
<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-1844 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "drchi064__s94010" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-CHI-94-064-S </AU>
Daily Report 
<DATE1>  8 Mar 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> REGIONAL WORK REPORTS </F>
<H3> <TI>   Tianjin Government Work Report Read at Congress </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Tianjin Government Work Report Read at Congress </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   SK1903125194 Tianjin TIANJIN RIBAO in Chinese 8 Mar 94 pp 1, 
2 </F>

<F P=103> SK1903125194 </F>
<F P=104>  Tianjin TIANJIN RIBAO </F>
<F P=105>  Chinese </F>


<TEXT>
BFN 

<F P=106> [Tianjin government work report delivered by Zhang Lichang, </F>
mayor of Tianjin Municipality, at the second session of the 12th 
municipal people's congress on 2 March: "Seize the Opportunity, 
Unite To Brave the Way Forward, and Create a New Situation in 
Reform, Opening up, and Development"] 
  [Text] Fellow deputies: 
  On behalf of the Tianjin Municipal People's Government, I 
will now present a government work report to this session for 
discussion. Members of the municipal committee of the Chinese 
People's Political Consultative Conference [CPPCC] and other 
personnel attending this session as observers please give 
opinions. 
<H5>  1. Review of the Past Year's Work </H5>
  The year 1993 was one in which we comprehensively 
implemented 
the guidelines of the 14th party congress and advanced 
triumphantly along the road of building socialism with Chinese 
characteristics. Under the leadership of the party Central 
Committee, the State Council, and the Tianjin Municipal party 
committee, the municipal people's government firmly relied on 
the people throughout the municipality, worked hard together, 
actively made progress, fulfilled the annual tasks defined at 
the first session of the 12th municipal people's congress fairly 
successfully, scored new achievements in reform, opening up, and 
economic development, and effected new changes in the work in 
all fields. 
  A. The national economy developed in a rapid and healthy 
manner. 
  Tianjin's GNP was expected at 50.3 billion yuan, an increase 
of 11.8 percent, which was the second highest annual growth rate 
since reform and opening up started. The industrial output 
value totaled 124.7 billion yuan, an increase of 24.5 percent, 
the marketing rate rose, economic efficiency picked up, the 
endeavor to end deficits and increase profits yielded good 
results, and deficits declined in terms of comparable standards. 
The rural economy developed in a sustained manner, and bumper 
grain harvest was won for the 10th year in succession. The 
production of meat, eggs, vegetables, milk, and aquatic products 
remained stable, their quality was improved, and their supplies 
were ample. Township enterprises maintained the trend of fairly 
high growth continuously. Urban and rural markets were 
thriving, with commodity retail sales increasing by 18.4 
percent; and the retail price index remained at a fairly low 
level among the 35 large and medium-sized cities in the country. 
Cargo loaded and unloaded at ports totaled 37.18 million 
tonnes, up 26.9 percent. Post and telecommunications, banking, 
insurance, and real estate businesses all registered fairly 
rapid development. Local revenue totaled 7.31 billion yuan, an 
increase of 21.8 percent, which was the largest annual increase 
in more than a decade. 
  B. Reform continued in various fields. 
  The methods to implement the "regulations on transforming 
the 
operating mechanism of the industrial enterprises owned by the 
whole people" and 26 supporting policy measures were issued. We 
gave approval to 25 new shareholding enterprises and limited 
liability companies to bring the total number to 58, and three 
of them had their shares listed. Over 60 percent of our 
commercial enterprises and over 1,000 rural collective 
enterprises switched to private management while retaining their 
state-owned status or became shareholding cooperatives. 
Individual and private economies continued to expand. We made 
an important step ahead of others in the country in extending 
the separation of tax payment from profit delivery in an 
all-round manner and in unifying the income tax rate. 
Construction of large markets was notably accelerated in the 
past couple of years, and 28 markets for iron and steel furnace 
charge, petrochemicals, coal, chemicals, textile raw materials, 
motor vehicles, and other means of production were built. 
Forty-one consumer goods markets were built last year. 
National trade fairs for rolled steel, building materials, and 
motor vehicles were held successfully. Our total amount of 
money lending in the monetary market ranked second in the 
country. Fifty securities institutions of various categories 
were approved. Labor service, technology, personnel, 
information, and real estate markets also made new headway. 
Coverage of old-age pension insurance and unemployment 
insurance was expanded, and social security upgraded. The 
government changed functions and improved work styles to form a 
system where work is handled by departments jointly and finished 
within a fixed time, and strengthened service to grass roots. 
  C. A good trend emerged in opening to the outside world. 
  The scope of foreign capital Tianjin used and the fields of 
investment were expanded continuously, and a number of 
well-known large international companies and consortia made 
investment vigorously. Contracts for 3,538 new foreign-funded 
enterprises of the three types, an increase of 118 percent, were 
signed; and the contracted amount of investment totaled $3.5 
billion, an increase of 82.5 percent, of which $2.25 billion 
would be made by foreign firms, an increase of 85 percent. The 
development of the development zone was accelerated, industrial 
output value, taxes, and profits doubled and redoubled, and 14 
of its indicators ranked first in all of the development zones 
in the country. The bonded zone developed rapidly, with 2,148 
enterprises approved and $1.06 billion worth of goods entering 
and leaving the zone. The construction of the 12 small zones 
entered a stage of substantial development. Construction of 
Tianjin's ports was notably accelerated, and their volume of 
imports and exports totaled $12.5 billion, an increase of 20 
percent. Tianjin's exports totaled $1.928 billion, an increase 
of 10.9 percent. Contracted overseas labor and tourism all 
witnessed growth. Lateral economic ties expanded continuously 
and domestic funds brought to Tianjin approached 1 billion yuan. 
  D. Construction of key projects proceeded smoothly. 
  Tianjin's investment in fixed assets totaled 22.43 billion 
yuan, up 32.1 percent. This breaks down into an increase in 
local investment of 42.3 percent, and 66.5 percent in the 
investment in equipment renewal and technical transformation 
66.5 percent. The progress of all the 55 key projects was up to 
the requirement, and 21 of them were completed or by and large 
completed. The seamless steel tube project began trial 
production, and a number of projects of joint investment with 
manufacturers of brand-name products in the world, such as 
Zanussi compressors, Honda motorcycles, and Samsung video 
recorders, completed smoothly. The no. 8 generating unit of the 
Junliangcheng Power Plant was fed into the power grid and began 
to generate power; the Beijing-Tianjin-Tanggu Expressway opened 
to traffic in all sections; the Tianjin port took the lead in 
the country in possessing the capacity to transport the fourth- 
generation container ships, and its construction of piers was 
completed. The sewage treatment plant with a daily capacity of 
400,000 tonnes was built and commissioned. The domestically 
advanced three-tier interlinked Wangdingdi overpass was 
completed at a high speed and in high quality to improve the 
traffic of this area; and the underground passage of the north 
station was successfully renovated to put an end to the 
long-standing traffic congestion and leakage on rainy days. The 
Jili Mansion and the commercial city of the development zone 
opened business. All these projects upgraded the city's 
function as a carrier, improved its investment climate, and 
enhanced its economic strength. 
  E. Science and technology, education, culture, and sports 
made new headway. 
  The principle of developing Tianjin through the application 
of science and technology was further implemented. We won 694 
new scientific and technological achievements, of which 67 
percent were put into production and application. Industrial 
enterprises produced 1,400 new products to increase their output 
value by 7.17 billion yuan, or 38.4 percent. Total income from 
technological and industrial undertakings and trade in the 
new-tech industrial park registered a 100-percent increase. 
Education developed continuously. We successfully held the 
municipal educational work conference, accelerated educational 
reform, and further increased the educational investment. The 
nine-year compulsory education was made universal in 95.5 
percent of the rural areas, and elimination of illiteracy among 
young and middle-aged people met state requirements. The 
educational structure and establishment of disciplines were 
improved upon. Sports undertakings were strengthened. 
Six-hundred eighty-nine hospital beds and a basic emergency 
medical network was established throughout the municipality. 
Family planning yielded notable results, with the birth rate 
and natural population growth lower than the state-assigned 
norms. Culture, sports, broadcasting, press, publications, and 
social sciences developed. Breakthroughs were made in film and 
television program production, and a number of them won prizes 
at home and abroad. 
  F. Living standard improved steadily. 
  The 20 practical jobs designed to improve urban and rural 
living standards set by the municipal government were all 
accomplished. New houses totaling 2.42 million square meters 
were built, an increase of 620,000 square meters over the 
preceding year; floor space equipped with heat supply systems 
increased by 2.1 million square meters; and households supplied 
with gas increased by 21,000. A number of major pollution 
sources were brought under control, tree-planting tasks 
fulfilled, and basic facilities for environmental protection 
strengthened, thus enabling Tianjin to maintain the title as one 
of the 10 most clean cities. Urban and rural people's income 
continued to increase. Urban people's per capita cost of living 
income was 2,579 yuan, up 5.4 percent when allowing for price 
rises; and rural people's per capita net income was 1,593 yuan, 
up 13 percent, and the per capita net income of poverty-stricken 
villages grew by 100 yuan. 
  By earnestly studying the socialist theory of Comrade Deng 
Xiaoping with regard to building socialism with Chinese 
characteristics and vigorously developing the pioneering spirit 
of the new historic period, governments at all levels paid 
attention all along to successfully building the spiritual 
civilization. The struggle against corruption was carried out 
in a down-to-earth manner and these governments scored 
periodical results in it. Leading cadres conducted self 
examination and correction in line with the five regulations of 
building administrative honesty and exercising self-discipline. 
A large number of major and appalling cases were investigated 
and handled, malpractices cropping up among various industries 
and trades were corrected, and 296 illegal charges were 
abolished. The municipality further enhanced the construction 
of democracy and legal systems; earnestly accepted the 
supervision over law enforcement, work, and democratic 
implementation; and implemented the procedural law of 
administration. These governments extensively solicited and 
listened to the opinions and suggestions raised by the deputies 
of the municipal people's congress and the members of the 
municipal CPPCC committee and broadened the exposure of the 
people's government work. They expanded the channel of making 
contacts with the masses by establishing a special telephone 
line and doing a good job in handling people's petition letters 
and visits. They also further enhanced the comprehensive 
management of public security and steadily maintained the 
honorary title of the municipality that is one of the regions 
across the country, which have been the best in social peace. 
  The municipality scored achievements and made progress in 
its 
work of 1993. However, it also suffered some problems and 
shortcomings. The economic results of a large number of 
enterprises were poor and the income of some staff members and 
workers was low. Progress in foreign trade and exports was not 
fast enough. The proportion of tertiary industrial enterprises 
was not high enough. The market scale required further expansion 
in the year. Some government personnel still indulged in 
formalism and bureaucracy and engaged in corrupt practices. 
Malpractices cropping up among various industries and trades 
still needed to be continuously and vigorously corrected in the 
year. We should pay great attention to these problems and 
earnestly resolve them. 
  Fellow deputies: Achievements scored in 1993 resulted from 
people throughout the municipality in doing pioneering work 
arduously and uniting as one in making progress, which can not 
be separated from the fine foundation laid over the long time, 
which are the embodiment of wisdom and energy of veteran 
comrades, and which benefit the predominantly favorable 
environment of the country as a whole. Hereby, on behalf of the 
municipality people's government, I would like to extend 
heartfelt thanks to various fronts; to workers, peasants, 
intellectuals, and public security cadres and policemen, who 
have industriously worked for the prosperity and development of 
the municipality; to all commanders and fighters of the Tianjin 
garrison district, the People's Liberation Army [PLA] units 
stationed in the municipality, and the armed police forces, who 
have shared weal and woe and worked side by side with the 
municipality; and to various democratic parties, industrial and 
commercial federations, nonparty personages, and mass 
organizations, who have shown utter devotion to and given full 
cooperation to the municipality. 
<H5>  2. The Work Guideline and Major Tasks of 1994 </H5>
  The sixth municipal party congress and the first session of 
the 12th municipal people's congress held in 1993 defined the 
general target of development for the coming period, in which 
the municipality should strive through its 20-year struggle to 
become one of the regions to take the lead in basically 
realizing modernizations. Economic development should be 
improved to the following two new levels: The municipality 
should fulfill the target originally set for the year 2000, of 
quadrupling 1980's GNP, by 1997. By 2010, the municipality 
should double the GNP again and build itself into a center of 
commerce, trade, and finance for north China; into a 
comprehensive industrial base with advanced technologies; and 
into a large city with modern international harbor facilities 
opening up to all directions of the world. To fulfill the 
aforementioned target, we feel that duties imposed on us in this 
regard are great and heavy. We must make efforts to work hard, 
to pioneer the road of advance, and to work out details for the 
target and tasks so as to enable leadership at all levels to 
sense the responsibility and pressure as well as to enable the 
people throughout the municipality to be hopeful and encouraged. 
Based on earnestly summarizing the experience gained in the 
practice over the years, and in line with the new situation and 
the desire of the people across the municipality, we have 
defined the following four targets for implementation: The 
municipality will exceed the target of quadrupling the GNP in 
three years by 1997 and maintain the annual average growth rate 
of 11 percent. In five or seven years, the municipality will 
basically fulfill the task of rebuilding the dangerous and 
shabby residential houses on a large scale and create conditions 
for realizing the per capita housing acreage of 8 square meters. 
In about eight years, the municipality will take reform as 
motivation to improve the state-owned large and medium-sized 
enterprises by conducting technological grafting, readjustment, 
and renovations. In about 10 years, the municipality will 
basically complete construction of a new coastal region. 
Simultaneously, we should regard the increase in the peasants' 
income as the focal point of agriculture and rural economic work 
and double the peasants' per capita income in the next five to 
seven years. These targets are related to one another. In 
making the economic work arrangements, we should lay emphasis on 
developing new areas and rebuilding old city proper. In regard 
to the priorities of development, we should attach importance to 
enlivening large and medium-sized state-owned enterprises and 
developing the rural economy. In regard to the relationship 
between production and livelihood, we should base ourselves on 
developing production and regard the improvement of the people's 
livelihood as a point to start with and conclude our work. To 
realize these targets, we should further deepen reform and 
expand the scale of opening up. We should not only grasp new 
economic growing points and accelerate the development of new 
economic areas but also grasp the reconstruction of old city 
proper and the transformation of old enterprises and accelerate 
the pace of readjusting and enlivening the existing enterprises. 
We should grasp the work of every year, make good strides, and 
be sure to make new changes every year and to make big changes 
in five years. 
  The year 1994 is a key year to maintain the good economic 
development trend as well as to promote reform. The basic 
principles governing the work of the whole party and the whole 
country in 1994, as set forth by the party Central Committee, 
are: Take Comrade Deng Xiaoping's theory on building socialism 
with Chinese characteristics and the basic line of the party as 
a guidance; comprehensively implement the 14th party congress 
and the third plenary session of the 14th party Central 
Committee; accelerate the setup of the socialist market economic 
system; maintain fast, sustained, and sound development of the 
national economy; safeguard political stability; and 
comprehensively promote social progress. The overall work 
situation of the whole party and the whole country is as 
follows: Grasp favorable opportunities to deepen reform, expand 
the scale of opening up, promote development, and maintain 
stability. All of our work should submit to and serve this 
overall situation. It is necessary to grasp the relationship 
among reform, development, and stability. We should 
conscientiously implement the tasks as set forth at the second 
(enlarged) plenary session of the sixth municipal party 
committee. All localities, departments, and trades and 
professions should foster the sense of high urgency and the 
sense of high responsibility; keep forging ahead; and attain 
high standards, high efficiency, high quality, and high 
benefits. Major economic targets should be better than those of 
last year. New headway should be made in the work in various 
spheres. The major economic and social development targets and 
tasks are as follows: The national economy should develop in a 
sustained, fast, and smooth manner. The municipality should 
ensure a 9-percent increase of the GNP and strive to register a 
12-percent increase in order to attain the requirements for 
fulfilling the quadrupling target three years ahead of schedule. 
The local revenues should increase by over 15 percent if 
calculated in terms of comparable items. It is necessary to 
further deepen reform. According to the state unified 
arrangements, we should positively organize forces to implement 
the major measures for reforming the financial and tax, 
monetary, investment, planning, foreign trade, and price 
systems; accelerate the change of the state enterprise 
mechanisms; explore effective ways for setting up the modern 
enterprise system; focus on cultivating the markets for 
production factors; expand the scale of markets; and enhance the 
influential power. We should make a breakthrough in opening to 
the outside world. The amount of foreign capital that are 
really used should increase by over 29 percent and the foreign 
export trade volume should increase by 14 percent. People's 
livelihood should greatly improve. The increase in the urban 
and rural residents' income should be higher than that of last 
year. The municipality should set a historical record in 
building urban residential houses. A total of 3.6 million 
square meters of houses should be completed during the year. A 
stable social environment should be created for reform and 
development. 
  Fellow deputies! Our development goals are grand, and 
tasks arduous. To attain these goals, we should have a correct 
understanding and control of the situation. It will become a 
general trend for some time after the 14th party congress and 
the third plenary session of the 14th party Central Committee to 
promote the establishment of the socialist market economy system 
in an all-round manner, deepen reform, open wider to the outside 
world, and facilitate development. Development throughout the 
country, especially in coastal areas, is very fast, and some 
medium-sized cities are rapidly rising. The situation is 
spurring us on. As China's important coastal open city, Tianjin 
should and can develop faster in compliance with the 
requirements of the central authorities. It has great 
potential. Since reform and opening up started, it has effected 
profound changes in all economic and social undertakings and 
notably enhanced its economic strength. It has notably 
accelerated its reform and opening up over the past two years 
and created a trend of rapid and healthy development in the 
economy. A number of old enterprises have transformed their 
mechanisms, increased their vigor, and become more adaptable to 
the market. This should be attributed to the foundation we have 
laid over the past many years. Cadres and the masses in the 
municipality have a high spirit and morale to change the outlook 
of their hometowns as soon as possible. All this provides a 
favorable condition and foundation for us to achieve better 
development. 
  Of course, we should also remain clear-headed to note the 
numerous contradictions and difficulties on our road of 
advancement and the possible factors difficult to predict. 
However, favorable conditions can be transformed into 
unfavorable ones, and vice versa. Favorable conditions depend on 
our efforts to apply and create; and unfavorable conditions 
depend on our efforts to transform and overcome. With same 
conditions and difficulties, all work depends on human efforts. 
The key to whether Tianjin can create a new situation and 
achieve faster development lies in our mindset, morale, 
determination, and work level. In short, our reform and 
development are faced with a golden opportunity, and favorable 
conditions are the main stream. Such a good historical 
opportunity is rare and extremely valuable. Time and tide wait 
for no one. As long as we firmly rely on the people throughout 
the municipality, emancipate our mind more, and work harder, we 
will be able to attain our goals! 
<H5>  3. Maintain Sustained, Rapid, and Healthy Economic </H5>
Development 
  The basic way to accelerate development lies in reform and 
opening up. We should properly handle the relationship between 
quantity and quality and between growth rate and efficiency in 
line with the law governing economic development, make great 
efforts to restructure the economy, promote technological 
advance, and conscientiously channel economic work to the track 
focusing on improving economic efficiency. 
  A. We should deepen reform to invigorate the existing amount 
of the economy. 
  To achieve faster development, we should focus on deepening 
the reform of state-owned enterprises, add impetus to the 
reform, transform the mechanism more rapidly, devote more 
efforts to invigorating the existing amount of the economy, 
ensure that state-owned assets maintain and increase their 
value, and fully develop the potential of large and medium-sized 
state-owned enterprises. 
  First, we should comprehensively deepen enterprise reform, 
continue to thoroughly implement the "enterprise law" and the 
"regulations," and make sure that enterprises have 
responsibilities, powers, and profits. We should achieve 
success in the reform of the three systems within enterprises 
and make more than 80 percent of the state-owned enterprises 
meet the requirements for transforming the operating mechanism. 
We should make arrangements for 180 large and medium-sized 
state-owned enterprises to conduct multiform reform of the 
property right system and select 30 enterprises to try out the 
modern enterprise system. Small state-owned enterprises may be 
managed on a contract or leasing basis, reorganized into 
shareholding enterprises, or sold to collectives or individuals. 
While promoting reform, all enterprises should attach importance 
to management and master skills to increase efficiency and 
improve enterprise quality to become more adaptable to the 
market and more competitive. 
  Second, it is necessary to combine reform with grafting 
transformation, readjustment, and reorganization. We should 
apply different methods to solve different enterprises' major 
problems and make sure that the remedy suits the case. The 
enterprises with good economic results, wide markets, and 
prospects for development should exert efforts to expand the 
scale of development and upgrade their quality. The enterprises 
with ordinary efficiency should exert efforts to renew their 
equipment and technology and to develop readily marketable 
products. Money-losing enterprises should exert efforts to 
enliven themselves separately, halt deficits, and increase 
profits. At present, money-losing enterprises should ensure the 
basic income of its staff and workers. The enterprises that 
suffer long-term losses and whose assets cannot cover the debts 
should declare bankruptcy according to laws. The municipality 
should delegate as soon as possible the rights to managing the 
enterprises that the municipality find it inconvenient for 
management and that the districts are not willing to manage. 
This year, we should comprehensively accelerate the pace of 
grafting transformation. All enterprises, no matter what sizes 
they are and no matter how many economic results they can 
create, can be developed so long as foreign traders are willing 
and we can gain benefits. We should have a number of large and 
medium-sized enterprises establish contacts with foreign 
businessmen. By conducting grafting transformation, we should 
solve problems related to capital, technology, products, and 
sales; change mechanisms; and promote enterprise management. 
  Third, it is necessary to positively encourage trades and 
industries to shift lines of operation. This year, we should be 
determined to adopt effective measures, including necessary 
administrative methods; guide and promote enterprises to break 
the bounds of trades; and carry out the method that trades and 
industries shift the lines of operation. Particularly, the 
enterprises that are located in the "golden" areas and fail to 
create good economic results should be encouraged to shift the 
lines of production and to develop a diversified economy. All 
enterprises should go into action, determine their course of 
action according to market demands, and liberate themselves. 
  Fourth, we should accelerate the reform of the social 
security system. We should continue to expand the scale of 
unified social arrangements, upgrade socialized progress of 
insurance for the aged, expand the extent of insurance coverage 
for the unemployed, and have insurance cover the staff and 
workers of private enterprises. We should further reform the 
current system of medical treatment with public funds and labor 
insurance, and further reform the insurance process for 
job-related injuries, and create conditions for state- owned 
enterprises to change their mechanisms. It is necessary to 
accelerate urban housing reform and set up, in a step-by-step 
manner, a new system of commercializing the houses dominated by 
market regulation and supplemented by social guarantees. 
  B. We should comprehensively enliven the construction of the 
new coastal area. 
  Cultivating new economic growing points is a key way for 
developing incremental and increasing aggregates. At the time 
of vigorously developing new high-tech industries, town and 
township enterprises, three types of foreign-funded enterprises, 
collective enterprises, and private and individual sectors of 
the economy, we should concentrate energy on building the new 
coastal area, accelerate the pace of development and opening up, 
and create some new economic advantages. 
  With the accumulated efforts of the municipal party 
committee 
and the municipal government, the ideas of accelerating the 
construction of the new coastal area have matured. The general 
ideas are as follows: Take Tianjin Harbor, development zone, 
and bonded area as a framework; take metallurgical industry and 
chemical industry as a foundation; have commerce and trade, 
banking trade, and tourist trade vie with one another for 
development; and form a new, highly opened, modernized, economic 
zone with new industries and the export-oriented economy playing 
a dominant role, with the free harbor area as an orientation 
area of development, with complete sets of infrastructural 
facilities, with complete sets of service functions, and with 
the capability to cater to the 21st century. Through the 
development and construction in the next 10 years or so, we 
should have the new area's GNP and foreign exchange earnings 
from exports account for more than 40 percent of the 
municipality's total. Along with the gradual realization of 
this target, we will be able to create conditions to 
rehabilitate and revitalize the old enterprises and to create a 
situation where the old city proper supports the new area, the 
new area promotes the development of the old city proper, and 
both the new area and the old city proper make common 
development. 
  We should make a unified plan to develop and construct the 
new coastal area, implement the plan in a step-by-step manner, 
mobilize the enthusiasm of all fronts and concentrate energy to 
rapidly develop the new area, ensure that the new area's GNP 
will increase by more than 20 percent annually, and make it the 
fastest area of economic development in Tianjin. First, we 
should accelerate harbor construction and carry out in an 
overall way the construction of docks for energy resources. We 
should also accelerate the construction of Nanjiang bridge and 
basically fulfill the task of doing the earth work for the 
sewage disposal center project. We should increase the 
capability of loading and unloading international containers to 
more than 500,000 containers per annum and the annual loading 
and unloading volume of the harbor to over 40 million tonnes. 
We should build Tianjin Harbor into a first-grade one for the 
country. Second, we should promote the fast development of 
economic development zones and bonded zones. The development 
zones should continuously broaden their operation of inviting 
business, further raise funds for development, realize their 
industrial output value of 11 billion yuan, and continuously 
maintain their leading positions in various economic targets in 
the country. The bonded zones should accelerate the 
construction of the second-phase development projects and 
vigorously develop international trade by drawing on the methods 
of international free trade to promote the connection between 
domestic and foreign markets. They should also foster the 
auxiliary service system among storage, transport, and 
processing so as to build themselves as soon as possible into a 
showcase of north China in international trades. Third, we 
should do a good job in building heavy and chemical industrial 
zones. The original enterprises in this regard should be 
improved to a new level. The pace of new projects under 
construction should be accelerated. Hereafter, in formulating 
key industrial projects we should merge these projects with 
those in the heavy and chemical industrial zones in principle. 
Old enterprises located downtown, which require renovation, 
should accelerate their production merger with the projects in 
these zones. Fourth, we should accelerate the construction of 
infrastructures. By making full use of funds in various fields, 
we should ensure the construction of the overpass on Xinhua 
street in Tanggu district, the Tianjin highway section on the 
Shan-Guang highway, the Gang-Tang highway. We should build the 
heating and power plant, water plant, and the project of 
diverting the Luanhe water to Hangu district as soon as possible 
in the development zones. Efforts should be made to actively 
seek foreign funds to build the express highway between the 
downtown area and the new coastal region. In line with the 
development of the new coastal region, we should accelerate the 
construction of the communications network among maritime, land, 
and air transportations. 
  C. We should broaden the utilization of foreign funds in all 
directions. 
  Being a coastal, open city, Tianjin Municipality must 
successfully concentrate its efforts on opening itself to both 
fraternal provinces and foreign countries so as to foster a 
situation in opening up in various fields, at the high level, 
and in all directions. 
  We should utilize foreign capital on a large scale. We have 
fostered an upsurge in utilizing foreign capital this year so 
that we could take the advantage to make progress and to 
accelerate the utilization in this regard. We should chiefly 
make great and important progress in directly utilizing foreign 
capital and also actively broaden the channels of seeking 
government loans, the loans of international financial 
organizations, and credit offered by foreign countries for 
exports. As long as they conform with the state policies, all 
primary, secondary, and tertiary industry enterprises in various 
fields are welcome to seek these loans for their large, 
medium-sized, and small projects and will be allowed these loans 
with the adoption of cooperative measures. In particular, we 
should firmly grasp loans for the basic industries that will 
make use of an imported technology so as to promote the 
production of a large number of plants and make efforts from top 
to bottom to ensure the loans for the key projects of building 
infrastructures. We should regard the volume of introduced 
foreign capital and of used foreign capital as well as the 
benefits exerted by the foreign capital that is introduced as a 
yardstick measuring the work done by the departments concerned 
in this regard. 
  We should vigorously create a new situation in foreign trade 
and exports. Efforts should be made to deepen reform in the 
system of foreign trade, to accelerate the structural 
readjustment of export commodities, and to upgrade the standard 
of intensive processing. We should also increase the export 
proportion of machinery and electric commodities and support the 
enterprises that are exporting their products on a large scale. 
Efforts should be made to actively open markets of multiple 
categories, to do a good job in sponsoring a China export trade 
fair in Tianjin, to develop enterprises established in outside 
places, to broaden the fields of sales in various industries and 
trade, to expand the export standardization of Tianjin export 
harbor, and to bring into full play the municipal harbor's role 
of linking Europe and Asia. We should vigorously increase 
incomes earned from the non-trade business, expand labor 
migration and contracts for construction projects in foreign 
countries, and develop the undertakings of tourism as well as of 
ocean shipping and air cargo that can earn foreign exchanges. 
  We should vigorously improve the investment environment. 
Various social circles, every department, and every resident 
across the municipality should set an example in this regard and 
regard the work of making business more convenient for foreign 
businessmen as their work emphasis. On the premise of mutual 
benefits and interest, we should not fear the money-making of 
foreign businessmen but should be able to account for it in an 
overall way as well as to have benefits in mind. We should 
persist in the methods of coordinated service and all-embracing 
service stations to provide quick and highly efficient service. 
Based on the opinions of most foreign firms, we should revise 
and improve policies in a timely manner to promote the 
development of more projects, but we will never force the 
projects to start when conditions are harsh. We should continue 
to send people out and invite people in; take advantage of 
various channels and opportunities more successfully to 
extensively publicize Tianjin and make it better known; make 
friends with others widely; and bring in investment from abroad. 
In particular, we should attach importance to developing the 
role of influential persons and large companies and consortia 
throughout the world in bringing in funds from abroad and strive 
to turn Tianjin into the most attractive place for investors. 
  We should play the "service card" well. Tianjin's opening is 
multi-directional, and its service should be as well. People 
all over the municipality should embrace a strong sense of 
service. We should do a good job both in opening to the outside 
world and in serving domestic places; serve both the areas 
around the Bohai Bay and the areas in north, northeast, and 
northwest China; and serve both central departments and other 
provinces and municipalities. Meanwhile, we should also serve 
the offices of other localities stationed in Tianjin. We should 
open Tianjin's door wide, win a good reputation and bring in 
more information, personnel, and funds with first-rate service, 
and promote cooperation and achieve development in service. 
  D. We should accelerate the cultivation and development of 
the market system. 
  To develop Tianjin's role as an economic center, we should 
cultivate large markets, develop large-scale commodity 
distribution, and speed up construction of a center for 
commerce, trade, and finance. We should consider the 
cultivation and development of the market an important part of 
the government's endeavors to change functions and serve 
enterprises and place it in a more prominent position. We 
should further adopt preferential policies and effective 
measures to consolidate and develop existing trade markets, 
expand their business scope, and improve their trade environment 
to form a greater climate. We should build another group of 
markets for essential elements of production and open some 
futures exchange centers on a trial basis. We should 
continuously expand the scope and categories of various types of 
securities to provide favorable conditions for opening the third 
stock exchange in the country. We should make active efforts to 
prepare for the establishment of the gold exchange center. We 
should step up construction of the northern property rights 
exchange market, technology exchange market, and personnel 
market geared to the entire country. In coordination with the 
renovation of the old city proper, we should expand and improve 
the real estate market. We should strive to build another group 
of large trade markets. We should actively develop the various 
kinds of intermediary service organizations; make the national 
spring commodity trade fair and national rolled steel trade fair 
successful; and strengthen the monitoring, regulation and 
control, and management of the market. Meanwhile, we should 
strive to develop transportation, post, telecommunication, 
information consultation, catering service, tourism, and 
recreational undertakings to make Tianjin more vigorous and 
prosperous. 
  E. We should pay attention to construction of key projects. 
  To promote its economy to a new height, Tianjin should 
strive 
to establish a number of pillar industries and produce a number 
of highly competitive products that are of a large scale and 
high level and that hold a large share in the market in order to 
increase its competitive edges and capacity for sustained 
development. We should step up the "222" project [The project 
in which Tianjin focuses on the automobile industrial 
corporation, the steel tube company, and 20 municipal-level key 
enterprises, and in which various bureaus, districts, and 
counties focus on 200 key enterprises]. We should establish the 
capacity to produce 150,000 Xiali-brand cars a year and make the 
seamless steel tube project meet the designed capacity as soon 
as possible so as to gain better returns on investments. 
Construction in the ethylene and polyester projects should be 
expedited. The production of 20 key products, such as program- 
controlled exchanges, video recorders, engineering machines, 
metal products, and chemical fibers, should be expanded and 
upgraded so as to improve efficiency. We should actively 
support the development of petroleum, chemical, and other 
enterprises stationed in Tianjin. Light industry, textile 
industry, medical industry, and building material industry 
should be restructured and renovated with imported technology 
and funds according to established priorities, and we should 
make sure that good results are achieved after every 
restructuring. All districts, counties, and bureaus should also 
direct attention to their own key projects. 
  It is necessary to accelerate the construction of urban 
infrastructure. This year, we should ensure that the whole 
inner-ring road be joined, build four new overpasses, and expand 
and rebuild a number of roads to clear up traffic congestion. 
It is necessary to make good preparations for the pre-phase 
project of diverting water from south to north. We should 
continue to build the second-phase project of Xinkaihe water 
works, accelerate the construction of Jixian power plant and 
Chentangzhuang thermal power plant, install 450,000 urban 
telephone lines, positively arrange the construction of the no. 
3 coal gas plant, and ensure the completion of projects for 
supplying heat for 3 million square meters of houses. It is 
necessary to accelerate the development of a group of projects 
that have been signed, including Huaxin Commercial Building, 
Yongji Garden, Fuyu Square, and Hechuan Building. Some 700,000 
square meters of commercial areas will be built during the year. 
  F. We should ceaselessly expand the rural economy. 
  We should comprehensively implement the central authorities' 
"policy measures for developing agriculture and the rural 
economy," take the increase of the peasants' income as the main 
target, strengthen agriculture's role as the foundation of the 
national economy, and make faster development in the rural 
economy. We should vigorously improve the agricultural 
production conditions and upgrade the overall agricultural 
production capability. It is necessary to speed up the 
readjustment of the agricultural structure and develop 
high-yield, good-quality, and high-efficiency agriculture. We 
should pay high attention to the "vegetable basket" project, 
increase the varieties of products, upgrade the quality of 
products, and expand the scale of production. 
  It is necessary to improve the production bases for 
foodstuffs. Governments at various levels should vigorously 
increase the input to agriculture and exert great efforts to 
achieve the construction of farmland water conservancy projects 
and the basic service system. It is necessary to enhance the 
disaster-fighting capability, to strictly bring the occupation 
of cultivated areas under control, to accelerate the development 
of town and township enterprises, to deepen internal reform, to 
clearly define property rights, to keep flexible mechanisms, to 
gradually set up dominant industries and dominant products, and 
to form regional economic advantages. We should increase, by a 
big margin, the proportion of the export-oriented economy, 
accelerate the construction of 12 small development zones, and 
expand the capability of creating foreign exchange through 
exports. It is necessary to accelerate the construction of 
small, modern towns. This year, we should first build 10 
central towns on a trial basis and gradually form a system of 
reasonably-distributed small towns of different scales and with 
different special features. It is necessary to accelerate the 
construction of comparatively well-off villages. The villages 
that have become comparatively well-off should upgrade their 
standards. Those that approach the level of being comparatively 
well-off should accelerate the pace of development. We should 
concentrate energy to help the small number of poor villages and 
have them free themselves from poverty within fixed time. The 
per capita net income of the rural people in the municipality 
should increase by over 200 yuan per annum. 
  G. We should promote the combination of science and 
technology with the economy. 
  Science and technology are the first productive forces. 
Under the market economic conditions, commodity competition is 
essentially technology competition. We must exert efforts to 
accelerate technological progress and to increase technological 
contents. We should further implement the principle of relying 
on science and technology to rejuvenate the municipality, deepen 
the reform of the scientific and technological system, apply the 
market mechanism, take science and technological as a guide, and 
cultivate new economic growing points. It is necessary to grasp 
the "10 billion" project dominated by industrializing new 
high-tech; to comprehensively develop 20 key scientific and 
technological projects; to assimilate, absorb, and blaze new 
trails in advanced technologies; to accelerate the development 
and application of new products; and to popularize agricultural 
experimental projects. We should accelerate the construction of 
new technological industrial gardens; bring into play our 
advantages of scientific research organizations being 
concentrated and having a good new high-tech foundation and 
strong research and developing abilities; positively use foreign 
capital; and make great progress in jointly and cooperatively 
developing scientific and technological projects and new 
industries. It is necessary to set up the scientific and 
technological service system and grasp the construction of 
scientific and technological cooperation centers and 
technological exchange centers. It is necessary to bring into 
full play the functions of the institutions of higher learning, 
including Nankai University and Tianjin University; the 
scientific research units stationed in Tianjin, and the 
scientific research organizations attached to the municipality. 
We should positively support the commercialization and 
industrialization of key scientific and technological findings. 
We should further strengthen the cooperation with the 
scientific research institutions and universities of Beijing and 
brotherly provinces and municipalities and extensively attract 
outstanding science professionals and technicians at home and 
abroad. We should further foster the social practice of 
respecting knowledge and skilled persons, bringing the 
intellectuals' role in reform, opening up, and modernization 
into full play. 
  H. We should accelerate renovations of dangerous, shabby, 
one-story houses. 
  There are many dangerous, shabby one-story houses in 
Tianjin, 
and a considerable amount of people still live in such houses. 
In some houses, three generations live under the same roof, and 
they suffer from leaky roofs on rainy days and suffer from cold 
in winter. Going all out to solve this problem is an unshirkable 
duty of governments at all levels. Renovating dangerous, 
shabby, one-story houses will not only directly benefit the 
masses but will also help improve urban traffic conditions, help 
rebuild old city proper, and help develop the tertiary industry. 
It will provide more job opportunities for urban residents, and 
make urban areas more civilized. This is good and will event 
benefit many sides. This year is the first year to carry out 
the goal of rebuilding all dangerous, shabby, one-story houses 
in five to seven years. We must win in the very first battle. 
Six urban districts must strive to set a high record in the 
fields of removing old houses, renovating houses, and completing 
construction of houses. Within this year, efforts should be 
made to complete the building of 2.795 million square meters of 
houses. We should mobilize the initiative of all fields to 
raise funds through every possible means. In particular, we 
should actively utilize foreign funds. We should make overall 
arrangement and reasonable layout in line with the overall urban 
construction plan. Designs should be advanced and applicable, 
construction should be meticulous, and quality should be 
guaranteed to satisfy the masses. We should rebuild houses in 
strict accordance with policies, make the construction situation 
visible to the public, do away with unhealthy trends, curb all 
sorts of expenses, and try our best to reduce the burdens on 
enterprises and the masses. 
<H5>  4. Strive To Promote the Development of Social Undertakings </H5>
  In the course of accelerating reform, opening up, and 
economic construction, we must go all out to build the socialist 
spiritual civilization and develop various social undertakings, 
as demanded by the principle of taking a two-handed approach and 
being tough with both hands, in an effort to maintain the 
coordinated development of the economy and society and promote 
the all-round progress of society. 
  A. We should make great efforts to bring educational 
undertakings to a new height. 
  To invigorate Tianjin and education, we should 
conscientiously implement the "China's Programs for Educational 
Reform and Development" and Tianjin's "opinions on educational 
reform and education" and put education in a strategic position 
of development on a priority basis. This year, the basic 
education should be aimed at accomplishing the task of making 
the nine-year compulsory education universal and at 
consolidating the achievements in wiping out illiteracy. The 
secondary vocational education should be devoted to training a 
large number of specialized talents of various kinds and skilled 
laborers. The higher education should be geared to the demand 
of Tianjin's economic and social development and should be aimed 
at readjusting structure and layout, at building a number of key 
subjects, and at training a number of top qualified persons. 
Adult education should be devoted to continuously improving the 
quality of workers, with emphasis on personal training. We 
should accelerate the reform of educational structure and 
gradually establish an open and diversified system of running 
schools through the common efforts of various circles in 
society, with the government operation as the mainstay. The 
system of having headmasters of primary and middle schools 
assume responsibility for running schools should be actively 
popularized. A good external condition should be created for 
developing education. To this end, the proportion of 
educational allocations in the total financial expenditure 
should be raised to 19 percent, and additional educational 
allocations in urban areas should be raised to 3 percent. 
School-run enterprises should be developed to enhance the 
schools' ability of replenishing their own educational expenses. 
The whole society should pay attention to and give support to 
the basic education. We should conscientiously implement the 
"law on teachers," strengthen the building of the ranks of 
teachers, and safeguard teachers' treatment according to law in 
order to form a good atmosphere of respecting teachers and 
valuing education. 
  B. We should vigorously strengthen ideological and cultural 
construction. 
  We should arm all the people in the municipality with the 
theory of building a socialism with Chinese characteristics. We 
should do research on theories in philosophy and social 
sciences. We should firmly and unremittingly conduct education 
on patriotism, collectivism, and socialism. Heroic and model 
figures on all fronts should be commended on a large scale to 
inspire the workers' sense of being the masters of the country. 
Efforts should be made to strengthen the education on 
professional ethics and social ethics to form a good atmosphere 
of forging ahead in a healthy manner and making active progress. 
  We should continue to uphold the orientation of serving 
socialism and serving the people and the principle of "letting a 
hundred flowers blossom and a hundred schools of thought 
contend," inherit and carry forward the Chinese nation's 
outstanding culture, and learn from the achievements of the 
advanced civilizations of the world. We should greatly develop 
literature and art, press and publications, radio and 
television, and other cultural undertakings, uphold correct 
guidance of media, and make the cultural market thrive. We 
should exert active efforts to promote the reform of the 
cultural system, increase the investment in cultural 
undertakings, carry out the activities to build the "districts 
and counties with advanced community culture," strengthen the 
basic work for the culture of the masses, and improve the 
cultural networks at the municipal, district, and county levels. 
We should actively expand cultural cooperation and exchanges 
with foreign countries and do a good job in the protection, 
development, and utilization of scenic spots and historical 
sites to serve Tianjin's endeavors to open wider to the outside 
world and develop tourism. 
  C. We should actively prepare to host the world table tennis 
games. 
  The 43d world table tennis games will be the largest 
international sports event with far-reaching influence ever held 
by Tianjin and a major event in the social life of the people in 
the municipality. It will play an important role in displaying 
the outlook of Tianjin people and the achievements in its 
reform, opening up, and economic construction and in making 
Tianjin better known. Preparations for it will enter a crucial 
stage this year. People across the municipality should work 
actively, carry out extensive activities to "build a civilized 
city and be civilized citizens," and be a successful host to win 
honor for the state and for Tianjin. Construction of various 
facilities should be conscientiously built well, and the sports 
center, international radio and television news center, and 
satellite ground station should be built. Hotels should be 
built or rebuilt so that we will have full capacity to receive 
guests. We should actively and successfully raise funds through 
various measures and channels. We should step up efforts to 
improve the environment, do a good job in the greening the city 
and make it clean, conduct education on civility and politeness, 
improve service, and strive to turn Tianjin into a city good in 
caring for the environment, service, and order. We should do a 
good job in hosting the 12th Asian table tennis games and the 
eighth municipal sports games, and further facilitate Tianjin's 
sports development. 
  D. We should continue with the good job in family planning 
and public health. 
  We should pay close attention to and achieve success in 
family planning, which is a major event concerning the overall 
situation in economic construction and social development. We 
should strengthen supervision over food hygiene and hygiene in 
public facilities, do a good job in the prevention and treatment 
of frequently occurring, contagious, and endemic diseases, and 
prevent serious epidemic. We should improve medical service and 
emergency-aid networks to make it more convenient for the people 
to see a doctor. We should persist in the combination of 
Chinese traditional medicine with western medicine, hold 
vocational training, strengthen medical research work, and 
strive to raise the level of medical service. We should also do 
a good job in rural cooperative medical work. 
  E. We should strive to create a good public security 
environment. 
  With a high spirit of responsibility, governments at all 
levels should defend the political and social stability 
throughout the municipality and continue to maintain Tianjin's 
leading position in the country in public security. They should 
organize forces to deal strict blows to serious criminal 
activities and wage special struggles, resolutely crack down on 
serious criminal activities according to law, strictly 
investigate and handle major and serious cases, and punish, 
according to the law, those guilty of economic crimes. We 
should make unremitting efforts to "wipe out pornography" and 
"eliminate the six vices." We should implement the "regulations 
of Tianjin Municipality on comprehensive management of public 
security," rely on the concerted efforts of the masses, advocate 
courage to defend a just cause, and establish a good social 
practice. We should further improve public security contingents 
and raise the political and vocational quality of cadres and 
policemen so that they uphold the sacred mission of safeguarding 
social security. 
  The People's Liberation Army [PLA] and the armed police 
force are the strong pillars of reform, opening up, and 
modernization. Governments at all levels should actively 
support the work of the PLA units in Tianjin, actively conduct 
activities on supporting the army, giving preferential treatment 
to families of revolutionary martyrs and servicemen, supporting 
the government, and cherishing the people, deeply conduct 
education on national defense, enhance the sense of national 
defense of all the people, do a good job in building people's 
air defense projects, and give full play to the important role 
of PLA units stationed in Tianjin and soldiers of the militia 
reserve service in economic construction and in safeguarding 
social security. 
<H5>  5. We Should Further Strengthen the Building of Government </H5>
  Governments at all levels have to shoulder heavy 
responsibilities to realize Tianjin's development objectives and 
fulfill this year's arduous tasks, therefore, they must 
realistically strengthen self-development. Leading cadres at 
all levels should renew their concepts, cultivate greater 
courage and vigor, promote the pioneering spirit of the new 
period, and lead the broad masses of cadres to create a new 
situation in reform, opening up, and development. 
  We must uphold the ideological line of emancipating the mind 
and seeking truth from facts, continue to deeply study volume 
no.3 of the "Selected Works of Deng Xiaoping," enhance 
consciousness and steadfastness in implementing the party's 
basic line, uphold the "three criteria," thoroughly free 
ourselves from the shackle of ossified and old concepts, and 
boldly practice and blaze new trials. It is necessary to further 
implement the important directive given by Comrade Deng Xiaoping 
during his inspection of Tianjin on "being bolder and striving 
for more rapid development," act freely on what we think is 
conducive to Tianjin's development, and never disappoint the 
heavy trust of the party and the people of the municipality. 
  We should actively conduct organizational reform and 
realistically change the government functions. Governments at 
all levels should further simplify administration and delegate 
powers with the spirit of "giving less intervention but more 
services," and do more practical things for enterprises. All 
powers that are clearly defined for delegating to the lower 
levels must be in place. We must give all decisionmaking powers 
to enterprises that should be given to them, let the markets 
solve their own problems, reduce procedures while handling 
things which we should manage in an all-round manner, raise 
working efficiency, and realistically manage all things well. 
Reform of the administrative management system and organizations 
should be actively promoted in line with the principles of 
separating government functions from enterprise management, 
simplifying structures, and promoting unity and efficiency, and 
in accordance with the central plans. In all levels of state 
administrative organs, we should comprehensively promote the 
public service system, further improve the relationship between 
the municipality and various districts and counties, and give 
full play to the role of districts and counties in developing 
the economy and all social undertakings. 
  We should quicken our tempo to seek high efficiency and 
creatively carry out our work. Leading cadres at all levels 
should have the sense of urgency and mission to invigorate 
Tianjin, accelerate our pace in carrying out all tasks, strive 
to scale the height, and be the first. We should prepare to 
accomplish several things with strenuous efforts, go deeply to 
the reality and the masses to conduct investigation and study, 
keep our eyes inward to find out where we are lagging behind, 
keep our eyes downward to serve the lower levels, pay attention 
to unity, denotation, the overall situation, and discipline, 
give encouraging talks, and make efforts to boost the enthusiasm 
of the people. It is necessary to comprehensively promote the 
work target responsibility system, and make the people feel the 
pressure on their shoulders, all levels have responsibilities, 
each level to grasp the work of the next level, do a lot of 
thinking on their work, and never delay their work. Before 
making policy decisions on things related to the overall 
situation, we may air our views. But when the decisions are 
decided, we must resolutely implement them and guarantee that 
all government orders will be smoothly carried out. At present, 
the situation is pressing, and we have no way to retreat. We 
should allow no delay, no obstacles to running when we are on 
track, and no obstacles to strictly enforcing orders or 
prohibitions. 
  We should pay attention to democracy and the legal system. 
Governments at all levels should further promote democracy and 
the legal system, conscientiously safeguard the democratic 
rights of the masses of people in their political, economic, and 
social life, establish and improve a democratic, and scientific 
policymaking system, prudently listen to opinions from all 
sectors, pool the wisdom of all, and enhance the policymaking 
level. We should conscientiously implement the relevant 
resolutions and decisions of the people's congresses and their 
standing committees, actively handle the motions, suggestions, 
criticism, and opinions raised by deputies, and consciously 
receive legal supervision and work supervision from the people's 
congresses of corresponding levels. We should give full play to 
the role of the CPPCC in political consultation and democratic 
supervision, respect the opinions of democratic parties, the 
federation of industry and commerce, people's organizations, and 
personages without party affiliation on the administration of 
government and state affairs, and make sure that consultation is 
conducted before decisions are made on major issues. We should 
fully develop the role of mass organizations, such as trade 
unions, the Communist Youth League, and women's federation, as 
bridges and channels. We should strengthen grass-roots 
democratic politics and improve the democratic management of 
enterprises and the systems of neighborhood committees and 
villagers' committees. We should conscientiously implement the 
party's policies on nationalities, religions, Taiwan affairs, 
and Overseas Chinese affairs. The government should do a good 
job in establishing the legal system, step up efforts to draft a 
number of local laws and regulations, actively formulate the 
government rules, and strive to use the legal means to manage 
the economy and society. All government personnel should 
perform official duties according to law and resolutely correct 
the phenomenon in which laws are not abided by or strictly 
enforced and law violations are not investigated. We should 
strengthen and improve the supervision of law enforcement by 
administrative departments, improve the contingents of 
law-enforcement personnel, and perfect legal service 
institutions. We should conduct in-depth education on 
disseminating laws to raise people's awareness of laws and the 
legal system. 
  We should conscientiously intensify the building of a clean 
government. Persistent struggles against numerous corrupt 
phenomena is the basic task of government building and an 
important guarantee for the smooth progress of reform and 
development. Governments at all levels should attach great 
importance to it and make it successful. All government 
personnel are only obligated to being honest and diligent in 
serving the people and never abusing power for personal gains. 
They should never do what the masses do not like and should 
always be the first to do what they ask the lower levels to do. 
We should establish and improve the mechanisms of supervision 
and restraint to ensure honesty, strengthen auditing and 
supervisory work, prevent and eliminate corrupt phenomena, and 
never allow trade of money with power. Leaders at all levels 
should take the lead in honesty and self-restraint and take the 
initiative in resisting unhealthy trends. Major cases on 
embezzlement, bribe- taking, and serious dereliction of duty 
should be strictly investigated and handled thoroughly no matter 
who is involved. 
  We should always adhere to the basic work idea of "doing 
everything for the people and relying on the people in doing 
everything." Seizing the opportunity to accelerate development, 
in the final analysis, depends on the enthusiasm, initiative, 
creativity, wisdom, and effort of the masses, without which, 
nothing can be accomplished. As all our leading cadres come 
from the masses, they must never forget the masses at all times 
and under all circumstances. They should think what the masses 
are thinking, be concerned about their hardships, and adopt 
every means possible to do practical and good work for them. We 
should persistently carry out the 20 practical jobs designed to 
improve urban and rural living standard and accomplish more in 
work closely related and directly benefitting the masses. All 
work concerning the basic life and vital interests of the masses 
is of prime importance. We should exert greater efforts to 
realize a larger and faster increase in the people's income by 
developing the economy and broadening the channels for 
employment. Governments at all levels should give particular 
consideration to the staff members, workers, and retired 
personnel of the enterprises which have suspended production 
totally or partially and actively adopt measures to help them 
tackle difficulties. They should pay attention to people's 
petitions that come up in their letters and visits, and continue 
the special telephone line so that people will have places to 
rely on to take care of their difficulties. We should further 
develop our political advantages, conscientiously strengthen 
ideological and political work, most extensively mobilize and 
rely on the masses, mobilize all positive factors, and develop, 
protect, and guide the enthusiasm of the masses well. 
  Fellow deputies! 
  The current situation is very good, opportunity is rare, 
people's expectations are ardent, and our tasks are heavy and 
journeys long. Guided by Comrade Deng Xiaoping's theory of 
building socialism with Chinese characteristics and the party's 
basic line, let us rally closely round the party Central 
Committee with Comrade Jiang Zemin as the nucleus and, under the 
leadership of the party Central Committee, the State Council, 
and the Tianjin municipal party committee, unite as one, raise 
spirits, brave the way forward, work hard, and strive to win new 
success in Tianjin's reform, opening up, and modernization drive 
in 1994. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-1845 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "drchi064_b_94001" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-CHI-94-064 </AU>
Daily Report 
<DATE1>  2 Apr 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> United States &amp; Canada </F>
<H3> <TI>   Reportage on Cyrus Vance Visit </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Reportage on Cyrus Vance Visit </PHRASE></F></HT>
<H4>    Meets Li Peng </H4>

<F P=102> OW0204082194 Beijing XINHUA in English 0754 GMT 2 Apr 94 </F>
<F P=103> OW0204082194 </F>
<F P=104>  Beijing XINHUA </F>
<F P=105>  English </F>


<TEXT>
BFN 

  [Text] Beijing, April 2 (XINHUA) -- Premier Li Peng said 
that better Sino-U.S. relations would create favorable 
conditions for the U.S. enterprises to expand business in China. 
  In an hour-long meeting with Cyrus Vance, former U.S. 
secretary of state today, Li noted that many big U.S. 
companies have submitted tenders for infrastructural projects 
in China. 
  He said that China and the U.S. are complementary to each 
other economically, noting that the U.S. has a very strong 
economic force and is a leader in hi-tech and infrastructure 
while China enjoys sustained economic growth and has a vast 
market, rich resource of manpower and fairly strong technical 
force. 
  Therefore, he said, the two sides can accomplish much in 
launching multi-form economic and technical cooperation. 
  He reaffirmed that China attaches great importance to its 
relations with the U.S. and hopes that such ties will turn for 
the better. 
  As China and the U.S. are big and influential powers, 
statesmen of the two sides should look towards the future and 
even to the 21st century while handling their bilateral 
relations, the premier said. 
  Li also briefed the visitor on the reform of China's 
taxation 
system, policies for absorbing foreign funds, the role played by 
the People's Bank of China as the central bank and how the 
interest rates are fixed. 
  Vance told Li that he saw tremendous changes in Beijing. He 
expressed the conviction that when in Shanghai, he would see 
even greater development and prosperity. 
  Vance said he knows that President Clinton wants very much 
to 
establish a stable and healthy relationship with China. 
  He believed that there would be further development of the 
mutually-beneficial U.S.-China cooperation in various fields. 
  Li Peng recalled that the doors between China and the U.S. 
were opened when the Republicans were in power and the 
diplomatic relations were established while the Democrats were 
in office. 
  Therefore, "we have many friends in both parties in the 
U.S.," Li said. 
  Vance said that the two parties are of the same opinion that 
no matter which party is in power, the U.S. will continue to 
work to promote relations with China. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-1846 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "drchi064_p_94001" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-CHI-94-064 </AU>
Daily Report 
<DATE1>  25 Mar 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> Central-South Region </F>
<H3> <TI>   Hainan Holds Meeting on Commodity Price Probe </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Hainan Holds Meeting on Commodity Price Probe </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   HK3003090494 Haikou Hainan People's Radio Network in 
Mandarin 2300 GMT 25 Mar 94 </F>

<F P=103> HK3003090494 </F>
<F P=104>  Haikou Hainan People's Radio Network </F>
<F P=105>  Mandarin </F>


<TEXT>
BFN 

  [Text] Yesterday morning [25 March], the provincial 
government held a mobilization meeting about a major commodity 
price investigation. Wang Xiaofeng, provincial party deputy 
secretary and provincial executive vice governor, presided over 
and addressed the meeting. Provincial Vice Governor Chen Suhou 
made a mobilization speech. 
  In his speech, Wang Xiaofeng pointed out: In recent years, 
our provincial economy has continuously advanced toward 
sustained, rapid, and healthy development. However, under the 
present situation of economic transformation, taking the 
opportunity of changes in tax and exchange rates and price 
reform, some enterprises, units, and individual commercial units 
have arbitrarily increased prices and collected fees. They have 
also arbitrarily raised prices of daily necessities and service 
charges. This has enhanced the pressure of inflation and caused 
higher price increase. In particular, the margin of price 
increase in our province ranks first in the country. Due to 
excessive price rises, the burden of the masses has become 
heavier. Various quarters have a strong reaction against such 
price hikes. Therefore, curbing price hikes has now become a 
key to handling relations between development, reform and 
stability well. 
  Wang Xiaofeng stressed: Under the condition of socialist 
market economy, relying on market prices alone is not enough. 
The government still needs to control prices. It is necessary 
to organically integrate exercising control with lifting 
controls. Therefore, it is necessary to deepen reform and 
strengthen macroscopic regulation and control over commodity 
prices. It is necessary to control prices according to law and 
establish a supervisory system of the government. It is 
necessary to stabilize prices through developing production and 
ensuring supplies. It is necessary to implement measures of 
microscopic regulation and control by central authorities and to 
properly control investment and consumption demand, so that we 
can maintain market stability and speed up the pace of our 
province's economic development. 
  In his mobilization speech, Chen Suhou pointed out: Carrying 
out a major investigation of commodity prices is an important 
measure for strengthening macroscopic regulation and control and 
promoting healthy economic development. It is an effective form 
for strengthening supervision and examination of commodity 
prices under the condition of developing a socialist market 
economic system. In light of Hainan's practical conditions, the 
present investigation of commodity prices must grasp well the 
three integrations. In other words, the major investigation 
must be integrated with the practice of stopping collecting fees 
arbitrarily and lightening peasant burden. The major 
investigation must be integrated with strengthening macroscopic 
regulation and control and improving the price control system. 
Inspection, supervision, and coordinated services must be 
simultaneously grasped, so that temporary relief can be 
integrated with permanent solutions. 
  It has been learned that the present majort investigation 
will be carried out in two stages. From the second half of 
March to 15 April, is propaganda and mobilization stage. 
Various departments and enterprises must carry out 
self-investigation and submit their own reports. From 16 April 
to the end of June will be the key examination, summation, and 
consolidation stage. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-1847 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "drchi064_e_94001" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-CHI-94-064 </AU>
Daily Report 
<DATE1>  2 Apr 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> Southeast Asia &amp; Pacific </F>
<H3> <TI>   Reportage on Australian Foreign Minister's Talks </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Reportage on Australian Foreign Minister's Talks </PHRASE></F></HT>
<H4>    Discusses Dissidents With Li Peng </H4>

<F P=102> HK0204075694 Hong Kong AFP in English 0715 GMT 2 April 94 </F>
<F P=103> HK0204075694 </F>
<F P=104>  Hong Kong AFP </F>
<F P=105>  English </F>


<TEXT>
BFN 

  [Text] Beijing, April 2 (AFP)--Australian Foreign Minister 
Gareth Evans told Chinese Premier Li Peng Saturday of his 
concern over the latest detention of leading dissident Wei 
Jingsheng, but said his exchanges were not encouraging. 
  Evans told journalists after a meeting Saturday with Li that 
he had raised the subject of Wei's detention, but added: "I 
can't say that the result of that particular exchange was very 
encouraging." 
  It was the second time in a month that Wei -- who was 
attempting to return to Beijing from the nearby city of Tianjin 
-- had been arrested. 
  Evans said he told Li "this added a whole new degree of 
difficulty in resolving the MFN (most-favoured-nation) issue 
with the United States and was a continuing matter of concern, a 
new matter for a good deal of the rest of the international 
community, including of course ourselves." [sentence as 
received] The Australian foreign minister said Li did not seem 
to be aware of the latest developments and responded with a 
lecture on "the virtues of sticking to bilateral relations and 
larger questions of international relations rather than internal 
affairs." 
  "The premier's reaction was not forthcoming on the subject 
of 
Wei Jingsheng. It's not a subject that the Chinese Government 
authorities care to talk about or care to talk about in polite 
terms anyway," Evans said. 
  The reason for Wei's detention Friday and his present 
whereabouts remain unclear. His secretary Tong Yi said she 
hoped he would be released after about 24 hours as he was after 
his previous detention one month ago. 
  The 43-year-old activist, who was released in September six 
months short of a 15-year jail term for "counter-revolutionary" 
activities, was among more than 15 dissidents picked up in a 
police sweep in early March. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-1848 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "drchi064_h_94001" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-CHI-94-064 </AU>
Daily Report 
<DATE1>  1 Apr 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> West Europe </F>
<H3> <TI>   Official Says Beijing Willing To Abide by GATT Stipulations </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Official Says Beijing Willing To Abide by GATT Stipulations </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   OW0104115594 Beijing XINHUA in English 1051 GMT 1 Apr 94 </F>
<F P=103> OW0104115594 </F>
<F P=104>  Beijing XINHUA </F>
<F P=105>  English </F>


<TEXT>
BFN 

  [Text] Beijing, April 1 (XINHUA) -- Entrepreneurs in 
Western European countries have become more and more interested 
in China's vast market since Deng Xiaoping delivered his 
landmark speeches during a south China trip in early 1992. 
  Western European entrepreneurs, given added knowledge of 
China's reality, have seen that the country's reform and opening 
policy, which has brought about economic prosperity and social 
stability, is not an expediency. 
  A fever of investing in China has emerged in Western Europe 
since 1993. Statistics show that the total volume of 
contractual investment in China by EEC countries reached 670 
million U.S. dollars during the January-September period of last 
year. The development of economic and trade cooperation 
between China and Western Europe has been bustling. The trade 
volume between the two sides was 15.1 billion U.S. dollars in 
1991, 17.4 billion U.S. dollars in 1992, and up to 26.1 billion 
U.S. dollars in 1993. 
  Taking the lead is Germany. In November last year the two 
countries signed over 20 cooperative agreements and letters of 
intent involving a total capital of 2.8 billion U.S. dollars. 
  China's economy has entered a new phase of high-speed growth 
since the beginning of 1992, with an annual growth rate reaching 
13 percent for two years running, presenting a big contrast to 
the economy in Western Europe. 
  Foreign Minister Flavio Cotti of Switzerland said at a 
meeting in Zurich in February of this year that the rise of 
China's economy has offered enormous opportunities to Swiss 
enterprises. He called on Swiss entrepreneurs to swing into 
action by seizing the opportune moment. 
  Ambassador Pierre Duchateau, head of the China-based 
delegation of the European Communities (EC) Commission, told 
XINHUA that the EC will enhance cooperation with China in such 
fields as transportation, energy, telecommunications and 
agriculture. 
  France is rapidly catching up. An official from the French 
Embassy in China told XINHUA that the upcoming China visit by 
French Prime Minister Edouard Balladur signify the importance 
France has attached to its ties with China. He revealed that 
the French prime minister will bring with him important 
information on the possibilities of cooperation in such areas as 
trade, aviation, communications and energy. 
  An official from the Chinese Ministry of Foreign Trade and 
Economic Cooperation (MOFTEC) said that it is the vast potential 
market rather than cheap labor that is attractive to foreign 
investors. This potential is becoming a reality, said the 
official, adding that China's total import volume will exceed 
1000 billion U.S. dollars from now to the end of the century. 
  Another major factor that makes China so attractive is the 
country's good investment conditions. China has adopted more 
than 500 economic laws and regulations concerning foreigners and 
is trying to further perfect economic legislation in this regard. 
  China's economic and trade system, after 15 years of reform, 
has become more conformable to the rules of the General 
Agreement on Tariffs and Trade (GATT), and the country has laid 
a favorable foundation in its infrastructure for further 
attracting foreign investment. 
  While Western Europe aims at China's big market, China is 
trying to open up the market of Western Europe. In the 
international economic exchanges there exist both cooperation 
and competition between the partners. 
  Duchateau admitted that some Western European countries 
sometimes showed a tendency toward trade protectionism because 
of economic recession in those countries. 
  He held that the best ways should be found to settle the 
trade conflicts in the international community through 
consultation and cooperation between the parties concerned. 
  The official from China's MOFTEC also held that problems 
should be resolved through consultation. China opposes adopting 
unilateral restrictive actions without consultation. 
  He said that China is taking an active part in the 
negotiations in an effort to resume its signatory party status 
in GATT. China is willing to abide by the stipulations of GATT 
and dedicate itself to promoting the development of the world 
economy and trade. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-1849 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "drchi064_j_94001" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-CHI-94-064 </AU>
Daily Report 
<DATE1>  4 Apr 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> Latin America &amp; Caribbean </F>
<H3> <TI>   Qian Qichen, Brazilian Foreign Minister Confer </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Qian Qichen, Brazilian Foreign Minister Confer </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   OW0404092894 Beijing XINHUA in English 0910 GMT 4 Apr 94 </F>
<F P=103> OW0404092894 </F>
<F P=104>  Beijing XINHUA </F>
<F P=105>  English </F>


<TEXT>
BFN 

  [Text] Beijing, April 4 (XINHUA) -- Chinese Vice-Premier 
and Foreign Minister Qian Qichen and visiting Brazilian Foreign 
Minister Celso Luiz Nunes Amorim held talks on bilateral ties 
and international issues here today. 
  In the talks, Qian noted that Sino-Brazilian relations have 
witnessed new developments since Chinese President Jiang Zemin's 
visit to Brazil last November. The fact that the Chinese and 
Brazilan foreign ministers have met three times in half a year 
also testifies to the fast increase of bilateral exchanges. 
  China is pleased with the progress of its cooperation in the 
various fields, including hi-tech, with Brazil, Qian added. 
  He continued that China and Brazil, the two biggest 
developing countries in the Eastern and Western Hemispheres, 
play inceasingly important roles in international affairs. 
  Therefore, "to strengthen Sino-Brazilian cooperation is of 
great importance to the development and prosperity of the two 
countries and to world peace and development," Qian stressed. 
  Amorim noted that the 20th anniversary of the establishment 
of Brazil-China diplomatic ties falls in 1994. He reaffirmed 
that the Brazilian Government is determined to push forward its 
ties with China. 
  His current visit is also aimed at giving new impetus to 
bilateral ties, he added. 
  Such ties have been greatly strengthened by the frequent 
high- level exchanges and wide-ranging cooperation between the 
two countries, he said. 
  Qian thanked Brazil for its support for the restoration of 
China's status as a founding party of GATT, and its cooperation 
with China in international affairs. 
  Qian also expressed appreciation for the Brazilian 
Government's "one China policy." 
  Amorim reiterated that Brazil will continue to abide by the 
principles enshrined in the communique on the establishment of 
diplomatic relations with China. 
  This afternoon, Song Jian, Chinese state councillor and 
minister in charge of the State Commission of Sience and 
Technology, and Amorim discussed cooperation on science and 
technology. 
  They also attended the signing of three supplimentary 
protocols to the sciene and technology cooperation agreement 
between the two governments. The protocols deal with new 
materials, biology and Chinese medicine respectively. 
  Earlier today, Wang Zhongyu, minister in charge of China's 
State Economic and Trade Commission, and Amorim had a meeting on 
furthering Sino-Brazilian trade and economic cooperation. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-1850 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "drchi064_r_94001" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-CHI-94-064 </AU>
Daily Report 
<DATE1>  2 Apr 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> North Region </F>
<H3> <TI>   Beijing Security Bureau Summons Wei Jingsheng </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Beijing Security Bureau Summons Wei Jingsheng </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   OW0204131694 Beijing XINHUA in English 1257 GMT 2 Apr 94 </F>
<F P=103> OW0204131694 </F>
<F P=104>  Beijing XINHUA </F>
<F P=105>  English </F>


<TEXT>
BFN 

  [Text] Beijing, April 2 (XINHUA) -- The Beijing Municipal 
Public Security Bureau summoned Wei Jingsheng and had a talk 
with him yesterday. 
  Wei left the bureau immediately afterwards. 
  He was sentenced to 15 years' jail in 1979 for activities 
endangering state security and was released on parole in 
September last year with six months of his sentence still to run. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-1851 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "drchi064_r_94002" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-CHI-94-064 </AU>
Daily Report 
<DATE1>  24 Mar 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> North Region </F>
<H3> <TI>   Beijing To Start Stock Trading 27 Mar </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Beijing To Start Stock Trading 27 Mar </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   OW2403135094 Beijing XINHUA in English 1311 GMT 24 Mar 94 </F>
<F P=103> OW2403135094 </F>
<F P=104>  Beijing XINHUA </F>
<F P=105>  English </F>


<TEXT>
BFN 

  [Text] Beijing, March 24 (XINHUA) -- Beijing is to start 
its first stock trading day next Sunday [27 March], and a total 
of 175 million shares will be sold from four local joint stock 
companies. 
  This was revealed by Wang Li Junhua, director of the 
municipal headquarters for stock issuing. 
  When speaking to a press conference held here yesterday, Li 
said this will be the first time that stocks will be traded in 
the Chinese capital, since the founding of New China. 
  The four stock owners include the Beijing Wangfujing 
Department Store Co. Ltd., the Beijing Urban and Rural Trade 
Center Corporation, the Beijing Tourist Vans Company, and the 
Beijing People's Printing Machinery Co. Ltd. 
  China Huaxia Securities Co. Ltd. and the Beijing Trust and 
Investment Company of the Construction Bank will be responsible 
for the sale of these stocks through more than 300 banks and 
savings banks around the city. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-1852 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "drchi064_n_94001" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-CHI-94-064 </AU>
Daily Report 
<DATE1>  4 Mar 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> Economic &amp; Agricultural </F>
<H3> <TI>   Li Peng Promulgates Rules on Mineral Rights Fees Collection </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Li Peng Promulgates Rules on Mineral Rights Fees Collection </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   OW0204095594 Beijing XINHUA Domestic Service in Chinese 0904 
GMT 4 Mar 94 </F>

<F P=103> OW0204095594 </F>
<F P=104>  Beijing XINHUA Domestic Service </F>
<F P=105>  Chinese </F>


<TEXT>
BFN 

  [Text] Beijing, 4 Mar (XINHUA) -- Decree No. 150 of the 
People's Republic of China State Council: 
  The "Provisions for Managing the Collection of Mineral 
Rights 
Fees," adopted by the State Council's sixth executive meeting on 
29 June 1993, is hereby promulgated for enforcement beginning on 
1 April 1994. 
  [Signed] Premier Li Peng 
  [Dated] 27 February 1994 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-1853 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "drchi064_k_94001" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-CHI-94-064 </AU>
Daily Report 
<DATE1>  2 Apr 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> NATIONAL AFFAIRS </F>
<F P=101> Political &amp; Social </F>
<H3> <TI>   Zhao Ziyang Allowed To Visit Sichuan Province </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Zhao Ziyang Allowed To Visit Sichuan Province </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   HK0204062294 Hong Kong SOUTH CHINA MORNING POST in English 2 
Apr 94 p 5 </F>

<F P=103> HK0204062294 </F>
<F P=104>  Hong Kong SOUTH CHINA MORNING POST </F>
<F P=105>  English </F>


<TEXT>
BFN 

<F P=106> [By Willy Wo-lap Lam] </F>
  [Text] Ousted Communist Party chief Zhao Ziyang has been 
allowed to go on a tour of Sichuan Province, one of his major 
power bases. Chinese sources said that, while it was unlikely 
Mr Zhao would return to the political scene in an official 
capacity, his role as a potential kingmaker had become apparent 
as the health of patriarch Deng Xiaoping remained precarious. 
  The sources said Mr Zhao arrived in the provincial capital 
of 
Chengdu before the Lunar New Year, and that he would be 
returning to Beijing later this month. They said while the 
former party general secretary enjoyed "generally good health", 
he suffered from an unspecified lung ailment and had spent some 
time at a sanatorium in Chengdu. Mr Zhao's wife, Liang Boqi, 
who had treatment in a Beijing hospital late last year for a 
heart problem, is also believed to be resting in the same 
sanatorium. 
  An informed source in Sichuan said Mr Zhao continued to pay 
attention to economic and political reform in the country, but 
he was not in a good mood. "Mr Zhao is worried about the 
pervasiveness of corruption, and the fear that it may get 
worse," the source said. "He hinted the present leadership had 
not acquitted itself well in curtailing graft saying he had done 
more to stop corruption during his tenure as premier and party 
chief." 
  Moreover, the source added, almost five years after his fall 
from grace, Mr Zhao was still complaining about mistreatment. 
"I was accused of liberalisation on the economic front, but the 
leadership has been doing things that I would not have dared 
do," he reportedly said. 
  China analysts said it was significant that Mr Zhao, who had 
been under virtual house arrest, had been allowed to go to 
Sichuan where he was party boss from 1975 to 1980. Last year, 
the leader of the party's liberal wing was permitted to pay 
visits to Guangxi, Hunan and Jilin provinces but not to 
Guangdong, where he had also been party secretary. 
  It is understood the administration is nervous about Mr Zhao 
travelling out of Beijing particularly in light of the 
enthusiastic reception accorded the former leader last year. 
Although Mr Zhao's status was that of an ordinary party member, 
he was met in each of the three provinces by the top party 
leaders. 
  Western diplomats said Mr Zhao's former associates had 
become 
more active since news about Mr Deng's failing health filtered 
out late last year. These associates included former state 
president Yang Shangkun and former head of the National People's 
Congress, Wan Li. Mr Wan, who together with Mr Zhao spearheaded 
agrarian reform in the late 1970s, was considered particularly 
close to the former party chief. In the past few months Mr Deng 
has told his intimates that Mr Wan should play a major role in 
ensuring a smooth political transition after his death. 
  Sources in Beijing said Mr Zhao, who lives in a guarded 
compound in the heart of the capital, had been allowed to see 
more visitors since late last year. The latter included his 
former associates as well as many influential children of senior 
cadres. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-1854 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "drchi064_k_94002" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-CHI-94-064 </AU>
Daily Report 
<DATE1>  2 Apr 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> NATIONAL AFFAIRS </F>
<F P=101> Political &amp; Social </F>
<H3> <TI>   Leaders Join Citizens in Tree Planting </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Leaders Join Citizens in Tree Planting </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   OW0204153394 Beijing XINHUA in English 1441 GMT 2 Apr 94 </F>
<F P=103> OW0204153394 </F>
<F P=104>  Beijing XINHUA </F>
<F P=105>  English </F>


<TEXT>
BFN 

  [Text] Beijing, April 2 (XINHUA) -- Chinese Communist Party 
and government leaders Jiang Zemin, Li Peng, Qiao Shi, Li 
Ruihuan, Zhu Rongji, Liu Huaqing and Hu Jintao this morning 
joined two million Beijingers in planting trees in the capital. 
  Together with local leaders and residents, as well as 50 
young pioneers, they planted 80 trees of Chinese pine and willow 
in the Yuanminyuan Park -- garden of ten thousand gardens -- an 
imperial park created over a 150-year period from 1709 to 1859, 
in the north-western suburbs. 
  The first Sunday of April is a tree-planting day for the 
capital, and over the past few years, government and party 
leaders have joined in the green activities on this day. 
  Jiang Zemin, general secretary of the Chinese Communist 
Party 
Central Committee, was told that the trees planted last year by 
the leaders were growing well. He expressed gratitude to the 
gardeners, saying that it was they who had taken good care of 
these trees. He added that what was wanted was to create a 
general greening spirit. 
  After planting a tree, Jiang said that every citizen should 
be aware of the importance of tree-planting since it can bring 
benefit to this generation and coming generations. 
  Also taking part in today's tree-planting were a dozen other 
high ranking officials. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-1855 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "drchi064_m_94001" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-CHI-94-064 </AU>
Daily Report 
<DATE1>  1 Apr 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> Military </F>
<H3> <TI>   Jiang Zemin Stresses Study of Deng Works </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Jiang Zemin Stresses Study of Deng Works </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   OW0304084594 Beijing XINHUA Domestic Service in Chinese 1305 
GMT 1 Apr 94 </F>

<F P=103> OW0304084594 </F>
<F P=104>  Beijing XINHUA Domestic Service </F>
<F P=105>  Chinese </F>


<TEXT>
BFN 

<F P=106> [By RENMIN RIBAO reporter Guo Jia (6753 0857) and XINHUA </F>
reporters Luo Yuwen (5012 3768 2429) and Jia Yong (6328 3057)] 
  [Text] Beijing, 1 Apr (XINHUA) -- Jiang Zemin, general 
secretary of the CPC Central Committee, state president, and 
chairman of the Central Military Commission, held a discussion 
today with the trainees of the first rotational training class 
for military cadres at and above the corps-level to study Volume 
3 of the Selected Works of Deng Xiaoping. He 
emphasized during the discussion: It is a long-term strategic 
task to arm the People's Liberation Army [PLA] with the theory 
on building socialism with Chinese characteristics. We should 
apply what we have studied in our practical work and raise our 
awareness of the need to carry out the major tasks. 
  Present at the discussion were Liu Huaqing and Zhang Zhen, 
vice chairmen of the Central Military Commission; and Zhang 
Wannian, Yu Yongbo, and Fu Quanyou, members of the Central 
Military Commission. 
  Jiang Zemin delivered an important speech after hearing 
views 
of several trainees. He pointed out: We should study Volume 3 
of the Selected Works of Deng Xiaoping thoroughly and 
unremittingly. Since the publication of the Volume 3 of the 
Selected Works of Deng Xiaoping, the whole party, 
the whole PLA, and the whole country have rapidly whipped up an 
upsurge of study, which has played a great role in achieving an 
ideological unity in the party and in promoting reform, opening 
up, and socialist modernization. Comrade Deng Xiaoping's theory 
of building socialism with Chinese characteristics is the 
Marxism of contemporary China, as well as a strong spiritual 
pillar which inspires the whole party, the whole Army, and the 
people of all nationalities across the country to work with one 
heart and one mind to attain our grand goals. The more progress 
we make in reform, opening up, and modernization, the more new 
circumstances and new problems we will have to deal with. So, 
it is even more necessary to arm ourselves ideologically with 
scientific theories. We will be able to achieve one success 
after another in reform, opening up, and modernization if our 
party has a large number of cadres who have had a grasp of basic 
Marxist theories and the theory of building socialism with 
Chinese characteristics, systematically and practically, not 
fragmentarily nor hollowly, and who know how to apply these 
theories in studying and solving important problems. It is no 
easy task to truly master and use skillfully Comrade Deng 
Xiaoping's theory of building socialism with Chinese 
characteristics, and it won't work to merely study it once or 
twice. We must study it constantly and repeatedly in light of 
our reality, deem the study to be a long-term strategic task, 
and pay attention to it persistently and unremittingly. 
  Jiang Zemin pointed out: Comrade Xiaoping has always called 
on us to study Marxist stand, viewpoints, and methods, and he 
always opposes dogmatism and pragmatism. The theory of building 
socialism with Chinese characteristics is a complete scientific 
system, in which the basic views and doctrines are inter-related 
and none of them is isolated. During the course of study and 
application, we should always pay attention to comprehensively 
and correctly understanding the essence of those views and 
doctrines and know the relationship among them. We should have 
a firm grasp of the quintessence of emancipating the mind and 
seeking truth from facts. We should know how to study and ponder 
Comrade Xiaoping's basic views in conjunction with the 
relationship among them, so that we will have a thorough and 
profound grasp of them. 
  Jiang Zemin said: In order to study well Comrade Xiaoping's 
works, it is very important to study them in conjunction with 
the important party documents issued since the Third Plenary 
Session of the 11th CPC Central Committee, as well as the 
important policy decisions of the party Central Committee and 
the Central Military Commission. In this way, it will be easier 
for us to enhance our understanding of Comrade Xiaoping's 
important thoughts and his basic theories and views, as well as 
the party's policies. At present, it is particularly necessary 
to study well the decision of the Third Plenary Session of the 
14th CPC Central Committee and the theory and basic knowledge on 
socialist market economy. 
  Jiang Zemin emphasized: During the course of thoroughly 
studying Volume 3 of the Selected Work of Ding 
Xiaoping, we should consider the major tasks of the party's 
work this year and raise our awareness of the need to carry out 
those tasks. The Central Committee has set the major tasks of 
the party's work this year as seizing opportunity, deepening 
reform, opening up wider, promoting development, and maintaining 
statability. They are based on a comprehensive analysis and 
correct appraisal of the present domestic and international 
situation. The key to success in promoting China's reform, 
opening up, and modernization lies in handling well the 
relationship among reform, development, and stability. We have 
promulgated a number of reform measures this year for the 
establishment of a socialist market economic structure, which is 
like a battle to storm heavily fortified positions. If we win 
in the battle and successfully build the framework of a 
socialist market economy, we will lay an important foundation 
for China's economic development. To win in this tough battle 
particularly requires the whole party, the whole Army, and the 
people of all nationalities across the country to unite as one, 
share weal and woe, take concerted actions, and forge ahead. 
Leading party cadres at all levels should fully understand the 
major tasks of the party's work and conscientiously subordinate 
themselves to and serve these major tasks. Our armed forces 
should provide a strong security guarantee for reform, opening 
up, and modernization and take up the historic responsibility. 
Through the study of Comrade Xiaoping's works, all PLA officers 
and men should identify themselves ideologically with the major 
tasks of the party's work and with the party's and government's 
important policies of deepening reforms. We should strive to 
promote reform, development, and stability at our workposts. We 
should educate the vast number of officers and men to treat 
correctly the readjusted relationship among different interest 
groups in the course of reform; conscientiously subordinate 
their individual interest to the interest of the whole; and set 
an example in stressing lofty ideals, good discipline, unity, 
and the interest of the whole. 
  Jiang Zemin emphasized, "While thoroughly studying Volume 3 
of the Selected Works of Deng Xiapping, we should 
strive to improve the overall quality of the leading groups and 
promote Army building in an all-round way. While studying 
Comrade Xiaoping's works, we must consider the Army's realities, 
carry out well the decisions of the Central Military Commission, 
and constantly promote Army building. In strengthening the 
leading groups, we should first adhere to the requirements of 
making the leading cadres more revolutionary, a younger average 
age, better educated, and professionally more competent. 
Comrade Xiaoping has always attached importance to training and 
selecting young outstanding cadres. He has had many important 
expositions in this regard, and we should comprehend and 
implement them very well. Second, we should raise our ability 
in conceiving strategic concepts and policy decisions. We 
should strive to learn from Comrade Xiaoping's rich experience 
and superb leadership in governing the party, the government, 
and the Army, as well as his revolutionary courage and 
resourcefulness, his realistic spirit and his scientific 
methods. We should learn from his ability in grasping the 
development characteristics and law of things. We should know 
how to discuss important matters and formulate important 
policies in consideration of the interest of the whole. We 
should constantly improve our ability in guiding the Army 
building and in keeping complex situation under control. Third, 
we should step up the cultivation of party character and 
maintain ethical integrity. A strong and pure party character 
among the leading cadres is an extremely important condition for 
realizing the party's program and line. During the course of 
developing a socialist market economy, leading cadres should 
take the lead in resisting the influence of mammonism, extreme 
individualism, and decadent life style. Fourth, we should 
seriously improve the style of leadership and perform actual 
deeds. We have already laid down clear and definite principles 
and policies for the building and reform of the party, the 
country, and the Army. The key now is making actual, strenuous 
efforts to carry them out. Leading cadres at oil levels should 
go deep into the realities of life, conduct investigation and 
study, combine general calls with specific guidance, and do a 
solid and effective work. We should resolutely oppose the 
seeking of superficial forms and pretty appearances, as well as 
the practice of exaggeration and fraud. There are a multitude 
of things to do for the troops, but all of them must be done 
eventually at the grass- roots units. We must build the 
grass-roots units well, fully arouse the enthusiasm of the 
cadres and fighters there, lay an even stronger foundation for 
the Army, and enhance its combat effectiveness in an all-round 
way. 
  The rotational training class is run by the National Defense 
University at the request of the General Political Department. 
  Also present at the discussion were Xu Caihou, deputy 
director of the General Political Department, and Zhu Dunfa and 
Li Wenqing, commandant and political commissar respectively of 
the National Defense University. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-1856 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "drchi064_u_94001" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-CHI-94-064 </AU>
Daily Report 
<DATE1>  1 Apr 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> PRC MEDIA ON TAIWAN AFFAIRS </F>
<H3> <TI>   Failure of Beijing-Taipei Talks Examined </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Failure of Beijing-Taipei Talks Examined </PHRASE></F></HT>
<H4>    Beijing Radio Views Talks </H4>

<F P=102> OW0304122994 Beijing Central People's Radio in Mandarin to 
Taiwan 2200 GMT 1 Apr 94 </F>

<F P=103> OW0304122994 </F>
<F P=104>  Beijing Central People's Radio </F>
<F P=105>  Mandarin </F>


<TEXT>
BFN 

<F P=106> [Commentary by station reporter Liao Xuefeng: "Based on </F>
Sincerity and Keeping the Words"; from the "News and Current 
Events" program] 
  [Text] The fourth round of working-level talks between the 
Association of Relations Across the Taiwan Strait [ARATS] and 
the Strait Exchange Foundation [SEF], which ended in Beijing 
recently, did not produce the expected results. In this 
connection, our station reporter Liao Xuefeng has written the 
following commentary: "Based on Sincerity and Keeping the Words." 
  The latest round of talks between the two organizations 
failed to make progress largely because prior to the talks, the 
Taiwan side had partially reneged on the common understanding 
reached between officials of the two organizations in Beijing 
last February. During the talks, SEF further raised questions 
which expanded or narrowed (?the scope of understanding). This 
is indeed regrettable. 
  As is known, the three topics, including repatriation of 
those who have entered the areas of the other side in violation 
of relevant regulations and other relevant issues, discussed at 
the latest round of working-level talks between the two 
organization are issues of deep concern to the masses on the two 
sides of the strait. Both the mainland's ARATS and Taiwan's SEF 
agree that these issues, which have inconvenienced the two sides 
for a long time, should be settled as soon as possible. For 
this reason, the two sides should respect and trust each other 
and hold talks on an equal footing so as to reach an early 
settlement, eliminate the inconvenience, and enhance 
cross-strait friendship. If these issues remain unsolved for a 
long time, they will affect the vital interests of the people on 
both sides of the strait, as well as cross-strait relations. 
This is absolutely not a wise man's action. To achieve positive 
results from talks, the two sides should first agree on two 
major points: first, it is necessary to separate political from 
routine issues so as to foster (?consensus); and second, it is 
necessary to value the common understanding and strictly carry 
out the promises reached during the previous rounds of talks. 
  It is a fact that currently the two sides of the strait 
practice different social systems and follow different political 
ideologies. However, this should not become an obstacle to the 
settlement of routine issues. If one side insists on mixing 
political ideologies with routine issues, even a simple matter 
can become complicated and can encounter mounting difficulties 
in the process of settlement. (?Therefore), the willingness to 
separate political ideologies from routine matters has become 
the yardstick for measuring one's sincerity of settling issues. 
  Moreover, it was a very remarkable feat that the two sides 
of 
the strait, which had been separated, got together to discuss 
common problems and reached rare understanding on some aspects. 
We should cherish the fruitful results of talks by respecting 
each other. As the saying goes, a gentleman attaches great 
importance to promises and keeps his word. ARATS-SEF talks are 
high-level contacts and negotiations between the two sides' 
nongovernmental organizations. They have conducted the 
negotiations in a serious manner and have reached an earnest 
common understanding. In a sense, the common understanding is a 
kind of promise that must be kept by both sides. For this 
reason, one should not make accusation as one pleases and should 
not renege on the understanding rashly. 
  (?In fact), during the final-day discussion between the two 
organizations, Mr. Xu Huiyou [Hsu Hui-yu], SEF deputy secretary 
general, suggested that the next round of working-level talks be 
arranged in Taibei [Taipei] as soon as possible, thereby showing 
in a certain way the Taiwan side's sincerity and determination 
to settle problems. We express our appreciation toward his 
suggestion. Meanwhile, we hope that the next round of 
working-level talks will be based on the common understanding 
reached between officials of the two organizations in Beijing 
last February; will be conducted in the spirit of avoiding 
political issues, discussing matters as they stand, solving 
first easy and then difficult issues, and seeking common ground 
while reserving differences; and will see that promises are kept 
with sincerity to achieve fruitful results and that no side 
issues crop up to complicate matters. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-1857 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "drchi064_w_94001" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-CHI-94-064 </AU>
Daily Report 
<DATE1>  2 Apr 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> HONG KONG &amp; MACAO </F>
<F P=101> Hong Kong </F>
<H3> <TI>   Li Peng Meets Hong Kong-Based Press Chiefs </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Li Peng Meets Hong Kong-Based Press Chiefs </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   OW0204134294 Beijing XINHUA in English 1241 GMT 2 Apr 94 </F>
<F P=103> OW0204134294 </F>
<F P=104>  Beijing XINHUA </F>
<F P=105>  English </F>


<TEXT>
BFN 

  [Text] Beijing, April 2 (XINHUA) -- Chinese Premier Li Peng 
met here today with press chiefs of six major Hong Kong-based 
newspapers and magazines. 
  The premier praised the great contributions they have made 
to 
promoting mutual understanding, cooperation and exchange between 
China's Mainland and Hong Kong. 
  The six Hong Kong-based newspapers and magazines were "WEN 
WEI PO", "TA KUNG PAO", "HONG KONG COMMERCIAL DAILY", "NEW 
EVENING POST", "ZIJIN MAGAZINE" and "ECONOMIC INFORMATION AND 
AGENCY". 
  The basic principle of "one country, two systems" would not 
change, the premier said, adding it is his hope that the Hong 
Kong- based newspapers and magazines would do a better job to 
shoulder their responsibilities in the realization of the 
peaceful transition of Hong Kong and maintaining long-term 
prosperity and stability there. 
  Also present were Ding Guangen and Li Lanqing, members of 
the 
Political Bureau of the Central Committee of the Chinese 
Communist Party, and other government leaders. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-1858 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "drchi064_v_94001" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-CHI-94-064 </AU>
Daily Report 
<DATE1>  1 Apr 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> TAIWAN </F>
<H3> <TI>   Premier Terms U.S. Sanctions `Unfair,' `Regretful' </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Premier Terms U.S. Sanctions `Unfair,' `Regretful' </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   OW0104132894 Taipei CNA in English 1256 GMT 1 Apr 94 </F>
<F P=103> OW0104132894 </F>
<F P=104>  Taipei CNA </F>
<F P=105>  English </F>


<TEXT>
BFN 

<F P=106> [By Debbie Kuo] </F>
  [Text] Taipei April 1 (CNA) -- Premier Lien Chan Friday [1 
April] called United States threats to impose trade sanctions 
against Taiwan for failing to protect endangered species 
"unfair" and "regretful." 
  US President Bill Clinton has yet to make a final decision 
on 
the sanctions, which are mandated under the Pelly amendment to 
the Fishermen's Protective Act of 1967. Any sanctions would go 
into effect 30 days after approval. 
  The ROC [Republic of China] Foreign Ministry confirmed that 
the US National Security Council had forwarded to President 
Clinton a recommendation to sanction only Taiwan under the Pelly 
amendment. 
  Lien said it is unfair that the US is seeking to selectively 
impose the sanctions, targeting only Taiwan and not Mainland 
China or South Korea. 
  The premier said the US Government did not take into account 
wildlife conservation efforts made by Taiwan's government and 
people. 
  The US has paid no attention to Taiwan's quick and effective 
reactions to comments and accusations from world conservation 
organizations, Lien said. 
  Lien added that Taiwan has done much more than many other 
governments and international groups in protecting endangered 
species. 
  Moreover, the government is currently expanding crackdowns 
on 
illegal trade in rhino horn, tiger parts and other endangered 
animals and species in addition to enacting a revised wildlife 
protection law and promoting Taiwan's efforts in the world 
community, Lien said. 
  He called for the people in Taiwan to correct their 
misguided 
ideas about the effects some endangered species have in curing 
diseases. "Don't sacrifice the country's image for medical cures 
or gourmet food," Lien said. 
  Meanwhile, Sun Ming-hsien, chairman of the Council of 
Agriculture, said the US is targeting Taiwan alone for trade 
sanctions despite a decision by the Convention on International 
Trade in Endangered Species (CITES) last week to postpone any 
decision on sanctions against Taiwan, Mainland China and South 
Korea until November. 
  He called US threats against Taiwan a "violation of 
international justice." 
  Sun said Taiwan will continuously and undauntedly 
communicate 
with the US, telling the Americans that Taiwan has done much 
more than Mainland China and South Korea in wildlife protection 
and conservation. 
  Sun (?said) that he has not ruled out resignation to take 
responsibility for the US sanctions, (?if) approved. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-1859 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "drchi064_v_94009" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-CHI-94-064 </AU>
Daily Report 
<DATE1>  27 Mar 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> TAIWAN </F>
<H3> <TI>   Japanese Air Unit Apologizes on Plane Interception </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Japanese Air Unit Apologizes on Plane Interception </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   OW0404040194 Taipei CHUNG KUO SHIH PAO in Chinese 27 Mar 94 
p 4 </F>

<F P=103> OW0404040194 </F>
<F P=104>  Taipei CHUNG KUO SHIH PAO </F>
<F P=105>  Chinese </F>


<TEXT>
BFN 

<F P=106> [By reporter Fang Yang-chung (2455 0111 1813) in Taipei] </F>
  [Text] An official for the Civil Aeronautics 
Administration (CAA) pointed out in the morning of 26 March: 
Regarding an incident in which Japanese fighter planes 
scrambled to make an "identification check" on a CAA test plane 
on the morning of 25 March, the whole incident is nothing but a 
"misunderstanding," probably a result of improper coordination 
between a Japanese air traffic control center and the Japanese 
Air Force. The Japanese air traffic control unit involved has 
made an oral apology to the CAA. 
  The official pointed out: Before the plane left for Taipei's 
air traffic information zone, the CAA had notified its Japanese 
counterpart and obtained its consent. The whole process, which 
was conducted properly, can be certified by referring to 
existing records. 
  The official said: The CAA plane was conducting its task 
when two F-4 Phantom planes of Japan's Self-Defense Force 
scrambled to make an "identification check." Our unit involved 
in the incident was quite confused by the Japanese move, and 
immediately cabled the Japanese side to find out more about the 
situation. 
  The CAA official pointed out: The Japanese air traffic 
control unit soon apologized to the two pilots in the test plane 
through our air traffic control unit. The Japanese side said 
that the mistake was a result of faulty coordination between a 
Japanese air traffic control unit and a Self-Defense Force 
control unit. The incident was only a "misunderstanding" 
because the fighter planes were merely making an "identification 
check." 
  The CAA official said his office is still negotiating with 
the Japanese air traffic control unit to work out methods to 
avoid the recurrence of similar incidents. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-1860 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "drchi064__s94001" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-CHI-94-064-S </AU>
Daily Report 
<DATE1>  28 Feb 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> REGIONAL WORK REPORTS </F>
<H3> <TI>   Guangdong Government Work Report </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Guangdong Government Work Report </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   HK2103055094 Guangzhou NANFANG RIBAO in Chinese 28 Feb 94 pp 
1,2 </F>

<F P=103> HK2103055094 </F>
<F P=104>  Guangzhou NANFANG RIBAO </F>
<F P=105>  Chinese </F>


<TEXT>
BFN 

<F P=106> [Guangdong Provincial Government Work Report, delivered by </F>
Guangdong Governor Zhu Senlin (2612 2773 2651) at the Second 
Session of the Eighth Guangdong Provincial People's Congress on 
19 February: "Government Work Report"] 
  [Text] Fellow deputies, 
  On behalf of the Provincial People's Congress, I now submit 
the report on the work of the government for your examination 
and approval, and also for suggestions and comments from members 
of the Chinese People's Political Consultative Conference 
[CPPCC] and other observers. 
<H5>  I. Review of Work Done in 1993 </H5>
  The year 1993 was an extraordinary one for the development 
of 
the socialist market economy and the realization of 
modernization in Guangdong Province. It was also a year when we 
seized the opportunity to speed up development. Under the 
leadership of the Guangdong Provincial CPC Committee and the 
supervision of the provincial people's congress and its standing 
committee, we have implemented conscientiously the principles 
and policies of the CPC Central Committee and the State Council; 
maintained good momentum in the sustained, rapid and healthy 
development [chixu kuaisu, jiankang fazhan 2170 4958 1816 6643 
0256 1660 4099 1455] of the national economy; and achieved new 
successes in science and technology, education, cultural 
development, and other social undertakings in the course of the 
year. Almost all the principal targets for economic and social 
development adopted at the first session of the eighth 
provincial people's congress have been fulfilled. Calculated on 
a comparable basis, the province's gross domestic product (GDP) 
is expected to reach 314 billion yuan (the 1993 price, same 
below), an increase of 21 percent over the previous year if it 
is calculated in terms of comparable items, while the total 
value of industrial and agricultural production is expected to 
soar by 31 percent to 597.4 billion yuan. 
  Encouraged by the important remarks made by Comrade Deng 
Xiaoping during his tour of south China and by the spirit of the 
14th National People's Congress, the vast numbers of cadres and 
people throughout Guangdong stirred themselves up, emancipated 
their minds, and seized the opportunity to quicken the pace of 
economic construction. With the economy growing rapidly, the 
provincial government urged all localities to implement 
conscientiously the spirit of the first session of the eighth 
provincial people's congress by recognizing and seizing the 
opportunity to develop the reform in both depth and breadth, 
formulating policy measures that will promote economic 
development, and establishing a new supremacy for the 
development of the Guangdong economy. At the same time, the 
provincial government also followed closely the trends of 
economic development, kept track of and analyzed the issues of 
key concern, strengthened macrocontrol, and promptly resolved 
new problems under new conditions. In the early part of the 
year, we stressed the need to combine emancipation of the mind 
with seeking truth from facts, insisting that we should proceed 
from reality in everything and should do everything in our power 
and within our capabilities. We wanted speed on the basis of 
achieving an optimal structure and better economic results, and 
opposed the blind vying for speed and the application of 
pressure at every level for "faster growth" without taking 
conditions into consideration. At the same time, through the 
strengthening of guidance over real estate development and the 
sorting out of development areas, we not only achieved 
considerable growth in real estate development and enabled 
various types of development areas to make a good start, but 
also brought about a change for the better in the over-extended 
scale of development. In the second half of the year, we 
implemented conscientiously the important decisions of the CPC 
Central Committee and the State Council on strengthening 
macrocontrol; seriously handled the relationships among reform, 
readjustment and development; and devoted major efforts to the 
consolidation of fixed-asset investment and the financial order. 
On the use of construction funds, we ensured the needs of key 
projects; strictly controlled the launching of new projects; 
examined and graded all projects under construction; and cut a 
number of projects that were not in conformity with the state's 
industrial policies, did not have the necessary funds, and did 
not have clear market prospects. We also conducted a general 
cleaning up of unauthorized inter- borrowing, illegal fund 
raising, and illegal financial institutions; strengthened price 
monitoring; and carried out a general inspection of prices and 
charges. Through these regulatory and control measures, we 
prevented major fluctuations in the national economy and ensured 
its healthy development. On the whole, the government was able 
to fulfill its 1993 tasks in a satisfactory manner. 
  1. The national economy continued to develop in a 
sustained, rapid and coordinated way [kuaisu, xietiao fazhan 
1816 6643 0588 6148 4099 1455]. 
  Last year, while developing the national economy at a great 
pace, our province also further optimized the economic structure 
and achieved notable improvements in economic results. Where 
the development of the three major sectors of industry was 
concerned, we made improvements in the primary sector, increased 
the weighting of the secondary sector, and made new headway in 
the tertiary sector. New achievements were made in agriculture 
and rural work. Local governments at all levels greatly 
strengthened their leadership over agriculture, and increased 
their input. Input by fiscal departments at various levels 
showed a 7.6 percent increase over the previous year. Although 
the province was repeatedly hit by typhoons and other serious 
natural disasters last year, the total value of agricultural 
production still reached 88.6 billion yuan, an increase of 3.5 
percent compared with the previous year. 
  Grain, sugar 
cane, and fruit production dropped, but forestry, animal 
husbandry, and fishery all registered fairly large increases. 
Afforestation attained the planned targets two years ahead of 
schedule, and high-quality, high- yield, high-efficiency 
agriculture developed at a much faster pace. Township 
enterprises achieved an output value of 208 billion yuan, 45 
billion more than in the previous year. Industrial production 
developed at great speed, and economic results improved. Total 
industrial output value increased by 36.5 percent to 508.8 
billion yuan, and 96 percent of the goods produced were sold. 
Losses sustained by budget-covered state-owned industrial 
enterprises dropped by 37.6 percent, while total profits 
increased by 190.5 percent. Key construction projects showed 
smooth progress, while large-scale infrastructural construction 
was launched, and notable results were achieved in such areas as 
energy, transportation, telecommunications, and water 
conservancy. Investment plans for 45 key projects in the 
province were basically fulfilled. Sixty-three km of the 
Guangzhou-Shenzhen Expressway were completed and opened to 
traffic, the Guangzhou-Meixian-Shantou Railway extended 
passenger service to Heyuan, the construction of major tunnels 
and bridges on the Guangdong section of the Beijing-Kowloon 
Railway was in full swing, and the third phase expansion of the 
East River-Shenzhen River water supply project was completed 
ahead of schedule. Generating units with a total capacity of 
3.88 million kilowatts [kw] were installed, an additional 150 
kilometers of expressways were built, 1,349 kilometers of 
primary and secondary highways were built or improved, and 
telephone exchanges with a capacity of 2.2 million circuits were 
built in the urban and rural areas. New achievements were made 
in foreign economic relations and trade. According to 
statistical specifications that apply to the whole nation, total 
import-export volume for the year was $46.9 billion, with 
exports accounting for $27 billion and imports accounting for 
$19.9 billion. A total of 19,000 contracts worth $34.8 billion 
were signed with foreign investors, and foreign funds worth 
$9.65 billion were used -- an increase of 98.6 percent. Of this 
amount, $7.498 billion were direct investment, another all-time 
record. Foreign affairs, overseas Chinese affairs, tourism, and 
other work also made positive contributions to economic 
construction in the province. The export-oriented economies of 
special economic zones, coastal open cities, and coastal open 
economic zones all made further headway. The domestic market 
was enlivened, and buying and selling were brisk. Total retail 
sales volume was 140.26 billion yuan, an increase of 32.3 
percent over the previous year. Fiscal income showed a large 
increase. Annual receipts totaled 34.62 billion yuan, an 
increase of 56.4 percent, and expenditure totaled 33.42 billion 
yuan, an increase of 51.9 percent, indicating that we had a 
balanced budget with a small surplus. Bank deposits and loans 
continued to grow. By the end of 1993, the balance of various 
types of bank deposits totaled 271.98 billion yuan, up 14.4 
percent, while the balance of borrowings was registered at 
223.73 billion yuan, up 23.4 percent. Development of 
mountainous areas accelerated, and a successful job was done in 
supporting the poor. Total industrial and agricultural 
production value in the 50 mountainous counties (districts) in 
the province was 91.1 billion yuan, an increase of 26 percent 
over the previous year; revenue increased by 43 percent to 3 
billion yuan; and the per-capita annual net income of peasants 
showed real growth of 5.8 percent. We secured a life with 
sufficient food and clothing for 130,000 people, and helped 1 
million people shake off poverty, thereby basically fulfilling 
the objectives set early last year. People's living standards 
continued to improve. A sample survey last year showed that per 
capita living expenses for urban residents in the province 
amounted to 4,277 yuan, while peasants' per capita net income 
was 1,675 yuan -- increases of 10.1 percent and 6.1 percent over 
their respective 1992 figures after allowing for inflation. The 
volume of savings deposits for urban and rural residents was 
187.45 billion yuan, 41.5 billion yuan more than in the 
beginning of the year, or 2,881 yuan per capita. Housing for 
urban and rural residents also continued to improve. Last year, 
various types of new housing units were built, with total floor 
space amounting to 56.73 million square meters. A large number 
of urban residents with housing problems moved into new units. 
New headway also was made in urban and rural construction and 
in environmental protection. 
  2. The further deepening of reforms. 
  With internal reform and the change of operational 
mechanisms 
in full swing, various types of enterprises were able to make 
notable progress in exercising management autonomy, gearing 
themselves to market needs, strengthening management, and 
improving economic results. The provincial government organized 
and deployed 10 inspection teams to 20 cities to check up on the 
implementation of the "Regulations Concerning the Transformation 
of Operational Mechanisms in Industrial Enterprises Owned by the 
Whole People" and our province's own "Methods of 
Implementation." This work has been instrumental in ensuring 
the decisionmaking powers of enterprises. The 2,000-plus pilot 
enterprises for comprehensive reform achieved notable results 
and played an exemplary role in the transformation of 
operational mechanisms. Reform of the shareholding system was 
tried out on an extended scale and was moving in the direction 
of standardization. Last year, we approved the establishment of 
159 limited-liability stock companies and listed a number of 
companies on the stock exchange. Management of joint-stock 
companies and the stock market was strengthened. The 
joint-stock cooperative system made swift headway in rural 
areas, with the number of joint-stock cooperative enterprises 
exceeding 30,000. 
  The individual and private economies 
continued to develop. The market system further matured. The 
whole province went all-out in developing special commodity 
transaction markets and large shopping arcades, and in 
cultivating futures markets. The scale of various types of 
markets in the urban and rural areas further expanded, and the 
volume of market transactions grew steadily. The capital goods 
markets also further expanded. Today, about 98 percent of 
capital goods consumed in the province are obtainable through 
the market. The system of compensated land use was instituted 
in over 90 percent of cities and counties in the province. 
Substantial headway was made in the development of markets for 
production factors. Gradual improvement was made in the pricing 
mechanism, with market forces playing a dominant role; reform of 
the social security system also steadily advanced. The scope 
covered by the old-age insurance system was enlarged, and 
reforms were carried out in the operation and management of 
funds for unemployment, medical care, industrial- injury 
insurance, and social insurance. The unemployment rate in urban 
areas was kept within the 2 percent level. The reshuffling of 
government organs was grasped without letup. A program was 
drawn up for the reform of organs directly under the provincial 
government. A number of permanent organs were abolished, with 
steps taken to relocate their staff members. Smooth progress 
was made in the experimental reform of government organs in 15 
cities and counties. Reforms of the financial, scientific and 
technological, educational, cultural, public health, and urban 
housing systems also continued to deepen. 
  3. New advances were made in cultural and ideological 
progress and other social undertakings. 
  We persisted in stressing both material and 
cultural-ideological progress, seriously organized people 
throughout the province to study in depth Comrade Deng 
Xiaoping's theory of building socialism with Chinese 
characteristics, and continued to conduct in-depth education on 
patriotism, collectivism, and socialism. A variety of 
activities for the promotion of cultural and ideological 
progress -- such as those aimed at fostering a new workstyle; 
the spirit of dedication; and the establishment of civilized 
units, neighborhoods, villages, and households -- were launched 
extensively in light of reality. These activities brought about 
an improvement in people's political and ideological awareness 
and their moral qualities, and yielded satisfactory results. In 
order to accelerate the development of education in science and 
technology, the provincial government decided that starting last 
year, 723 million yuan would be raised and injected into the 
scientific and technological education fund each year. Notable 
results were achieved in science and technology, and new headway 
was made in the commercialization and industrialization of 
scientific and technological achievements, with focus on new and 
high technologies and their industrial development. The six 
state-level high and new technology development areas in our 
province all were able to maintain a good momentum of growth. 
Smooth progress was made in the implementation of the "Torch" 
and "Spark" Programs. New achievements were made in 
technological development and basic research. Education saw 
accelerated development. Last year, another 13 counties 
(cities and districts) passed the assessment and acceptance test 
for the implementation of compulsory junior secondary education. 
Universal nine-year compulsory education was practiced in 58 
counties (cities and districts), or half of the number of 
counties in the province. In some economically better-developed 
cities and counties, universal senior secondary education was 
introduced. Vocational, technical and adult education saw rapid 
development. The number of specialized higher and secondary 
institutions increased, enrollment expanded markedly, and 
distribution became more rational. Cultural and artistic 
creation, as well as mass literary and art activities thrived. 
A number of outstanding works emerged which reflected the 
spirit of the times and displayed local characteristics. 
Control of cultural markets produced fruitful results. The 
authorities carried out three large-scale raids on the 
province's audio-video and cultural markets and recreational 
outlets, stepped up the expansion of the ranks of cultural 
inspectors, and strengthened the management of cultural markets. 
Journalism, publication, and radio and TV broadcasting saw 
further development, and played an important role in promoting 
cultural and ideological progress and in enriching people's 
spiritual and cultural lives. Health conditions in the urban 
and rural areas improved. Achievements were made in terms of 
ensuring that township hospitals and county-level epidemic- 
prevention and health-protection organs were not housed in 
dangerous buildings and that they had appropriate accommodation, 
facilities, and personnel. Good results were achieved in 
sports. Our athletes broke 10 world records 17 times, and won 
19 world championships. At the Seventh National Games, they won 
31 gold and silver medals, and came second in terms of overall 
scores and medal counts. Mass sports activities continued to 
develop. A good job was done in family planning. The natural 
population growth rate was maintained at 12.5 per thousand per 
annum, suggesting that the target set by the state was 
fulfilled. National defense education for the whole citizenry 
continued to develop in depth. Closer ties were cemented 
between the Army and the government and between soldiers and 
people, and the work to support the Army and cherish the people, 
to support the Army and give preferential treatment to the 
families of soldiers and martyrs, and to arm grass-roots units; 
was strengthened. Armed forces units stationed in Guangdong, 
the People's Armed Police, the militia, and the reserve service 
all played an active role in rescue work and the maintenance of 
public order, and made new contributions to the promotion of 
material progress, as well as cultural and ideological progress. 
New achievements were made in minority nationality and 
religious affairs, archives, the protection of cultural relics, 
social welfare, and old-age care. 
  4. The comprehensive consolidation of public order and 
the establishment of a democratic legal system were strengthened. 
  With the spearhead directed against salient public order 
problems, we strengthened the work of comprehensive 
consolidation by by organizing a series of special campaigns 
were against thieves on public transport and bandits on roads, 
criminal gangs of a secret society nature, prostitution and 
whoring, gambling and drug dens, as well as smuggling and the 
selling of smuggled goods. Major raids also were organized 
against key spots and venues. Thus social stability was 
effectively maintained. The provincial government decided last 
year to increase contributions to administrative and legal 
development funds by 172 million yuan each year. It also 
decided to further enhance the strengthening of the ranks of 
administrative and legal personnel by increasing staff size and 
improving equipment. Economic auditing and administrative 
supervision were strengthened, and violations of law and 
discipline in the economic sphere were investigated and dealt 
with in accordance with law. Local governments at all levels 
continued to implement conscientiously the resolutions of the 
provincial people's government and its standing committee, and 
consciously accepted supervision by the provincial people's 
congress. The provincial government handled 327 proposals and 
recommendations submitted by deputies to the national and 
provincial people's congresses, as well as 252 motions submitted 
by members of the national and provincial committees of the 
CPPCC. Last year 18 pieces of local legislation submitted by 
the provincial government were examined and adopted by the 
standing committee of the provincial people's congress, and 31 
rules and regulations were promulgated by the provincial 
government. Lawyers and notarial organs worked hard to provide 
legal services for economic construction. Local governments at 
all levels devoted major efforts to the fight against 
corruption, and achieved intermediate results in promoting 
honesty and self-discipline, in rectifying unhealthy practices 
among leading cadres, and in tackling issues of key concern to 
the masses. Government organs at all levels improved their work 
style, further established and improved various administrative 
systems, perfected administrative procedures, increased the 
transparency of government, and improved working efficiency. 
  Over the past year, our province achieved economic 
prosperity, social stability, and tremendous successes on all 
fronts. These were the results of the concerted struggle waged 
by people throughout the province under the correct leadership 
of the CPC Central Committee and the State Council. We also 
owed these successes to the support and assistance given us by 
the PLA units stationed in Guangdong; democratic parties; 
people's organizations; Hong Kong, Macao and Taiwan compatriots; 
and overseas Chinese compatriots; as well as friends all over 
the world. On behalf of the Guangdong Provincial People's 
Government, I extend to them our highest esteem and heartfelt 
thanks. 
  While affirming our achievements, we also must view soberly 
the new contradictions and problems that cropped up in our 
social and economic development last year. First, the scale of 
fixed-asset investment was over-extended. Last year, 
fixed-asset investment in the province totaled 146.1 billion 
yuan, an increase of 58.5 percent over the previous year. The 
use of funds was rather scattered, and there still was not much 
rationality in the readjustment and layout of the investment 
structure and in fund use. Second, there were too many weak 
links in agricultural production. Investment was sufficient, 
the loss of arable land was excessive, and the ability to 
prevent and fight natural disasters still left much to be 
desired. Our province suffered repeated spring chills and 
flooding, and was hit by six strong typhoons last year. These 
natural calamities caused our agricultural sector more than 12 
billion yuan in direct economic losses. Third, prices rose 
substantially. The general retail price index for the whole of 
last year was 18.2 percent higher than in 1992, and exceeded the 
control targets set by the provincial government early last 
year. Fourth, the public order situation was grim and there was 
an increase in the number of criminal offenses. Apart from 
these, there were enterprises that performed poorly and were 
heavily indebted. In some localities, contradictions reflecting 
clashes of interest relations among the people increased, and 
some localities lagged behind in economic development, while 
some had serious fires and accidents. These are problems that 
deserve our attention and that we must tackle in the course of 
advance. 
  Fellow deputies! In the new year ahead, we will be 
confronted by good opportunities, as well as grave challenges. 
The trend of peace and development cannot be held back, and the 
international environment has further improved. Comrade Deng 
Xiaoping's theory of building socialism with Chinese 
characteristics and the decision of the 14th National CPC 
Congress and the 3d Plenary Session of the 14th CPC Central 
Committee on the establishment of a socialist market economy 
structure have further charted our course of reform and opening 
up. The whole country is deepening the reform, opening wider to 
the outside world, and pushing ahead in economic construction. 
We must cherish, grasp, face, and welcome this opportunity. 
Although we are likely to meet numerous other new challenges on 
our road toward the basic realization of modernization before 
the year 2000, with the foundation laid by more than 10 years of 
reform and opening up and with the great enthusiasm and wisdom 
shown by people throughout the province in construction, we 
definitely will be able to overcome difficulties and win new 
victories in reform and development. 
  II. Ensure the Sustained, Rapid, and Healthy 
Development of the National Economy 
  The year 1994 will be an important one for our province in 
accelerating the establishment of the socialist market economy 
structure and in economic development. The guidelines for the 
work of the government are: To conscientiously implement the 
spirit of the 3d Plenary Session of the 14th CPC Central 
Committee and the second session of the 7th provincial people's 
congress; actively promote reforms for the establishment of the 
socialist market economy structure; open wider to the outside 
world; make an earnest effort to shift the focus of economic 
work into the orbit of striving for better economic results; 
readjust and optimize the economic structure; properly handle 
the relationship among reform, development, and stability; 
ensure the sustained, rapid, and healthy development of the 
national economy; and promote the all-round progress of all 
social undertakings. 
  Based on a forecast of the overall trend of economic 
development, and bearing in mind that economic targets must be 
arranged in such a way that they can create an environment 
conducive to reform, the following planned targets have been 
adopted for our province: GDP growth -- 15 percent; total 
industrial output value growth -- 21 percent; total agricultural 
output value growth -- 5 percent; real growth in fixed-asset 
investment -- 13 percent; total retail sales growth -- 21 
percent; revenue growth -- 10 percent, calculated in comparable 
terms; growth in total import-export volume -- 16 percent; 
increases in the general retail price index -- around 12 percent. 
  In order to achieve these targets, it is necessary to pay 
special attention to the following ten tasks: 
  1. Steadily develop agriculture and the rural 
economy. 
  Governments at all levels must have a better understanding 
of 
the position of agriculture as the foundation of the economy; 
must strengthen their leadership over agriculture and rural 
work; and through guidance, support, protection, regulation and 
control, must increase input in agriculture in diverse ways so 
as to invigorate the agricultural economy. We must continue to 
readjust and optimize the pattern of agricultural production; 
invigorate agriculture through application of scientific and 
technological advances and the promotion of education; do a good 
job in running various types of farming-breeding and 
demonstration bases; promote advanced and applicable 
agricultural science and technology in an all-round way; and 
accelerate the development of high-quality, high-yield and high- 
efficiency agriculture, forestry, animal husbandry, and fishery. 
We must strengthen land management, strictly forbid the 
unauthorized seizure and use of arable land, and establish a 
basic farmland protection system. We must do a good job in the 
construction of commodity grain bases so as to ensure the steady 
development of grain production. We also must establish a 
system whereby the price of grain sold under purchase contracts 
is protected, and set up a grain risk fund in order to increase 
peasants' income. Effective measures must be taken to stabilize 
the acreage sown to grain and sugar cane, ensuring that we have 
at least 3.3 million hectares under grain and 260,000 hectares 
under sugar cane each year. We must strengthen farmland capital 
construction and concentrate on the construction, harnessing, 
repair, and reinforcement of key water conservancy projects -- 
such as the construction of embankments along major rivers and 
the Feilai Gorge Water Control Project -- so as to increase our 
capacity to fight and resist natural disasters and improve the 
conditions for agricultural production. We must make a success 
of the exploitation, utilization, and protection of water 
sources; develop the forestry economy; increase the acreage of 
fine forests and orchards; do a good job in forestry protection; 
and consolidate the achievements of afforestation. We must 
speed up the exploitation of slopes, extensively cultivate 
pastures, and actively develop grazing stock and rare animals so 
as to bring about a larger increase in the total number of 
livestock. We must stabilize and improve the two-tier 
management system, with contracting on a household basis forming 
the mainstay; actively develop the rural joint-stock cooperative 
system; and promote a moderate degree of economies of scale and 
intensive management in agriculture. We must develop various 
collectivized service systems in rural areas; gradually promote 
insurance for agricultural production; accelerate the 
integration of trade, industry, and agriculture; and enliven the 
flow of agricultural products. Care must be taken to integrate 
the development of township enterprises with the development of 
small towns in order bring about a higher level of urbanization 
in rural areas. We also must make full use of our superiority 
in having a long coastline and a vast sea area in order to 
further accelerate the exploitation and utilization of seas, 
coastal belts, and islands so as to develop a maritime economy 
in a big way. 
  2. Maintain rapid industrial growth on the basis of 
improved performance. 
  Achieving better economic performance is the key link in 
improving industrial production. Governments and departments at 
all levels must firmly grasp this key link; firmly uphold the 
policy of a high starting point, a high level,and a large scale 
in promoting technological development and technological 
transformation in an all-round way; speed up readjustment of the 
product mix; and improve the quality, grade, and 
production-marketing ratio of products. We must give energetic 
support to the development and production of new products, 
create a number of brand-name products, and establish a number 
of "star" enterprises in an effort to form some pillar 
industries and series of new products that have a competitive 
edge. We must attach special importance to follow-up 
technological transformation in 100 key enterprises and ensure 
the implementation of major technological transformation 
programs. International standards must be adopted in promoting 
standardization in enterprises. We must pay attention to the 
organization, deployment, and coordination of energy, transport, 
material resources, funds and other important factors of 
production. The internal management of enterprises must be 
strengthened. Emulation activities aimed at "changing the 
operational mechanism, grasping management, enhancing 
capability, and improving performance" must be launched in all 
enterprises in the province, and unremitting efforts must be 
made to grasp the management of work at the grass-roots level 
and in workshops in order to tap potential, reduce energy 
consumption, lower cost, and accelerate funds turnover. We must 
continue to grasp the work of turning deficits into surpluses 
and strive to bring about the unity of speed and performance. 
All enterprises must effectively ensure the legitimate rights 
of their staff members and workers, and improve their production 
and living conditions. Further efforts must be made to 
strengthen leadership over safety in production, establish and 
improve safety responsibility systems in production at all 
levels, stop all loopholes, remove hidden perils, and guard 
against the occurrence of serious accidents. 
  3. Attach importance to key projects and accelerate 
the development of infrastructural facilities and basic 
industries. 
  Doing a good job in developing transportation, energy, 
telecommunications, and key raw and semifinished materials 
industries is an important task confronting our province in its 
efforts to speed up modernization. While ensuring a rational 
level of fixed-asset investment, it is necessary to strengthen 
and improve macrocontrol, optimize the investment structure, and 
continue to give priority to infrastructural construction, basic 
industries, and technological transformation in investment. On 
the basis of the availability of funds, it is necessary to make 
rational arrangements for construction projects and keep new 
projects under strict control. Real estate development must be 
carried out in a positive and steady manner. Efforts also must 
be made to reduce the number of up-market buildings and villas 
and to step up the construction of residential units with a 
small profit margin for people with housing problems. 
  Our province has 33 major construction projects under way 
this year, with total investment amounting to 73 billion yuan, 
and 20 billion yuan in investment planned for the current year. 
Among these projects, five are new. They include the Guangzhou 
subway, the coastal expressway in the western part of the 
province, the Guangdong section of the Beijing-Wuhan-Guangzhou 
fiber-optic cable, the Feilai Gorge key water conservancy 
project, and the Dahe Reservoir project. The remaining 28 are 
projects already under construction. They include construction 
of the Beijing-Kowloon Railway, where work will be in full swing 
on all sections; the Guangzhou-Meixian-Shantou Railway, where 
track-laying will reach the Lianhuashan Pass and freight 
transport will be extended to Meixian; the Guangzhou-Shenzhen 
Quasi-Express Railway, where efforts will be made to put China's 
first quasi-express train into service; the completion of the 
Guangzhou-Shenzhen Expressway; the Humen Bridge, where work will 
be accelerated; the commissioning of a number of 10,000-ton 
berths at new ports; as well as efforts to step up the 
construction of key raw and materials projects, such as the two 
ethylene plants at Maoming and Guangzhou. The following targets 
have been adopted for key infrastructural projects in the 
province: Increase power generating capacity by 3 million kw, 
build 140 km of expressways and 400-500 km of first-class 
highways, and increase program-controlled telephones by 2.5 
million circuits. In accordance with the principle of "unified 
planning, coordination between central and regional authorities, 
responsibility at each level, and joint development," 
governments at all levels and various departments must mobilize 
the whole society, persist in raising funds in diverse ways, 
improve the fund-raising mechanism for key projects, strengthen 
organizational coordination and management, promptly tackle 
problems and difficulties arising in the course of construction, 
and ensure the completion of projects on time with attention to 
both quality and efficiency. 
  4. Open wider to the outside world and promote 
pluralism in foreign economic relations and trade 
  Opening wider to the outside world is an important guarantee 
for accelerating the Guangdong economy and for convergence with 
the international economy. We must grasp the opportunity and 
promote the opening of the province on multiple levels and in 
wide areas, as well as in breadth and depth. Special economic 
zones, coastal open cities, and the Pearl River Delta must 
continue to set the pace for opening to the outside world. The 
role of Guangzhou as a pilot city for comprehensive reform must 
be brought into play, and the pace of modernizing the 
export-oriented economy must be quickened. The eastern and 
western flanks of Guangdong and the mountainous areas in the 
heartland must strengthen the work in forming links with other 
parts of the country and importing from abroad, improve the 
investment environment, promote opening to the outside world in 
all directions, and accelerate the pace of development. The 
development zones must do a good job in planning, accelerate 
infrastructural construction, and grasp the completion and 
commissioning of a number of projects. Foreign affairs, 
overseas Chinese affairs, and tourism must continue to serve the 
opening of the province in a positive way and strive to absorb 
funds, talent, and technology from abroad. Efforts must be made 
to strengthen exchanges with other countries and to form 
friendly ties with overseas cities. It is necessary to further 
implement the policies with respect to overseas Chinese 
nationals, particularly housing policies for relatives of 
overseas Chinese nationals in cities and towns, and to make a 
success of overseas Chinese farms. We must strengthen ties and 
cooperation with overseas Chinese compatriots and compatriots 
from Hong Kong, Macao, and Taiwan, and fully bring into play the 
superiority of Guangdong as the hometown of many overseas 
Chinese. We must make an earnest effort to plan and build 
tourist spots in the province; develop Guangdong, Hong Kong, and 
Macao into a "big tourist triangle"; open up international 
tourist routes; improve the quality of tourist services; and tap 
the source of tourists. We must promote reform of ports, 
strengthen port management and port construction, and improve 
work at the customs and other checkpoints in order to provide 
the opening of our province to the outside world with excellent 
coordinated services. We must value the close ties of 
cooperation already formed with Hong Kong and Macao, as these 
ties are in keeping with the aspirations and interests of the 
people of the three places. The people of Guangdong must render 
positive efforts toward the smooth return of Hong Kong and 
Macao, as well as to their prosperity and stability. 
  We must fully grasp the favorable opportunity for the reform 
of foreign trade and strive to expand our foreign economic 
relations and trade. We must persist in putting quality first 
and accelerate the realization of the strategy to diversify 
export markets. While consolidating the Hong Kong and Macao 
markets, we must concentrate efforts to open up markets in North 
America, Western Europe, Southeast Asia, and Japan, and must 
increase our market shares in these areas. We also must 
continue with our efforts to open up markets in Eastern Europe, 
the Commonwealth of Independent States, South Africa, Africa and 
Australia. We must create conditions for the development of 
overseas enterprises, run multinational enterprises and 
international cooperative production enterprises, and establish 
overseas regional sales networks. We must attach importance to 
the development of trade with Taiwan. We must devote major 
efforts to developing international technology, labor exports, 
and overseas engineering contracts. We must strengthen import- 
export management and achieve better export returns. We must 
optimize the foreign investment structure, actively import high 
technology, attach importance to the work of attracting more 
international consortiums and multinational companies to invest 
in Guangdong, actively explore ways to make use of the 
international capital market, win foreign government loans and 
loans from the Asian Development Bank and World Bank, and 
improve the realization rate of foreign capital pledged. It is 
also necessary to strengthen the management of and provision of 
service to foreign-invested enterprises in accordance with the 
principle of equality and equal benefits, as well as the 
principles, policies, laws, and regulations stipulated by the 
state. 
  5. Develop tertiary industry and cultivate various 
types of markets. 
  Rationally developing primary, secondary, and tertiary 
industries, and achieving better coordination among the three 
sectors is a necessity for the basic realization of 
modernization in our province by the year 2000. This year, 
substantial headway must be achieved in accelerating the 
development of tertiary industry. We must implement 
conscientiously the Decision of the CPC Central Committee and 
the State Council on "Accelerating the Development of Tertiary 
Industry," as well as the proposals for implementation drawn up 
by the provincial party committee and the provincial government, 
do a good job in general surveys, make concrete plans, and 
strive to increase the proportion of tertiary industry in the 
national economy. Growth of the tertiary sector in special 
economic zones and the Pearl River Delta must be higher than GDP 
growth. Mountainous areas, as well as under-developed areas, 
must quicken their pace of development. In developing tertiary 
industry, we must concentrate on speeding up the establishment 
of the market system and stimulate circulation. We must uphold 
the coordinated development of all economic sectors, with the 
public sector constituting the mainstay. We must continue to 
develop the commodity market and conscientiously grasp market 
development. Places that meet the necessary conditions should 
strive to set up more up-market large commercial and trading 
centers. Efforts also must be made to speed up the cultivation 
of various production factor markets, particularly the 
development of the financial, technological, information, labor, 
and transportation markets. We must accelerate the development 
of intermediary services, such as accounting, legal advice, 
auditing and counseling; accelerate the training of personnel 
providing intermediary services through a variety of effective 
ways and means; establish and improve various types of 
intermediary service organs; strengthen management; and actively 
provide high-quality service. We also must pay close attention 
to the establishment and improvement of market rules and 
regulations, protect fair competition, and strictly ban fake and 
inferior goods. 
  6. Effectively control commodity prices and improve 
the people's living standards 
  Keeping prices basically stable is an important condition 
for 
the smooth progress of reform. As the scale of national 
construction expands and the price reform progresses, price 
rises are unavoidable, but they must be contained within a 
reasonable range. We must actively and properly implement the 
state's price reform program; choose the opportune moment to 
further rationalize transport, energy, and telecommunications 
charges, as well as the prices of products like cured tobacco 
and cocoon; and step up the improvement of the price formation 
mechanism in which market forces play a dominant role. It is 
necessary to strengthen the government's macroeconomic control 
and management of prices, uphold and improve the system of 
responsibility for price control targets for governments at all 
levels, proceed from the work of increasing the supply of 
essential products, strengthen "Rice Basket" and "Shopping 
Basket" Projects, and effectively stabilize the prices of 
products that have a vital bearing on the everyday life of the 
masses. We must improve the reserve system for important 
commodities like grain, oils, sugar, and meat, as well as 
measures for price control. We must strengthen the management 
of administrative charges, strengthen price supervision and 
inspection, resolutely investigate and deal with the unlawful 
practices of random charges and price rises, and protect the 
legitimate interests of consumers. 
  Through efforts to develop the rural economy, improve the 
performance of enterprises, and promote the reform of the job 
allocation and wage systems in enterprises and administrative 
establishments, we should pay attention to resolving the actual 
difficulties of retirees, steadily raise people's income level, 
and improve their living conditions. 
  7. Maintain fiscal balance and credit balance 
  Actively carrying out reform of the taxation system and 
reform of the tax-sharing fiscal system in accordance with the 
unified arrangements of the state is a central task of our 
province's fiscal work. Governments at all levels must do a 
conscientious job in their fiscal and taxation work, and must 
strive to tap new sources of revenue and to economize on 
expenditure. It is necessary to manage taxation strictly in 
accordance with law; improve the means of tax collection; 
strengthen tax collection and management, particularly the 
collection and management of personal income tax and enterprise 
income tax; and ensure a steady growth of local revenue and 
revenue to be turned over to the central authorities, in order 
to make greater contributions to the state. In accordance with 
the principle of "planning our expenditures in light of our 
income and maintaining a balance between income and 
expenditure," we must manage our budgets strictly and must not 
allow any deficits. We must do a conscientious job in arranging 
and managing normal revenue and expenditure; give priority to 
the dispensing of normal operating expenses to local state 
organs at various levels and wages to administrative units; and 
guarantee input into agriculture, science, education, and other 
key areas, as well as public spending. We gradually must resolve 
the problem of scattered financial resources, reform the 
existing expenditure structure, practice strict economy, 
resolutely control unreasonable expenditure, and ensure fiscal 
balance. Efforts also must be made to complete the issuing of 
treasury bonds. 
  It is necessary to continue to strengthen bank credits and 
the control and management of money supply, and to improve the 
mechanism for a benign cycle of credit "borrowing, use, and 
repayment." In conjunction with fiscal reform, we must 
concentrate our efforts on readjusting the credit structure, 
truly support units that perform well and restrict those that 
perform poorly, ensure the fund needs of key projects, keep 
dynamic accounts of funds on deposit, speed up the turnover of 
funds, and make effective use of funds. We must continue to 
prohibit random fundraising. We must improve banking services 
and energetically organize deposits. In particular, it is 
necessary to stabilize enterprise deposits, strengthen bank 
provisions, do a good job in cash management, and strictly 
control the irrational release of cash. We must strengthen 
foreign debt management and prevent blind borrowing. It is also 
necessary to improve various management systems, standardize 
various types of financial operations, and consolidate the 
results of the financial overhaul. 
  8. Accelerate economic development in mountainous 
areas and quicken the pace of shaking off poverty and achieving 
prosperity 
  Speeding up economic development and the work to shake off 
poverty and achieve prosperity in "old, newly developed, 
mountainous, border, and poverty-stricken" areas is a task with 
an important bearing on the basic realization of modernization 
in our province by the year 2000. 
  Governments at all 
levels and various departments must attach further importance to 
and support economic development in 50 counties in mountain 
areas, make full use of the resource superiority of mountainous 
areas, suit measures to local conditions, and blaze new trails 
for economic development in mountainous areas. We must 
implement conscientiously the spirit of the eighth provincial 
conference on work in mountainous areas, energetically develop 
township enterprises in mountainous areas, concentrate energy on 
the vigorous grasping of infrastructural construction in 
mountainous areas and the improvement of their backward 
transport conditions, and speed up the exploitation of local 
resources and the work of absorbing foreign capital. According 
to the new standards prescribed by the state, our province still 
faces an arduous task in supporting the poor at present. We 
must continue to implement the existing support-the-poor 
policies and the related support systems of the provincial party 
committee, provincial government, and relevant units directly 
under the provincial government; resolutely adhere to the 
principle of "the province giving support to counties, cities 
giving support to townships, and townships giving support to 
management districts and villages"; and implement the system of 
contracted responsibility for different levels. We must do a 
better job in resettling people in extremely poverty-stricken 
limestone areas and on reservoir sites, continue to support 
extremely poverty-stricken townships in their efforts to expand 
their collective economy, concentrate energy on supporting 
poverty-stricken households, and strive to basically resolve the 
problem of providing these people with sufficient food and 
clothing in accordance with new standards before the end of this 
year. 
  9. Attach great importance to science, technology, and 
education; promote scientific and technological progress; and 
improve the quality of laborers. 
  Accelerating the development of science, technology, and 
education is the fundamental way to turn our national economy 
from an extensive economy into an intensive one. Governments at 
all levels must strengthen their leadership over scientific and 
technological work, increase input into science and technology 
through diverse channels, gradually establish an operating 
mechanism for science and technology which suits our economic 
development, and devote major efforts to increasing our 
comprehensive scientific and technological strength. In our 
scientific and technological development, it is necessary to 
face the main battlefields of economic construction; take 
commercialization, industrialization, and internationalization 
as our objectives; and concentrate our energy on the development 
of electronics information, bioengineering, new materials, fine 
chemicals, mechatronics, and other high and new technologies and 
industries. We must see to it that enterprises become the main 
entities for scientific and technological development, encourage 
enterprises to run their own research organs, and enhance the 
capability of enterprises to absorb technologies and carry out 
research and development on their own initiative. It is 
necessary to bring into full play the role of existing special 
research organs and institutions of higher learning, strengthen 
research on basic and applied science, and organize key 
scientific and technological projects and intermediate trial 
production in order to steadily raise the scientific research 
capability and technological level of our province. We must 
protect intellectual property, do a good job in patenting work, 
accelerate the conversion of existing scientific and 
technological achievements into productive forces, and raise the 
technological content of products. We also must continue to do 
a good job in running the six state-level high- and 
new-technology development areas and the Pearl River Delta High 
Technology Industrial Belt, and expand the scope of 
technological proliferation. 
  Continue to uphold the strategy of giving priority to the 
development of education. We must raise funds for education 
through diverse channels and improve the conditions for running 
schools. We must promote reform of the educational system, 
readjust the educational structure, and make a success of pilot 
projects for comprehensive educational reforms in both rural 
areas and cities. The Pearl River Delta and counties where 
conditions are right must make an effort to popularize senior 
secondary education. We must devote major efforts to developing 
secondary vocational and technical education and various types 
of adult education, and to providing on-the-job training for 
staff members and workers. We must strengthen preschool and 
special education, and develop various types of post-secondary 
education through various channels. In tertiary education, we 
must further optimize the distribution of institutions and the 
structure of specialties in an effort to train all kinds of 
specialized personnel for modernization. Moral education must 
be strengthened in all schools and the quality of education must 
be improved in an all-round way. We must earnestly organize the 
implementation of the "PRC Teachers Law," show greater concern 
for teachers, create the necessary environment for the 
continuous improvement of teachers' working and living 
conditions, stabilize and enlarge the ranks of teachers, and 
improve the quality of the ranks of teachers. 
  10. Strengthen urban and rural planning and 
management, and make an earnest effort to do a good job in 
environmental protection 
  We must have our eyes on the future; hold ourselves 
responsible to coming generations; persist in synchronous 
planning, implementation, and development for economic 
construction, urban and rural planning, and environmental 
construction; and must not carry out construction at the expense 
of the environment. 
  In accordance with the requirement of 
"unified planning, rational distribution, comprehensive 
development and coordinated construction," governments at all 
levels must strive for planning from a high starting point, 
construction of a high standard, and efficient management in 
order to be able to stand the test of time. It is necessary to 
quicken the pace of development in villages and small towns; 
concentrate energy on the planning and development of the seats 
of government of our 1,000-plus small towns; and turn them into 
rural economic, political, and cultural centers with fairly 
comprehensive functions. In environmental management at the 
small-town level, there must be the necessary leadership, a 
contingent of environmental protection and health personnel, 
guaranteed funds, and garbage and sewage treatment plants, as 
well as rules, regulations, and systems for environmental 
protection and public health work. By properly grasping work at 
the small-town level, we can bring along work at the village 
level. We also must uphold the principle of "unified planning, 
unified land acquisition, unified development, unified 
alienation, and unified management," and effectively strengthen 
land development, utilization, and management in both urban and 
rural areas. Strict standards must be adhered to in the 
examination, approval, and management of land use for 
construction purposes and of land use in the development areas. 
In the development of new villages by peasants, the use of land 
on slopes should be advocated. We must strengthen the 
comprehensive improvement of highways; do a good job in cleaning 
up, greening, and landscaping roadsides; take effective measures 
to tackle the problems of illegal construction and the dirty, 
messy, and poor environment in an all-round way; and strive to 
improve the view along roads. We must grasp urban environmental 
protection and the prevention and control of industrial 
pollution in accordance with law; attach importance to the 
comprehensive control of the "four harms" of sewage, waste gas, 
industrial residue, and noise pollution; and strive to achieve 
harmony between the overall environment and economic 
construction in order to continuously improve people's living 
environment. 
<H5>  III. Reforms for Promoting the Establishment of the </H5>
Socialist Market Economic Structure 
  The "Decision" of the 3d Plenary Session of the 14th CPC 
Central Committee is the program for accelerating the 
establishment of the socialist market economy structure. Our 
province must and can continue to set the pace in reform, and 
establish the basic framework for a socialist market economy 
structure in five years. With this in mind, and in accordance 
with the strategy of "general advance and breakthrough at 
selected areas," we must quicken the pace of reform while 
grasping reforms in the following seven areas. 
  (1) Speed up the establishment of a modern enterprise 
system. 
  We must be innovative in the establishment of a modern 
enterprise system. A total of 250 enterprises in the province 
will be chosen as pilots for the establishment of a modern 
enterprise system, and the experience thus gained will be 
promoted gradually. It is necessary to further implement the 
"Enterprise Law" and the "Regulations on Changing the 
Operational Mechanisms of Industrial Enterprises Owned by the 
Whole People," and effectively extend to enterprises the various 
rights and responsibilities pertaining to their management. It 
is also necessary to promote reform of the internal operational 
mechanisms, the labor and personnel system, and the distribution 
systems of enterprises in an all-round way, and to implement 
conscientiously the "Guidelines for Accounting in Enterprises" 
and the "General Financial Rules for Enterprises." These reforms 
should be completed before the end of this year. We must take 
reform of the property rights system as the point of 
breakthrough to accelerate reform of the system for management 
of state-owned assets. We must firmly grasp the establishment 
and improvement of state-owned asset management organs at all 
levels, and strengthen the management and supervision of 
state-owned assets by earnestly implementing the 
soon-to-be-published "Regulations for the Supervision and 
Management of the Assets of State-Owned Enterprises." We must 
unfold a general checkup of assets, define property rights, 
settle claims and debts, reappraise assets, and verify state 
capital. We must do a good job in property rights registration, 
clarify equity relations, and speed up the establishment of a 
standardized equity transaction market. Efforts must be made to 
study the organizational forms of equity of state- owned 
enterprises; promote the pluralization of equity through such 
means as alienation, mergers, leasing, and auctions; and bring 
about the compensated use of state-owned assets and their 
appreciation against inflation. We must earnestly publicize and 
implement the "PRC Company Law." In general, the corporate 
system must be practiced in all newly established companies. We 
must systematically promote the corporate system in existing 
enterprises. In light of specific conditions, wholly-owned 
companies, limited- liability companies, limited-liability stock 
companies, and other forms may be adopted. We must continue to 
enlarge the scope of experimentation in the standardized 
joint-stock enterprise system. Positive efforts must be made to 
adopt the shareholding system in new development and 
construction projects, and efforts must be made to increase the 
number of publicly listed, limited-liability stock companies. 
Joint-stock companies must play a good exemplary role in 
standardized management and in the transformation of management 
mechanisms. We must continue to do a good job in making use of 
foreign funds to rejuvenate old enterprises. 
  2. Ensure the smooth progress of reform in the 
fiscal and taxation systems. 
  We must do a good job in tax reform, reform of the 
tax-sharing system, and reform of the profit-distribution system 
in state-owned enterprises -- all in strict accordance with the 
unified requirements of the central authorities. Governments at 
all levels must resolutely subordinate themselves to the overall 
needs of reform and the overall interests of the state; properly 
handle relations between different quarters; protect the 
enthusiasm of governments at all levels in increasing revenue, 
reducing expenditure, and developing the economy; and ensure the 
smooth progress of reform. With the state now implementing the 
tax-sharing system, we must continue to practice the system of 
fiscal responsibility in cities and counties. The overall 
requirement is: 1) Rationally fix the pattern of interest 
distribution between the provincial government and the city and 
county governments. In accordance with the principle of 
protecting the vested interests and enthusiasm of the local 
authorities while ensuring that the provincial fiscal department 
can appropriately centralize financial resources and increase 
its regulatory and control capability, it is necessary to 
appropriately readjust the base figures of various cities and 
fix the annual rates of increase in light of the tax- sharing 
method practiced by the central government and the actual 
situation in various cities. 2) The provincial government must 
appropriately pool financial resources in given proportions from 
the additional revenue generated by different cities in 1993. 
These resources will be spent mainly on ensuring provincial 
public expenditure; helping out mountainous and poverty-stricken 
areas; supporting agriculture and scientific, educational, 
cultural, and public health undertakings; and supporting 
expansion of the ranks of public security, procuratorial, and 
judicial personnel. 3) Clearly and accurately settle accounts 
in strict accordance with policy regulations and promote this 
practice from city to city. Governments at all levels must do a 
good job in various kinds of groundwork for reform of the 
taxation system; establish a system of intermediate tax, with 
the value-added tax as the mainstay; and improve the local 
taxation systems and various supporting systems. In conjunction 
with the tax reform and the implementation of the "two 
regulations," it is necessary to readjust and standardize in a 
rational manner the relations of interest distribution between 
the state and enterprises. We must strengthen the collection 
and management of various types of taxes, and set up taxation 
organs at the central and local levels. Reform of the fiscal 
and taxation systems touches on various aspects of economic 
work. When promoting the reform, we must conscientiously handle 
various new problems and continually work for their improvement 
in order to increase the sources of revenue and arouse the 
enthusiasm of enterprises. Through promotion of fiscal and tax 
reforms, it is necessary to make positive efforts to explore new 
ideas for straightening out the relations between the localities 
and the fiscal departments in revenue distribution and for 
broadening the sources of revenue, and establish a good 
mechanism that can truly bring about the unity of fiscal and 
operational authority. 
  3. Steadily promote reform of the financial system 
  We must support and assist the provincial branch of the 
People's Bank of China in the transformation of its functions 
and in its exercise of stronger financial supervision. We must 
transform the operational mechanism of specialized banks as 
quickly as possible, so they gradually can change themselves 
into state-owned commercial banks that bear their own risks and 
are responsible for their own profits and losses. We must bring 
into full play the role of standardized local financial organs. 
We must speed up the transformation of operational mechanisms 
in the Guangdong Development Bank, the Guangdong Provincial 
International Trust and Investment Company, the Guangdong 
Provincial Overseas Chinese Trust and Investment Company, the 
Guangdong Provincial Yuecai [4727 6299] Trust and Investment 
Company, and other financial organs, and must increase their 
competitiveness. We must systematically run city cooperative 
banks in key cities on a trial basis. Positive efforts must be 
made to persuade the state to authorize the setting up of the 
Guangdong Overseas Chinese Bank. We must strive to create the 
necessary conditions to attract more foreign banks and Chinese 
banks in Hong Kong and Macao to set up branches in our province 
in accordance with the law, and encourage our more competitive 
financial institutions to set up branches outside China. We 
must develop and put on a sound basis a provincial financial 
market in which bank financing will be the main activity, a 
market that is managed strictly and opened to the outside world 
in a unified way and in which there is fair competition. We 
must speed up the formation of the Guangdong Financial Center 
and establish a standardized and centralized financing center as 
quickly as possible in order to standardize interbank borrowing. 
We must continue with our efforts to run well the Securities 
Transaction Center and the Shenzhen Stock Exchange, and take 
prudent and proper steps to carry out foreign exchange futures 
transactions on a trial basis. We also must continue to explore 
other forms and means of financing in order to broaden the 
source of construction funds in our province. 
  At the same time, corresponding steps must be taken to 
reform 
the existing investment system and gradually establish a risk 
restraint mechanism for corporate investment and bank credits. 
We must reform the method of setting up projects, as well as 
the procedures for examination and approval, and establish a 
system of project registration. Competitive investment projects 
will have enterprises as basic investment entities and will be 
established and managed through fundraising on the market. 
While actively trying to secure state investment and financing 
in our infrastructural projects, it is also necessary to 
increase the responsibility of enterprises and local governments 
in investment and financing. Governments at all levels must 
concentrate on grasping the construction of major 
infrastructural facilities and basic industries that have a 
vital bearing on the local economy, make active efforts to win 
state support, and encourage and attract more local 
participation and investment in order to broaden the channels of 
investment and financing for these projects. Investment in 
public welfare projects should be made within the financial 
capability of the local governments concerned. 
  4. Deepen reform of the foreign trade system 
  We must uphold the orientation of "unified policy, open 
management, fair competition, and sole responsibility for 
profits and losses," and must make use of the opportunity 
afforded by reform of the foreign exchange system to promote 
reform of the foreign trade system. We must handle properly the 
various tasks of convergence following the merging of exchange 
rates, actively explore effective means of maintaining rapid 
growth in foreign trade and exports when mandatory plans for 
foreign trade enterprises are abolished, strengthen the 
coordination and service mechanism of foreign trade management, 
further improve the system of export tax refund, gradually 
introduce public bidding or standardized distribution for import 
and export quotas and licensing administration, and further 
enlarge the foreign trade power granted to production and 
commercial enterprises and scientific and technological units 
where conditions are right. We must speed up the transformation 
of operational mechanisms in state-owned foreign trade 
enterprises. Foreign trade enterprises that satisfy the 
conditions may be reorganized into standardized 
limited-liability or limited-liability stock companies after 
approval. We must practice the method of diversification on the 
basis of one main trade, actively promote the system of import 
and export agents, and develop international enterprise groups. 
We must back up enterprises where conditions are right in 
forming conglomerate companies that combine trade with industry, 
agriculture and technology, and promote the development of large 
enterprise groups and foreign-invested enterprises into 
multinational companies that combine trade with industry, 
agriculture and technology. 
  5. Increase the intensity of reform in the social 
security system 
  We must establish and improve centralized social insurance 
management organs to manage old-age pensions, industrial 
injuries, unemployment, and medical services in the province. 
Relevant departments at all levels must provide energetic 
support and cooperation in order for new breakthroughs to be 
made. All cities must establish within their jurisdiction as 
soon as possible special organs for the unified management of 
social insurance. It is necessary to enlarge the coverage of 
social insurance, pay special attention to the improvement of 
old-age and unemployment insurance in enterprises, strengthen 
the function of social services, and reduce the burdens of 
enterprises. We must create the necessary conditions for 
extending old-age insurance to rural areas, and practice there a 
system in which family insurance will be combined with community 
support, with the former playing the main role. We must reform 
the existing free medical system and labor insurance medical 
system, and speed up the establishment and improvement of an 
unemployment, industrial-injury, and medical insurance system 
for the whole province. We must establish social insurance fund 
supervision organs to supervise the collection, expenditure, and 
management of social insurance funds, and must separate social 
insurance administration from social insurance operations. We 
also must energetically expedite the work of providing the legal 
framework for the social insurance system. 
  6. Make a further success of reform in the urban 
housing system 
  In order to achieve a moderate level of prosperity in urban 
housing, it is necessary to speed up construction of civilian 
housing; put equal stress on sale, renting, and construction; 
coordinate policies; form a market; and accelerate the 
establishment of a new urban housing system. We must fix 
property prices rationally, quicken the pace of rent increases 
within the limits of rational housing expenses of worker 
families, and strive to raise rent levels to the equivalent of 
the sum of maintenance and management expenditure and 
depreciation by the year 1996. We must implement, in an overall 
way, a housing provident fund system and practice a variety of 
purchase payment methods. It is necessary to develop 
energetically housing that is both affordable and suitable, and 
to strive to improve a system to supply housing of a social 
insurance nature. Commercial real estate development companies 
should devote at least 20 percent of their construction projects 
to affordable and suitable housing. All local governments must 
speed up the construction of merchandise housing. In 
particular, they must step up the construction of cheap housing 
for those with housing difficulties and effectively improve 
people's living conditions. It is necessary to actively develop 
the real estate transaction market, while simultaneously paying 
attention to developing the property management, maintenance, 
and interior decoration markets. It is also necessary to 
quicken the pace of enterprise housing reform. 
  7. Actively implement the reform of government organs 
  Governments at all levels must effectively change their 
functions, and accelerate the reform of government functions in 
accordance with the principle of separate government and 
enterprise functions and the principle of simpler, unified, and 
effective administration. We must change the state of 
overlapping functions and the over-elaborate division of work in 
economic management departments, abolish or merge organs that 
perform overlapping or similar functions, and redefine the 
functions of different organs; drastically slash the number of 
non-permanent organs; energetically streamline internal organs 
and reduce staff numbers, and strictly adhere to the size or 
number of personnel stipulated; establish and improve a work 
system for organs and put administrative procedures on a sound 
footing. In institutional reform, it is necessary to make 
unified planning and careful organization, bring the higher and 
lower levels together, and implement measures gradually. On the 
basis of consolidating the achievements of previous 
institutional reforms, it is necessary to complete reform at the 
provincial level and reform in the 15 pilot cities and counties 
(districts) before launching the reform in all cities, counties 
(districts) and small towns, and strive to complete the reform 
of government organs at all levels as soon as possible. In 
conducting institutional reform and implementing the public 
service system, it is necessary to combine administrative 
streamlining and intensified training with the development of 
productive forces in order to improve the personnel structure 
and quality, while simultaneously turning superfluous personnel 
into a vital force for modernization. 
  Meanwhile, we must continue to deepen rural reform and 
reform 
of the planning, commodity circulation, pricing, scientific- 
technological, and education systems, and to accelerate growth 
of the market system and of structural readjustment. 
Governments at all levels must handle properly the relations 
between reform and development on the one hand and stability on 
the other, attach importance to key projects, pay attention to 
coordination, properly handle the interests of all quarters, and 
create a more relaxed macroeconomic environment for promoting 
reform. 
<H5>  IV. Strengthen Socialist Culture and Ideology; Promote the </H5>
Advance of All Social Undertakings 
  The establishment of a socialist market economy structure 
and 
the quickening of the economic development pace not only provide 
more favorable conditions for the promotion of cultural and 
ideological progress, but make it imperative for cultural and 
ideological progress to provide the necessary ideological 
guarantees, spiritual stimulation, and intellectual support. 
Our objective for cultural and ideological progress is to 
improve in an all-round way the quality of man as modern and 
civilized people, foster a new generation of better-educated and 
self-disciplined people with high ideals and moral integrity, 
and mold a good image for the people of Guangdong; to create a 
spiritual environment where everyone has a positive attitude and 
strives to make progress, a working environment where there is 
unity and harmony, an investment environment where there is 
friendly cooperation, and a living environment that is clean and 
beautiful; to foster a healthy, civilized, hardworking, and 
law-abiding social atmosphere, and promote economic prosperity 
and all-round social progress. In accordance with this 
objective, it is necessary to bring about cultural and 
ideological progress in practice. We must strengthen 
ideological education; arm the broad masses of cadres and the 
people with Comrade Deng Xiaoping's theory of building socialism 
with Chinese characteristics; deeply unfold education on 
patriotism, collectivism, and socialism, education on modern 
Chinese history, and education on the fine traditions of the 
party; oppose money worship, extreme individualism, and decadent 
ways of life; and foster a correct outlook on life, a correct 
sense of values, and correct moral concepts. We must unfold 
activities to build civilized units, villages, and households in 
a more extensive and penetrating way throughout the province. 
We must continue to develop and improve venues and facilities 
for the masses to better themselves culturally and 
ideologically. We must further unfold education on 
public-mindedness and professional ethics; create a fine social 
atmosphere in which everyone pays attention to civility, public 
health and decorum, abides by discipline and law, takes pleasure 
in helping others, and is ready to take up the cudgels for a 
just cause; and give substance to the vibrant spirit of the 
Guangdong people in seeking progress. 
  Further strengthen theoretical research on social science, 
and use Marxism and Mao Zedong Thought to guide theoretical 
research on philosophy and social science. We must implement 
the principle of "integrating theory with practice" and 
concentrate our energy on studying major theoretical and 
practical issues in the establishment of the socialist market 
economy structure, and carry forward various reforms. We also 
must continue studying the trends of economic development 
worldwide, draw useful lessons in economic construction from 
other parts of the country and from other countries, study how 
to further establish a new superiority for the development of 
Guangdong, and promote the modernization of our province. 
  Actively develop and promote various cultural undertakings. 
We must uphold the principles of serving the people and 
socialism, and pf "letting a hundred flowers blossom and a 
hundred schools of thought contend"; encourage the vast numbers 
of literary and art workers to actively plunge themselves into 
the great practice of reform, opening up and modernization, and 
to create outstanding works that are worthy of the times and 
satisfy the growing spiritual needs of the masses. We must 
continue to deepen the reform of the literary and art system and 
of art education, and to blaze new trails that are not only 
compatible with the socialist market economy structure, but can 
meet the requirements of socialist cultural and ideological 
progress, and are in keeping with the law of development of 
culture and art itself. We must effectively grasp the 
implementation of the "Beautiful Southern Guangdong Project" for 
the promotion of Guangdong culture. Factories and mines, rural 
areas, and government organs and establishments must actively 
unfold healthy, forward-looking, and diversified recreational 
activities to enrich the cultural life of the masses. While 
striving to bring about a prosperous culture, we must grasp 
management of the cultural market and make unremitting efforts 
to eliminate pornography in order to maintain a clean and pure 
social environment. We must raise funds by any and every means; 
further strengthen the construction of basic cultural and art 
facilities; grasp the construction of libraries, museums, 
cultural halls (stations), archives, and television and 
broadcasting centers and relay stations; and strive to broaden 
their coverage. From this year on, fiscal authorities at 
various levels must increase their allocations to support the 
development of cultural undertakings. Journalism, publication, 
and radio and TV broadcasting must create a better media 
environment for the reform, opening up, and economic development 
of Guangdong. Further efforts must be made to do a better job 
in keeping historical accounts, archives and local gazetteers, 
and to strengthen the protection of relics. 
  Strive to do a good job in medical and health work. We must 
continue to make a success of public health reform, and must 
strengthen and improve the internal management of medical and 
health units. Fiscal departments at all levels must suitably 
increase allocations to medical and health services. Efforts 
must be made to expedite the implementation of the primary 
health care program and do a good job in developing county-level 
epidemic prevention and health care organs, as well as township 
hospitals. We must grasp conscientiously the cultivation and 
training of public health technical personnel, and actively 
conduct research on medical science in order to raise the 
quality and level of medical service. We must devote major 
efforts to invigorating Chinese medicine. We must continue to 
do a good job in the prevention and treatment of local, chronic 
and epidemic diseases, and improve sewage and toilet facilities 
in rural areas. We must strengthen health legislation and the 
supervision of relevant law enforcement, and effectively 
consolidate the pharmaceutical market. We also must continue to 
conduct the patriotic health movement in depth, and make a 
success of health inspection in all cities in the province in 
order to greet the Third National Urban Health Assessment and 
Appraisal. 
  Energetically develop sports activities. We must launch more 
extensive mass sports activities in urban and rural areas, and 
strive to join the front ranks of the nation in mass sports 
work. We must improve selection and training networks, properly 
run sports schools and part-time physical education classes, and 
step up the cultivation of reserve athletes. We must strengthen 
research in sports science, strive to raise the level of 
competitive sports, and establish a new superiority for 
Guangdong in the sports field. We must make an earnest effort 
to make a success of the Ninth Guangdong Provincial Games. 
  Vigorously grasp family planning. Our province is still at a 
birth peak this year, and control of population growth remains 
an arduous task. Governments at all levels must effectively 
strengthen leadership over birth control, with the number one 
man personally assuming overall charge. It is necessary to 
organize the two provincial birth control campaigns in May and 
September, properly grasp regular birth control work, and bring 
birth control work into the orbit of management according to the 
law. It is necessary to strictly prohibit couples from having 
many children, strictly control persons having a second child 
outside the plan, and raise the birth control rate. It is 
necessary to strengthen family planning among the migrant 
population. Every effort should be made to keep the natural 
population growth rate under the level of 13.5 per thousand. 
  Conscientiously do a good job in work with nationalities and 
religious persons. We must uphold the principle of equality, 
solidarity, mutual assistance, and cooperation among different 
nationalities, and further implement the "PRC Law on Autonomy 
for Nationality Regions." We must assist nationality regions in 
making a success of infrastructural construction, energetically 
develop their economies, and strive to narrow the gap between 
minority nationality regions and other regions. We must 
implement conscientiously the party's policies concerning 
religion, respect the religious freedom of citizens, and protect 
normal religious activities and the legitimate rights of 
religious circles. 
  Further unfold national defense education and strengthen 
Army- people unity. With patriotic education as the core, we 
must make continuous efforts to enhance the defense awareness of 
the citizenry and strengthen the building of the militia and 
reserve forces. We must continue to do a good job of the "two 
supports," and create more model "two-support" cities 
(counties). Through the launching of activities to nominate 
"outstanding wives and mothers of servicemen," dynamic education 
on supporting the Army and giving preferential treatment to 
families of soldiers and martyrs should be unfolded in urban and 
rural areas this year. We must launch in a down-to-earth and 
sustained manner activities in which soldiers and civilians join 
hands to promote a civilized way of life, and must strengthen 
unity between the government and the Army, and between soldiers 
and the people. We must continue to take proper care of 
ex-servicemen and soldiers transferred to civilian work, as well 
as retired military cadres. 
  V. Strengthen the Socialist Legal System; 
Consolidate and Develop the Situation of Stability and Unity 
  Actively advance democratic politics. Governments at all 
levels must uphold the system of reporting their work to the 
people's congress and its standing committee, and must 
consciously accept the inspection and supervision of these 
bodies and earnestly implement their resolutions. It is 
necessary to further open up democratic channels, and bring into 
full play the role of the CPPCC and of democratic parties and 
nonparty personages in participating in and discussing 
government and political affairs. We must establish and improve 
the system of democratic participation in politics for trade 
unions, communist youth leagues, women's federations, and other 
organizations. We must earnestly handle motions and 
recommendations submitted by people's deputies, as well as 
proposals put forward by members of the CPPCC, humbly listen to 
the views and suggestions of all, strive to improve government 
work, cement closer ties with the masses, and advance socialist 
democratic politics. 
  Quicken the pace of legislation around the task of 
establishing a socialist market economy structure. We must take 
the initiative to support the people's congress and its standing 
committee in speeding up the formulation of laws and regulations 
for standardizing market entities, maintaining market order, 
strengthening macrocontrol, improving social security, and 
promoting the opening up of the country to the outside world, 
and must earnestly do a good job in drafting and coordinating 
bills and laws that are within our terms of reference. We must 
formulate administrative rules and regulations for standardizing 
the government's work of macroeconomic control, and try as 
quickly as possible to establish and improve the legal system, 
which is necessary for the development of the socialist market 
economy structure. We must devote major efforts to making a 
success of supervision over law enforcement, and make 
unremitting efforts to raise the level of doing things in 
accordance with law and of conducting administration and 
management in accordance with law. We must continue to promote 
the "two-five" (0059 0063] popular legal education and enhance 
the legal concept of the whole nation. We must further 
strengthen reform through labor and labor education, and make a 
success of legal services at the grass-roots level. 
  Strive to maintain social stability. We must raise the 
awareness of the citizenry concerning national security, and 
must guard against infiltration and sabotage by hostile forces 
both at home and abroad. We must continue to wage struggles 
against, deal vigorous blows to and eliminate the "seven evils." 
Bearing in mind the new trends of criminal offenses under a 
market economy, we must increase the intensity of the crackdown 
on serious criminal offenses, and promptly wage struggles or 
conduct investigations with specific targets in mind. We must 
concentrate our energy on battling infiltration by outside 
secret societies, as well as criminal gangs of a secret society 
nature, criminals guilty of serious violence, pickpockets on 
public transport, road bandits, and other arch- criminals. We 
must uphold the principle of "putting equal stress on raids and 
prevention, and dealing with the cause as well as the effect, 
with the emphasis on the cause"; rely on the great masses of the 
people; continue to strengthen the comprehensive consolidation 
of public order; earnestly implement various public order 
responsibility systems; establish and improve mass prevention 
and mass control networks; launch joint defense for the 
maintenance of public order; enlarge the coverage of public 
order patrols; and strive to maintain social stability and the 
safety of people's lives and property. We must strengthen 
public order administration over the migrant population. We 
must pay close attention to various factors of instability, and 
take positive steps to prevent and handle emergencies. We must 
be adept at handling contradictions among the people, properly 
handle the distribution of interests, and guard against the 
intensification of contradictions. We must energetically 
strengthen management of the traffic and fire services, attach 
importance to safety inspection, and promptly eliminate hidden 
perils. We must continue to conduct in-depth antismuggling 
struggles and joint operations in coastal cities and counties, 
and solve a number of major cases. We must earnestly grasp the 
building of public security and judiciary forces; rectify the 
workstyle of the police, increasing their strength and improving 
their political and vocational qualities; and make still greater 
contributions toward maintaining the stability of the 
motherland's "Southern Gate." 
  Fellow deputies, in order to fulfill these tasks, 
governments 
at all levels must energetically strengthen the building of 
honest government, and effectively improve their style of work. 
The building of honest government is a matter of prime 
importance in building closer ties between the government and 
the masses; ensuring social stability; and guaranteeing the 
smooth progress of reform, opening up, and economic 
construction. Government workers must bear in mind always that 
they are servants of the people, must wholeheartedly serve the 
people, and must wage resolute struggles against all corrupt 
phenomena. Leading cadres at all levels must take the lead in 
maintaining an honest and self-disciplined workstyle, resolutely 
investigate and deal with cases of major importance, and take 
effective measures to rectify unhealthy practices to which the 
masses strongly object. 
  It is necessary to further 
strengthen education on clean and honest administration, 
energetically publicize typical examples of honest officials, 
and deal severely with decadent and corrupt elements. It is 
necessary to establish a mechanism for fighting corruption and 
protecting honest officials, and TO combine the reform measures 
and economic policies of government departments with measures to 
establish a system for fighting corruption and protecting honest 
officials. It is necessary to continue with reform of the 
examination and approval system in administrative organs with a 
view to achieving open administration under mass supervision. 
It is necessary to combine internal supervision with social 
supervision in government work in order to achieve a perfect and 
sound supervisory mechanism. We must carry forward the fine 
tradition of plain living and hard struggle, and must oppose 
extravagance and waste. Government workers must strive to raise 
their theoretical and policy levels, better their knowledge, and 
improve their work style. They must study earnestly Comrade 
Deng Xiaoping's theory of building socialism with Chinese 
characteristics, and study the basic theories and knowledge of 
the socialist market economy. Responsible comrades of 
governments at all levels must gain a deeper understanding of 
the importance and necessity of investigation and studies during 
the new period, liberate themselves from dinner parties and red 
tapes, take the lead in conducting investigation and studies, go 
down to the grass-roots units and into the midst of the common 
people to study new conditions and solve new problems, overcome 
bureaucratism and formalism, and strengthen their service and 
work. It is necessary to increase the transparency of 
administration, gradually improve the system of democratic, 
scientific and efficient decisionmaking, and increase the 
efficiency of administration. It is necessary to do a good job 
in monitoring economic and social development; strengthen and 
improve macrocontrol; establish a system of supervision and 
inspection; strengthen the administrative functions of 
governments at all levels; ensure the unimpeded circulation of 
administrative orders; and truly turn governments at all levels 
into clean, honest, and efficient people's governments that work 
hard for the people. 
  Deputies! The 14th CPC National Congress, which attracted 
worldwide attention, adopted for Guangdong the grand objective 
of basically realizing modernization by the year 2000, and the 
Third Plenary Session of the 14th CPC Central Committee further 
drew up for us the general blueprint for our socialist market 
economy structure. Our development objectives are grand, and 
our orientation of reform is clear-cut. In the year ahead, let 
us boldly blaze new trails, keep forging ahead, and advance 
bravely along the road of building socialism with Chinese 
characteristics. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-1861 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "drchi064__s94002" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-CHI-94-064-S </AU>
Daily Report 
<DATE1>  5 Mar 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> REGIONAL WORK REPORTS </F>
<H3> <TI>   Governor Delivers Hebei Government Work Report </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Governor Delivers Hebei Government Work Report </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   SK2403125194 Shijiazhuang HEBEI RIBAO in Chinese 5 Mar 94 pp 
1-3 </F>

<F P=103> SK2403125194 </F>
<F P=104>  Shijiazhuang HEBEI RIBAO </F>
<F P=105>  Chinese </F>


<TEXT>
BFN 

<F P=106> [Hebei Provincial Government Work Report delivered by </F>
Governor Ye Liansong at second session of eighth Hebei 
Provincial People's Congress on 25 February] 
  [Text] Fellow Deputies: 
  On behalf of the Hebei Provincial Government, I now submit a 
report on the work of the government for you members of the 
provincial Committee of the Chinese People's Political 
Consultative Conference [CPPCC] and other members attending this 
session as observers, to examine, approve, comment and make 
suggestions upon. 
<H5>  1. Review of the Work in 1993 </H5>
  In 1993, under the correct leadership of the party Central 
Committee, the State Council, and the provincial party 
committee, the provincial government led the people across the 
province to conscientiously implement Comrade Deng Xiaoping's 
theory on building socialism with Chinese characteristics and 
the guidelines of the 14th party congress, acted in close 
connection with the general objective of building a economically 
strong province, seized the opportunity, deepened reform, 
expanded opening up, accelerated development, achieved 
gratifying achievements in economic construction, reform, 
opening up, and all social undertakings, and basically fulfilled 
all tasks defined by the first session of the eighth provincial 
people's congress. 
  We always persisted in taking economic construction as the 
central task, comprehensively organized people to implement the 
"outlines for invigorating Hebei's economy," and noticeably 
accelerated the pace in building an economically strong 
province. In 1993, the gross domestic products of the province 
were valued at 156 billion yuan, up 16.5 percent over the 
previous year -- a year with the quickest rate of increase since 
reform and opening up. The financial revenue reached 14.39 
billion yuan, up 44.4 percent, basically striking a balance 
between revenue and expenditure. Despite many years of natural 
disasters, there were fairly good harvests. The total output of 
grain during the year reached 23.802 million tonnes, up 8.9 
percent over the previous year, the best record in history; that 
of oil-bearing crops, 805,000 tonnes, up 21.4 percent; and that 
of meats, vegetables, and preserved and fresh fruits all 
increased by a fairly large margin. Affected by various 
factors, cotton suffered a fairly big decline in production, and 
the total output only reached 192 million tonnes, a decline of 
37.1 percent from the previous year. Township enterprises 
developed quite rapidly, and their total output value reached 
171 billion yuan, up 65.5 percent over the previous year; the 
amount of profits totalled 20.1 billion yuan, up 59.8 percent; 
and the amount of taxes handed over to the state reached 3.4 
billion yuan, up 37.7 percent. In industrial production, we 
strived to overcome the "bottleneck" restrictions in funds, 
power, and transportation, succeeded in simultaneously 
increasing the rate and efficiency, and fulfilled the objective 
of "increasing industrial output value, the fixed asset value, 
and profits and taxes so as to move the province one place 
forward in the country." The annual industrial output value 
reached 260 billion yuan, up 29.4 percent over the previous 
year; and the added value of industry reached 75.4 billion yuan, 
up 23 percent. Of this, the output value of industrial units at 
and above the township level reached 162.51 billion yuan, up 
17.8 percent; and that of large and medium-sized enterprises, 
87.71 billion yuan, up 11.2 percent. The industrial economic 
efficiency was noticeably enhanced. The overall index of 
economic efficiency of industrial units at and above the 
township level across the province, exercising independent 
economic accounting, reached 94.9 percent, up 10.4 percentage 
point over the previous year. The "dragon-tiger plan," and the 
plan on grasping the "development in six aspects," were 
comprehensively implemented, and industry and product mix were 
further optimized. The development of tertiary industry was 
accelerated. The volume of goods transported by all means of 
transportation increased 4.3 percent; in post and 
telecommunications, the objective of installing an urban 
telephone with a capacity of 1 million lines was fulfilled ahead 
of schedule, and counties (cities) across the province entered 
the national telephone automation network. Urban and rural 
markets were brisk. The retail sales of social commodities 
across the province reached 57.7 billion yuan, up 16.1 percent 
over the previous year; the overall commodity retail price level 
rose 10.5 percent, lower than the national increase average by 2 
percentage points. Overly rapid population growth was 
controlled. The whole province's natural population growth rate 
was 9.17 per thousand, under the 12.7 per thousand target for 
controlled growth. The living standards of urban and rural 
residents steadily improved. The per capita income for living 
expenses of the urban and rural residents across the province 
went up by 24.9 percent from the previous year, and the average 
per-capita income of peasants rose 17.8 percent, showing an 
increase of 8.2 percent and 2.9 percent respectively if the rise 
in prices was factored in. The production and living conditions 
in poverty-stricken areas improved. Last year, some 745,000 
poor households received support, and the food and clothing 
issues of 415,000 households were resolved. 
  Firmly aiming at the general goal of establishing the 
socialist market economy system and focusing on enterprise 
reform, we promoted reform in various fields in a coordinated 
manner to continuously facilitate the liberation and development 
of productive forces. Under the leadership of the provincial 
party committee, we successfully completed the important reform 
of the administrative system to merge 12 cities and prefectures 
last year, thus by and large putting an end to the regional 
pattern in which cities and prefectures existed simultaneously 
and urban and rural areas were separated and providing favorable 
conditions for the development of the market economy. 
Enterprise reform was notably expedited. By thoroughly 
implementing the "enterprise law" and the "regulations," we paid 
close attention to ensure delegation of the 14 decision- making 
powers to enterprises, exerted great efforts to check wanton 
collection of fares, fines, and donations, organized 1,000 
enterprises to appraise government departments, and promoted the 
change of government functions. The operating mechanism was 
notably transformed in 32 percent of Hebei's local budgetary 
industrial enterprises and 50 percent of its large and 
medium-sized state-owned commodity distribution enterprises, and 
the enterprises were greatly invigorated. Experiment with the 
shareholding system made new headway. Approval was given to 306 
enterprises to try out the shareholding system, and the Huayao 
and Weiyuan shareholding companies were successfully organized 
to issue shares to the public. Establishment of the market 
system was accelerated. In particular, the markets for labor 
forces, technology, information, and other essential elements of 
productions developed by leaps and bounds. Establishment of the 
market intermediary organizations was intensified to effectively 
increase the market force in the national economy. 
  We continued to take opening to the outside world as the 
important measure for building an economically strong province 
and made a substantial step in opening to the outside world. 
The provincial government held two provincial foreign economic 
and trade activities outside the border, winning new progress in 
using foreign capital. A notable characteristic was the 
extension of use of foreign capital from ordinary processing 
projects to energy, transportation, and other basic industry and 
infrastructural projects, from ordinary small projects to large 
and medium-sized construction projects, and from imports of cash 
to renovation of old enterprises. Last year, Hebei used $480 
million in foreign funds, of which $360 million was direct 
foreign investment, an increase of 68.6 and 100 percent, 
respectively, over the preceding year. Newly registered three 
types of foreign-funded enterprises totaled 1,879, an increase 
of 44.4 percent. Five hundred new foreign-funded enterprises of 
the three types were established to bring the total number to 
1,007. Last year, the three types of foreign-funded enterprises 
created 6.7 billion yuan in output value, earned $170 million 
through exports, and paid 210 million yuan in taxes, up 158, 
137.2, and 160 percent, respectively, from the preceding year. 
Our annual volume of exports totaled $1.99 billion, up 11.4 
percent from the preceding year, of which the exports through 
ordinary trade and the exports by the three types of 
foreign-funded enterprises totaled $1.59 billion, up 12.9 
percent. Substantial progress was made in opening to domestic 
areas, with 3,066 contracts for economic and technological 
cooperation signed and 2.25 billion yuan brought in, up 17.7 and 
80 percent, respectively. 
  We conscientiously implemented the series of policy measures 
of the party Central Committee and the State Council for 
strengthening and improving macroeconomic regulation and 
control, thus bringing about a notable turn for the better in 
financial and economic order. Illegal inter-bank lending and 
collection of funds were checked, and people's savings deposits 
increased. Development zones and real estate business developed 
in a healthy manner thanks to efforts in examination and 
rectification. Funds for state and provincial key construction 
projects, for circulating funds of key enterprises, and for the 
purchase of farm and sideline products were guaranteed. By the 
end of last year, Hebei had recalled 1.73 billion yuan in 
illegal inter-bank lending and cleaned up 136 illegal monetary 
organizations. Savings deposits of monetary organizations 
throughout the province totaled 140.6 billion yuan, up 24.48 
billion yuan from the amount registered at the beginning of the 
year, and their loans totaled 143.17 billion yuan, up 25.22 
billion yuan, which effectively supported industrial and 
agricultural production and construction undertakings. As has 
been proven in practice, the central measures for strengthening 
and improving macroeconomic regulation and control were very 
necessary and correct. 
  We made unremitting efforts to reasonably increase input, 
accelerate the construction of key projects, and enhanced the 
reserve strength for national economic development. Last year, 
the investment in fixed assets of society was 54 billion yuan, 
an increase of 60.8 percent over the previous year. Of this, 
the investment of state-owned units was 31.03 billion yuan, an 
increase of 54.8 percent. Of the investment of state-owned 
units, the investment in local capital construction was 11.35 
billion yuan and that in technological transformation was 7.51 
billion yuan, respectively increasing by 83.1 percent and 36.6 
percent. The construction of key projects was accelerated. As 
of the end of last year, the province invested 9.7 billion yuan 
in 149 continued projects and new projects and 41 projects were 
completed and went into operation. Thus, the reserve strength 
for economic development was enhanced. 
  We made efforts to promote the combination of science and 
technology and education with the economy and further brought 
into play the functions of science and technology and education 
for promoting economic development. Positive achievements were 
made in launching the campaign of scientific and technological 
progress. The province gained 1,082 scientific and technological 
findings at or above the provincial and departmental levels. 
Some of these findings attained the international and domestic 
advanced levels. Two hundred and seventy-nine new 
high-technology enterprises and 472 new high-technology products 
were approved and acknowledged. Education steadily developed. 
Twenty counties in the province basically popularized nine-year 
compulsory education. Sixty county-level vocational education 
centers were basically built. Higher education developed in the 
course of reform. Institutions of higher learning paid 
attention to readjusting the specialized subjects, optimized the 
specialized structure, added and readjusted 47 specialized 
courses, and increased the proportion of specialized courses 
directly serving economic construction. 
  We constantly put the spiritual civilization and the setup 
of 
democracy and legal system in an important position and 
comprehensively promoted social progress. Cultural undertakings 
became more prosperous. We successfully sponsored the fourth 
China Wuqiao international acrobatic art festival, introduced a 
number of fine works of art, and won 93 awards at national and 
international art contests. The urban and rural areas further 
strengthened the health work and made new improvements in 
medical quality. The provincial delegation made good results at 
the seventh national sports meet, where the provincial teams 
ranked the province 10th. New headway was made in press, 
publication, radio, film, and television, environmental 
protection, foreign affairs, tourist, overseas affairs, 
nationalities affairs, religion, cultural relics, archives, and 
local chronicles. The governments at various levels consciously 
accepted legal supervision and work supervision by the people's 
congresses and democratic supervision by the CPPCC 
organizations; made efforts to improve the quality of handling 
deputies' suggestions, criticisms, and opinions and CPPCC 
members' motions; and handled, within the legal time limit, 
1,260 suggestions and motions as set forth at the first session 
of the eighth provincial people's congress and the first session 
of the seventh provincial CPPCC committee and submitted by the 
National Peoples' Congress and the National CPPCC Committee. 
Last year, the provincial government drafted, revised, and 
formulated 51 local rules and administrative regulations and 
ensured the timely promulgation of a group of legislative items 
needed by reform, opening up, and the development of the 
socialist market economy. We strengthened the improvement of 
administrative honesty and made achievements in opposing 
corruption. The government organizations across the province 
launched various kinds of special inspections; conscientiously 
straightened out the unhealthy trends of wantonly collecting 
funds, wantonly apportioning expenses, and wantonly asking for 
charges; corrected the unhealthy trends within trades; and 
investigated and handled major and appalling cases. As of the 
end of last year, the procuratorial organs across the province 
filed 2,840 cases of cadres violating disciplines and revised 
and canceled 294 items of collecting charges and imposing fines 
as defined by the provincial organs themselves. Thus, social 
order was further strengthened. A total of 47,451 criminal 
cases were cracked, including 13,612 major cases. This 
effectively attacked the arrogance of the criminal offenders and 
safeguarded social order. New achievements were made in 
supporting the Army and giving preferential treatment to 
families of revolutionary martyrs and servicemen and supporting 
the government and cherishing the people. Five cities in the 
province were named as state-level model cities advanced in the 
double-support work; and 35 counties (cities) were named 
provincial-level model cities (counties). There were 6,500 
Army-civilian joint civility centers. All this helped promote 
the improvement of the spiritual and material civilizations. 
  Fellow deputies: The first year in the tenure of the 
present provincial people's government is 1993. Various 
achievements scored by the province in reform, opening up, 
economic construction, and socialist undertakings in the year 
are the outcomes made by the broad masses of cadres and people 
on various fronts across the province in being keen on making 
progress, in engaging in labor work industriously, and in 
uniting as one in waging struggle under the correct leadership 
of the CPC Central Committee, the State Council, and the 
provincial party committee. Hereby, on behalf of the provincial 
people's government I would like to extend lofty respect and 
heartfelt thanks to the broad masses of workers, peasants, 
cadres, and intellectuals throughout the province; to the broad 
masses of officers and soldiers of the People's Liberation Army 
[PLA] units stationed in the province and of cadres and 
policemen of the provincial armed police forces; to various 
democratic parties and nonparty personages; to the compatriots 
of Hong Kong, Macao, and Taiwan, as well as overseas Chinese, 
who have made contributions to the province's development; and 
to both domestic and foreign friends who have supported the 
province's construction and development in various undertakings. 
  While fully acknowledging the achievements, we have clearly 
seen that the province still has some shortcomings and problems 
in accelerating its economic development and building itself 
into a strong economic province. As compared with the advanced 
and coastal provinces the province has greatly lagged behind, 
though it has accelerated its economic development. The 
structural contradiction of the economy is prominent. As 
compared with the secondary industry, the development of primary 
and tertiary industries is relatively backward. The economic 
results of a large number of enterprises are poor. The rate of 
industrial products in markets is low. The proportion of 
nonstate-run enterprises is smaller. The restriction imposed by 
the "bottleneck" is still more serious. The situation in funds, 
power, and transportation is strained. The shortage of raw 
materials, including cotton, is larger. The dynamics added to 
opening up is not enough and the pace in development is not 
fast. The integration between science, technology, and the 
economy is not close enough. The rate of turning the scientific 
and technological results into productive forces is low. The 
public security of some localities is not satisfactory and the 
people lack a sense of security. A small number of employees 
in the people's governments are committing the problems of 
corruption, formalism, and bureaucracy, which are adversely 
affecting the close relationship between the masses and the 
government. As for these problems, we should adopt realistic 
effective measures to handle them earnestly. 
<H5>  2. The Guiding Ideology and Fighting Targets of 1994 Work </H5>
  This year the province will continuously maintain a fine 
trend of development based on achieving rapid economic 
development over the past two years, and will be an important 
year in which the province will push forward the overall reform 
in the economic systems and will accelerate the establishment of 
socialist market economic systems, and a crucial year in which 
the province will successfully fulfill the "Eighth Five-Year 
Plan" and strive to prefulfill the target of quadrupling the 
gross national product. The guiding ideology of the government 
work this year is as follows: By regarding as a guide Comrade 
Deng Xiaoping's theory of building socialism with Chinese 
characteristics and the party's basic line, we should earnestly 
implement the spirit of the 14th CPC Congress and the spirit of 
the Third Plenary Session of the 14th CPC Central Committee; as 
well as unite as one, overcome the difficulties, and accelerate 
the establishment of socialist market economic systems according 
to the principle of seizing the opportunity, deepening the 
reform, broadening the opening up, promoting the development, 
maintaining the stability, and building Hebei into a strong 
economic province. Efforts should be made to open more markets; 
to readjust the structure; to increase economic results; to have 
the province's national economy achieve sustained, rapid, and 
sound development; to safeguard the political stability and 
social peace; and to promote overall progress in the society. 
  In line with the above mentioned guiding ideology, major 
targets set for economic and social development in the province 
this year are as follows: 
  The gross national product should show an over 11 percent 
increase over 1993. Of this increase, that of added value in 
primary industry will be 4 percent; that in secondary industry, 
over 14 percent; and that in tertiary industry, over 14 percent. 
  The investments made in the fixed assets of society as a 
whole will be 61 billion yuan and show a 13 percent increase 
over 1993. Of these investments, those made by the state-owned 
units will be 34.9 billion yuan and show a 12.5 percent increase 
over 1993 and the rate of investments will reach 32 percent. 
  Calculated in terms of the new tax assignment system and 
financial system, the local financial revenues should reach 8.03 
billion yuan, up 7.9 percent. All sorts of savings deposits of 
banks should be 17 billion yuan, up 17 percent, and all kinds of 
loans should increase by 22 billion yuan, up 20.9 percent. 
  The actual use of foreign capital should reach $600 million, 
up 25 percent; the total volume of foreign export trade should 
be $2.16 billion yuan, up 8.5 percent; the export of ordinary 
trade and the three types of foreign-funded enterprises should 
be $1.83 billion yuan, up 15 percent. 
  The total retail sales of commodities should increase 16 
percent, and efforts should be made to control the rise in the 
retail prices of commodities within 10 percent. 
  The average per capita income for living expenses of urban 
residents across the province should reach 2,600 yuan, up 18.6 
percent; the net income of peasants should reach 900 yuan, up 12 
percent. 
  We must guarantee that the natural population growth rate 
will not exceed 12 per thousand, and strive to control it within 
10.85 per thousand. 
  The aforementioned objective is proposed after analyzing the 
conditions in various sectors in the province and through 
repeated estimates and calculations and meets the demand of the 
"outline for invigorating Hebei's economy," and is 
forward-looking and feasible, allowing a certain flexibility. 
During our practical work, we should strive to fulfill it in a 
better manner in line with the objective of building an 
economically strong province. 
  There are many favorable conditions for doing this year's 
work well. This year the state will issue more reform measures 
and make the biggest strides in reform. This will accelerate the 
process of marketization of economic development, gradually 
improve the relations in various economic sectors, further 
improve macroeconomic environment, and instill new vitality into 
national economic development. With our unceasing efforts to 
consolidate and improve macroeconomic regulation and control, 
the economic order will be better. Over the past few years, 
Hebei Province has successively maintained a rational increase 
in the investment in fixed assets, completed and commissioned a 
number of new projects, formed a new production capacity, 
unceasingly strengthened its economic development momentum, and 
laid a certain material foundation for realizing a sustained and 
rapid economic development. The international and domestic 
environments are very favorable for us to continuously expand 
opening up. The issuance of the central policy decision on the 
development strategy of opening up areas around Bohai Bay has 
enhanced Hebei's attraction of foreign investments. 
Particularly, the further ideological emancipation of the broad 
masses of cadres across the province has formed a strong joint 
force for implementing the "outline," developing the economy, 
and building an economically strong province. Actually, we have 
faced a hard-earned good opportunity for reform, opening up, and 
economic development. Meanwhile, we should also recognize that 
there are still many contradictions and difficulties on our road 
of advancement. Along with the deepening of reform and the 
readjustments involving the interests of various sectors, some 
new situations and new problems will also emerge. There are also 
some destabilizing factors in society. During the current 
economic development, the "bottleneck" restrictions, such as 
funds, energy, communications, and transportation, have remained 
prominent. Along with the price readjustment of energy, raw 
materials, and communications, the production cost has 
increased, and the difficulty in enhancing economic efficiency 
has aggravated. As a major textile industrial province, Hebei 
has faced the difficult problem in cotton production and supply. 
We must not lower our guard in these contradictions and 
difficulties, and must pay full attention to them. Judging from 
the general situation, we have more favorable factors than 
unfavorable ones, if we compare the former with the latter. As 
long as we persist in viewing the overall situation in line with 
Comrade Deng Xiaoping's theory on building socialism with 
Chinese characteristics and the party's basic line; further 
emancipate the mind under the leadership of the party Central 
Committee, the State Council, and the provincial party 
committee; unceasingly renew concepts; always persist in taking 
economic construction as the central task; unite as one; enhance 
spirit; advance despite difficulties; work in a down-to-earth 
manner; and unswervingly act in line with the objective defined 
in the "outline," we will surely resolve and overcome all sorts 
of contradictions and difficulties on our road of advancement, 
and unceasingly push Hebei's reform, opening up, economic 
construction, and all undertakings forward. 
<H5>  3. Accelerate Reform in the Province as a Whole by Upholding </H5>
the Integration Between Pushing Forward Reform in an Overall Way 
and Making a Breakthrough in Key Fields 
  The "decision on the several issues of establishing the 
systems of socialist market economy," which has been adopted at 
the Third Plenary Session of the 14 CPC Central Committee, has 
defined the basic frame of the socialist market economy; drawn 
up an overall blueprint; and pointed out the direction and tasks 
for the country to conduct reform in the economy in the coming 
period. In line with the central arrangements, we should deepen 
the reform and make a reform breakthrough in multiple fields 
this year. We should actively deepen the reform in rural areas 
by emphasizing the tasks of shifting the mechanism; establishing 
the modern enterprise systems; accelerating the reform in the 
managerial systems of finance and tax, banking, planning, 
investments, fund raising, foreign trade, and commodity prices; 
and the task of making concerted efforts to push forward the 
reform in the systems of socialist market economy and public 
security. In line with the state overall arrangements, we must 
concentrate our efforts on earnestly doing a good job in 
grasping the reform and ensuring the fulfillment of various 
tasks in reform. 
  We should accelerate the shifting of business mechanisms of 
the state-owned enterprises and actively probe an effective way 
to establish modern enterprise systems. This represents a basic 
demand for establishing the systems of socialist market economy, 
a central link of the reform in the economic systems as a whole, 
and also an emphasis or difficult point of reform. In line with 
the tasks of boosting the large- and medium-sized enterprises 
and reinforcing the dynamics of reform, we should be greatly 
determined this year to achieve new and practical progress in 
the following several links: First, efforts should be made to 
continuously implement the "enterprise law" and "regulations" 
and to delegate to the letter various rights and duties to 
enterprises. Second, efforts should be made to continuously 
perfect various business styles that have been proved effective 
and to urge enterprises to shift their business mechanisms. We 
should strive to have 50 percent of the state-owned enterprises 
shift their operation mechanisms this year. We should continue 
to deepen the reform in the systems of labor and personnel 
affairs and distributions, to prefect the internal systems of 
enterprises, and to reinforce the vigor of enterprises. Third, 
a good job should be done in carefully grasping the pilot work 
of establishing modern enterprise systems. Except for 
successfully organizing the units assigned by the state for the 
pilot work, the province as a whole should assign 100 
enterprises to take up the pilot work in this regard to enable 
the enterprises that have taken up the pilot work to truly 
become modern ones with clear property rights, clear division 
between right and duties, separation between political work and 
enterprise management, and scientific management. We should also 
enable these enterprises to play a leading or model role in 
encouraging the state-owned enterprises to shift their operation 
mechanism. Fourth, efforts should be made to actively push 
forward the reform in the property right systems by emphasizing 
reform of shareholding systems. As for the large- and 
medium-sized enterprises that have scored good economic results 
and have been strong in the competitive capability, as well as 
the core enterprises of enterprise groups, we should reform them 
in line with their different conditions into limited liability 
companies or limited liability stock companies with the 
participation of corporate shares. Some of them may be 
reformed into companies with the only share of state funds. We 
should take up the pilot work of reforming or reorganizing 200 
enterprises into shareholding ones this year and strive to 
reform 300. As for a number of small state- owned enterprises 
and money-losing medium-sized enterprises, we should vigorously 
enforce among them various property managerial styles, such as 
the state ownership and management by individuals, the public 
ownership and management by individuals, the lease of 
enterprises, the entrustment of business, and sale or the 
transfer of business or production. As for some enterprises 
that cannot pay their debts and those that have no hope to 
switch their losses to profits, we should have them become 
bankrupt in line with the provisions of the "bankrupt law". In 
conducting reform in the property right systems, we should 
establish or improve the mechanism of property right supervision 
to ensure the value reserve and increase of the state assets. 
  We should actively push forward the reform in the systems of 
finance and tax, banking, planning, investments, fund raising, 
and commodity prices and establish or improve the province's 
system of conducting macro readjustment and control. In 
conducting reform in the financial and tax systems, the state 
has enforced the financial system of assigning taxes to 
provinces beginning 1 January this year. The province will also 
enforce the financial managerial system of assigning taxes to 
cities and prefectures. The general guiding ideology and 
principles in this regard are as follows: We should accurately 
make distributions between the province and the cities and 
prefectures. We should not only consider the vested financial 
resources of all localities and mobilize the enthusiasm of the 
governments at various levels for developing the economy, 
increasing revenues, and reducing expenses, but also ensure the 
stable increase in the provincial-level financial resources and 
safeguard the provincial level's necessary regulation and 
control abilities. We should reasonably define the affairs 
rights of the province and the cities and prefectures. In line 
with the principle of linking affairs rights with financial 
rights, the affairs that are related to the province as a whole 
and should concentratively be managed by the province should be 
managed by provincial-level finance. As for the affairs that 
are suitable for the management of cities and prefectures, the 
affairs rights and the financial rights should relevantly be 
delegated to cities and prefectures. In line with the principle 
of management by various levels according to unified policies, 
we should balance the financial distributions between the 
province and the cities and prefectures. On the basis of 
basically maintaining the distribution patterns as defined in 
the current financial system, we should separate central and 
local taxation systems. We should strictly enforce financial 
and economic disciplines and ensure the smooth progress of this 
reform. Simultaneously, we should also conscientiously separate 
the state tax bureau from the local tax bureaus and make good 
connections of their work. In the course of replacing the old 
systems by the new, we should exert great efforts to attend to 
the tax collection and management work and the work of handing 
over taxes to the finance to ensure the fulfillment of tax 
collection and revenue tasks. In the principle of tightly 
arranging expenditures, we should harden the restrictions of the 
budget. No financial departments at various levels are allowed 
to have deficit arrangements. It is necessary to reform the 
monetary system. According to the state-fixed orientation, 
targets, tasks for reforming the monetary system and the general 
principles governing the monetary work, we should continue to 
consolidate the monetary order, steadily promote the monetary 
reform, strictly control the aggregate of credits, and 
realistically strengthen the monetary supervision and 
management. To suit the demands of setting up the monetary 
organizational system and the monetary market system, we should 
strive to gain the state approvals to set up various categories 
of monetary organizations and positively develop nonbanking 
monetary organizations, such as capital circulation leasing 
companies, credit investment companies, and financial affairs 
companies. To suit the demands that specialized banks should 
engage in the management of the proportions of assets and 
liabilities, we should vigorously organize savings deposits, 
stabilize the sources of funds for credits, and positively 
support the province's reasonably financial needs for economic 
construction. To suit the new situation of separating commercial 
banks from policy-lending banks, we should strengthen enterprise 
management, increase returns on use of capital, enhance 
enterprises' capability for returning loans, and enjoy the 
support of the commercial banks. We should strengthen the 
pre-phase preparatory work for the projects that should be 
supported out of the policy consideration, make increasingly 
more projects be listed in the state plan, and strive to gain 
the support of the policy-lending banks. It is necessary to 
reform the planning system. To suit the demands for the 
development of the socialist market economic system, we should 
gradually set up a new-type guidance planning system and better 
bring into play planning functions for regulation and control, 
balance, guiding orientation, and service. It is necessary to 
reform the investment and capital circulation systems. 
According to the state requirements for dividing the categories 
of basic investment projects, competition investment projects, 
and public welfare investment projects, some basic projects 
should be covered in the state capital arrangement plan and 
supported by the state development plans, enterprises should 
actively keep connections with banks and gain the support of the 
financial departments to develop the competition projects, the 
financial departments at various levels across the province 
should make investment in public welfare projects, and 
simultaneously, we should positively strive to gain the support 
of the state to develop the projects of this category. It is 
necessary to reform the price system. The state decided to rise 
the prices of such basic products as crude oil, electricity, and 
cotton. We should adopt effective measures to ensure the smooth 
progress of the reform in these aspects and to strictly prevent 
arbitrary price hikes. In regard to the price changes that are 
related to the benefits of each and every household, we should 
judge the hour and size up the situation, take into full 
consideration the bearing capability of the masses, and 
carefully work out measures for price reform. As for the key 
commodities that have a bearing on the people's livelihood, we 
should set up a reserve system and a risk fund system, perfect a 
mechanism for regulating the circulation of commodities, and 
control market prices. It is necessary to strengthen the 
management of market prices and maintain the stability of market 
prices. We should resolutely deal blows to the activities of 
manufacturing and marketing fake and poor quality products to 
safeguard the interests of consumers. Simultaneously, we should 
also grasp the media orientation and accurately guide 
consumption. 
  Fellow deputies! The general task of this year's work is 
to seize the opportunity, deepen reform, expand opening up, 
promote development, and maintain stability. All fields and all 
items of work should submit and gear themselves to this general 
task and conscientiously handle the relations among reform, 
development, and stability. Reform and opening up are the 
motivation to promote development, development is the foundation 
of social stability, and stability is the essential condition 
for reform and development. In the process of firmly and 
unswervingly promoting reform and establishing the socialist 
market economic structure, we must decide on the various steps 
of reform and judge their success or failure by adhering to the 
criterion of whether they help promote economic development. We 
must attach high importance on and appropriately resolve all 
sorts of contradictions and problems emerging in reform. We must 
positively and appropriately readjust the relations between the 
interests of all sectors and the pattern of interest. We must 
strengthen the research of public opinions and the feelings of 
the masses and master in a timely manner the changes in the 
people's concept of value, spiritual mood, and spiritual state. 
We must do a good job to reduce social upheavals and strengthen 
the monitoring of, the analysis of, and the pre-warning of 
economic trends to ensure the smooth progress of reform and 
development. Governments at all levels must firmly embrace the 
sense of the whole, consciously safeguard the unity, 
seriousness, and effectiveness of policies and decrees issued by 
the CPC Central Committee and the State Council. Leaders at all 
levels should concentrate even more energies on reform, and, for 
some major reform measures, experiments should be made first 
before they are popularized. Experiments should be bold and 
popularization should be prudent. We should not only make 
overall arrangements and give meticulous guidance to ensure that 
the reform will proceed in a coordinated manner, but also seize 
the opportunity of reform and have a good command of key links 
to make breakthroughs in major areas in order to constantly 
deepen the package reform and ensure the success in all reform 
measures. 
<H5>  4. Strive To Promote Sustained, Rapid, and Sound </H5>
Development of the Provincial Economy 
  Closely around the general goal of optimizing structure, 
improving efficiency, promoting development, and building an 
economically strong province, the 1994 economic work should be 
focused on the work in the following six aspects: 
  A. We should actually attend to agricultural and rural work, 
with emphasis on making the people well-off. 
  Agriculture, rural areas, and peasants are the fundamental 
issues of China's economic development and modernization. This 
year, agricultural and rural work should be aimed at 
continuously implementing the guidelines of the central and the 
provincial rural work conferences, stabilizing the party's basic 
policies toward rural areas, deepening the rural reform, making 
positive explorations for resolving the conspicuous 
contradictions and problems cropping up in the development of 
rural economy, and further strengthening the position of 
agriculture as the foundation of the national economy. We 
should focus all the work on building better-off villages, 
townships, and counties to promote the all-around development of 
the rural economy and increase peasants' income. 
  Under the prerequisite of ensuring the steady increase of 
output of major agricultural products, we should optimize the 
agricultural structure under the guidance of markets. Grain 
production should be continuously aimed at increasing the per 
unit output. The annual total grain output should range from 23 
million tonnes to 23.5 million tonnes. Cotton production has 
already dropped to the bottom, and hence efforts should be made 
to pick it up. To this end, we should increase cotton growing 
acreage on a large scale, increase its per unit yield, 
resolutely implement the 10 measures of the provincial 
government on promoting this year's cotton production, and 
actually pay attention to cotton production in line with the 
tasks and goals defined by the cotton production responsibility 
letters. We should further increase the investment in 
agriculture, build well the grain and cotton base counties that 
are decided by the state, and give full play to these bases key 
role in increasing output. 
  We should strengthen the popularization of agricultural 
science and technology and actively popularize and apply 
agricultural technology to increase production. It is necessary 
to unremittingly carry out farmland capital construction, do a 
good job in building projects on "saving water, drilling wells, 
storing water, and diverting water to Hebei," increase the water 
irrigated areas by 2.27 million mu, and improve 4.17 million mu 
of water- saving irrigated areas. We should make real efforts 
to conduct agricultural comprehensive development projects and 
to strive to raise the ability to combat natural disasters. On 
the premise of guaranteeing the stable increase in such basic 
agricultural products as grain and cotton, we should actively 
readjust the structure of agriculture and the rural economy, 
accelerate the change of agriculture into "high-yield, fine 
quality, and highly efficient farming," and accelerate the 
seven-character project on "water conservation, vegetables, 
afforestation, crop cultivation, cattle raising, fishery, and 
production of leading products," and the "double thousand 
project" in grain fields. Continued efforts should be made to 
build the rural socialized service system and guide peasants 
into the market. In line with the demand of industrialization, 
and on the basis of developing leading industries and key 
products, we should establish a production management system of 
integrating crop cultivation with breeding industry and 
processing industry, marketing with production and supply, 
domestic trade with foreign trade, and agriculture with industry 
and commerce, and enable staple agricultural and sideline 
products enter the market or be converted to increase value. 
  We should actively develop township enterprises. Township 
enterprises are the main pillars of the rural economy. We 
should uphold the principle of adopting various ownership forms 
and systems; accelerating development; and making improvements 
steadily, making the annual development rate of township 
enterprises across the province reach or surpass the national 
average; simultaneously increasing profits, tax delivery, and 
the development rate; and relatively transferring the 
agricultural surplus labor forces. We should continue to 
implement the strategy on developing township enterprises around 
"Bohai Bay, Beijing and Tianjin Municipalities, railways," make 
breakthroughs in key areas, and carry out this work orderly. 
Counties, (cities, districts) along "Bohai Bay, Beijing and 
Tianjin, and railways," in particular, should achieve a higher 
development rate and economic efficiency than the provincial 
average. 
  We should select a number of enterprises, include them in 
plans at all levels, support them on a priority basis, and 
establish a batch of key township enterprises and enterprise 
groups of a large scale, high level, and good efficiency that 
are export oriented. Under the new situation in which reform of 
state-owned enterprises is being unceasingly deepened and 
foreign-funded enterprises are being rapidly developed, we 
should accelerate the change of township enterprise operational 
mechanisms, actively popularize the shareholding cooperative 
system, and enhance the competitive capacity of township 
enterprises. It is necessary to accelerate the building of 
small industrial areas and small towns, establish the incentive 
mechanism for county, township, and village cadres, link the 
development of township enterprises with the achievements of 
cadres, and give strict evaluation, awards, and punishment. 
  We should continue to reduce the burdens of peasants and 
deeply conduct the work on supporting and developing the poor 
areas. Reducing the burdens of peasants is a policy measure for 
protecting the production enthusiasm of peasants and an 
effective way for increasing the income of peasants. We should 
continue to implement a series of policy stipulations of the 
state and Hebei Province on reducing the burdens of peasants and 
further resolve the problem of the rural areas on the 
unwarranted pooling of funds, arbitrary requisition of donations 
and exaction of fees. Based on investigation and study, we 
should further formulate and improve policies and measures for 
supporting the development of less-developed areas and adopt 
essential special policies to accelerate economic development in 
these areas. This year, the province as a whole should resolve 
the food and clothing problems of 300,000 poverty-stricken 
households. Persistent efforts should be made to develop and 
help the poor areas, and strive to realize the goal that every 
person will basically have an average of one or half a mu of 
field which gives stable and high yields irrespective of drought 
or water-logging within a short period of time. On this basis, 
we should develop township enterprises and regional pillar 
industries in line with local conditions, develop industries in 
other localities, export labor service, and strive to raise the 
average per capita income of the people. Beginning this year, 
we should resolve the problems of 2,000 villages with 
exceptional difficulties by groups, organize some large- and 
medium-sized enterprises in the province, some cities under the 
jurisdiction of the provincial government and provincial-level 
departments, colleges and universities, and scientific research 
units to help these villages, formulate development plans, and 
give support to the counterparts. We should increase the input 
of funds, materials, science, and technology in these poor areas 
and help them train personnel. Through unremitting efforts, we 
may greatly improve the outlook of the poor areas in our 
province. 
  We should solidly attend to the rural family planning work. 
Our province's family planning task is extremely arduous. The 
rural areas should put the focus of the family planning work on 
the grass roots, the basic work, the implementation of the 
rules, the workers contingents, and the solid work. It is 
necessary to strengthen the management of family planning 
according to laws and resolutely eliminate the serious phenomena 
that some counties, townships, and villages are weak in their 
basic family planning work and poor in management, employ 
trickery, and give birth to two or more children. According to 
the requirements that party and government top leaders 
personally engage in and assume sole responsibility for the 
management of family planning and the principal leaders 
realistically grasp the management of family planning, we should 
conscientiously implement the system of responsibility for 
management of population quotas and strictly implement the 
system that all achievements will be negated if family planning 
is not successfully grasped. Leaders of the counties (cities) 
where family planning work is backward and many problems exist 
should have a stronger sense of responsibility to attend to this 
work and strive to immediately change the passive situation. 
  B. We should optimize the industrial structure and deeply 
launch the activities of "three increases, one decrease, and one 
improvement." 
  This year, we should optimize the industrial product mix 
according to the market demands, increase economic results, and 
continue to maintain a faster industrial growth rate. The 
industrial front should extensively and deeply launch the 
activities of "three increases, one decrease, and one 
improvement" with the main contents of increasing production, 
decreasing deficits, and improving efficiency. That is, the 
increase in the industrial added value should range from 14 to 
17 percent. Of this, the added value of the independent 
accounting industrial enterprises at or above the township level 
should increase from 12 to 15 percent, the profits and taxes 
realized by these enterprises should increase by 10 percent, the 
investment in technological transformation of state-owned units 
should increase by 13.4 percent, the amounts of deficits 
suffered by large and medium-sized industrial enterprises should 
be reduced by 15 percent, and the overall index of the economic 
results realized by the independent accounting industrial 
enterprises at or above the township level should increase by 1 
percentage point and strive to increase by 2 percentage point. 
  The key to persisting in the state industrial policies, 
taking markets as a guidance, and making great efforts to 
readjust the structure is to grasp the readjustment of the 
product mix. The general requirements are as follows: The 
heavy industry should bring into play its role as the basic 
industry, continue to solve the problems relating to the "highly 
efficient heavy industry," and strengthen the reserve strength 
for the province's economic development. The light industry 
should continue to implement the famous-brand strategy and 
persistently make readjustments according to the orientation of 
"high" (new high-technology), "quality" (good quality and famous 
brands,) "large" (efficiency of scale), and "outside" (foreign 
markets). In line with the targets for readjusting the product 
mix, we should accelerate the technological transformation of 
enterprises. From this year, we should concentrate in four 
years to technologically transform, in a well-planned manner, in 
groups, and by stages, all of our province's budgetary 
industrial enterprises. In particular, we should popularize the 
experience gained by "Xuancai" and positively use foreign 
capital to conduct graft transformation among old enterprises. 
This is a key way for changing the enterprise mechanism, 
accelerating the structural readjustment, promoting enterprises 
to stand among the international market, and making up for the 
deficiency in construction funds. This year, the large- and 
medium-sized enterprises and budgetary industrial enterprises 
plan to invite foreign businessmen to develop 1,000 items in the 
province and strive to sign 300 contracts. We should 
comprehensively carry out the "dragon and tiger plan." This 
year, 76 continued and new projects covered in the "dragon and 
tiger plan" should be developed. By the end of this year, we 
should ensure the completion and operation of 40 projects. In 
line with the requirements for developing new products and 
upgrading old products, we should manufacture and develop a 
group of new high-technology products, have pillar industries to 
increase the production of the products with advantages, 
increase a group of products that can create and save foreign 
exchange, have burgeoning industries manufacture a number of 
products, eliminate a group of old products, and upgrade a group 
of new products so as to elevate the province's overall 
industrial quality to a new height. 
  We should grasp the demands of markets and broaden the 
occupation of products in markets. The prominent problem of 
industrial production this year is one relating to markets. We 
should organize a large number of specialists into several 
groups to carry out investigation, study, and calculation on 
markets in line with the difference of various industries and 
trades and to put forward in a timely manner the intermediate- 
and long-term policies to upgrade the capability of coping with 
the future changes of markets. The forefront work of 
enterprises should be placed on markets and all enterprises 
should grasp the work of opening more markets by regarding it as 
an important task. They should foster a business mechanism with 
the rapid feedback of markets, flexible reaction, and the strong 
capability of meeting the change. They should also be able to 
grasp sales to promote production, to increase sales to expand 
production, and to fix production in line with sales. Efforts 
should be made to ensure the sale rate of industrial products 
turned out by enterprises at or above the township level across 
the province to reach 97 percent this year. 
  We should deeply launch the drive of learning from the 
wealthy and influential enterprises and from the Handan Iron and 
Steel Company, grasp the projects conforming with strong 
business trends, create products with competitive capability, 
contend for turning out first-grade products, and strictly 
conduct management and run plants. In line with the demand of 
the market economy, we should vigorously enhance the operation 
and management of enterprises; boldly learn or draw from the 
advanced managerial experience gained by foreign countries; and 
improve the enterprise regulations and rules. We should also 
reinforce the labor discipline, enhance the accounting of cost, 
vigorously grasp the training of staff members and workers, and 
upgrade the technological standards so as to promote enterprises 
to improve their economic targets of products' quality, material 
consumption, economic results, and safe production, to a new 
level. Efforts should be made to grasp the work of encouraging 
enterprises to switch their losses to profits, to emphatically 
conduct the work of encouraging the profit-making enterprises 
whose profits are over 1,000 yuan to further increase their 
profits and the large- and medium-sized enterprises to handle 
their operational losses. As for money-losing enterprises and 
those that have suffered production suspension or 
semi-suspension, we should carry out study on the plants one by 
one and put forward the measures of switching losses to profits 
in line with the local conditions to reduce the number of 
enterprises that have suffered production suspension or 
semi-suspension as much as possible. 
  C. We should vigorously develop tertiary industrial 
enterprise by emphasizing the fostering of market systems. 
  The development of tertiary industrial enterprises 
represents 
an important yardstick in measuring the extent of developing a 
modern socialist economy, an important condition for promoting 
the development of primary and secondary industries, and an 
important resource for increasing local financial revenues. We 
must emphasize in economic development the task of accelerating 
the development of tertiary industrial enterprises and 
concentrate our efforts on grasping the development vigorously 
and successfully. We should earnestly organize the enforcement 
of "Hebei Province's 1991-2000 outline on developing the 
tertiary industry." We should also encourage the state-owned, 
collectively owned, individually owned, privately owned, and 
foreign-funded enterprises, as well as various industries and 
trades, to make concerted efforts in the development according 
to the principles of formulating rational plans, defining the 
emphasis, actively giving guidance, and accelerating the 
development, so as to gradually upgrade the proportion of 
tertiary industry in the national economy. 
  We should regard market establishment as an emphasis or a 
breakthrough in developing the tertiary industry. In line with 
the basic idea of "establishing large markets, developing 
large-scale trade, and enlivening the large-scale circulation," 
we should further develop the markets of means of production 
and consumer goods and uphold the principle of paying 
simultaneous attention to both market development and 
improvement. We should also consolidate, develop, improve, and 
upgrade the existing markets of various commodities. Efforts 
should be made to continuously accelerate the fostering and 
establishing of large specialized and wholesale markets and 
comprehensive wholesale markets. We should put our work 
emphasis on building the 20 large shopping centers of various 
categories, accelerate the fostering and development of markets 
of various essential factors of production, and vigorously 
develop the intermediary organizations of markets. We should 
take a larger step this year in establishing the markets of 
finance, labor forces, talented personnel, technologies, 
information, and property right business. We should establish 
or develop as soon as possible a large number of social 
intermediary organizations, such as an accounting office, 
attorney office, and auditing office; as well as the 
self-discipline organizations of markets, such as industrial and 
economic federation, chamber of commerce, associations of 
various industries and trades, so as to promote the rational 
circulation of essential factors of production and the fair 
competition of markets. 
  Great efforts should be made to develop social insurance, 
environmental protection, and real estate that are oriented to 
guarantee and improve the lives of the people. Emphasis of this 
endeavor should be placed on unemployment insurance and 
retirement insurance. Positive efforts should be made to 
develop real estate trade, with focus on building residences. 
Attention should be paid to the pre-phase preparatory work for 
building 6 million square meters of residences for urban 
workers. We should positively develop environmental protection 
undertakings to resolve such problems, which exist in some urban 
and rural localities of the province, as environmental 
pollution, traffic jams, confused order, dirty surroundings, and 
poor service so as to constantly improve the living environment 
and living standards of the people. Tourism should develop with 
great efforts. This year, the foreign exchange revenue from 
tourism is projected at $14 million. 
  D. Investment in fixed assets should increase on a rational 
scale, and construction of key projects should be accelerated. 
  After endeavoring for several years, a number of large- and 
medium-sized capital construction and technological 
transformation projects of the province have been approved and 
decided by the state and construction of these projects will be 
started one by one. Within the tenure of office of the current 
government, efforts should be made to build or to complete the 
construction of the Beijing-Shijiazhuang (double width), 
Shijiazhuang-Taiyuan, and Shian highways. At the same time, the 
expansion of Berth 3-6 of Beijing-Tangshan Harbor and the 
Qinhuangdao Harbor should be accelerated. Construction of power 
plants should be continued to increase capacity. On the basis 
of reaching 1.29 million lines in the total capacity of urban 
and rural telephone exchanges last year, the total capacity of 
urban and rural telephone exchanges this year should reach 1.8 
million lines, or 2 million lines. In addition, a number of 
basic raw materials, basic facilities, and processing projects 
are under construction. The investment in fixed assets this 
year should increase through every possible means and should be 
set according to the capability of the province. The province 
should not only ensure the fulfillment of the set objectives but 
also ensure the basic balance between total supply and total 
demand. Efforts should also be made to attain or surpass the 
national average level in terms of the increase in fixed assets 
investment. The focus of the fixed asset investment should be 
placed on the readjustment of investment structure and on the 
optimization of investment orientation. By making full use of 
the province's advantages of having relatively more basic 
industries and basic facilities, Hebei should ensure on a 
priority basis the investment in the projects of agriculture, 
water conservation, energy resources, transportation, 
communications, and major raw materials, and should increase the 
investment in technological transformation, high and new 
technological, and precision and deep processing projects. At 
the same time, Hebei should increase a number of processing 
projects oriented to increasing the value that are much demanded 
on markets, require fewer fund investments and short 
construction period, and yield rapid returns from investment and 
good economic efficiency. At the same time, efforts should be 
made to incorporate these processing projects to the general 
construction plan of the state and the province. The general 
projects, whose economic efficiency is poor, whose construction 
funds have not been ensured, and that have no construction 
conditions, should be curbed resolutely to avoid duplicated and 
ill-planned projects. Energy should be concentrated on key 
construction projects. This year, Hebei Province has arranged, 
through screening, 158 key construction projects, 129 of which 
are the projects under continued construction, and should strive 
to obtain 13 projects whose construction will begin this year 
and 16 preparatory projects approved by the state. Attention 
should be paid to accelerating the building of the continued 
projects to ensure the completion and commission of 42 continued 
projects this year. The province should positively create 
conditions to win the state approval, as early as possible, of 
the two major construction projects, with one being the 
Shenhuang Land Port that is of strategic importance to Hebei's 
economic development and the other being the middle section of 
the project of diverting water from south to north. Continued 
efforts should be made to select good projects and do prephase 
preparatory work to ensure that the province's construction 
projects will not stop. The province should try every possible 
means to raise construction funds and open up more channels to 
raise and circulate money. We should strive to include some 
infrastructural projects compatible with the state's industrial 
policy in the total state construction plan and win the money 
support from the state policy-lending banks, various specialized 
banks, and other monetary institutions. Meanwhile, we should 
strive to raise funds from in and outside the province and 
actively and effectively use foreign capital. Banks and 
approved monetary institutions other than banks should fully 
develop their role in money lending to meet the needs of key 
construction projects. We should strengthen the management and 
coordination of key construction projects. We should strengthen 
the macro-regulation, control, and guidance of investment, apply 
the legal person responsibility system to key projects, and 
establish the mechanisms of risk-taking and restraint for new 
construction projects. We should strengthen the auditing and 
supervision of the use of funds and strictly keep the funds 
within the budget. While ensuring construction quality, we 
should strive to speed up the progress of construction to ensure 
all projects are started and commissioned early and yield 
benefits early. 
  E. We should actively develop the nonstate sectors of the 
economy to cultivate the new growing points of economic 
development. 
  We should adhere to the principle of developing the various 
sectors of the economy simultaneously while keeping the public 
sector predominant, and, while actively promoting the 
development of the state-owned economy, we should further adopt 
encouraging policies to develop the collective, individual, 
private, and foreign-funded economies. In developing the 
nonstate sectors of the economy, the key is that leaders at all 
levels should enhance understanding. They should take the 
"three advantages" as the criteria, eliminate the shackles of 
"leftist" ideas, conscientiously address the problem that the 
nonstate sectors "are discriminated against in policies and 
unfairly treated by the media, faced with levies of unwarranted 
fines, donations, and fees, and have no one to support them," 
treat all enterprises equally, and create a good social 
environment for the nonstate sectors to develop and to 
participate in market competition on an equal footing. We 
should include the development of the nonstate sectors of the 
economy in the local economic development plan and work out 
clear and specific targets. We should strengthen the management 
of the nonstate economies according to law and safeguard the 
legal rights and interests of the owners and managers of 
property. Meanwhile, we should actively give guidance to and 
exercise supervision over enterprises so that they will operate 
according to law, pay taxes according to regulations, and 
distribute interests in a rational manner. We should crack down 
on tax evasion, manipulation of the market, and other law 
breaches to promote the healthy development of the nonstate 
economies. 
  F. We should unswervingly implement the strategy of 
promotion 
through the export-oriented economy and open wider to foreign 
countries and domestic areas. 
  We should make the best use of the domestic and foreign 
markets, resources, and funds, speed up the connection with the 
international market, and implement the strategy of promotion 
through the export-oriented economy. This is an important way 
to develop the socialist market economy and also a significant 
change in Hebei's guiding thoughts for economic development and 
its work of opening to the outside world. To comply with this 
change, we should further emancipate our minds and have the 
courage and foresight to open wide, achieve great improvement, 
make major breakthroughs, and achieve large development. 
  We should pay attention to foreign trade, foreign funds, and 
foreign economic relations simultaneously and speed up their 
development. In exports, we should take advantage of the reform 
of the foreign trade system and stimulate the enthusiasm of all 
quarters to improve our capacity for earning foreign exchange 
through exports. We should adhere to the guiding thought that 
foreign trade should be developed by everyone and pool the 
efforts of the "four major armies." The provincial specialized 
import and export corporations should play their role as the 
major force to ensure the steady growth in exports. City and 
prefectural import and export corporations, enterprises with the 
decisionmaking power in export, and the three types of 
foreign-funded enterprises should achieve a rapid increase in 
exports. We should strive to reach the national average growth 
rates in ordinary trade, the export of the three types of 
foreign-funded enterprises, and barter trade and make Hebei's 
exports grow at the same pace with its gross national product. 
In using foreign capital, we should uphold the principle of 
giving simultaneous attention to large-, medium-sized, and small 
projects; to primary, secondary, and tertiary industries; to the 
efforts of the province, and various cities, prefectures, and 
counties; to various economic sectors, and to capital from Hong 
Kong, Macao, Taiwan, Overseas Chinese, and foreign countries; 
and actively broaden the channels and spheres in using foreign 
capital. We should strengthen external contacts, expand 
external propaganda, and regularize and standardize the work of 
inviting business and foreign capital. Through efforts, we 
should realize the goal of actually using $600 million in 
foreign capital this year, strive to make it reach $700 million, 
and build 700 three types of foreign-funded enterprises. In 
foreign economic and technological cooperation, we should 
achieve a big breakthrough this year. It is necessary to 
contract more labor services and construction projects abroad, 
actively support localities and enterprises with favorable 
conditions to export technology and equipment, establish 
enterprises abroad, and do business in foreign countries. 
Through the efforts of this year and next, we should realize 
the objective of "making the foreign economic business volume 
reach $10 million and exporting 10,000 laborers"; and this year 
we should make the foreign economic business volume reach $5 
million and the number of laborers working abroad reach 5,000. 
  We should continue to attend to places around Bohai, 
Beijing, and Tianjin. Our province has the two major advantages 
of being surrounded by Bohai Bay, Beijing, and Tianjin. If we 
do a good job in giving play to these two advantages, we will 
have great hope for accelerating Hebei's economic development. 
We should further enhance the sense of being "surrounded by 
Bohai Bay, Beijing, and Tianjin." The four cities of 
Qinhuangdao, Tangshan, Cangzhou, and Shijiazhuang cities located 
along Bohai Bay should actively organize people to implement the 
strategy on opening up and economic development which aims at 
"developing export-oriented economy to bring along the entire 
economy, combining the efforts of places around Bohai Bay, 
Beijing, and Tianjin, establishing cooperation at home, and 
making breakthroughs in introducing foreign capital," accelerate 
the pace to change the domestic-oriented economy into the 
export-oriented economy, achieve new breakthroughs in 
establishing and introducing large projects in the development 
zone, establish the due status of these cities in the economic 
zone around Bohai, and give play to their exemplary and 
radiation role in the whole province. All cities, prefectures, 
and counties should pay attention to places around Bohai, 
Beijing and Tianjin, formulate new measures, strive to develop 
a new sphere for developing Hebei by relying on Beijing and 
Tianjin, taking advantage of these two municipalities, and 
serving them, and grasp this work well until good results are 
achieved. This year Hebei plans to sign 1,100 domestic 
cooperative projects and introduce 2.3 billion yuan of funds and 
6,000 trained personnel from other provinces. 
  We should further improve the investment environment. 
Continued efforts should be made to improve the tangible 
conditions. This year, we should continue to expand the 
strength in making investments in communications, 
telecommunications, and power projects, strive to complete a 
number of key projects, and put them into use as early as 
possible. We should pay attention to improving the intangible 
conditions, further improve the system involving the management 
of foreign business firms, reduce and simplify procedures, raise 
efficiency, and improve service. It is necessary to strengthen 
management and service over three types of foreign-funded 
enterprises, manage things strictly in accordance with 
international practices, conscientiously implement the 
"joint-venture law," and help enterprises solve practical 
problems. We should strengthen the training and improvement of 
personnel dealing with foreign business and introduce and 
cultivate personnel for handling international economic and 
trade business activities in an effort to meet the needs of 
unceasingly expanding opening up and accelerating the 
export-oriented economy. 
<H5>  5. We Should Actively Develop Scientific, Technological, </H5>
Educational, and Cultural Undertakings 
  The development of scientific, technological, educational, 
and cultural undertakings is an important aspect in building an 
economically strong province, and an important guarantee for 
smoothly carrying out reform, opening up, and economic 
construction. While concentrating efforts on grasping economic 
construction, we should pay great attention to this work and 
actively reform and develop scientific, technological, 
educational, and cultural undertakings. 
  We should accelerate the pace of scientific and 
technological progress. The key in this regard lies in 
concentrating on "integrating science and technology with the 
economy" and "turning scientific and technological results into 
productive forces." By deepening the reform, we should 
establish or improve the mechanism of effectively integrating 
science and technology with the economy and accelerate the pace 
in commercializing the scientific and technological results and 
turning these results into practical productive forces. Efforts 
should be made to vigorously establish or improve the 
institutions in charge of scientific and technological 
development owned by enterprises. All large- and medium-sized 
enterprises across the province should create conditions for 
establishing as soon as possible their own scientific and 
technological development units; actively set up technical 
associations with the scientific research units and the higher 
educational institutions; and enforce the projects with joint 
efforts made by productive units (enterprises), schools (higher 
educational institutions), and research (scientific research 
institutes or units) to accelerate the integration between 
science, technology, and the economy. The work emphasis of this 
year will be placed on successfully establishing scientific and 
technological development units among 300 large- and 
medium-sized enterprises and building the internal technical 
progress mechanism of enterprises with the integration among 
markets, scientific research, and production to enable 
enterprises to possess stronger capabilities in technical 
development and transformation. 
  While continuously enhancing basic research, we should 
further reinforce the dynamics in applied research, technical 
development, and result popularization. In 1994 the province 
plans to manufacture or develop 1,100 new products at or above 
the provincial level. Of these products, over 40 percent of 
them will reach the domestic advanced level. It will study to 
develop 100 projects of new technologies at or above the 
provincial level. Of these technologies, over 60 percent of 
them will reach the domestic advanced level. The province will 
also do a good job in formulating 20 projects of assimilating 
the imported products and technologies and creating something 
new from them. By regarding as a target the integration between 
science, technology, and the economy, the province will do a 
good job in overcoming the scientific and technological 
difficulties among the 40 important and major research projects 
and among the 140 key projects; as well as in scoring the 
results with the domestic advanced level among the 100 projects. 
Efforts should be made to boldly develop privately owned 
scientific research units and to establish privately owned 
scientific and technological enterprises, scientific and 
technological enterprises owned by the state but operated by 
individuals, and the three types of foreign-funded enterprises 
in charge of scientific and technological research. The 
province will accelerate the pace in building the state-level 
high and new technology industrial development zones of 
Shijiazhuang and Baoding and select areas for building 12 
provincial high and new-technology industrial parks. We should 
concentrate our efforts on successfully conducting the key work 
in building these parks. Efforts should be made to accelerate 
the development of high and new technologies and high and new 
technology industries. In 1994 the province's number of high and 
new technology enterprises appraised as qualified will reach 350 
and that of high and new technology products will reach 550. We 
should earnestly implement the principle of "opening up, 
invigorating, supporting, and guiding" to establish the open 
systems of technological markets. Based on continuously 
improving the provincial level technological markets, we should 
do a good job in emphatically establishing permanent 
technological markets. 
  We should accelerate the development of educational 
undertakings. In conducting the education work, we should 
earnestly implement "China's outline on educational reform and 
development"; deepen the reform in the educational systems; and 
readjust the educational structure. We should also upgrade the 
teaching quality and schooling efficiency and vigorously train 
the talented personnel of various kinds, who are able to meet 
the demands of developing the socialist market economy. Efforts 
should be made to accelerate the enforcement of nine-year 
compulsory education. In enforcing compulsory education, we 
should chiefly have the schools operate with the state 
investment; encourage the social fund raising to be made through 
multiple channels and styles and local people to operate 
schools; and foster a new system with the integration between 
most schools being run by the government and social 
participation in schooling being realized. A good job should be 
continuously done in grasping the "educational project of hope" 
and realistically resolve the problem of the school-age children 
in rural areas being unable to enter schools. Efforts should be 
made to consolidate, upgrade, and perfect the secondary 
vocational and technical education and the adult education. We 
should actively push forward the comprehensive reform in rural 
education and enforce overall arrangements among agriculture, 
science, and education. In 1994 the province will concentrate 
its efforts on building 100 vocational education centers at the 
county level. A good job will be continuously done in 
eliminating illiteracy among youths. In conducting the higher 
education, efforts should be made to grasp the projects 
including the strong points of higher educational institutions; 
to create research results with competitive capability; to turn 
out highly sophisticated technologies; and to train outstanding 
and qualified talented personnel for serving economic 
construction and social development. We should positively and 
steadily readjust the specialized course of institutions of 
higher learning. Through appropriate amalgamation, we should 
expand the scale of institutions of higher learning and upgrade 
the efficiency in running schools. We should positively 
organize forces to strive to join the implementation of the 
state "211-project" plan and attend to the construction of two 
key universities and 50 major branches of learning. On the 
premise of taking teaching as a key link, we should vigorously 
strengthen scientific research so as to further suit the demands 
for upgrading the teaching quality and serving the economic 
construction. It is necessary to stabilize the scale of 
recruiting students for universities and secondary specialized 
schools. This year, ordinary institutions of higher learning 
should recruit 36,000 students and secondary specialized schools 
should recruit 75,000 students. We should conscientiously 
implement the "law governing teachers" and realistically 
safeguard the legal rights and benefits of teachers. We should 
strive to set up and maintain a teacher contingents with high 
political integrity, high professional abilities, and a strong 
spirit of respecting the professional work. We should 
realistically solve teachers' wage, housing, and training 
problems; stabilize the teacher contingents; and promote the 
overall provincial educational level to a new height. 
  It is necessary to promote the prosperity of the socialist 
cultural undertakings. We should persist in the orientation of 
making literature and art serve socialism and the people and the 
principle of letting a hundred flowers blossom and a hundred 
schools of thought contend, carry forward the main melody, 
advocate a variety of artistic styles, and persistently attach 
primary importance to social benefits. On this prerequisite, we 
should unify economic results with social benefits. We should 
positively promote the reform and setup of the cultural system, 
make efforts to create outstanding skilled persons and 
outstanding artistic works, strive to create and upgrade 
"Yanzhao art" with Hebei's special characteristics, and provide 
the people with the spiritual food of healthful and colorful 
contents. The press and publication and radio and television 
departments should prominently propagate reform, opening up, and 
economic construction; press close to reality, life, and the 
people; ceaselessly upgrade the effect of propaganda; and expand 
the scale of propaganda. We should vigorously develop the mass 
cultural undertakings; collect funds from all fronts to 
accelerate, in a well-planned manner and in the order of 
importance, the construction of such cultural facilities as 
cultural centers, libraries, scientific and technological 
centers, museums, archives, and gymnasiums; add grass-roots 
scientific and technological and cultural centers; and launch 
cultural activities within enterprises, neighborhood committees, 
campuses, villages, and towns so as to satisfy the people's 
increasing higher cultural and entertainment demands. It is 
necessary to strengthen the management of cultural markets and 
ensure the sound development of cultural markets. We should 
protect, develop, and use cultural relics according to laws. 
  It is necessary to develop public health and sports 
undertakings. We should persist in the principle of putting 
prevention first in medical work and pay attention to and 
strengthen the prevention and cure of the diseases that 
seriously harm the health of the people. This year, we should 
continue to carry out, on a trial basis, the medical insurance 
system in the urban areas; develop the rural cooperative medical 
treatment system; and set up perfect county, township, and 
village medical treatment networks. We should strengthen the 
education on medical ethics among the medical units at various 
levels; vigorously carry forward the spirit of wholeheartedly 
serving the people, saving the dead, and supporting the injured; 
resolutely correct the unhealthy trends within various trades; 
and strive to upgrade the medical and technological levels and 
service quality. We should persist in the principle of paying 
equal attention to popularizing and improving sports activities 
and positively explore ways for reforming the sports management 
system in the new situation. At the time of implementing the 
"state all- people health plan" and vigorously popularizing mass 
sports activities, we should grasp our strong items, cultivate 
outstanding athletes for our province, and upgrade Hebei's 
sports competition levels. 
<H5>  6. We Should Realistically Strengthen Spiritual </H5>
Civilization, Democracy, and the Legal System 
  In the progress of reform, opening up, and socialist 
modernization, we must always uphold the principle of "taking a 
two-handed approach and be tough with both" and attach prime 
importance to realistically strengthening socialist spiritual 
civilization, democracy, and the legal system. 
  We should conscientiously attend to ideological and 
political 
construction under the socialist market economic conditions. It 
is necessary to persist in using Comrade Deng Xiaoping's theory 
on building socialism with Chinese characteristics to unify the 
ideology and understanding of the broad masses of cadres, using 
scientific theory to arm the people, correct public opinions to 
guide the people, noble spirit to mold the people, and 
outstanding works to encourage the people. We should deeply and 
realistically organize the study of volume no.3 of the "Selected 
Works of Deng Xiaoping," urge the higher and the lower levels 
across the province to unceasingly emancipate the mind, renew 
concepts, and enhance the consciousness and steadfastness of the 
broad masses of cadres in unswervingly implementing the party's 
basic line. We should persist in using correct public opinions 
as the guidance, guide the broad masses of cadres to improve 
relations in reform and to support and participate in reform. 
It is necessary to strengthen education on pioneering 
undertakings with painstaking efforts during the new period, 
actively conduct all forms of education on patriotism, 
collectivism, and socialism, promote healthy trends among the 
people, and strengthen their cohesion. The correct outlook on 
life, the concept on value, and the civilized and healthy way of 
living should be upheld, and money worshipping, out-and-out 
egoism, and all sorts of decadent ideologies should be 
resolutely resisted and opposed. Further efforts should be made 
to strengthen education on professional ethics and social 
morality, adopt clear-cut stand to support justice, deal blows 
to unhealthy trends, and form a good social habit of conducting 
healthy activities to scale the heights and making progress 
actively. 
  We should earnestly promote socialist democracy. It is 
necessary to always pay attention to safeguarding the right of 
the broad masses of people of being masters of their own 
destiny, extensively mobilize and rely on the masses, and give 
full play to, safeguard, and guide the enthusiasm of the broad 
masses of people. Governments at all levels should respect the 
people's congresses, the people's congress standing committees, 
and the deputies to exercise their functions and powers in line 
with law and consciously receive legal supervision and work 
supervision from the people's congresses. We should pay 
attention to giving play to the role of the CPPCC committees, 
democratic parties, nonparty patriotic persons, and mass 
organizations in political consultation and democratic 
supervision and conscientiously listen to their opinions and 
suggestions while making major policy decisions. It is 
necessary to conscientiously handle all proposals and 
suggestions raised by deputies and the motions raised by the 
CPPCC committee; further establish and improve the system and 
procedures in making policy decisions and giving supervision 
democratically so that all policy decisions are made in a 
scientific, democratic, and legal manner. We should actively 
strengthen democracy in the grass roots, give full play to the 
role of workers' congresses, neighborhood committees, and 
villagers' committees, and guarantee that the grass-roots people 
can fully exercise their democratic power. 
  We should pay great attention to socialist legal system. To 
build and improve the socialist market economic structure, we 
must have a perfect legal system as a guarantee for keeping the 
activities within a proper bound. We should step up efforts to 
formulate laws and regulations to keep the market activities 
within proper bound, to safeguard the market economic order, to 
improve macroeconomic regulation and control, and to perfect 
social security, establish and improve laws and regulations, 
conscientiously perform administrative work in line with law, 
and use more economic and legal means to organize, guide, and 
manage economic activities and social affairs. We should 
strengthen inspection and supervision over law enforcement and 
resolutely resolve the problems of failing to observe the laws 
that are enacted and to strictly enforce laws and regulations, 
and using one's words to replace laws and one's power to bend 
the law. Continued efforts should be made to deeply develop the 
"second five-year plan to disseminate law knowledge," and 
enhance the legal concept of the broad masses of people. We 
should further strengthen the legal service and the legal 
guaranteeing functions of judicial and administrative organs at 
all levels and make more contributions to accelerating reform, 
opening up, and the development of the socialist market economy. 
  The comprehensive management of social order should be 
strengthened. We should be highly vigilant against and deal 
resolute blows to the sabotages conducted by hostile forces and 
hostile elements at home and abroad. The campaign of dealing 
severe blows to crimes should be launched continuously and 
profoundly, and forces should be organized in a timely manner to 
deal blows to crimes. All sorts of serious criminal and 
economic cases should be investigated and cracked rapidly and 
should be punished according to law as severely and promptly as 
possible. All criminal cliques, the cliques with the nature of 
underworld society in particular, and all the hooligans and 
criminals who jeopardize public security, should be stricken 
voluntarily and be eliminated resolutely. Even more resolute 
measures should be adopted to wipe out pornographic books and 
articles, to strike human abduction, and to eliminate the "six 
social vices." Efforts should be made to wipe out all ugly 
social phenomena, resolutely investigate and ban all sorts of 
unlawful behaviors, such as manufacturing and selling of obscene 
articles, prostitution, visits to whores, gambling parties, and 
obscene service. Meanwhile, severe blows should be dealt to 
those who abduct and sell women and children. We should 
continuously strengthen the building of basic and grass-roots 
public security organs, give full play to the role of all mass 
autonomous organizations, such as the social order maintenance 
organs at the grass-roots level and the people mediation organs, 
establish and perfect the socialized security guarding 
mechanism, comprehensively implement various measures and 
responsibility system concerning comprehensive management of 
public security, mobilize the forces in all fields of society to 
maintain social order altogether in order to create a fine 
social order. 
  The activities of supporting the army, giving preferential 
treatment to family members of revolutionary martyrs and 
servicemen, supporting the government, and cherishing the people 
should be launched in a profound way, and the building of the 
army should be supported positively. 
  We should continue to consolidate and develop the province's 
excellent situation characterized with army-government unity and 
army-people unity in order to promote the in-depth development 
of the "double-support" activities. We should profoundly launch 
the activities of the army and the people or the police and the 
people making concerted efforts to build spiritual civilization 
and to create "double support" model cities and counties in 
order to create even more "double support" model units. 
Governments at all levels should enthusiastically show concern 
for and support army building and should actually help the army 
resolve the problems with regard to the training oriented to 
preparations against war and to the construction of national 
defense projects. Governments at all levels should also do a 
good job in receiving retired army cadres, giving special care 
to disabled servicemen and to family members of revolutionary 
martyrs and servicemen, and providing jobs for demobilized 
soldiers. We should further enhance the national defense 
concept of the vast numbers of cadres and the masses. 
  The nationality and religious work should be improved. The 
nationalities policies and religious policies of the party and 
the state should be carried out conscientiously. Great efforts 
should be made to promote and support the development of the 
economy and all other undertakings of minority nationalities 
areas. The unity among various nationalities should be 
enhanced, the culture of various nationalities should be carried 
forward, and efforts should be made to train cadres of various 
nationalities. The system of national regional autonomy should 
be upheld and improved, the customs and habits of all minority 
nationalities should be respected, and the socialist relations 
among all nationalities should be consolidated. The legal 
management of religious affairs should be strengthened, normal 
religious activities should be protected, and the activities of 
utilizing religion to commit crimes should be stopped and dealt 
with according to law. 
  Fellow Deputies! 
  Opposing corruption, strengthening administrative honesty 
and 
diligence of governments at all levels, and resolutely 
struggling against all sorts of corrupt phenomena are a 
fundamental task for the building of political powers at all 
levels as well as a major guarantee for the smooth progress of 
reform, opening up, and economic development. Governments at 
all levels should fully understand the long-duration and 
arduousness of the anti-corruption campaign and should carry 
this campaign through to the end. All state functionaries, 
leading cadres in particular, should keep firmly in mind that 
the powers in their hands are invested on them by the people and 
all the behaviors of abusing one's powers to seek personal gain 
are against the will of the people, adversely affect the 
prestige of the party and the government among the masses and 
destroy the flesh-and-blood relations between the party, the 
government, and the people. Therefore, our cadres at all levels 
should take the initiative in remaining clean and honest in 
performing official duties, be diligent to work for the people, 
and serve the people wholeheartedly. We should make further 
efforts to address the problems about which the masses have many 
complaints. We should step up establishment of effective 
mechanisms for supervision and restraint, fully develop the 
supervisory role of the laws, organizations, masses, and the 
media, continue to investigate and handle the serious cases on 
embezzlement, bribery, dereliction of duty, and sternly punish 
corrupt elements. We should make continuous efforts to check 
the unhealthy trends of abusing power for extortion, swindling, 
trampling upon others, telling lies, making false achievement 
reports, making false accounts, and producing fake and inferior 
commodities. In the struggle against corruption, we should 
correctly handle the relations between the anticorruption 
struggle and economic construction, be firm in promoting reform, 
opening up, and the socialist market economy, be firm in 
opposing corruption, advocating honesty, and cracking down on 
crimes, and continuously push forward the endeavor of opposing 
corruption and advocating honesty, reform, opening up, and the 
modernization drive. 
  We should actively facilitate the reform of the 
administrative system and the organizational reform and 
accelerate the transformation of the government functions. In 
line with the guidelines of the 14th party congress and the 
first session of the eighth NPC, Hebei's organizational reform 
should be by and large completed by the end of 1995 and the 
popularization of the public service system should be by and 
large completed by the end of 1996. Based on the principle of 
streamlining organizations, changing functions, bringing the 
relations between various sectors into better balance, promoting 
development, and ensuring stability and the general idea of 
diverting personnel after determining the functions, the setup, 
and the staff of organizations and then establishing the public 
service system, we should first carry out the reform of the 
provincial-level organizations and then promote the reform at 
the city, prefectural, county, and township levels in a planned 
and orderly manner. Governments at all levels should strengthen 
the organization and leadership of this work, conscientiously 
carry out ideological and political work, and educate the vast 
number of office personnel to have the cardinal principles in 
mind, take the overall situation into account, correctly treat 
the organizational reform, remove the ideological obstacles, 
stabilize their feelings, and ensure the smooth progress of the 
organizational reform and the normal operation of the office 
work. Through the organizational reform, we should gradually 
establish an administrative system that suits the needs of the 
development of the socialist market economy and build a compact, 
highly trained, honest, highly efficient, and vigorous 
contingent of public servants. 
  We should attach great importance to and properly handle the 
contradictions among the people and earnestly show concern for 
people's life. Following the continuous deepening of reform, 
various types of contradictions among the people may be 
reflected in complicated forms. We should conduct ideological 
education, give policy guidance, adjust the interests between 
various sectors, and adjudicate according to law to properly 
address the issues concerning the vital interests of the masses 
and the sensitive hot issues, eliminate the destabilizing 
factors in a timely manner, and consolidate and develop the 
stable and united political situation. We should earnestly give 
heed to people's petitions and maintain close ties with them. 
Governments at all levels should always be concerned with the 
well-being of the masses, especially the supplies of fuel, rice, 
oil, salt, soy sauce, vinegar, and vegetables to them, to ensure 
the supplies of daily necessities and the distribution of wages 
to teachers, cadres, and workers on time. We should 
conscientiously do a good job in helping the poor and disaster 
relief. We should adopt all necessary measures to help resolve 
the difficulties in the production and life of difficult 
enterprises and people of disaster areas. We should create a 
stable social environment for reform and development through 
various work. 
  We should exert great efforts to improve leadership style, 
seek truth, deal with concrete matters relating to work, and do 
solid work. According to Comrade Jiang Zemin's recent 
requirements for "concentrating more time, having less social 
intercourse, conducting more investigation and study activities, 
having less subjectivism, doing more concrete deeds, and 
indulging in less empty talks," we should strive to make 
noticeable progress in improving the leadership style. It is 
necessary to vigorously advocate the style of study. The 
leading cadres at various levels should take the lead in 
studying the third volume of the "Selected Works of Deng 
Xiaoping" and the CPC Central Committee's "decision on several 
issues relating to the setup of the socialist market economic 
system," strive to grasp the new knowledge concerning the 
market economy, study the new measures for promoting the 
economic development, master the new methods for solving various 
contradictions and problems cropping up during economic 
operation, upgrade the abilities in organizing and leading the 
socialist market economy, and enhance the foresight, initiative, 
and creativeness of the work. We should adopt various forms to 
give trainings at different levels, in groups, and by stages so 
as to make the broad masses of the cadres' ideas and work 
methods suit the changes from the planned economy to the market 
economy. It is necessary to vigorously advocate the practice of 
investigation and study. We should persist in materialist 
dialectics, avoid lopsidedness and formalism, and overcome 
subjectivism and bureaucracy. The leading cadres at various 
levels should often go deep to the grass roots, the masses, and 
the reality to conduct more investigation and study activities 
and help solve problems and to timely discover, sum up, and 
popularize the masses' creativeness and experiences. The 
government leaders at the provincial, city, and county levels 
should make division of work, keep contacts with the units that 
they should assume responsibility for their reform work, grasp 
typical cases, and sum up experiences, and promote the work of 
the overall situation. It is necessary to vigorously advocate 
the practice of doing solid work. The working personnel of the 
governments at various levels should firmly foster the idea of 
doing solid work to rejuvenate the province and make the 
province strong, have the spirit of holding themselves 
responsible to the party and the people, create achievements, 
and make new changes in the appearances of their localities, 
departments, and units in the new situation. We should further 
perfect the system of responsibility for management of fixed 
tasks and perfect the cadre encouragement and restriction 
mechanisms. The cadres with outstanding achievements and those 
who are among the best within their trades and departments 
should be commended. Those who make slow progress in their 
work; those whose development speed, progress levels, and work 
seating arrangements lag behind the national average levels; and 
those who fail to make progress or even lag behind for several 
years should be encouraged to change their appearances. We 
should resolutely readjust the leading bodies and cadres that 
fail to improve their work, seriously create disunity, indulge 
themselves in unhealthy practice, accumulate the problems, 
engage themselves in the "fake and unqualified" activities in 
their leadership work, are involved in serious problems, and 
produce bad influences. We should vigorously advocate the 
practice of doing solid work and striving to create quality 
achievements and further speed up the pace of reform, opening 
up, and building Hebei into an economically powerful province. 
  Fellow Deputies: 
  We are now in an extremely important historical period. Time 
is advancing and the situation is developing. Our fighting 
strides cannot be obstructed by any difficulties and obstacles 
in the course of advance. Under the leadership of the party 
Central Committee, the State Council, and the provincial party 
committee, we should firmly grasp the historical favorable 
opportunities, unite as one, keep forging ahead, arduously do 
pioneering work, and make unswerving efforts to advance toward 
the target of building Hebei into an economically powerful 
province. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-1862 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "drchi064__s94003" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-CHI-94-064-S </AU>
Daily Report 
<DATE1>  25 Feb 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> REGIONAL WORK REPORTS </F>
<H3> <TI>   Heilongjiang Government Work Report </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Heilongjiang Government Work Report </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   SK0903030894 Harbin HEILONGJIANG RIBAO in Chinese 25 Feb 94 
p 2 </F>

<F P=103> SK0903030894 </F>
<F P=104>  Harbin HEILONGJIANG RIBAO </F>
<F P=105>  Chinese </F>


<TEXT>
BFN 

<F P=106> ["Excerpts" of Heilongjiang provincial government work </F>
report delivered by Governor Shao Qihui at the second session of 
the eighth provincial people's congress on 24 February] 
  [Text]Review of 1993 Work 
  Under the leadership of the provincial party committee, the 
people of the province thoroughly implemented the guidelines of 
the 14th national party congress and Comrade Deng Xiaoping's 
important speeches, further emancipated the mind, had courage in 
practice, and worked in a down-to-earth manner, with the focus 
on establishing the socialist market economy system and 
comprehensively promoting socialist modernization, in the past 
year. The work tasks for 1993 approved at the first session of 
the eighth provincial people's congress were by and large 
accomplished, and great achievements were won in reform and 
development. 
  The national economy developed in a sustained and stable 
manner. Despite contradictions in systems and structures, which 
had yet to be resolved, and the rather serious restrictions 
imposed by the bottlenecks, such as funds and transportation, we 
managed to maintain a fairly high growth rate in Heilongjiang's 
economy thanks to the efforts to rely on reform and opening up, 
strengthen macroeconomic regulation and control, and overcome 
numerous difficulties. The gross domestic product totaled 102.8 
billion yuan, up 4.9 percent from the preceding year in terms of 
comparable prices. Industrial production rose steadily, and its 
economic efficiency improved notably. The annual industrial 
output value totaled 131.6 billion yuan, up 6.2 percent in terms 
of comparable prices. Proceeding from strengthening the 
position of agriculture as the foundation and protecting and 
boosting peasants' enthusiasm, we made conscientious efforts to 
correct the irrational burdens (totaling 360 million yuan or 
20.8 yuan per capita) on peasants when doing rural work, made 
active efforts to eliminate "IOUs," increased money, science, 
and technology input, facilitated the "four aspects of 
integrated management," and thus promoted rural economic 
development. Agricultural output value totaled 33 billion yuan, 
up 2.3 percent. Grain output attained a new height to reach 
23.91 million tonnes. Animal husbandry developed in a sustained 
and balanced manner, and the proportion of its output value to 
the total agricultural output value rose to about 25 percent. 
An unprecedented good situation emerged in township 
enterprises, which registered a growth rate of 53.1 percent, 
increased their output value to a level that accounted for 60 
percent of the agricultural output value, and were becoming the 
major force of the rural economy. Key construction and 
technical transformation were accelerated, and investment of the 
entire society in fixed assets totaled 32.15 billion yuan, up 
36.4 percent. Urban and rural markets remained thriving, with 
the total volume of retail sales increasing by 12.3 percent over 
the preceding year. Revenues rose steadily, and the financial 
order improved. 
  We quickened the steps toward the socialist market economy 
system. Enterprise reform focusing on enforcing the 
"regulations on transforming the operating mechanism of the 
enterprises owned by the whole people" and Heilongjiang's 
"detailed regulations for implementation" made significant 
headway. Enterprises' decision- making power was implemented 
gradually, and, in particular, reform of the property right 
system began to take a big step forward. Especially after the 
third plenary session of the 14th party Central Committee, we 
formulated and put into effect a series of major reform measures 
in line with the guidelines of the "decision" and the national 
economic work conference, which would notably accelerate our 
transition from the planned economy system to the socialist 
market economy system. 
  A good development trend continued in opening to the outside 
world. Further developing the advantages presented by the 
opening of border areas, we made active efforts to promote the 
strategic escalation of opening to the outside world, emphasized 
the building of the large passageway for international trade, 
implemented the strategies of winning with quality and 
diversifying the market, and made persistent efforts to push 
large and medium-sized enterprises to the major battleground of 
foreign economic relations and trade. Heilongjiang's total 
imports and exports came to $3.06 billion, up 6.2 percent from 
the preceding year. 
  All-round progress was made in various social undertakings. 
With economic construction as the central link, development of 
the economy and society was coordinated. Thanks to the profound 
implementation of the strategic principle of "invigorating the 
province through science and technology," more sciences and 
technologies took root in the economy, more scientists and 
technicians plunged into the main battlefield of economic 
construction, and more scientific and technological research 
achievements were translated into practical productive forces. 
Adhering to the principle of "taking a two-handed approach and 
being tough with both hands," we went all out to build the 
socialist spiritual civilization. The cultural front presented 
a group of fine cultural works that mainly reflected practical 
lives. Harbin city successfully obtained the right to host the 
Third Winter Asian Games. Great results were achieved in public 
health, sports, family planning, press and publication, 
broadcasting and television, environmental protection, and the 
work of nationality, civil administration, overseas Chinese 
affairs, and foreign affairs. 
  Living standards of urban and rural residents continued to 
improve. Deducting the factors of price rises, the per capita 
annual income of urban residents available for living expenses 
increased by 5.2 percent over the previous year, and the per 
capita net income of rural residents increased by 2.1 percent. 
Savings deposits of urban and rural residents at the end of 
1993 increased by 10.68 billion yuan, up by 22.6 percent. Urban 
and rural construction was accelerated, and public facilities 
improved somewhat. The per capita housing area of urban 
residents was 6.4 square meters, 0.2 square meters more than in 
the previous year. The per capita housing area of rural 
residents was 14.53 square meters. 
  Construction of democracy, the legal system, and 
administrative honesty was strengthened. Governments at all 
levels conscientiously executed the resolutions of people's 
congresses and their standing committees, attached full 
importance on the role of the organizations of Chinese People's 
Political Consultative Conference [CPPCC], democratic parties, 
people's groups, and various circles in society in conducting 
political consultation and democratic supervision, earnestly 
received the letters and visits from the masses, and handled 178 
proposals from people's deputies and 373 motions from the CPPCC 
organizations. Remarkable improvement was made in drawing up 
and enforcing administrative laws and in supervising law 
enforcement. In line with the arrangements of the central 
authorities and the provincial party committee, we positively 
and conscientiously launched the anticorruption campaign among 
government departments. 
  In the past year, many difficulties and problems remained to 
the province's economic and social lives. Deep-rooted 
contradictions in systems and structures were not resolved 
effectively, overall economic efficiency was not good enough, 
restrictions to economic activities remained very serious, the 
margin of price hikes was on the high side, the people's living 
standards improved slowly, the number of enterprises with 
difficulties increased, some city and county organizations as 
well as some schools had difficulties in paying wages or 
salaries, and there unstable factors in society increased 
relatively. 
<H5>  Principles and Objectives for 1994's Provincial Economic and </H5>
Social Development 
  The principles for the 1994 work of the province are: Under 
the guidance of Comrade Deng Xiaoping's theory of building 
socialism with Chinese characteristics, we should profoundly 
implement the guidelines of the 14th party congress and the 
third plenary session of the 14th CPC Central Committee, 
accelerate the building of the socialist market economic 
structure and the modernization drive, vigorously readjust 
economic structure and improve economic efficiency, safeguard 
political stability, and promote the all-round progress of 
society. 
  In line with this principle, the province's major targets 
for economic and social development in 1994 are as follows: 
  The gross domestic product will show a 6 percent increase 
over 1993. 
  The total industrial output value will show an about 5 
percent increase over 1993. 
  The total agricultural output value will show an about 4 
percent increase over 1993. 
  The investment made in the fixed assets of society as a 
whole 
will show a 20 percent increase over 1993. 
  The increased scale of social retail prices will be 
controlled at about 10 percent. 
  The rate of natural population growth will be controlled 
under 12 per 1,000. 
  In order to totally overfulfill the tasks and targets of 
economic and social development in 1994, we must pay attention 
to grasping the following points in ideology and work: 
  First, in developing the economy, we must proceed from the 
province's reality. Comrade Deng Xiaoping stressed: 
"Development represents an essential criterion" and "the final 
resolution of problems should also depend on economic 
development." Particularly, in view of the province, we must 
make efforts to bring about a change to the slow development and 
to strive to achieve a faster growth. We will face many 
favorable conditions for accelerating development in 1994. 
However, we should also fully note that if we fail to 
fundamentally deal with the systematic and structural 
contradictions, such as the long-standing adversity cropping up 
in the structure of industries focused on basic production and 
natural resources, the large amount of losses of economic 
results caused by the systems of highly mandatory plans and the 
tortuous changes of prices, the high demands of investments, the 
high cost of production, the weak capability of self 
accumulation, and the low level of inputs, as well as the 
restriction imposed on by the bottleneck of funds and 
transportation, will continue to adversely affect the province's 
economic development. Based on stabilizing the increase at 
present, we can only exploit strong points and avoid 
shortcomings; readjust the structure; and gradually provide 
conditions for achieving fast development in the coming few 
years. 
  Second, the way and hope to dealing with the problems 
cropping up in the province's economic development lie on 
deepening the reform. The state has issued major and important 
measures this year for the fields of finance and taxes, banking, 
planning, investment, foreign trade, and the reform of 
state-owned enterprises. We should organize the departments 
concerned to carefully enforce them. According to the target of 
establishing the systems of socialist market economy, many 
reform measures are beginning to be enforced this year. As soon 
as these measures begin, we should do a good job in grasping the 
direction and concentrate our efforts on formulating new systems 
and mechanism. Efforts should be made to enhance the follow-up 
analysis over the reform progress and to discover or resolve the 
prominent problems cropping up along the advancing road. A good 
job should be done in conducting the harmony, coordination, and 
improvement of reforms. In making arrangements for the economic 
work, we should create a more relaxed environment for reforms so 
as to ensure their smoother progress. 
  Third, safeguarding and maintaining social stability 
represents an overriding task. Without a stable social 
environment, we are in no position to do everything. Localities 
and departments whose stability situation is more serious should 
spend some time and concentrate their efforts on vigorously 
grasping the work of safeguarding stability as well as sacrifice 
a little the development rate and adequately slow down the pace 
of reforms. 
  Fourth, we should uphold the principle of "building the two 
civilizations simultaneously and scoring achievements in both of 
them." We should constantly grasp material civilization on one 
hand and spiritual civilization on the other, grasp economic 
construction on one hand and struggle against corruptions on the 
other, and grasp construction on one hand and legal systems on 
the other. 
  Develop Rural Economy in an All-Round Manner, With 
the Focus on Increasing Peasants' Income 
  Maintaining the stability and development of the rural 
economy constitutes an important foundation for ensuring 
Heilongjiang's economic and social stability, and agriculture 
should be put unfailingly in the first place of economic work. 
  We should deepen the rural reform. The original farmland 
contracts should be extended another 30 years without change 
when they expire. Paid transfer of land use right according to 
the law should be permitted, and the optimal-scale operation 
based on household contracted operation should be developed. 
Rural socialized service system should be improved 
continuously. We should accelerate rural market construction 
and guide peasants to enter the field of commodity distribution. 
In line with state arrangements, we should continue to maintain 
the contracted grain purchasing quota and properly raise the 
grain purchasing price when new grain begins to be marketed this 
year. We should establish the grain risk fund and further 
improve the grain reserve and marketing systems. 
  Guided by the market, we should lead peasants to adjust the 
production setup and product mix of their own accord so that 
agriculture will develop along the direction of high yields, 
good quality, and high efficiency. The areas planted to 
different crops should be properly arranged, and the emphasis 
should be on development of the advantageous strains needed by 
the market and the products of high commercial rate and capable 
of earning plenty of foreign exchange. We should intensify 
construction of capital farmland water conservancy facilities 
and do a good job in afforestation. To facilitate sustained and 
stable agricultural development, we should continue to increase 
financial allocations, credit, and peasants' investment to 
agriculture. 
  We should carry out the "leap-over project" of township 
enterprises. The output value of Heilongjiang's township 
enterprises should reach 50 billion yuan this year, up more than 
50 percent from last year. The cooperative shareholding system 
should become the major way of township enterprises' reform and 
development, and cooperative shareholding enterprises 
established with the funds pooled by peasants, who either 
participate in their management or not, should be greatly 
developed. Township enterprises should do a good job in 
cooperation with coastal areas, scientific research units, 
colleges and universities, and large enterprises. We should 
strive to increase the investment in township enterprises and, 
by pooling funds, inviting investment, and increasing bank 
loans, increase the investment to 2 billion yuan this year. We 
should give particular attention to the construction of small 
township industrial zones and develop the large areas with the 
concentration of these zones. We should coordinate the 
construction of these small zones with the construction of small 
cities and towns. Experiment should be conducted with the 
reform of the household registration system in small cities and 
towns, and peasants should be encouraged to invest in 
establishing enterprises in the small industrial zones. We 
should do a better job in building the bank of township 
enterprises' projects, actively bring in and train personnel, 
disseminate new technology, develop new products, and guide 
township enterprises to increase the scale and raise the level. 
We should replenish and strengthen city, county, and township 
leadership force in charge of township enterprises and organize 
the departments, enterprises, and institutions at and above the 
county level and some units directly under the central and 
provincial authorities to support and help township enterprises. 
We should strive to attain one year ahead of schedule the 
target of doubling the output value of township enterprises. 
  We should make unremitting efforts to reduce the burdens on 
peasants. Fees and charges collected from peasants should be 
put under strict control in line with relevant laws and 
regulations of the state and the province. Departments directly 
under the province and governments at and below the city or 
prefectural level have no authority to stipulate the items of 
fees and charges to be collected from peasants. We should 
strengthen management of collective finance and keep the 
percentage of township unified accumulation and village 
retention within 5 percent of local peasants' net annual income 
of the previous year. 
  Combine Reform With Renovation, and Successfully Run 
State-Owned Enterprises, With Large and Medium-sized Enterprises 
as the Mainstay 
  Heilongjiang is a province with more large and medium-sized 
state-owned enterprises, and thus it must regard the successful 
operation of state-owned enterprises, with large and 
medium-sized ones as the mainstay, as the most important task of 
deepening reform and accelerating development. 
  To successfully run state-owned enterprises, with large and 
medium-sized ones as the mainstay, the most essential work is to 
deepen reform, accelerate renovation, and organically combine 
the two. 
  Enterprise reform should be pressed forward positively and 
steadily in line with the decision adopted by the third plenary 
session of the 14th CPC Central Committee on transforming the 
operational mechanisms of enterprises and establishing the 
modern enterprise system. At present, we should continue to 
conscientiously implement the "enterprise law," the "corporate 
law," the "regulations," and the "detailed rules" in order to 
truly delegate various decision-making powers to enterprises. 
We should rapidly establish the modern enterprise system, with 
emphasis on reforming the property rights of state-owned 
enterprises. Within this year, we should choose 50 enterprises 
of different trades to try out the modern enterprise system and 
then the system should be spread to all fields to accumulate 
experiences. On the basis of standardizing existing 
shareholding enterprises, with emphasis on establishing the 
corporate system, we should make great efforts to explore the 
organizational forms concerning the property composition of 
state-owned enterprises, should vigorously develop the limited 
liability corporations whose shares are purchased by legal 
entities, and should spread in a planned manner the experiments 
for establishing the limited corporations wholly owned by the 
state. The 150 state-owned enterprises that have conditions, 
large and medium-sized industrial enterprises in particular, 
should be rebuilt or be newly built into limited-liability 
corporations. Some large and medium-sized enterprises that are 
of no hope to halt deficits should be chosen to try out the 
bankruptcy system according to law. In the course of 
consolidating and perfecting existing enterprise groups, by 
combining the voluntary participation of enterprises with the 
guidance of government, we should again organize several 
enterprise groups of different categories that have industrial 
or product advantages, with key enterprises as the head. 
Through such major forms as the shareholding cooperative 
system, the management based on leasing, and the selling of 
property rights, we should make great efforts to completely 
fulfill the task of reforming property rights of small 
state-owned enterprises in this and the next years. To ensure 
the success in reforming the system concerning the property 
right of enterprises and to effect an innovation of the 
enterprise system, we must make an inventory of and check the 
stockpiles and capital of enterprises, actually reduce the 
burdens of enterprises, and accelerate the establishment of the 
social security system. 
  Technological transformation is as important as enterprise 
reform, and they complement each other. So far as Heilongjiang, 
in which enterprises are seriously aging, is concerned, it is an 
urgent task to energetically promote the technological 
transformation of enterprises. 
  Currently, fund shortage is the key problem hampering the 
technological transformation of enterprises. We must seek the 
way out by deepening reform and expanding the scale of opening 
up. With the key technological transformation projects as the 
backer, we should spread the shareholding system and collect 
funds from enterprise workers and staff members and the from 
society. The "grafting" renovation of enterprises should be 
carried out on a large scale to attract foreign funds. We 
should strengthen the self-renovation capacity of enterprises 
through the method of accelerating depreciation. In the course 
of running well large and medium-sized state-owned enterprises, 
we should pay high attention to resolving the difficulties and 
problems facing the state-owned enterprises of counties. 
<H5>  Unfailingly Build Key Projects, Readjust Economic Structure, </H5>
and Form New Economic Growth Points 
  To extricate Heilongjiang's economy from slow growth and 
weak 
momentum, we must pay attention to building a group of key 
capital construction and technological transformation projects 
with high starting points in technology, wide connections with 
industries, strong competitiveness in the market, and good 
economic efficiency. In addition, we must make great efforts to 
cultivate the pillar industries that greatly affect 
Heilongjiang's economy. 
  We should concentrate energy on grasping the construction 
of key projects. It is necessary to accelerate the development 
of five key pillar industries and 10 key projects as defined by 
the provincial party committee. The completion and operation of 
these projects will greatly upgrade the province's economic 
development speed, efficiency, and reserve strength. In the 
forms of striving for loans and stocks, we should concentrate 
financial and material resources to vigorously and rapidly 
promote economic development. It is necessary to deepen 
investment and inter-regional capital movement systems and to 
intensify the investment restriction mechanism. It is necessary 
to intensify the development and scientific management of 
projects; set up a warehouse of projects, including on-going 
projects and reserve projects; and make positive efforts to 
strive for new projects. 
  The readjustment of the economic structure should be 
accelerated, and new growth points for the economy should 
positively be cultivated. It is impossible to set up the 
socialist market economic system and to register a faster 
economic growth rate under the unitary ownership system and the 
unitary economic structure. Therefore, we should vigorously 
develop the tertiary industry; continue to develop 
transportation, postal and telecommunications, scientific and 
technological, and educational industries; and accelerate the 
development of circulation, financial, insurance, tourist, real 
estate, information consultation, and intermediate service 
trades. It is necessary to boldly give free rein to the 
development of individual and private sectors of the economy and 
the three types of foreign-funded enterprises and to bring into 
full play the potentials of various sectors of the economy. It 
is necessary to implement the provincial party committee and 
government's "regulations on several issues related to the 
private and individual sectors of the economy." The state-owned 
enterprises and enterprises with other forms of ownership are 
encouraged to make mutual investments and to become 
shareholders. It is necessary to develop the economy of various 
sectors where property rights are clearly defined. 
  This year, as well as in the foreseeable future, we should 
regard the intensive and precision processing of farm and 
sideline products as a new economic growth point, prominently 
attend to it, and regard it as a priority of the provincial 
government and the governments at various levels. We should 
regard dairy products, grain processing, forage, sugar refinery, 
foodstuffs, wooden goods, flax products, and medical trade as 
leading trades; come up with a unified plan; attain serialized 
development; and accelerate the pace of development. It is 
necessary to implement the provincial party committee and the 
provincial government's decision on "making trade, industry, and 
agriculture a coordinated process;" positively organize and 
guide industrial and trade enterprises; and organize a 
production- processing-circulation community in the forms of 
contract, stock cooperation, and economic assistance. In line 
with the precision and intensive processing of farm, forestry, 
and livestock products, we should conduct technological 
transformation among production enterprises and go all out to 
develop new products. Through efforts in the next few years, we 
should make the processing industries with farm and sideline 
products as raw materials become a key force to affect the 
province's economic development. 
<H5>  Positively Pioneer Domestic and Foreign Markets and Promote </H5>
the Opening of the Province to All Directions 
  Regarding foreign economic relations and trade, we should 
take the deepening of the reform of the foreign trade system and 
the unification of exchange rates as a favorable opportunity; 
continue to upgrade the strategy of opening to the outside 
world; gradually develop the opening of the province along 
higher layers, wider spheres, and deep ranges; and further 
enhance the functions for affecting the overall economy. 
  In the course of opening to the outside world, we should 
regard the import of capital and technology as an extremely 
important task. As for the contracts and agreements of intention 
on conducting technological transformation with foreign capital 
as signed by the provincial government on the two overseas 
business invitation events, we should clearly define 
responsibilities and pay firm attention to the fulfillment of 
these contracts and agreements. Continuously in line with the 
economic construction priorities, we should invite businessmen, 
bring in capital, and expand inter- regional capital circulation 
channels in a well-planned manner and through various channels. 
  Large and medium-sized enterprises are of main bodies in 
the opening up and we should accelerate the pace of encouraging 
these enterprises to enter international markets. Efforts 
should be made to uphold the direction of unifying the policies, 
carrying out open management and operation, enforcing equal 
competition, adopting the responsibility system for both profits 
and losses, conducting integration between industries and trade, 
and promoting the system of acting as agent. We should also 
accelerate the reform in the systems of foreign economic 
relations and trade and open in an orderly manner the import and 
export businesses to the outside world. Efforts should be made 
to strive to delegate more self- determination rights of imports 
and exports to large and medium- sized enterprises and to 
delegate the cash trading right to border trading enterprises as 
well as to encourage or support large and medium-sized 
enterprises to carry out transnational business in foreign 
countries and to have their products enter international markets. 
  The province will sponsor the fifth Harbin border and local 
economic talks this year and the Asian Winter Games in 1996. By 
regarding the sponsorship and arrangements for the talks and 
games as a turning point, we should further improve the 
investment environment and broaden the province's influence in 
the world. 
  Markets for the province's products at present are chiefly 
within the country. Therefore, while actively opening foreign 
markets, it is imperative to intensively have the domestic 
markets of the province's products achieve development. Efforts 
should be made to broaden the marketing rate of local products 
and particularly of famous-trade-mark ones. We should 
accelerate the development of markets for various commodities. 
A good job should be continuously done in perfecting the 
markets for the products of north China's timber, petrochemical 
industries in Daqing city, the province's machine-building and 
electric industries, light industries, and of dairy farms, as 
well as in improving the operation of these markets. We should 
concentrate our efforts on developing or fostering the markets 
of essential factors of production and take a new step in 
developing the markets of funds, labor forces, technologies, 
information, real estate, and property rights. 
<H5>  Deeply Enforce the Strategic Principle of "Having Science </H5>
and Education Make the Province Prosperous," Upgrade in an 
Overall Way the Province's Economic Quality 
  A good job should be done in implementing or promoting the 
"overall plan for the medium stage of having 'science and 
education make the province prosperous'". By regarding the 
thorough reform in the systems of the economy, science and 
technology, and education as a main aspect in the strategy, as 
well as the vigorous development of high-and-new-tech industries 
and relying on science and technology to achieve extra 
development of township enterprises as two flanks, we should 
conduct integration between promoting the strategy as a whole 
and making a breakthrough in the key aspects of the strategy and 
concentrate the forces of various circles to enforce in an 
organized and planned manner some key projects and items that 
are exerting influence as well as should establish some 
demonstration zones in this regard. We should give priority to 
having science and education make industries prosperous and 
deepen the enforcement of having science and education make 
agriculture prosperous. Efforts should be made to increase the 
input in science, technology, and education at multiple levels 
and through multiple channels and to reinforce the strength of 
supporting the strategy of having science and technology make 
the province prosperous. 
  We should adopt realistic measures to promote the scientific 
and technological progress. Efforts should be made to 
accelerate the development of high and new technologies and of 
industries of these technologies. A good job should be done in 
further improving the management over the development zones of 
high-and-new-tech industries in Harbin and Daqing. Cities and 
prefectures that have conditions in development may establish 
their high and new technical parks and their large and 
medium-sized enterprises may establish their high and new 
technical corners. Efforts should be made to accelerate the 
pace of turning the scientific and technical results into 
practical productive forces. In line with the principle of 
applying the advanced technologies to equipping various 
industries and trades in the national economy, we should 
emphatically deal with the pressing problems cropping up in 
developing agriculture with high yield, fine quality, and high 
benefits; conducting the technical renovations of enterprises; 
turning the military industrial technologies into civilian 
industrial ones; and in assimilating and creating something new 
in the imported foreign advanced technologies. We should 
support or encourage the scientific research units to coordinate 
with enterprises in conducting technical development and guide 
the state-owned large and medium-sized enterprises to gradually 
become the main bodies of scientific and technological 
development. We should also encourage or support individuals to 
operate the institutions of scientific and technological 
research, vigorously foster technical markets, develop technical 
intermediary organizations, and realistically protect the 
intellectual property rights. 
  We should continue to put education in a strategic position 
for development on a priority basis. Both reform and 
development depend on improvement of the quality of all our 
people. Governments at all levels should conscientiously 
implement the "outlines of China's educational reform and 
development" and the "PRC teachers law," accelerate educational 
development and reform of the education system, and raise the 
quality of education and the efficiency of running schools. We 
should intensify elementary education and greatly develop 
vocational and technical education and adult education. We 
should encourage pooling of funds from all quarters of society 
to run schools and establishment of nongovernmental schools. We 
should deepen rural and urban overall educational reform and 
facilitate the overall planning and integration of "agriculture, 
science, and education" and "economy, science, and education." 
We should optimize the structure of higher education and 
particularly develop a number of disciplines urgently needed in 
Heilongjiang's economic construction. We should fully develop 
the scientific and technological, intellectual, and technical 
advantages of schools of higher learning and secondary 
specialized schools. We should step up efforts to improve the 
contingents of teachers. 
  We should attach importance to and achieve success in the 
work related to trained personnel. We should do a better job in 
enforcing the provincial party committee and government's 
"several policy regulations on fully developing the functions of 
intellectuals to promote economic development" and establish a 
good practice of respecting knowledge and respecting trained 
personnel throughout society. We should make continuous efforts 
to improve the conditions for the work, study, and life of 
intellectuals. Intellectuals with outstanding contributions 
should be generously awarded. We should achieve success in 
stabilizing trained personnel and attract trained personnel from 
foreign countries and from outside the province with 
preferential policies. 
<H5>  Persistently Pay Attention to Building the Socialist </H5>
Spiritual Civilization and Facilitate Comprehensive Progress in 
Social Undertakings 
  We should greatly facilitate building of the socialist 
spiritual civilization. Guided by Deng Xiaoping's theory of 
building socialism with Chinese characteristics and the party's 
basic line and firmly focusing on economic construction, which 
is the central task, we should advocate the major melody of this 
era and intensify the education on patriotism, collectivism, and 
socialism. We should conscientiously implement the principle 
that the "important aspect of the spiritual civilization is in 
building," carry out the activities to build civilized units in 
a down-to-earth manner, and provide spiritual impetus and 
intellectual support to establishment of the socialist market 
economy system. We should intensify the education on 
professional ethics, social morality, and family virtues, 
promote improvement of social conduct, and greatly upgrade 
people's ideology and morality and social morality. 
  We should strive to develop culture, press and publication, 
radio and television broadcasting, public healthy, sports, and 
science and technology. In doing cultural work, we should 
continue the orientation of making literature and art serve the 
people and serve socialism and the principle of "letting a 
hundred flowers blossom and a hundred schools of thought 
contend," put improvement of social benefits in the first place, 
and strive to achieve unity between social benefits and economic 
efficiency. We should deepen the reform of the cultural system, 
make literary and art creation flourish, step up efforts to 
achieve progress in grass-roots culture, manage well the 
cultural market, and resolutely ban pornographic books and audio 
and video products and illegal publication. In press and 
publication work, we should comprehensively raise the quality of 
newspapers, magazines, pictures, books, and audio and video 
products in compliance with the demand for "upholding the 
orientation, managing according to law, deepening reform, and 
promoting development." In radio and television work, we should 
continue to develop the spirit of solid work characterized by 
the endeavor "to become the best and the leader" and raise the 
quality and effective coverage of Heilongjiang's radio and 
television programs. 
  Press and propaganda work should be 
aimed at meticulously propagating the guidelines of the third 
plenary session of the 14th CPC Central Committee, the current 
economic situation of the province, and the achievements in 
reform and construction. Press and propaganda work should be 
oriented to correct guidance of the media. Social sciences 
units should take an active part in the practice of reform, 
opening up, and economic development and strengthen research and 
explorations for invigorating Heilongjiang's economy. Public 
health work should be focused on deepening the reform of 
operational mechanism of medical and health care units and on 
improving the quality of medical service. Emphasis should be 
placed on building the village-level hospitals in rural areas 
and spreading the primary health care service. 
  Good preparations should be made for the Third Winter Asian 
Games, and the hosting of the games should be regarded as the 
major event of the province. We should give wide publicity to 
the games among the people to enhance their sense of 
participation and the sense of playing the host. We should go 
all out to make preparations for the games. 
  Family planning, protection of cultivated land, and 
environmental protection constitute the basic policy of China. 
We should simultaneously grasp materials production and family 
planning and truly carry out the system of population quota 
responsibility. We should actually protect cultivated land and 
pay equal attention to management of resources and assets. 
<H5>  Good Arrangements Should be Made for the Lives of the People </H5>
To Promote and Ensure Social Stability 
  On the basis of developing the economy, we should make great 
efforts to increase the actual income of urban and rural 
residents and improve the living standards and living quality of 
the people. Attention should be paid to resolving the people's 
difficulties in clothing, food, housing, transportation, 
attending kindergartens and schools, and medical treatment. 
Efforts should be made to increase various kinds of service, 
cultural, and recreational facilities and to enhance the level 
of urban management with a view to providing convenience for the 
people. 
  We should positively and appropriately press forward the 
pricing reform and resolutely control the hiking margin of the 
general level of commodity prices. We should further 
rationalize the relations among prices, successfully grasp the 
dynamics of the overall control over prices, carry out the 
declaration system for the record for the prices of daily 
necessities and service charges, strengthen guidance to and 
coordination of the prices of such daily necessities as grain, 
cooking oil, port, eggs, and vegetable. We should build well 
foodstuff bases and vegetable bases to enrich the people's 
"vegetable baskets." 
  We should show concern over the weal and woe of the people 
in 
poor areas, vigorously promote the reform of housing system, 
actively press forward the reform of social security system, and 
further strengthen the comprehensive management of public 
security. 
  We should pay attention to the work related to 
nationalities, 
religion, overseas Chinese affairs, and foreign affairs. We 
should vigorously build the political power at the grass-roots 
level, reinforce the unity between the army and the government 
and between the army and the people, and mobilize the positive 
factors in all fields. 
<H5>  Transform the Government Functions and Further Improve the </H5>
Style of Work 
  We should actively and appropriately accelerate the reform 
of 
government organizations. This year, we should fulfill the task 
on reforming the organs directly under the provincial 
authorities, and successfully try out the reform of the organs 
at the county and township levels. The public service system 
should be popularized among state administrative organs. In 
organizational reform, we should attend to transforming the 
government functions. 
  We should establish and improve the provincial-level 
regulating and control system compatible with the market economy 
and meticulously organize implementation of the major reform of 
the planning and investment systems, financial and tax systems, 
and banking system. We should meet the needs of the market 
economy system, give play to the macroeconomic, strategic, and 
policy functions of plans, and intensify the research and 
formulation of long- and medium-term economic and social 
development plans, annual plans, and industrial policies. We 
should strengthen the tracing, analysis, supervision, 
examination, balancing, and coordination of economic operation 
to improve the overall environment for economic activities. In 
line with the principle of "making the grass-roots level prosper 
first before making the province prosper," we should apply the 
tax assignment system to the provincial financial system and 
strive to enable all quarters to gain benefits and increase 
vitality in the process of economic development on the premise 
that continuous enhancement of the state's financial resources 
is ensured. We should implement the state's monetary system and 
cultivate and improve the money markets. 
  Government departments at all levels should greatly advocate 
the practice of study, the practice of seeking truth from facts, 
and the practice of investigation and study. Study and mastery 
of the theories on the socialist market economy is an urgent 
task for us. We should create provincewide a vigorous atmosphere 
for the earnest study of the "Selected Works of Deng Xiaoping," 
the "decision" of the third plenary session of the 14th party 
Central Committee, and the basic knowledge on the market 
economy. We should conscientiously improve work styles and 
leadership methods, study more, attend fewer parties, conduct 
more investigation and study, avoid subjectivism, renounce empty 
talk in favor of practical work, learn about the masses' desires 
and demands in a timely and accurate manner, and promote all 
work in a positive, steady, and down-to- earth manner. 
  Strictly managing government affairs and making unremitting 
efforts to build a clean government constitute a basic task to 
build political power and also an important guarantee for the 
smooth promotion of reform and development. We should continue 
to carry out the three tasks of the anticorruption struggle put 
forward by the party Central Committee, do a better job in 
maintaining the honesty and self-discipline of leading cadres, 
resolutely oppose and guard against unhealthy trends, 
conscientiously investigate and handle major and serious cases, 
strictly investigate and handle the cases on serious bureaucracy 
and dereliction of duty, which have caused great losses to the 
state, and conscientiously address the important issues that 
seriously affect the government-populace ties and social 
development. 
  We should strengthen democracy and the legal system. The 
provincial government will designate some dates to receive 
people's deputies and special telephone lines to establish ties 
with them in order to listen to and handle their criticisms and 
suggestions. We will take the initiative in strengthening ties 
with the CPPCC, democratic parties, and people's organizations 
and attach full importance to their functions of political 
consultation and democratic supervision. We will establish and 
improve the democratic and scientific policy-making systems, 
attach importance to and develop the role of research and 
consulting institutions and experts, and promote democratic 
politics. Governments at all levels must learn to apply the 
legal means to manage the economy and society. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-1863 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "drchi064__s94004" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-CHI-94-064-S </AU>
Daily Report 
<DATE1>  7 Mar 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> REGIONAL WORK REPORTS </F>
<H3> <TI>   Heilongjiang Procuratorate's Work Report </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Heilongjiang Procuratorate's Work Report </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   SK0104024094 Harbin HEILONGJIANG RIBAO in Chinese 7 Mar 94 p 
3 </F>

<F P=103> SK0104024094 </F>
<F P=104>  Harbin HEILONGJIANG RIBAO </F>
<F P=105>  Chinese </F>


<TEXT>
BFN 

<F P=106> ["Excerpts" of the work report of the Heilongjiang </F>
Provincial People's Procuratorate made by Yu Wanling, chief 
procurator of the provincial people's procuratorate, at the 
second session of the eighth provincial people's congress--date 
not given] 
  [Text] Fellow deputies: 
  Now, I am going to deliver a report on the 1993 work 
situation of the procuratorial organs across the province and 
the 1994 work arrangements to the session for examinations. 
<H5>  1. The Basic Procuratorial Work Situation in 1993 </H5>
  Under the leadership of the supreme procuratorate and the 
provincial party committee, under the supervision of the 
people's congress standing committees at various levels, and 
with the support of the governments, in 1993, the procuratorial 
organs at various levels conscientiously implemented the 
guidelines of the 14th party congress, the third plenary session 
of the 14th party Central Committee, the party Central 
Committee's instructions on waging the anticorruption struggle, 
and the resolutions on the work report of the provincial 
procuratorate as adopted at the first session of the eighth 
provincial people's congress; positively engaged themselves in 
the anticorruption struggle; dealt strict blows to the corrosive 
elements who were indulged in corruption and malpractice and 
serious criminal offenders; strengthened the self-construction 
of the procurator contingents; better fulfilled the 
anticorruption tasks; and made new progress in the procuratorial 
work in other aspects. 
  A. Major Achievements in Procuratorial Work 
  a. The procuratorial organs sternly punished the economic 
criminals, including those engaged in corruption and bribery; 
and forcefully promoted the deep progress of the anticorruption 
struggle. The procuratorial organs across the province accepted 
and handled 6,039 economic cases of various categories, put 
3,777 cases on file, and investigated and concluded 3,478 cases 
or 82.2 percent. A total of 95.448 million yuan of economic 
losses were retrieved, an increase of 33,588,600 yuan over the 
previous year. 
  We resolutely implemented the party Central Committee's 
unified arrangement for waging the anticorruption struggle; 
constantly focused our efforts on investigating and handling 
cases of corruption and bribery, the criminal cases of four 
major departments, and major and appalling cases; and made 
noticeable achievements. Of the economic criminal cases that 
were put on file for investigation, 1,877 were cases of 
corruption and bribery, accounting for 49.69 percent of the 
total. A total of 1,818 cases each involving 10,000 yuan or 
more were put on file for investigation, an increase of 46.97 
percent. Of this, nine were extraordinarily serious cases each 
involving more than 1 million yuan (six were cases of diverting 
public funds for other use and three were cases of corruption.) 
Sixty-three cases involving the cadres at or above the county 
and section level were put on file for investigation (three were 
cases involving the cadres at or above the department level), an 
increase of 57.5 percent over the previous year. A total of 158 
criminal cases involving the four key departments were put on 
file for investigation. 
  We conscientiously implemented the central policy decision 
on 
strengthening the macroeconomic regulation and control and 
consolidating the financial order and dealt strict blows to the 
economic criminal offenders who disturbed and damaged the 
socialist market economic order. A total of 700 cases of tax 
evasion and tax resistance were put on file for investigation 
and 14,851,900 yuan of evaded taxes were withdrawn. Seventy-six 
cases of fake trademarks were placed on file for investigation, 
an increase of 22.58 percent over the previous year. A total of 
1,058 cases of diverting public funds for other uses were placed 
on file for investigation, an increase of 15.13 percent over the 
previous year. Sixty-two economic criminal cases of corruption, 
bribery, and diverting public funds for other uses were exposed 
on the monetary front and were placed on file for investigation. 
Simultaneously, we also paid attention to exposing some 
new-typed economic criminal activities. Simultaneously, we 
investigated and handled a number of cases of manufacturing and 
marketing fake and low-quality commodities, gaining export 
drawback by cheating, using public funds to "engage in stock 
speculation," and gaining huge property of unknown origin. 
  After the central authorities arranged the anticorruption 
struggle, the procuratorial organs at various levels across the 
province strengthened the dynamics of attacking the economic 
criminal activities of corruption and bribery and made 
contributions to opposing the corruption. The number of cases 
that had been handled increased rapidly. From September to 
December, 1,436 economic criminal cases of various categories 
were placed on file for investigation, equal to 61.34 percent of 
the total figures in the previous eight months. Of this, 724 
were cases each involving over 10,000 yuan, equal to 66.18 
percent of the total figures in the previous eight months. 
Thirty-three cases were cases involving the cadres at or above 
the county and section level, equal to 110 percent of the total 
figures in the previous eight months. The procuratorial organs 
timely brought suits against and punished a number of corrosive 
elements. From September to December, the procuratorial organs 
brought actions against 351 economic criminals, equal to 36.79 
percent of the total figures in the previous eight months. 
  b. The procuratorial organs dealt strict blows to serious 
criminal activities and continued to maintain the prestige and 
effect of "strict blows." The procuratorial organs across the 
province accepted the reports on arresting 22,424 criminals and 
approved the arrest of 19,333 persons through examinations. We 
accepted the reports on bringing and canceling suits against 
28,030 persons and brought suits against 19,273 persons through 
examinations. 
  We prominently dealt blows to serious activities; 
persistently got involved in advance; resolutely dealt blows to 
the violent criminal cases that seriously jeopardized social 
order and the lives and property of the people, habitual 
offenders, recidivist, and gangs of criminals with underworld 
nature. A total of 7,233 serious and extraordinarily serious 
criminals were arrested throughout the province and suits were 
brought against 4,380 persons. Cases relating to 6,703 persons 
were investigated before approvals for arrests and prosecution, 
accounting for 55.57 percent of the total serious and 
extraordinarily serious cases. 
  We positively participated in such special struggles as 
"spring offensive," "100-day fortified battle," "antithefts," 
and encirclement and elimination of "train marauding and 
waylaying." The procuratorial organs conscientiously implemented 
various overall examination measures and brought into play their 
roles in safeguarding the stability of social order. 
  We strengthened investigation, judgment, and supervision; 
timely set forth opinions on correcting such unlawful situations 
as not investigating the crimes and substituting fines for 
penalty; and protested, according to laws, the activities of 
leniently sentencing those who were guilty of serious crimes and 
pronouncing criminals not guilty. Decisions on not arresting 
1,731 persons and not bringing actions against 197 criminals 
were made. Corrections were made on the decisions that 162 
persons should have been arrested and suits should have been 
brought against 109 persons. The procuratorial organs protested 
48 cases that had been judged wrongly. 
  c. We further strengthened the examinations of the 
enforcement of laws and disciplines. The procuratorial organs 
across the province accepted 1,847 cases of violating laws and 
disciplines; and placed 978 cases on file for investigations, 
including 149 major and extraordinarily serious cases and 
showing an increase of 21.14 percent over the previous year. A 
total of 923 cases or 84.9 percent were concluded. 
  With the focus on investigating and handling cases of "five 
categories" and by regarding the cases of engaging in 
malpractice to seek private gains as the most serious cases, 
last year, we made the best achievements in history. A total of 
852 cases of engaging in malpractice to seek private gains, 
exacting confession by means of torture, unlawfully taking into 
custody, neglecting duties, and creating accidents due to 
negligence were placed on file for investigations, accounting 
for 87.12 percent of the total cases that had been placed on 
file and showing an increase of 6.54 percentage point over the 
previous year. Of this, 26 were cases of seeking private gains 
by ill means, an increase of 62.5 percent over the previous year. 
  By eliminating interference and obstacles, we cracked a 
group 
of criminal cases relating to security and judicial personnel 
that the masses had strong complaints about. A total of 148 
cases were placed on file, an increase of 64.44 percent over the 
previous year. 
  d. The supervision over the work of jails was strengthened. 
Various jails were supervised according to laws. A total of 
3,654 unlawful cases that took place in reformatories were 
corrected, and the correction rate reached 81.4 percent. Of 
this, we corrected 128 cases of illegally reducing penalty and 
unlawfully releasing on probation, 59 cases of relieving 
reform-through-education sentences and reducing set terms of 
sentences, 43 cases of seeking medical advice on bail, and more 
than 10 cases of wantonly collecting charges. We concentrated 
efforts to solve the problems that criminals were still detained 
after completion of their fixed terms of imprisonment; 1,639 of 
these kinds of cases were corrected. Thus, the number of the 
province's criminals that were detained after expiration of 
sentences was lower than the national average figure by 10.9 
percentage point. Cases of 160 prisoners committing crimes 
again and 182 cases of prisoners and their families appealing to 
the higher levels and filing charges were handled. Twenty 
economic criminal and unlawful and undisciplined cases relating 
to cadres and policemen of supervisory centers and reformatories 
were investigated and handled. 
  e. The accusation and report work was strengthened. The 
accusation and supervisory departments and the report centers 
brought into full play their roles as a "window" and a "bridge," 
accepted and handled 14,307 visitors and incoming letters from 
the amasses, handled 64 visiting groups, accepted and handled 
1,509 accusation cases, reexamined 31 cases, and changed the 
original decisions on 52 cases. We accepted and handled 12,984 
cases whose clues were reported by the masses, an increase of 
50.89 percent over the previous year. Of this, clues for 9,055 
cases of corruption and bribery were accepted, an increase of 
53.71 percent; and clues for 622 cases involving personnel at or 
above the county and section level were accepted, an increase of 
181 percent over the previous year. 
  f. The inspection of the civil and administrative work was 
strengthened. This was a new task and greatly helped promote 
the handling of cases. We accepted and handled 404 accusation 
cases, placed 131 cases on file, lodged protests against 23 
cases, respectively, increasing by 134 percent, 208 percent, and 
667 percent over the previous year; and made 58 suggestions on 
further inspections and changes of judgment, 10.6 times over the 
previous year's figure. 
  Our province made new achievements in the procuratorial work 
techniques and the procuratorial work in the agricultural, 
forestry, and railway aspects. Other overall departments also 
positively brought their roles into play in ensuring and 
promoting the progress of their professional work. 
  B. Main Methods for Carrying Out the Procuratorial Work in 
1993 
  a. The procuratorial organs persisted in the accurate 
political orientation and ceaselessly deepened the guiding 
ideology of making the procuratorial work serve the economic 
construction. 
  Over the past year, we constantly stressed that the 
procuratorial organs at various levels must maintain an accurate 
political orientation, persisted in the basic line of "one 
center and two basic points," and served the central work of the 
party. After the 14th party congress, setting up and developing 
the socialist market economic system becomes the central task of 
the party. Under such a situation, according to the 
requirements of the supreme procuratorate, the provincial 
procuratorate persistently used Comrade Deng Xiaoping's theory 
on building a socialism with Chinese characteristics to arm 
their brains; focused the service of economic construction on 
strictly enforcing laws, firmly handling cases, and intensifying 
the functions for legal supervision; and ceaselessly deepened 
and developed the guiding ideology of the procuratorial work in 
practice. The procuratorial organs at various levels paid 
attention to accurately handling relations between attacks and 
service, between the enforcement of laws and the implementation 
of policies, and between putting work priorities in a prominent 
position and making a unified arrangement; firmly attended to 
the link of handling cases; and better brought into play their 
functions. 
  b. The procuratorial organs strictly enforced laws, firmly 
attended to the principle of handling cases, and intensified 
their functions for legal supervision. 
  According to the Supreme Procuratorate's requirements and in 
line with the general ideologies of "strictly enforcing laws, 
firmly handling cases, and intensifying legal supervision," the 
procuratorial organs persistently regarded the handling of cases 
as the primary task and penetrated supervision into the entire 
process of the procuratorial work. Thus, there emerged a good 
situation where the procuratorial work was comprehensively 
developed. The procuratorial organs made the focal points stand 
out and firmly attended to handling cases. First, they grasped 
focal points. Second, they grasped the sources of the cases. 
Third, they attended to investigations. Fourth, they firmly 
attended to the system of responsibility for handling affairs. 
Fifth, they attended to giving guidance. Sixth, they grasped 
service and the guarantee for rear service. The procuratorial 
organs strictly enforced laws and intensified supervision. 
First, they strengthened the awareness of supervision. Second, 
they intensified the functions for conducting supervision 
according to laws. Third, they intensified the supervision over 
security and judicial personnel. Fourth, they intensified the 
setup of the supervisory system. Fifth, they intensified the 
internal restriction; and focused their efforts on grasping the 
links of placing cases on files, exempting from lawsuits, and 
withdrawing cases. So, the number of cases exempting from 
lawsuits was greatly reduced. A total of 510 criminals engaged 
in corruption and bribery exempted from lawsuits, accounting for 
34.65 percent of the total people and showing a decrease of 
11.48 percent from the previous year. 
  c. The procuratorial organs persisted in the policy of 
taking a "two-hand" approach and strived to upgrade the quality 
of cadres and policemen. 
  In regard to the work arrangements and the leadership 
forces, 
we constantly persisted in the ideology of taking a two-hand 
approach and attended to both professional work tasks and the 
construction of the workers contingents. On the one hand, we 
attended to investigating and handling major and appalling 
economic criminal cases of corruption and bribery; on the other 
hand, we opposed corruption and advocated administrative 
honesty. So, our worker contingents experienced new tests and 
made new improvements. In regard to the construction of the 
leading bodies, we mainly strengthened the ideological 
construction and further improved the theoretical understanding 
and application abilities of the leading bodies. In regard to 
the improvement of the work style of the leading bodies, we 
conducted self-investigation and self-correction in line with 
the 13 prohibitions as set forth by the central authorities and 
the provincial party committee, also conscientiously made 
rectification and correction, and played an exemplary vanguard 
role. We strengthened the organizational construction, 
resolutely readjusted the leading bodies that were not unified, 
ensured to make decisions on major issues through democratic 
discussions and collective study, and strengthened the unity and 
combat effectiveness of the leading bodies. In regard to the 
construction of the leading bodies, we attended to the following 
four tasks: First, we strengthened the ideological and political 
work. Second, we attended to the training of cadres. Third, we 
paid attention to the consolidation of discipline. We strictly 
investigated and handled the small number of cadres and 
policemen violating laws and disciplines and corrected and 
straightened out the problems of wantonly collecting charges, 
wantonly imposing fines, and wantonly collecting funds. Fourth, 
we positively launched the activities of striving to create new 
achievements. The organs under the provincial procuratorate 
launched the activities of striving for the best, creating 
first-grade achievements, making contributions and promoting the 
progress of the provincewide "double-emulation and 
double-comparison" activities and the spiritual civilization. A 
large group of advanced units and individuals emerged. 
Sixty-one institutions were commended as units advanced in 
spiritual civilization. 
  d. Procuratorial organs strengthened investigation and study 
and upgraded the quality of policy decisions 
  We regarded the investigation and study work as a basic 
work, 
went deep to reality to seek truth from facts, timely discovered 
and solved the new situation and new work problems, and made the 
policy decisions more scientific and democratic on the basis of 
investigation and study. Before making major work arrangement, 
the provincial procuratorate and the city procuratorial organs 
timely organized relevant departments to conduct investigation 
and study and make analysis and then worked out measures to 
arrange and guide the progress of the work. 
  e. Procuratorial organs strengthened leadership and gained 
the initiative in work 
  The procuratorial organs at various levels carried out the 
procuratorial work firmly under the leadership of the party, 
ceaselessly strengthened the sense of the party in waging the 
struggle against corruption, and conscientiously carried out the 
system of delivering work reports to the party committees at 
various levels and the system of reporting major cases. These 
organs persisted in the system of delivering work reports to the 
people's congresses and their standing committees, 
conscientiously made fiscal work reports and special work 
reports, timely reported on the major issues relating to the 
procuratorial work, resolutely implemented the resolutions of 
the people's congresses and their standing committees, 
conscientiously accepted supervision, prudently listened to the 
deputies' opinions on their inspection and assessment of the 
procuratorial work, and ceaselessly improved their work. 
  In 1993, the provincial procuratorial work situation was 
generally good. The province made greater achievements in the 
procuratorial work. However, some problems that could not be 
ignored still existed. Some procuratorial workers did not have 
correct law enforcement ideas, did not have a strong sense of 
service, were afraid of difficulties, failed to emancipate the 
mind, and did not have the awareness of doing pioneering work 
and blazing new trails. Some weak links still existed. The 
quality of cadres and policemen did not suit the requirements of 
the situation. Some violated laws and disciplines and gained 
private gains when handling cases, thus producing extremely bad 
influence. The basic construction of the procuratorial work was 
comparatively weak. The communications and telecommunications 
facilities and the technological equipment were comparatively 
backward. All these restricted, to a certain extent, the 
progress of the procuratorial work. 
<H5>  2. General Arrangements for 1994 Procuratorial Work </H5>
  Fellow deputies: The implementation of the "decision" 
adopted at the third plenary session of the 14th party Central 
Committee will produce a profound impact on the political, 
economic, and social activities and create some new 
contradictions and problems. The procuratorial workers are 
confronted with an extremely grim situation and more arduous 
tasks in the new situation. The procuratorial organs must fully 
understand the heavy historical tasks that they are taking on, 
work closely in line with the central link of economic 
construction, regard the investigation and handling of cases as 
the most important means to directly serve economic 
construction, and strive to make new development and improvement 
on the basis of the procuratorial work achievements made in the 
previous year. According to the arrangements of the Supreme 
Procuratorate, we will focus our efforts to attend to the work 
in the following four aspects: 
  A. We should deeply study Comrade Deng Xiaoping's theory on 
building a socialism with Chinese characteristics and arm the 
heads of the entire cadres and policemen with this theory. 
  We should organize the broad masses of cadres and policemen 
to conscientiously study Comrade Deng Xiaoping's theory on 
building a socialism with Chinese characteristics, put the study 
of the theory in an important position of the ideological 
construction and the political and theoretical education, regard 
it as a key link of the ideological and political work. We 
should emphatically study and grasp the policy of taking "a 
two-hand approach and being sure that both hands are tough," the 
ideology on democracy and legal system, and a series of 
expositions of opposing corruption; enable the broad masses of 
cadres and policemen to have a firm determination to oppose 
corruption and deeply promote the improvement of administrative 
honesty. In line with the study of the "decision" of the third 
plenary session of the 14th party Central Committee, we should 
understand and grasp the essential special features, operational 
mechanisms, and policy measures of the socialist market economy; 
and make the procuratorial work better serve economic 
construction. 
  B. We should strictly enforce laws, firmly attend to the 
principles of handling cases, and further intensify the 
functions for legal supervision 
  We should concentrate energy to investigate and handle major 
and appalling cases and deeply and constantly wage the struggle 
against corruption. We should further upgrade the understanding 
about the importance of the anticorruption struggle and foster 
the idea of waging a long-term struggle. We should concentrate 
energy to investigate and handle major and appalling cases with 
the focus on the criminal cases relating to the working 
personnel of the party and political leading organs, judicial 
departments, administrative and law enforcement departments, and 
economic management departments. We should make a new 
breakthrough in investigating and handling major cases and 
resolutely investigate and handle, if discovered, the major 
cases involving the leading organs and the leading cadres at or 
above the county and section level. We should select typical 
cases and make key breakthroughs in dealing blows to the 
criminal activities of organs, organizations, enterprises, and 
institutions giving and accepting bribes and evading, resisting, 
and swindling taxes. We should continue to strengthen the 
dynamics of the propaganda on reporting criminal activities, 
timely achieve the report feedback work, and implement the 
encouragement policies. We should strengthen the coordinate 
command and coordination of the investigation work, strengthen 
the setup of information networks, and achieve the work of 
guarding against and pursuing and capturing those who commit 
crimes and abscond with public funds. 
  We should strictly deal blows to serious criminal activities 
and safeguard the social stability. We should implement the 
principle of strictly and rapidly dealing blows to criminal 
activities, persist in the "two basic" principles, get involved 
in the serious and extraordinarily serious criminal cases ahead 
of time, and timely approve to arrest and bring actions against 
criminals so as to stop the rising tendency of serious and 
extraordinarily serious cases. Under the leadership of the party 
committees, we should positively participate in the special 
struggles and conscientiously implement various measures for 
comprehensively improving the procuratorial work. 
  We should strengthen the supervision over the enforcement of 
laws and ensure the unified and accurate enforcement of laws. 
We should expand the investigation and supervision to the link 
of placing cases on file, strengthen the supervision over the 
activities of not listing cases or not appropriately listing 
cases, timely pursue to arrest and bring actions against 
criminal offenders, and realistically stop making mistakes or 
escaping unpunished. 
  We should pay prominent attention to the work of lodging 
protests and ensure the quality of the protests to be lodged. 
We should regard the inspections of the enforcement of laws and 
disciplines as an important task for waging the anticorruption 
struggle and promoting the strict enforcement of laws and 
prominently investigate and handle the cases of judicial 
personnel and administrative and law enforcement personnel 
abusing power to engage in malpractice, seeking private gains, 
and perverting justice for bribes. We should conscientiously 
solve the problems involving criminals who are still detained 
after completion of their set terms of imprisonments, not 
enforcing laws and regulations, and substituting money for 
penalty. We should persist in the principle of correcting all 
the mistakes and conscientiously investigate and handle the 
cases of not being submitted to the courts' judgments and 
rulings and the procuratorial organs' decisions on canceling 
lawsuits. 
  C. We should strengthen the construction of the leading body 
contingents and upgrade the overall quality of the contingents 
  It is necessary to realistically strengthen the construction 
of the leading bodies. The provincial procuratorate and various 
city branches should support the local party committees to 
readjust and strengthen the leading bodies so as to install 
well-organized and professionally competent leading bodies at 
various levels. We should strengthen the study among the 
central group of the leading party groups of the procuratorates 
at various levels and ceaselessly upgrade the political and 
theoretical levels of the leading bodies. 
  We should strengthen the construction of the reserve cadre 
contingents and upgrade the ability of the reserve cadres. 
  We should make efforts to upgrade the procuratorial worker 
contingents' quality and their law enforcement levels. The 
procuratorial organs are units where the organizational reform 
is strengthened. When adding new personnel, the procuratorial 
organs should persist in principles to ensure the quality of 
newly added personnel. We should persistently regard the 
training of cadres as a long-term strategic task, pay attention 
to cultivating cadres and having them temper themselves in the 
course of practice, and cultivate a group of specialized talents 
in the course of handling cases. 
  We should further upgrade the understanding about the 
importance of the anticorruption struggle, strengthen the 
awareness of cadres and policemen's administrative honesty and 
self-discipline, pay attention to sorting out and correcting 
such unhealthy trends within trades as "seeking private gains in 
handling cases" and "stressing personnel relationship in 
handling cases," strictly investigate and handle the unlawful 
and undisciplined phenomena that a small number of cadres and 
policemen violate laws and disciplines, and also investigate the 
wrongly handled cases by conscientiously implementing the system 
of being honest and diligent in performing official duties. 
  It is necessary to vigorously advocate the spiritual 
civilization. By 1996, the procuratorial departments across the 
province should strive to stand among the province's advanced 
departments emerging from the construction of civilized units. 
We should positively launch the activities of creating quality 
achievements as well as the "double-advanced" and assessment and 
comparison activities; and vigorously cultivate and foster 
advanced examples. We should achieve the basic construction, 
positively improve the communications and telecommunications 
facilities and investigation technical equipment to suit the 
procuratorial organs' demands for investigating and handling 
cases, and strengthen the guarantee for the supply of materials 
and the reserve service work. 
  D. We should realistically strengthen leadership to suit the 
demands for setting up the socialist market economic system 
  We should positively and actively accept the leadership of 
the party committees and the people's congress. Under the 
leadership of the party committees, we should independently 
exercise the procuratorial rights according to laws, positively 
and actively gain the leadership of the local party committees, 
and rely on the party committees to eliminate various obstacles. 
We should further consciously accept the supervision by the 
people's congresses; set up, perfect, and also conscientiously 
implement the report system; positively accept the inspections 
on enforcement of laws by the people's congress standing 
committees; and conscientiously handle the affairs handed over 
by the people's congresses. We should strive to gain the 
support and cooperation of the governments and the departments 
concerned and positively and effectively carry out the 
procuratorial work. The procuratorial organs at higher levels 
should strengthen the leadership over the organs at lower 
levels, assume responsibility to help the lower-level 
procuratorial organs solve their professional work problems, 
particularly the difficulties that come across when handling 
cases; support the lower-level procuratorial organs to justly 
enforce laws, and ensure to conduct the legal supervision in a 
constant and step-by-step manner. 
  Fellow deputies: In the new situation, the tasks we are 
taking on are heavy and arduous. We are determined to 
conscientiously implement the resolutions of this session, 
strive to suit the requirements in the new situation and the new 
tasks, go all out, keep forging ahead, and make new 
contributions to setting up and developing the socialist market 
economic system. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-1864 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "drchi064__s94005" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-CHI-94-064-S </AU>
Daily Report 
<DATE1>  28 Feb 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> REGIONAL WORK REPORTS </F>
<H3> <TI>   Shaanxi Governor Delivers Government Work Report </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Shaanxi Governor Delivers Government Work Report </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   HK0903051394 Xian Shaanxi People's Radio Network in Mandarin 
0500 GMT 28 Feb 94 </F>

<F P=103> HK0903051394 </F>
<F P=104>  Xian Shaanxi People's Radio Network </F>
<F P=105>  Mandarin </F>


<TEXT>
BFN 

  [Excerpts] In his government work report to the second 
session of the eighth provincial people's congress, Governor Bai 
Qingcai indicated: The province's capital industry and 
infrastructure were augmented in 1993. Investment in fixed 
assets was 21.5 billion yuan, up 50.9 percent from the previous 
year, of which investment in state-owned capital construction 
was 10.1 billion yuan, up 55.4 percent, which was mainly put 
into capital industry and infrastructure. Investment in raw 
materials industry increased by 74.6 percent, investment in 
agriculture increased by 9.6 percent, investment in energy 
resources increased by 49.8 percent, investment in 
communications, transportation, post and telecommunications 
increased by 97.3 percent. [passage omitted] 
  In his report, Governor Bai Qingcai said: In 1994 it is 
imperative to grasp building capital industry and infrastructure 
with unremitting efforts to augment the staying power for 
development. The planned social investment in fixed assets is 
to be 27.5 billion yuan, up by 14 percent. [passage omitted] 
  The most conspicuous problem in building key projects 
remains 
the shortage of funds. It is imperative to try our best to 
collect construction funds through many channels. In collecting 
construction funds, it is necessary to make all sorts of funds 
available to localities to found the Shaanxi fund for developing 
capital industry and infrastructure. At the same time, it is 
necessary to face society and other provinces and encourage 
everyone to make joint investment to conduct infrastructure 
construction. It is especially necessary to utilize the 
share-holding system to collect funds, and to actively import 
foreign funds. On the one hand, foreign businessmen should be 
guided to directly invest in infrastructure and the building of 
capital industry; on the other hand, some stock ownership of 
some capital industry could be transferred to foreign 
businessmen, with the funds thus obtained put into capital 
construction. In this way, we can keep the funds rolling, 
accelerate the pace in building key projects, and augment our 
strength. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-1865 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "drchi064__s94006" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-CHI-94-064-S </AU>
Daily Report 
<DATE1>  11 Mar 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> REGIONAL WORK REPORTS </F>
<H3> <TI>   Shanxi Procuratorate Issues Work Report </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Shanxi Procuratorate Issues Work Report </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   HK3003151694 Taiyuan SHANXI RIBAO in Chinese 11 Mar 94 p 6 </F>
<F P=103> HK3003151694 </F>
<F P=104>  Taiyuan SHANXI RIBAO </F>
<F P=105>  Chinese </F>


<TEXT>
BFN 

<F P=106> [Shanxi Provincial People's Procuratorate work report </F>
(summary) delivered by Shanxi Chief Procurator Zuo Xiang before 
the Second Session of the Eighth Provincial People's Congress on 
1 Mar 
  [Text] Deputies: 
  I will deliver to this session a report on the situation of 
procuratorial work in the province since the First Session of 
the Eighth Provincial People's Congress, and I ask for your 
examination. 
  First, the CPC's wise decision on the anticorruption 
drive was resolutely implemented, and the struggle against 
corruption and bribery launched extensively. 
  In 1993, especially after 21 August when General Secretary 
Jiang Zemin made the important speech on launching the struggle 
against corruption at the second plenary session of the Central 
Commission for Discipline Inspection, the procuratorial organs 
of various levels in our province followed the arrangements by 
the provincial party committee and the Supreme People's 
Procuratorate, and viewed investigation into economic crimes 
such as corruption and bribery--especially serious cases--as the 
highest priority in procuratorial work; they organized work 
carefully and concentrated strength to investigate a number of 
economic crimes, such as corruption and bribery, scored certain 
results, and developed the role of procuratorial organs in the 
anticorruption drive. In 1993, the procuratorial organs in the 
whole province opened files to investigate 1,987 cases of 
economic crimes, such as corruption and bribery, which involved 
2,282 persons, at present, 1,351 cases involving 1,571 persons 
have been closed, and 467 cases involving 543 persons have been 
handed over to law courts for prosecution. The retrieved stolen 
money and goods exceeded 30 million yuan. 
  --A number of big and serious cases were cracked. In 1993, 
the procuratorial organs in the whole province investigated 52 
cases for which files were opened, and these cases involved 53 
leading cadres at county and office levels, a 27 percent 
increase over 1992. Among these cases, four cases involved 
crimes committed by four cadres at the provincial department 
level. At the same time, new progress was made in the work of 
investigating big cases, each of which involved more than 10,000 
yuan. A total of 1,284 cases, each of which involved more than 
10,000 yuan, were probed and files were opened for them; this 
number accounted for 64 percent of all the cases for which files 
were opened, and showed a 48 percent increase over 1992. Among 
these cases, 936 cases involved 10,000-50,000 yuan, 179 cases 
50,000-100,000 yuan, 137 cases 100,000-500,000 yuan, 13 cases 
500,000 yuan to 1 million yuan, and 19 cases more than 1 million 
yuan. 
  --Relatively great progress was made in investigating 
economic crimes such as corruption and bribery in the "four 
major departments." In 1993, procuratorial organs in the whole 
province investigated 334 oepn-file cases of economic crimes, 
such as corruption and bribery, committed by personnel who 
worked in leading party and government, judicial, law 
enforcement and administrative, and economic management 
departments, and this number accounted for 16.8 percent of the 
total number of files opened. Among the cases, 95 cases were 
economic crimes committed within leading party and government 
departments. 
  --A number of cases of economic crimes such as tax evasion, 
refusal to pay tax, deception in tax payment, false trademarks, 
and so on, were handled. In 1993, procuratorial organs of 
various levels in the whole province actively participated in 
special campaigns such as "crackdown on counterfeit items" and 
rectification of taxation; they coordinated closely with 
relevant departments and forcefully cracked down on criminal 
activities which disrupted the taxation order, infringed upon 
the rights of consumers, and seriously hindered normal operation 
of market mechanisms. Procuratorial organs in the whole province 
opened files to investigate a total of 472 cases such as tax 
evasion and refusal to pay tax, among these cases, 34 cases 
involved more than 100,000 yuan each, while 104 cases involved 
counterfeit trademarks. Use of tricks to deceive the state in 
order to get reimbursement of export taxes is a new form of 
crime which has emerged after the country carried out reforms of 
the taxation and foreign trade systems in recent years. Last 
year, the procuratorial organs in the whole province opened 
files to investigate 18 cases of collaboration between criminal 
elements and some corrupt elements in customs, taxation, and 
foreign trade departments who deceived the country into giving 
reimbursements; a total of 11 million yuan was retrieved. 
  --A number of serious economic criminals who had been at 
large were arrested. Over the past three years, among the cases 
of economic crimes for which files were opened for investigation 
by the procuratorial organs in our province, there were 48 
criminals who were on the run, and among them an absolute 
majority carried huge sums of money. The procuratorial organs 
in the whole province adopted various measures to track them 
down, and now, 28 of them have been arrested, and a total of 2.5 
million yuan of economic losses to the state and collectives has 
been recovered. 
  In the course of launching the struggle against corruption 
and bribery, we made a special effort to grasp the following 
three areas: 
  First, we took decisive measures to swiftly change the 
situation in which the number of files opened for economic 
crimes in the whole province rapidly decreased. In the first 
two months of last year, due to the influence of various 
reasons, the procuratorial organs in the whole province opened 
only 77 files, a 60.3 percent decrease compared with the same 
period of 1992. Among the cases for which the files were 
opened, there were only 43 cases which involved more than 10,000 
yuan each, and this was a 39.4 percent decrease compared with 
the same period of last year. Among the 134 procuratorial 
organs in the whole province, 84 had no files opened for 
investigation into economic crimes. On the one hand, the 
phenomenon of corruption was spreading; on the other hand, the 
number of cases handled by us greatly decreased, and this was a 
very big gap. In light of this grim situation, the provincial 
procuratorate promptly reported the situation to the provincial 
party committee and the Supreme People's Procuratorate, and at 
the same time decisively adopted five measures: Carrying out 
investigations and surveys, thoroughly understanding the 
situation, and securing the initiative in guiding work; unifying 
understanding, overcoming fear of difficulties and slackened 
spirits; encouraging procurators of various levels to play the 
"locomotive" role; grasping weak links, classifying problems for 
guidance, solving actual problems during investigation of cases; 
and enforcing the law strictly, to ensure quality during the 
handling of cases. As a result, we relatively swiftly changed 
the passive situation in which the number of files opened for 
economic crimes in the province rapidly decreased. By the end 
of July, all the procuratorial organs which had not opened files 
before, did have open files, and the number of files, as well as 
the number of big and serious cases in the whole province, began 
to rise month after month. 
  Second, we promptly transmitted, studied, and implemented 
the 
CPC Central Committee's important instruction on fighting 
decadence, and deepened the struggle against corruption and 
bribery. Since 21 August 1993, the provincial procuratorate has 
held an emergency meeting of heads of sub- and city 
procuratorates, as well as a provincial conference on fighting 
corruption and bribery done by the procuratorial organs in the 
whole province, to examine and adopt a series of resolute and 
forceful measures to deepen the struggle against corruption and 
bribery. 1) The broad masses of procuratorial cadres and police 
were organized to seriously study General Secretary Jiang's 
important speech and to deeply understand its spiritual essence; 
the CPC Central Committee's instruction on fighting decadence 
was used to unify everybody's minds; the broad masses of 
procuratorial cadres and police were gievn an enhanced sense of 
mission, responsibility, and urgency; and the ideological 
foundation for profoundly launching the struggle against 
corruption and bribery was laid. 2) The strength of reporting 
work was substantiated and boosted, reporting phone calls were 
promptly announced to society, and reports made by the masses of 
people were seriously handled. 3) Handling more and big cases, 
and in particular serious cases, was viewed as the main 
criterion for judging the result in work against decadence. 
More importance was attached to preliminary investigations into 
big and serious cases and efforts to do so were stepped up, 
strength was rationally used and coordinated, and the method of 
congregating crack forces to fight a war of annihilation, to 
crack down on key cases was adopted. Last year, the provincial 
procuratorate directly transferred personnel from other units to 
open files to investigate 14 big and influential cases which 
involved 17 persons. 4) The procurators of various levels 
played an exemplary role and they took the lead in investigating 
big and serious cases on the one hand, and on the other hand, 
gave full play to the role of leading groups in overall combat; 
regarding decisions on important problems and the work in 
investigation into big and serious cases, they insisted on 
collective research and decisions to avoid and reduce mistakes. 
5) Leadership of upper-level procuratorates over lower-level 
procuratorates was further strengthened, and the provincial 
procuratorial system's ability to launch the struggle against 
corruption and bribery in terms of unified command and concerted 
effort was gradually improved. 6) Links with the discipline 
inspection commission, supervisory department, courts, and 
public security organs to exchange information and coordinate 
actions were strengthened. 7) Strict law enforcement was 
always insisted upon, crimes were strictly distinguished from 
acts which were not criminal, and relations between crackdown 
and protection were properly handled. In the process of 
handling cases, attention was paid to safeguarding the 
legitimate rights of enterprises and legal persons to obtain the 
social effects of cracking down on crimes, protectin reform, and 
promoting economic development. 
  Third, a number of big and serious cases were promptly 
announced, to encourage the masses and promote profound 
development of the struggle against corruption and bribery. 
When the procuratorial organs in the whole province were making 
relatively great progress in the struggle against corruption and 
bribery, the provincial procuratorate held a news conference on 
13 December 1993, to report on the progress of the struggle 
against corruption and bribery launched by the procuratorial 
organs in the whole province since 21 August, and revealed 20 
big and serious cases of corruption and bribery crimes; this 
caused strong responses in society, further aroused the 
enthusiasm among the masses of people for fighting against 
corrupt elements, and enhanced the confidence and determination 
among the procuratorial cadres and police to launch the struggle 
against corruption and bribery. 
<H5>  Second, serious criminal activities were severely cracked </H5>
down on, and political stability and social tranquility was 
safeguarded. 
  In 1993, the procuratorial organs in our province continued 
to view safeguarding political stability and social tranquility 
as an important duty, resolutely implemented the principle of 
"handling cases severely and swiftly," closely coordinated with 
the people's law courts and public security organs, harshly 
punished serious criminal elements who disrupted law and order, 
and diligently created a stable social environment for reform, 
opening up, and economic construction in the province. In 1993, 
the procuratorial organs in the whole province received requests 
from public security organs to arrest 15,965 persons, and after 
examination, approval was granted according to law to arrest 
13,795 persons; they also received requests from public security 
organs to prosecute 14,773 persons, and after examination, 
prosecuted 12,299 persons. In the area of severely cracking 
down on serious criminal activities, we mainly grasped the 
following three tasks: 
  --Actively participating in special struggles and solving 
acute problems of public order. Since last March, the 
procuratorial organs in the whole province actively participated 
in the special struggle for encroaching and annihilating 
"highway robbers" according to unified arrangements in the whole 
province, scoring certain results. By the end of last year, 
procuratorial organs received requests from public security 
organs to arrest 796 "highway robbers" in 265 cases, and 
permission was granted to arrest 728 of them in 246 cases, thus, 
the rampant criminal tendency of "highway robbery" was 
effectively checked. Since July, procuratorial organs in the 
whole province have enthusiastically joined the special struggle 
to rectify the law and order situation in rural areas and strike 
at hooligans and gangs. From July to September, procuratorial 
organs in the whole province arrested a total of 4,843 criminal 
elements of various kinds, and prosecuted 3,784 of them, 
obtaining good social effect. 
  --Key areas for crackdown were highlighted. Serious criminal 
activities which posed serious threat to law and order in the 
society and the people's lives and properties were severely 
punished. The procuratorial organs in the whole province always 
pointed the spearhead of struggle at seven kinds of serious 
criminal elements, namely murderers, robbers, rapists, culprits 
who used explosives, armed criminals, hooligans who caused 
nuisances, notorious thieves, and culprits who stole and 
destroyed facilities and materials for industrial and 
agricultural production, hitting particularly hard hooligans and 
gangs which collaborated with persons inside and outside the 
country, dominated a certain quarter, and had the nature of 
secret societies. When handling cases, the procuratorial organs 
of various levels upheld the principle of intervening in 
important criminal cases ahead of schedule and "clarifying basic 
facts and securing basic evidence," and grasped combat 
opportunities to quickly arrest and prosecute them, fully 
embodying the spirit of handling cases swiftly and giving harsh 
punishment. In 1993, the procuratorial organs in the whole 
province granted approval to arrest 4,827 serious criminal 
elements of these seven kinds, and prosecuted 3,775 of them. 
This has dealt a severe blow to the arrogance of serious 
criminal elements. 
  --While handling cases, organs actively participated in 
comprehensive rectification of public order. Procuratorial 
organs of various levels revealed crimes, educated the masses, 
and promoted legal system through appearing in courts to support 
prosecution. Last year, the procuratorial organs in the whole 
province sent personnel to courts to support prosecution of 
persons in 6,640 criminal cases, and issued 5,584 prosecution 
letters. Responding to problems existing in the units in which 
cases took place, they issued 1,253 "letters suggesting 
inspection and supervision." Regarding personnel who got 
prosecution waivers, public announcements were made. Regarding 
the situation of enforcement in the areas of exercising control 
over personnel, of stripping them of their political rights, of 
suspending penalties, of giving parole, and of allowing them to 
be bailed out for medical treatment, the procuratorial organs 
carried out frequent inspections and supervision. Many 
procuratorial organs carried out investigation and research into 
crime prevention measures, and publicized legal system. 
<H5>  Third, full play was given to the role of procuratorial </H5>
organs in enforcing law and discipline and, according to law, 
handling cases of infringement of citizens' democratic and 
personal rights, as well as cases of dereliction of duty. 
  In 1993, procuratorial organs in our province always put 
investigation of crimes such as "infringement of rights" and 
dereliction of duty in an important position within 
procuratorial work, and further strengthened work in enforcing 
law and discipline. Procuratorial organs in the whole province 
investigated 1,046 cases of "infringement of rights" and 
dereliction of duty for which files were opened, arrested 224 
culprits according to law, and instituted proceedings against 
337 persons. Through handling cases, procuratorial organs 
retrieved economic losses of 1.59 million yuan for the state and 
collectives. In the process of investigating crimes such as 
"infringement of rights" and dereliction of duty, we mainly 
grasped the following four tasks: 
  --The emphasis was on investigating crimes such as 
malpractice and favoritism, use of torture to extort 
confessions, and illegal detention which were committed by 
judicial, administrative, and law enforcement personnel, and 
which caused strong grievances among the masses. Procuratorial 
organs in the whole province opened files to investigate 206 
cases of these three kinds of crimes, and this figure accounted 
for 19.7 percent of the files opened for investigation into law 
and discipline enforcement units. For example, Ning Haide, 
chief of the public security bureau in Linyi County bent the law 
for private interests and practiced fraud; Shen Yugen, chief of 
the public security bureau in Xinzhou City harbored criminals 
who cheated others; their cases were promptly handled, and good 
social effects were obtained. 
  --Cases of responsibility for serious accidents were 
actively 
investigated. Our province is a base of energy and heavy and 
chemical industries, and coal production is the pillar industry 
supporting the economy in our province. However, because some 
localities did not pay attention to safe production, serious 
accidents continuously happened in the coal mines during recent 
years, causing not only deaths and injuries, but also great 
economic losses and adverse effects on the development of 
production. The procuratorial organs in the province always 
viewed investigation into cases of responsibility for serious 
accidents as an important task of enforcing law and discipline, 
and they opened files to investigate 442 cases of responsibility 
for serious accidents. 
  --Cases of negligence in commercial and trading activities 
were handled seriously. Procuratorial organs in the whole 
province opened files to investigate into 142 cases of this 
kind. These cases caused direct economic losses of 13.5 million 
yuan to the state and collectives. 
  --Cases of undermining elections were solemnly handled . In 
1993, the people's congresses of various levels in the whole 
province held elections because terms expired, and the 
procuratorial organs in our province paid earnest attention to 
this matter and, in pursuance of the law, investigated 14 cases 
of crimes which undermined elections, so as to safeguard smooth 
work in elections. 
<H5>  Fourth, law was strictly enforced, procuratorial </H5>
undertakings were thoroughly launched, and the function of legal 
supervision was strengthened. 
  Enforcing law strictly is the central link of legal system 
building. Strengthening legal supervision and promoting strict 
law enforcement is the basic duty entrusted by law to 
procuratorial organs. In 1993, adhering to the work principle 
of "enforcing law strictly and making strenuous efforts to 
handle cases," the procuratorial organs in our province firmly 
grasped the acute problem of not enforcing law strictly and 
firmly grasped typical cases, to launch legal supervision work. 
  --A key effort was made to correct the situation of 
"ineffective crackdown," and work seriously launched to 
supervise investigation and judgment. At the same time they 
severely cracked down on serious criminal activities, 
procuratorial organs in the whole province ceaselessly 
strengthened the sense of supervision and seriously fulfilled 
the duty of supervising investigation and judgment in various 
links such as examining requests and granting approvals for 
arrests, examining prosecutions, and appearing in courts to 
support the process of instituting proceedings. First, they 
supervised correction of issues such as not requesting arrests 
of those who should be arrested, substituting fines for jail 
terms, and so on. The procuratorial organs ordered the arrests 
of 169 various criminal elements who had not been arrested; they 
also reinstated proceedings against 95 criminal elements who had 
committed crimes and should have had their criminal 
responsibilities pursued, but were sent to 
education-through-labor camps or given only public order 
punishment or other forms of treatment. Second, they raised 
defense for 80 cases which truly had wrong judgments and 
verdicts, and among these cases 19 have now been closed, with 10 
persons in 10 cases getting corrected verdicts. Third, they 
issued 168 "notices on correcting lawbreaking deeds" aimed at 
the unlawful behavior in the course of investigation and 
judgment, and orally gave opinions 1,068 times concerning 
correction. 
  --Emphasizing the handling of cases of crimes in detention 
and reform-through-labor facilities and stressing correction of 
lawbreaking activities, procuratorial organs launched work in 
detention and reform-through-labor facilities. The 
procuratorial organs in the whole province brought to court 60 
cases involving 75 persons who had committed crimes again while 
under detention; and handled 72 cases, which involved 72 
persons, of complaints and appeals by the detained and their 
relatives and consequently, they opened files to investigate 12 
cases of crimes committed by 13 prison cadres and personnel. 
Responding to the situation of random charges collected by the 
detention and reform-through labor facilities when performing 
formalities for reduction of term, parole, and medical treatment 
outside jail, procuratorial organs carried out special 
investigations, and offered concrete procuratorial suggestions, 
enabling some problems to be promptly corrected. 
  --Emphasizing investigation into appeals against charges, 
procuratorial organs launched work in appeals against charges. 
Procuratorial organs in the whole province received 1,522 
visitors who had complaints, received 6,196 letters from the 
masses, investigated into 398 cases of appeals against charges, 
handled 33 cases of bigamy, and properly settled 47 cases of 
visits by groups of people, thus defusing possible 
intensification of conflicts. Procuratorial organs in the whole 
province actively launched activities of civilized reception, 
and 85 percent of the reception rooms charged with the duty of 
receiving complaints against charges have basically reached the 
standard of a civilized reception room prescribed by the Supreme 
People's Procuratorate. The reception rooms for receiving 
complaints against charges in Hejin County and Linfen City were 
granted the title of "civilized reception room" within the 
nationwide procuratorial system by the Supreme People's 
Procuratorate. 
  --Emphasizing the work in complaints against verdicts on 
civil and administrative cases, and the cases for which 
obviously unfair verdicts were given, procuratorial organs 
launched work aimed at civil and administrative cases. The 
procuratorial organs in the whole province accepted, according 
to law, 295 cases of complaints against verdicts on civil, 
economic, and administrative cases. After examination, 12 cases 
of complaints against charges were put forward, and the law 
courts agreed to retry them; at present two cases have obtained 
different verdicts. 
  --Emphasizing development of forensic verification and 
examination of documents, procuratorial organs launched 
technical work. They examined 3,356 cases of various kinds, 
inspected 884 on-the-spot scenes, and scrutinized 217 documents; 
among the cases, 34 had the original appraisals amended, and a 
total of 1,428 legal documents of various kinds was produced to 
provide scientific basis for determining the correct nature of 
cases being handled. 
<H5>  Fifth, strict principles for running procuratorial organs, </H5>
and strengthened building of procuratorial contingent were 
upheld. 
  In 1993, the procuratorial organs of various levels in our 
province continued to profoundly launch ideological and 
political work which had procuratorial characteristics; they 
insisted on building procuratorial organs according to law, 
upheld strict principles for building procuratorial organs, and 
further strengthened their own ideological, organizational, and 
styles building. 
  --Procuratorial organs were run on strict principles, and 
anticorruption work was strengthened within the procuratorial 
contingent itself. 
  Under the unified arrangement by the provincial 
procuratorate, cadres at and above office levels in the 
procuratorial organs in the whole province strictly used the 
"five instructions" given by the CPC Central Committee, the "10 
no's" announced by the provincial party committee and 
government, and "procuratorial personnel discipline," to carry 
out serious self-inspection and self-correction. Procuratorial 
organs in the whole province handled a total of five cases of 
violation of law and discipline by police, involving five 
persons, among whom two were pursued for their criminal 
responsibility. At the same time, according to the relevant 
regulations, the problem of random collection of fees by 
procuratorial organs and of procuratorial organs running 
companies, were sorted out and rectified. 
  --Local party committees were actively helped to do work in 
appointing new procurators as the terms of old procurators 
expired. Provincial, sub-, and city procuratorates took the 
initiative in coordinating with the provincial party committee 
and, according to the "four qualities" standard and the 
principle of having both integrity and ability, selected a 
number of young comrades who are comparatively mature 
politically and have higher educational attainment for positions 
in the leading groups of the procuratorial organs of various 
levels. Work in appointing new procurators as the terms of the 
old procurators expired was smoothly accomplished, thus enabling 
the old group to hand over duties to the new group. 
  --Activities in "struggling for excellence" were vigorously 
launched. Under the conditions that their duties were arduous 
and their tasks difficult, the broad masses of procuratorial 
cadres and police developed the revolutionary spirit of 
tenacious struggle and selfless dedication, and survived the 
exercises and tests in the struggle against corruption. A 
number of advanced collectives and staff, who would enforce law 
impartially and handle things honestly, has emerged. Last year, 
in the whole province, 43 procuratorial cadres and police and 19 
collectives were commended by the Supreme People's Procuratorate 
and the provincial party committee and government; and 66 
advanced collectives and 243 advanced staff were commended by 
the provincial procuratorate. 
  --Work was launched in educating and training procuratorial 
cadres in various styles and through various channels. The 
procuratorial organs in our province further strengthened 
education and used available resources to launch various kinds 
of short-term and on-the-job training. More than 500 
procuratorial cadres and police took part in self-study and 
examinations organized by the Law University, and more than 
1,300 procuratorial cadres and police took part in the 
second-phase certificate course on procuratorial studies. 
Procuratorial organs in the whole province organized 60 
training classes and forums of various types to train 1,800 
procuratorial cadres and police. The knowledge structure of the 
procuratorial contingent was further improved, and the 
professional quality of procuratorial cadres and police was 
upgraded. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-1866 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "drchi064__s94007" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-CHI-94-064-S </AU>
Daily Report 
<DATE1>  8 Mar 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> REGIONAL WORK REPORTS </F>
<H3> <TI>   Shandong Government Work Report </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Shandong Government Work Report </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   SK2703000894 Jinan DAZHONG RIBAO in Chinese 8 Mar 94 pp 1, 2 </F>
<F P=103> SK2703000894 </F>
<F P=104>  Jinan DAZHONG RIBAO </F>
<F P=105>  Chinese </F>


<TEXT>
BFN 

<F P=106> [Shandong government work report delivered by Zhao Zhihao, </F>
governor of Shandong, at the second session of the eighth 
provincial people's congress on 28 February] 
  [Text] Fellow deputies: 
  On behalf of the provincial people's government, I will now 
present a government work report to this session for discussion. 
Members of the Chinese People's Political Consultative 
Conference [CPPCC], other personnel attending as observers 
please give your opinions. 
  1. Shandong Fulfilled the Second 100-Percent-Increase Target 
of the Economy Ahead of Schedule in 1993 To Lay a Foundation for 
Basically Achieving Modernization. 
  The past year was one when Shandong's reform, opening up, 
and 
modernization drive were further accelerated and other 
undertakings developed vigorously. Under the leadership of the 
party Central Committee, the State Council, and the provincial 
party committee, governments at all levels united and led the 
people across the province to conscientiously implement the 
guidelines of Comrade Deng Xiaoping's important speeches and the 
14th party congress, to resolutely carry out the series of 
central principles, policies, and measures for deepening reform, 
speeding up development, and strengthening and improving 
macroeconomic regulation and control, to make earnest efforts to 
do practical work, to go all out to pioneer the way forward, and 
to successfully fulfill the 1993 work tasks defined at the first 
session of the eighth provincial people's congress. An 
encouraging situation characterized by economic development, 
political stability, unity of the people, and social progress 
emerged provincewide. 
  We maintained the good trend of rapid development in the 
economy and achieved increases basically at the same pace in 
growth rate and efficiency. The annual gross domestic product 
totaled 270.09 billion yuan, up 24.2 percent from the preceding 
year, marking the largest annual increase since reform and 
opening up started. The rural economy developed in all sectors, 
with agricultural output value totaling 99.4 billion yuan, up 
14.3 percent; grain output hit an all-time high despite 
catastrophic disasters to reach 41 million tonnes; and forestry, 
animal husbandry, sideline production, fishery, and township 
enterprises grew at a high speed. Industrial production 
registered a substantial increase and improved efficiency, with 
output value totaling 598 billion yuan, up 57.2 percent. 
Industrial enterprises at and above the township level 
registered a 35.7-percent growth rate, increased the marketing 
rate of their products to 95.9 percent, achieved a 43.2-percent 
increase in profits and taxes, and made their overall index of 
economic efficiency 98.7 percent, up 8.7 percentage points. The 
Jinan- Qingdao Expressway, the first-phase work of Qingdao's 
Qianwan Port, the Dongming Bridge across Huang He, and other key 
construction projects were completed and commissioned to further 
improve infrastructural facilities and the investment climate 
and effect a new change in urban and rural outlook. The 
financial situation took a turn for the better, and revenues 
increased by a large margin. Shandong's local revenue totaled 
19.44 billion yuan, up 38.8 percent, thus achieving a balance 
between the revenue and the expenditure of the year. Markets 
thrive. Retail sales of commodities totaled 99.38 billion yuan, 
up 24.8 percent, and the retail price index rose by 10.7 
percent. Living standards were further improved. Urban 
people's per capita cost of living income was 2,338 yuan, and 
peasants' per capita net income was 953 yuan, up 11.1 and 6.1 
percent, respectively, when allowing for price rises. Urban and 
rural people's savings deposits showed an increase of 23.4 
billion yuan over the figure registered at the beginning of the 
year. 
  We facilitated overall reform and opening up, which played a 
notably greater role in promoting development. All levels in 
the province emancipated the mind, sought truth from facts, and 
began to develop in both range and quality the reform designed 
to establish the socialist market economy system. By 
implementing the "enterprise law" and "regulations," enterprises 
made new headway in transforming their operating mechanism. A 
major breakthrough was achieved in the experiment with the 
shareholding system. Shareholding enterprises at and above the 
county level throughout the province increased to 1,101 of which 
five had their shares listed; and shareholding cooperatives 
increased to 59,000. We stepped up efforts to establish the 
market system and the social security system, added impetus to 
the price reform, and further deepened reforms in the 
macroeconomic regulation and control system. Reform of 
government organizations and the transformation of government 
functions was accelerated. The reform of organizations at 
county and township levels was basically completed. Enough 
preparations were made for the reform of organizations at the 
provincial, city, and prefectural levels. The level of opening 
to the outside world was enhanced, and the scale expanded. The 
number of cities that established friendly ties with foreign 
cities reached 50, and grass-roots non- governmental units that 
established friendly ties with foreign units reached 119. 
Foreign economic relations and trade developed further. Import 
and export trade rose substantially. The province as a whole 
earned $5.98 billion in foreign exchange from exports, an 
increase of 27.1 percent over 1992. In 1993, a total of 8,012 
foreign-invested projects were approved, an increase of 72.3 
percent; and a total of $2.26 billion in foreign funds were 
actually utilized, up by 64.2 percent. A marked increase was 
effected in infrastructure, tertiary industry, and projects with 
a huge amount of investment and advanced technology. Of these 
projects, 257 each involved $10 million yuan in investment. New 
headway was made in international economic cooperation, the 
contracting of labor service abroad, and tourism. 
  New progress was made in science, technology, education, and 
other social undertakings, and the building of the spiritual 
civilization was enhanced continuously. In 1993, the province 
achieved a total of 2,858 major scientific research results and 
popularized and applied 2,263 results. Construction of high and 
new technology development zones was accelerated. All levels 
and all kinds of education developed in a relatively rapid 
manner. The enrollment rate of school-age children was 98.7 
percent, and the number of students attending ordinary 
institutions of higher learning increased by 22,000 persons and 
reached 152,000 persons. Adult education and workers' education 
were valued and a good beginning was made in encouraging society 
to run adult and workers' education. Family planning witnessed 
a remarkable result. The natural population growth rate was 
dropped to 3.71 per thousand, and the rate of family planning 
was enhanced to 88.4 percent. Environmental protection and land 
management were strengthened. New results were achieved in 
culture, public health, sports, press and publication, radio, 
film, television, social welfare, nationalities, religion, 
Taiwan affairs, overseas Chinese affairs, aged people, history, 
and archives. The building of democracy and the legal system 
was strengthened. Severe blows were dealt to all kinds of 
crimes. Comprehensive management of social order was 
strengthened, and social order was relatively good. Remarkable 
results were achieved in dealing blows to smuggling. The 
anti-corruption campaign was deepened gradually and soundly. Of 
the total 5,856 cases of various kinds were investigated and 
handled, 382 were major and appalling cases, and of the 3,974 
cadres who were punished, 44 were at or above the county and 
section levels. The sense of being clean and honest and being 
strict with oneself was strengthened at cadre levels. The 
spreading trend of some negative and corrupt phenomena was 
checked at the start. This basically met the anticipated 
demands of the central authorities and the provincial party 
committee. 
  Fellow deputies, here I want to happily announce the fact 
that thanks to the arduous work of the people throughout the 
province over the past dozen of years, the GNP in 1993 was 
already 4.3 times that in 1980, fulfilling the quadrupling task 
7 years ahead of schedule, and successfully accomplishing the 
first-step development objective of the province's three-step 
strategy. This shows that the province's modernization has 
embarked on a new period. This is a great historical 
achievement that all the people in the province can be proud of! 
  In the review and summary of government work in the past 
year, we paid attention to the following several points: 
  First, we kept a clear head and positively and soundly 
strengthened and improved overall control. All levels of 
governments in the province conscientiously implemented the 
guidelines of the central instructions, combined overall control 
with the invigoration of the economy to resolve the 
contradictions and problems emerging in economic development, 
and made great efforts to deepen reform, thus effecting a series 
of basic changes in economic life. Confusion in the financial 
order, that once existed has taken a noticeable turn for the 
better. The trend of investment in fixed assets increasing at an 
excessively rapid speed was brought under control. The 
phenomenon of providing "IOU" notes to farm and sideline produce 
sellers was basically eliminated. Not only was the 
macroeconomic environment improved but the high national 
economic growth trend continued to be maintained. Second, in 
line with the implementation of the "3321" project, we paid firm 
attention to the weak links and upgraded the quality of economic 
operation. We concentrated capital to ensure the development of 
a group of key technological transformation projects. The 
investment in technological transformation increased by 79 
percent during the year. We continued to relax policies and 
vigorously developed the tertiary industry and the private and 
individual sectors of the economy. The increase rate of the 
tertiary industry reached 32.5 percent. The proportion of the 
individual and private sectors of the economy in the economy of 
the province rose. Economically powerful counties and townships 
continued to bring their leading roles into play. The province 
had 11 counties (cities and districts) each creating over 10 
billion yuan in industrial and agricultural output value. Nine 
counties with financial subsidies comprehensively experimented 
with reform and opening up. The areas where the economy was not 
well developed further enhanced their development vitality. 
Great headway was made in building Shandong on the sea and 
developing the Huang He delta. Third, we paid attention to 
persisting in the principle of taking a two-hands approach and 
being sure that both hands are tough in strengthening the work 
in the ideological and political sphere. The broad masses of 
cadres and people were organized to conscientiously study the 
third volume of the "Selected Works of Deng Xiaoping" and the 
guidelines of the third plenary session of the 14th party 
Central Committee, attended to both ideological and political 
work and economic work, further emancipated the mind, and were 
mobilized with enthusiasm. We persistently did administrative 
work according to laws and accelerated the pace of making 
economic laws. Nine local rules and regulations were reported 
to the provincial people's congress and its standing committee 
for examinations and approvals and 16 regulations of the 
provincial government were issued. The education on national 
defense and the militia reserve service was strengthened. We 
positively launched the activities of supporting the army and 
giving preferential treatment to families of revolutionary 
martyrs and servicemen, supporting the government and cherishing 
the people, and mobilizing the army and the people to develop 
spiritual civilization. Thus, the unity between the army and 
the government and between the army and the people was further 
consolidated. Fourth, we further changed the functions, 
intensified service, and strengthened the self-construction of 
governments. All levels paid attention to linking the central 
policies and principles with the local actual conditions, 
strengthened investigation and study, firmly attended to the 
implementation of policies and principles, and upgraded the 
policy-making level and the work efficiency to a new height. We 
conscientiously solved the problems of wantonly collecting 
funds, apportioning expenses, and collecting charges that the 
grass roots and the masses had strong complaints on and 
corrected the unhealthy trends within trades. We adopted 
effective measures to reduce the peasants' burdens. The 
provincial government formulated regulations to cancel 75 items 
on collecting charges. Simultaneously, all cities, prefectures, 
and counties canceled a number of charge collection items. What 
we should especially point out is: Some localities across the 
province were hit by extraordinarily serious floods and 
waterlogging disasters last summer. The party Central Committee 
and the State Council showed cordial concern to us. The broad 
masses of cadres and people in the disastrous areas were 
mobilized to combat the disasters and provide relief on their 
own. The officers and men of the People's Liberation Army units 
and the armed police forces were fighting in the forefront of 
dealing with the emergency. All localities and units and the 
broad masses of cadres and people donated more than 100 million 
yuan worth of money and materials and helped the disastrous 
people restore production and rebuild their houses. A 
magnificent song was composed. Practice showed again that as 
long as we unite as one and fight in a unified way, we will 
overcome all difficulties and be ever-victorious. 
  Fellow deputies, although we achieved great achievements in 
our province's various undertakings last year, we still have to 
face many difficulties and restraining factors in the course of 
development. The agricultural foundation is weak, the 
comparable returns are low, cotton production has greatly 
declined, the burdens of peasants in some localities have 
remained heavy, and the increase in the actual income of 
peasants is not rapid. The progress of economic structural 
readjustment is slow, the advantages for developing leading 
industries have not been formed, brand-name and competitive 
products are few in number, and tertiary industry has remained a 
prominent and weak aspect. The problem of low economic 
efficiency has not been fundamentally tackled, some enterprises 
are poorly managed, deficits have increased, and the efficiency 
of funds is not high. The problem of uneven regional economic 
development is quite prominent, some localities in the western 
part of the province have to face many difficulties in economic 
development, the corrupt phenomena of using public funds for 
wining and dining and sending gifts, using public funds for 
travelling, engaging in extravagance and waste, and abusing 
one's powers to seek personal gains still exist in some 
localities and units and among a small number of people. There 
are some public security problems which we must not neglect. 
The number of major and appalling cases have increased in some 
localities, some repulsive social phenomena have become frequent 
occurences, and serious smuggling activities have occurred in 
some coastal areas, bringing great harm to the province. We 
must pay great attention to these problems and rely on the great 
support and active participation of the people across the 
province and various social sectors to solve them more rapidly 
and successfully. 
  2. We Should Clearly Define This Year's Principles and Tasks 
for Economic and Social Development and Push the Modernization 
Drive to a New Stage 
  The year 1994 is an important year for reaching the Eighth 
Five-Year Plan ahead of schedule on the basis of achieving a 300 
percent increase in Shandong's economy and accelerating the 
establishment of the socialist market economic structure, 
therefore, the reform and development tasks will be very 
arduous. To analyze the economic development trend and 
international and domestic conditions, we realize that we are 
facing not only a good opportunity but also a severe challenge. 
After two years of rapid development, some conditions for 
economic development have been used and some new restraining 
factors have emerged. However, a new group of basic industries 
and infrastructure facilities have started to show efficiency; 
the steady increase in investment and consumption will expand 
market demands; the opportunity for international trade and 
investment and cooperation will noticeably increase, and, in 
particular, the issuance of a series of important reform 
measures will greatly strengthen the vitality for economic 
development. Judging from the overall situation, our province 
still has conditions for maintaining a fairly rapid economic 
growth, and will face hard-earned good opportunity for reform 
and development for a considerable long period of time to come. 
We must seize the opportune moments to push the modernization 
drive to new heights. Meanwhile, we should remain clear-headed 
to note that competition at home and abroad becomes increasingly 
intense, and that we are in a crucial period for reform and 
development, during which no progress or small progress means 
retrogression. In the new year, in line with the general demand 
for "seizing the opportunity, deepening reform, opening wider, 
promoting development, and maintaining stability" as put forward 
by the party Central Committee, we should take Comrade Deng 
Xiaoping's theory of building socialism with Chinese 
characteristics and the party's basic line as the guide, 
thoroughly implement the guidelines of the 14th party congress, 
the third plenary session of the 14th party Central Committee, 
and the sixth provincial party congress, persistently emancipate 
the mind and seek truth from facts, facilitate reform in an 
all-round manner, open wider to the outside world, accelerate 
scientific and technological progress, greatly adjust the 
structure, improve economic efficiency, achieve substantial 
progress in establishing the basic framework for the socialist 
market economy system, maintain sustained, rapid, and healthy 
economic development, and promote social stability and overall 
progress. 
  The basic tasks of our economic and social development for 
this year are as follows: 
  We should maintain sustained, rapid, and healthy economic 
development. We should take economic construction as the 
central task, firmly embrace the guiding thought that 
"development is the essential criterion," do our best, act 
according to our capacity, and greatly develop any item for 
which there is a market, has good efficiency, is good in 
structure, has full capacity for sustained development, and is 
export-oriented. After taking all factors into consideration, 
we plan to arrange a 12-percent increase in the gross domestic 
product, which, translated, will be a 4-percent increase in the 
primary industry, a 13-percent increase in the secondary 
industry, and an 18-percent increase in the tertiary industry. 
  We should make a substantial step in reform and opening up. 
Following the state's unified arrangements and focusing on 
establishing the modern enterprise system and promoting the 
reform of the financial, tax, banking, investment, foreign 
trade, housing, state property management systems, we should 
conduct reform in rural areas and in social security, science 
and technology, education, and culture in a coordinated manner 
and do a good job in establishing the market system. We should 
speed up the integration with the international economy and make 
our economy more export-oriented. We should make the growth 
rate in exports for earning foreign exchange higher than that in 
the entire economy to reach 16 percent, and efforts should be 
exerted to make it 20 percent. We should strive to increase the 
three newly approved types of foreign-funded enterprises to over 
10,000 and to increase by more than 50 percent the actual amount 
of foreign capital used in the year. 
  We should improve the entire quality of the national economy 
to a new level. We should correctly handle relations between 
growth rate, structure, and efficiency and improve the quality 
of economic development. We should continue to adjust the 
proportions of the primary, secondary, and tertiary industries 
and their respective structures and, while strengthening the 
primary industry and improving the secondary industry, greatly 
expand the tertiary industry to increase its proportion to the 
gross domestic product by 2 percentage points. We should 
restructure investment, increase the investment in energy, 
transportation, telecommunications, water conservancy, and other 
basic industries, and greatly increase the proportion of the 
investment in technical transformation. We should strive to 
raise economic efficiency and achieve a 20-percent increase in 
the profits and taxes of the industrial enterprises at and above 
the township level, a 6-percent increase in labor productivity, 
and a 10-percent increase in revenue. 
  It is necessary to promote coordinated economic development 
of the eastern and western parts of the province. We should 
further implement the principle of the eastern and western parts 
of the province making concerted efforts to develop together and 
learn from each other's advantages. The eastern area should 
upgrade standing and technological levels and promote the 
development of the economy along with the requirements for high 
layers and export orientation. The western area should continue 
to vitalize itself, go all out to seek prosperity, define 
development ideas, accurately select breakthrough points, 
further lay a good foundation, expand the scale of development, 
and make improvements. In the course of deepening reform, we 
should study and formulate the new ideas and methods for helping 
the economically underdeveloped areas in the financial and tax, 
monetary, and investment spheres by providing them with skilled 
persons; expand the dynamics of support; and conscientiously 
attend to the implementation of these new ideas and methods. 
The number of economically underdeveloped counties whose trial 
reform and opening up are directly grasped by the province 
should increase to 25. These counties should be supported 
simultaneously by economically powerful counties and provincial- 
level departments. The remaining economically underdeveloped 
counties should be assisted by cities and prefectures to which 
they belong. Through overall support measures, we should 
promote rapid development of the western area. 
  It is necessary to comprehensively develop all social 
undertakings. It is necessary to handle the relationship 
between economic growth and social development; pay attention to 
spiritual civilization; and promote the fast development of 
scientific and technological, educational, and cultural 
undertakings. Achievements in family planning work are 
necessary. The natural population growth rate should be 
controlled within 6 per thousand. Achievements in work for the 
elderly are necessary. On the basis of developing the economy, 
we should continue to improve the people's livelihood. The per 
capita spendable income of urbanites and the net income of 
peasants should respectively increase by 18 percent and 16 
percent. 
  It is necessary to continuously maintain social stability. 
Stability is a necessary condition for economic development and 
smooth reform. So, we must conscientiously handle the 
relationship between stability, development, and reform. The 
work in these three aspects should equally be taken into 
consideration and promote one another. In carrying out the 
reform that is closely related to the benefits of the masses, we 
should take into full consideration the capacity of all fronts 
and steadily and positively promote reform. It is necessary to 
control currency inflation and to keep price hikes under 10 
percent or so. We should pay attention to and appropriately 
handle hotly-debated issues and difficulties that the masses are 
concerned with, alleviate various kinds of contradictions, keep 
social stability, and create a relaxed environment for reform 
and development. 
  3. We Should Further Intensify Agriculture's Role as the 
Foundation of the National Economy, Optimize Structure, Upgrade 
Efficiency, and Promote Faster and Better Economic Development. 
  To fulfill 1994's economic and social development tasks, we 
must make unified arrangements, make focal points stand out, and 
focus our efforts to grasping the work in the following eight 
spheres: 
  A. We should intensify agriculture's role as the foundation 
of the national economy and comprehensively develop the rural 
economy. 
  Agriculture, rural areas, and the peasants are great issues 
related to economic development, the improvement of the people's 
livelihood, and social stability. All levels should firmly 
foster the strategic idea of taking agriculture as the 
foundation of the national economy, stabilize the basic policies 
toward the rural areas, deepen rural reform, focus agricultural 
and rural work tasks on increasing the peasants' income and the 
supply of farm products, positively promote intensive farming, 
and accelerate the development of the rural economy according to 
market demands and the modernization of the rural economy. 
  We should continue to readjust rural economic structure and 
vigorously develop high-yield, good-quality, and highly 
efficient agriculture and market agriculture. Grain output 
increased by a big margin last year. This year, we should 
strengthen measures and strive to maintain the 1993 grain 
production volume or register a slight increase. We should 
exert great efforts to change the cotton production decrease 
situation, further perfect policies, realistically solve the 
problems in the links from growing to purchasing, assign cotton 
sown areas, increase per unit yield, and ensure that the cotton 
production will restore to the normal level as soon as possible. 
We should continue to comprehensively develop agriculture and a 
diversified economy; vigorously develop animal husbandry, 
aquatic product industry, and forest fruit industry; and 
increase their proportion in the total agricultural output 
value. We should accelerate the cultivation of rural markets 
and guide peasants to organize production in line with the 
demands of the market economy and the orientation of 
specialization and industrialization. It is necessary to 
further improve the rural socialized service system, organize 
the establishment of "dragon-head" enterprises and production 
bases, and accelerate the building of storage, processing, and 
circulation facilities for farm products. We should 
conscientiously grasp the "nonstaple foods" project and improve 
urban and rural market supply. 
  We should increase investment in agriculture, science, and 
technology. The investment in agriculture and the amount of 
agriculture-oriented funds and loans should show an increase 
over the previous year. We should develop and improve the 
foundation for rural cooperation and extend the rural 
shareholding cooperative system from the secondary industry to 
the primary and tertiary industries. Strenuous efforts should 
be made in farmland capital construction with water conservancy 
as the focus, in alleviating the contradiction of the shortage 
of water resources, doing a good job in managing water diversion 
and storage projects, paying attention to saving water, 
accelerating the harnessing of key rivers and the reinforcement 
of dangerous reservoirs, and further improving production 
conditions. We should continue to support the poor areas and 
accelerate the pace of making poverty-stricken areas shake off 
poverty and become prosperous; combine agriculture with science 
and education, actively invigorate agriculture with science and 
education, strengthen the ranks of scientific and technical 
workers in rural areas, improve rural science and technology 
dissemination network and service organs, and accelerate the 
development, popularization, and application of high and new 
agricultural technology; support and protect 
agriculture-oriented industry and do a good job in organizing 
and supplying the agricultural means of production. 
  We should gradually resolve the problem of low comparative 
returns in agriculture. Beginning from the time when new grain 
and cotton are distributed for sale in the markets, we should 
raise the grain purchasing price and the cotton contract 
purchasing price; strengthen management over the prices of major 
means of production for agricultural use; establish the grain 
and oil-bearing crops storage system and the grain and 
oil-bearing crops risk-taking fund system; persist in making 
unremitting efforts to reduce the burdens of peasants, overcome 
the lax mood, strengthen supervision and inspection, and 
guarantee that relevant central and provincial stipulations will 
be implemented where needed. 
  We should strive to simultaneously increase the rate and 
efficiency of township enterprises. With the comprehensive 
promotion of the shareholding cooperative system as the 
emphasis, we should make use of the advantage of the flexible 
mechanism of township enterprises to lay a foundation for 
township enterprises to come to the fore for the second time. 
We should persist in giving simultaneous attention to 
development and improvement, encourage and guide township 
enterprises to cooperate with large enterprises, scientific 
research units, and institutions of higher learning, adopt new 
technology, and raise technology quality and product grade; 
encourage and guide township enterprises to strengthen 
scientific management and carry out intensive management; 
encourage and guide township enterprises to introduce foreign 
capital and to conduct grafting and transformation, actively 
participate in international competition, and increase foreign 
exchange earnings through export; and encourage and guide them 
to optimize the organization structure, develop enterprise 
groups, and raise the efficiency of scale. It is necessary to 
combine development of township enterprises with the 
establishment of small cities and towns, promote the transfer of 
rural labor forces, and accelerate the process of integrating 
urban and rural areas. 
  B. We should regard technological progress, structural 
readjustment, and strengthening of management as the main 
orientation and raise the overall quality of industry and 
competitive ability. 
  Based on our advantage of producing finished products, we 
should accelerate technological transformation to bring along 
readjustment and optimization of industrial structure and the 
updating and upgrading of all products. The provincial 
authorities will continue to grasp the 100 key technological 
transformation projects, support 50 large and medium-sized 
enterprises to establish technology development centers and 
intermediate experimental bases, enable specialized scientific 
research organs to enter enterprise groups in a planned and 
step-by-step manner, and make key products enter a higher grade 
and key industries enter a higher level. All localities should 
carry out a number of key technological transformation projects. 
Guided by the market, we should implement the "product project" 
and "brand-name strategy," give priority to developing a number 
of competitive products with good prospects, expand mass 
production, strive to gain initiative when patterns of 
consumption change, and strive to make more products gain 
footholds in the domestic and international markets and be very 
competitive with a larger market share in an effort to bring 
along the formation of new leading industries. We should 
continue to actively develop enterprise groups, encourage 
enterprise amalgamation and cooperation, expand the scale, 
improve functions, intensify their radiation and stimulation 
power, and promote the readjustment of the organizational 
structure of enterprises. 
  Focusing on improving economic efficiency, we should carry 
out in-depth activities of increasing production, practicing 
economy, increasing income, and reducing expenses and strengthen 
enterprise management. We should improve basic work and 
strictly enforce labor discipline and various regulations and 
systems to comprehensively improve enterprise quality. We 
should strengthen technical supervision to further upgrade 
product quality. We should reduce production costs to the 
minimum and speed up the turnover of funds. We should attach 
importance to and achieve success in production safety and 
eliminate hidden danger to reduce job-related accidents. We 
should tap enterprises' internal potential, emphasize the work 
to end deficits and increase profits, help major loss makers on 
a priority basis, and adopt comprehensive measures to help them 
end deficits within a fixed time. 
  We should approach the work to explore the market and 
strengthen sales from a strategic viewpoint, attach importance 
to it, put promotion of sales in the leading position in 
organizing industrial production, improve the contingents of 
advertising and sales personnel, and stabilize and improve sales 
promotion policies to raise the marketing rate of our industrial 
products to the country's advanced level. 
  C. We should further lift control to invigorate and greatly 
develop the tertiary industry. 
  The development level of the tertiary industry is an 
important indicator of the modernization level. We should 
continue to relax policies, persistently develop state-owned, 
collective, individual, private, and foreign-funded economies 
simultaneously, develop urban and rural areas simultaneously, 
establish development mechanisms whereby various ownerships 
coexistent and are full of vigor, achieve a substantial step 
forward each year, and make the growth rate of the tertiary 
industry notably higher than that of the entire economy. 
  We should further intensify construction of infrastructural 
facilities to meet the need for accelerating development. We 
should improve transportation and telecommunications development 
plans and build a number of large key projects based on a high 
starting point to gradually alleviate "bottleneck" restrictions. 
At present, we should step up the establishment of local 
shareholding aviation companies, open more air routes and flight 
services, expecially do a good job in improving auxiliary 
facilities and management of the Jinan and Qingdao Airports, and 
be determined to change Shandong's backward aviation 
undertakings. 
  Without a perfect market to serve as the carrier, great 
development of the market economy will be out of the question. 
We should further enliven commodity distribution and expedite 
the building of commercial units, with the focus on building a 
number of large and high-grade commercial and service facilities 
with a strong radiating capacity. We should develop and improve 
the market system more expeditiously, with the focus on 
developing the markets for money, technology, labor forces, 
property rights, information, and other essential elements of 
production, and greatly develop accountants', lawyers', and 
auditors' offices and notarial, property appraisal, and other 
intermediary service organizations. We should strengthen market 
management, encourage competition, and resolutely crack down on 
manipulation of the market, production of fake and inferior 
products, and other illegal activities. As Shandong's real 
estate business is still in its initial stages of development, 
we should strengthen guidance on it, standardize its development 
and exchange activities, and facilitate its rapid and healthy 
development. 
  D. We should implement the strategy of promotion through the 
export-oriented economy in an all-round manner and develop the 
export-oriented economy. 
  Opening to the outside world is an important way to improve 
the overall quality of the economy and accelerate the 
modernization drive, and only with large-scale opening up can we 
achieve large-scale development. We should make continuous 
efforts to emancipate the mind and have the courage to compete 
internationally. We should enhance the sense of overall opening 
up, expand overseas propaganda, further improve the investment 
climate, accelerate the process to integrate with the 
international economy, and promote faster and better development 
in Shandong's economy. 
  We should stimulate the enthusiasm of all quarters and adopt 
every means to expand exports. We should actively implement the 
strategy of diversifying the market and winning through quality, 
accelerate the adjustment of the export commodity mix, develop 
imports and exports simultaneously, expand the scale through 
good efficiency, ensure good efficiency through the scale, 
increase export capacity, and enhance the strength for sustained 
development. Integrated industrial and foreign trade companies 
outside the province should continue to play their role as the 
major force, and cities, prefectures, counties, and enterprises 
with decision-making power in exports should also apply pressure 
on themselves and hold the responsibility for earning more 
foreign exchange for the state. We should organize a number of 
enterprise groups to integrate industrial, agricultural, 
commercial, and technological enterprises with foreign trade 
enterprises. We should regard the export of foreign-funded 
enterprises as the focus of our endeavor to expand export and 
strive to increase its proportion to the total export of the 
province by more than 10 percentage points over the preceding 
year. 
  We should invite traders and bring in capital from all 
directions and on a large scale, widen the investment sphere, 
and increase overall economic results. We should intensify the 
orientation guiding industrial policies; focus on inviting 
traders and bringing in capital for the technological 
transformation and the graft transformation of existing large 
and medium-sized enterprises, basic industries, and leading 
industries; and make a breakthrough in developing large 
projects. The province should continue to simplify the 
procedures for handling affairs, upgrade the efficiency of 
handling affairs, also set up a system of management of key 
projects involving foreign capital and a system of dividing 
administrative levels to hold talks with foreign traders, decide 
to hold regular economic and trade symposiums attended by 
traders from Taiwan and the ROK, and strive to make great 
achievements in using foreign capital. We should particularly 
pay attention to increasing the amount of capital that has been 
put in place, the number of projects involving foreign capital, 
and the foreign exchange earnings through exports. We should 
strengthen, according to law, the management of the enterprises 
with foreign investment. We should make efforts to run well the 
economic and technological development zones and bonded areas 
and bring into better play their "show-window," experimental, 
and influential functions. We should bring into full play the 
role of the Singapore-Shandong economic and trade council to 
make great realistic achievements in promoting the mutual 
economic and trade cooperation and to further invite more 
foreign businessmen and bring in more foreign capital from other 
countries. 
  We should positively pioneer international economic and 
technological cooperation spheres. We should reform and perfect 
the management of overseas contract projects and labor service 
cooperation, make efforts to upgrade the layers of cooperation, 
and increase economic results. We should steadily develop 
overseas investment, encourage the running of various types of 
overseas enterprises, and gradually perfect the province's 
overseas networks for promotion of sales, capital circulation, 
technological cooperation, and information. 
  E. We should optimize the investment structure and ensure 
the 
construction of key projects. 
  Maintaining a reasonable scale of investment in fixed assets 
and rationalizing the fixed assets investment structure is an 
important condition for making fast and highly efficient 
economic development. The investment in fixed assets of society 
is planned at 110 billion yuan, an increase of 26 percent over 
the previous year. Of this, the investment in capital 
construction of local state-owned units should increase by 36 
percent and the investment in equipment renewal and 
technological transformation should increase by 54 percent. We 
should strengthen the regulation and control of the investment 
in fixed assets and link the expansion of scale with the 
optimization of structure; concentrate energy to ensure the 
construction of key projects; realistically develop energy 
resources, transportation, postal and telecommunications, and 
water conservation facilities; vigorously cultivate leading 
industries and new high technology industries, and accelerate 
the construction of Shandong on the sea and the development of 
Huang He delta. This year, the province should grasp the 
construction of the Shandong section of the Beijing-Jiulong 
railway line, the Jinan-Handan railway line, the Jinan-Dezhou 
high-grade highway, the Jinan- Liaocheng high-grade highway, 
coastal ports, and the power projects with 1 million kw 
installed capacity. We should adopt forms to conduct 
cooperation with domestic large enterprises and use foreign 
capital to build iron and steel and vehicle industrial projects. 
Technological transformation should realistically be regarded as 
a strategic measure. It is necessary to increase the proportion 
of investment in technological transformation; to mainly rely on 
science and technology; to persist in high starting points, high 
standing, and high efficiency; and neither to increase input nor 
to develop low-quality projects. The strain on capital is a 
prominent factor restricting the investment in fixed assets, 
particularly the construction of key projects. We should 
extensively open channels for capital, adopt flexible forms to 
circulate capital, and attract increasingly more foreign traders 
and social investment. 
  F. We should realistically increase revenues and reduce 
expenditures and ensure a balance between revenues and 
expenditures. 
  After the setup of the new financial and tax system, whether 
or not revenues can be increased in a sustained and steady 
manner and the province can strike a balance between revenues 
and expenditures is a great matter that will effect economic 
development and the social stability. Last year, there were 
some incomparable factors for the higher increase in the 
province's revenues, and simultaneously, the basic figures of 
expenditures relatively increased. This year, the revenue 
increase tendency is relatively weakened, and there are great 
difficulties in balancing revenues and expenditures. To suit 
the changes in the revenue structure after the implementation 
of the tax assignment system on the basis of a rational 
division of power between central and local authorities, we 
should set up, as soon as possible, the local financial resource 
system with great and stable reserve strength; strengthen the 
management of tax revenues according to law; and strive to 
increase revenues. We should pay particular attention to 
achieving the work of turning enterprises' deficits into 
profits, which is closely related to the local revenues and 
regard the development of the tertiary industry as an important 
factor for increasing revenues. We should strictly enforce 
financial and economic discipline, manage the extra-budgetary 
funds well, and make good use of them. In financial 
expenditure, we should give priority to guaranteeing wages for 
personnel and the basic maintenance funds, and increase input in 
agriculture, science, technology, education, and public 
security. It is necessary to promote the spirit of managing all 
undertakings diligently and thriftily, reduce normal 
administrative expenditure, expand the reform measures on the 
use of expenditure and on optimizing the structure, and 
guarantee a balance between financial revenue and expenditure 
during the year. Places where the financial situation is fairly 
good should further strengthen financial and taxation work and 
make new contributions to steadily increasing the whole 
province's financial revenue. Places with difficult financial 
situation should study and explore ways to accelerate economic 
development and to increase financial revenue under the new 
systems, and extricate themselves from a difficult position as 
quickly as possible. 
  G. We should continue to regard science, technology, and 
education as a matter of strategic importance and 
comprehensively implement the principle of "invigorating 
Shandong with science and education." 
  On the basis of building a new mechanism which is closely 
integrated with the economy and compatible with the 
self-development law, we should also deepen reform of the 
scientific and technological system. It is necessary to 
accelerate the development of technology markets, further 
decontrol scientific research units and their personnel, 
encourage people-run scientific and technological enterprises to 
turn themselves into high-technology and export-oriented 
enterprise groups. We should strengthen basic research, applied 
technology research, and popularization of scientific and 
technological findings, and raise our province's comprehensive 
scientific and technological level. Efforts should be made to 
comprehensively implement the project on invigorating 
agriculture, industry, aquatic product industry, tertiary 
industry, and high and new technology industry with science and 
technology, manage the high and new technological development 
zone well, and strengthen the pulling force for economic growth. 
We should strengthen the establishment of scientific and 
technological development and popularization networks, 
encourage areas with favorable conditions, key enterprises, and 
large enterprises to establish all sorts of technology 
development and popularization centers. 
  We should comprehensively implement the "outline on China's 
educational reform and development," deepen reform of the 
educational system, and form a pattern with government efforts 
to run schools as the mainstay while pooling the efforts of all 
social sectors to jointly or cooperatively run schools. It is 
necessary to optimize the structure, improve the teaching 
content and methods, and raise educational quality, working 
efficiency, and the efficiency of running schools; actively 
implement nine-year compulsory education, pay attention to 
raising the school entrance rate of school-age children in the 
poverty-stricken areas, reduce the number of dropouts, and 
gradually wipe out illiteracy among young people and people in 
the prime of life. Active efforts should be made to develop 
vocational education, adult education, and special education, 
pay attention to training on science, technology and 
professional skills among workers and peasants, and enhance the 
scientific, technological, and cultural quality of all laborers. 
In higher education, we should regard internal upgrading as the 
main task and run more schools to cultivate more good and 
qualified specialized personnel. We should conscientiously 
implement the "teachers' law," raise the quality and status of 
teachers, gradually improve their working and living conditions, 
and allow no delay of wages for teachers. We should strengthen 
management and check the unhealthy trend of unwarranted pooling 
of funds, arbitrary requisition of donations and exaction of 
fees. 
  H. We should strictly control population growth and 
strengthen environment protection and land management. 
  It is necessary to unswervingly grasp the three basic 
national policies and unceasingly make new progress in this 
aspect. Continued efforts should be made to firmly grasp family 
planning work, conscientiously implement the principle of 
"paying main attention to propaganda and education, to regular 
work, and to contraception," strictly implement the system of 
assuming responsibility over the management of the population 
target, strengthen the management of family planning of rural 
population and transients, promote healthy births and healthy 
upbringing, control population, and raise the population 
quality. We should enhance the sense of environment of all the 
people, strictly enforce environmental protection laws and 
regulations, perfect the responsibility system, and strengthen 
supervision and inspection. Continued efforts should be made to 
implement the principle of "simultaneously designing, building 
and putting into operation the main construction project and 
pollution prevention facilities," accelerate the disposal of 
"three industrial wastes," improve the key polluted areas and 
the polluted sources in the southern four lakes, Xiaoqing He, 
and Dongping Lake, pay attention to resolving the air pollution 
problems in Jinan and other major cities, and attend to 
preventing and disposing inshore pollution. We should 
comprehensively improve the urban and rural environment, do a 
good job in protecting and using water and soil resources, 
firmly grasp tree planting and afforestation, guard against soil 
erosion, strengthen the building and development of nature 
reserves, and further improve the ecological environment. It is 
necessary to earnestly implement the "land management law," 
reform the land utilization system, cultivate and standardize 
the land market, realistically manage and use the land well, and 
forbid the arbitrary occupation of cultivated land. 
  4. Press Package Reform Forward, Make Breakthroughs in 
Major Areas, and Accelerate the Establishment of a Socialist 
Market Economic Structure 
  Reform constitutes the biggest motivation to accelerate 
development. The third plenary session of the 14th CPC Central 
Committee adopted the "decision on some issues concerning the 
establishment of a socialist market economic structure" and 
sketched the basic framework and development process for the new 
structure. This indicates that the reform has entered the stage 
of resolving the most difficult problems for the establishment 
of the new structure. Located in the coastal area, with a 
relatively good economic foundation, Shandong is one of China's 
key areas opened to the outside world, and thus it also has the 
conditions necessary to establish the basic framework of the 
socialist market economic structure in advance. This year, a 
key year for the establishment of the new structure, the central 
authorities have decided to set forth a series of major reform 
measures that are unprecedented in depth, scale, and dynamics. 
Profoundly implementing the central authorities' "decision" and 
the provincial party committee's "opinions on implementing the 
decision" and energetically pressing forward all items of reform 
are the most important tasks for the government work this year. 
All levels of governments in the province should further 
enhance the sense of responsibility and the sense of urgency, 
combine the package reform with the breakthroughs in key areas, 
seek unity in understanding and actions, and do a solid job to 
win victory in reform. 
  A. Enterprise Reform 
  Enterprise reform is the core of the reform as a whole. The 
orientation of enterprise reform is to establish a modern 
enterprise system that meets the essential requirements of the 
market economy and in which the property rights, as well as the 
rights and responsibilities of enterprises, are clearly defined, 
government administration and enterprise management are 
separated, and scientific management is established. This year, 
we should continue to conscientiously implement the "enterprise 
law," the "regulations," the "general rule on financial affairs 
of enterprises," and the "criterion for accounting of 
enterprises." We should strive to make breakthroughs in 
changing the operational mechanism of enterprises. 
  The reform of property right system constitutes the major 
foundation for the establishment of the modern enterprise 
system. We should gradually bring the relations of property 
rights of state-owned enterprises into better balance. In line 
with the principles of state ownership, graded administration, 
division of work and supervision, and enterprise management, we 
should make an inventory and check of the stockpiles and capital 
of enterprises, define property rights, appraise assets, clarify 
debts receivable and debts payable, and verify the property 
shared by enterprises as legal entities. We should establish 
and perfect the state-owned property management organs and 
experiment on the system of appointing someone to assume 
responsibility for management of assets and appointing someone 
to supervise the management of assets. We should positively 
explore reasonable forms and effective ways to manage and 
operate state-owned assets with a view to changing the poor 
management and plugging losses of state-owned assets and to 
maintaining and adding the value of the assets. 
  We should positively explore specific ways to establish the 
modern enterprise system. In accordance with the "enterprise 
law," we should turn state-owned enterprises, large and 
medium-sized enterprises in particular, into corporations in 
groups and by stages. The enterprises with the nature of 
monopoly can be reorganized as the state-owned wholly invested 
limited-liability corporations. Most enterprises of competitive 
trades can be reorganized as the limited-liability corporations 
whose shares are owned by the state and by several other legal 
entities. We should choose a small number of large and 
medium-sized enterprises that net more profits and conform to 
the industrial policy, and then directly reorganize them as 
limited-liability companies whose shares are purchased by the 
state. This year, the province will choose 50 enterprises to 
try out the modern enterprise system. At the same time, the 
province will continue to profoundly carry out and perfect the 
reform of labor, employment, and distribution systems and expand 
the scale of the experiments for the shareholding system. Among 
small state-owned enterprises, the shareholding cooperative 
system should be popularized. Some small state-owned 
enterprises can be reorganized through the methods of 
incorporation, leasing, and auctioning. A small number of 
enterprises that have no possibility of halting deficits and 
whose assets cannot cover their debts can be declared bankrupt 
according to law. The enterprises initiated from now on should 
all carry out new operational mechanism according to new 
standards. 
  In the course of persistently regarding the publicly owned 
economy as the mainstay, we should continue to encourage the 
free development of the individual, private, and cooperative 
sectors of the economy and create a social environment 
characterized with equal competition and common development for 
all sectors of the economy in the fields of policy, law, and 
media. 
  B. Reform of the Financial and Tax Systems 
  Changing the revenue responsibility system into a 
revenue-sharing system to suit the needs of the socialist market 
economy will help bring into better balance the relations 
between the state, the localities, and the enterprises in terms 
of distribution and will also change Shandong's financial 
capacity and structure. All levels should take the overall 
situation into account and facilitate the reform of the 
financial and tax systems in an active and prudent manner. 
  We should further clarify the financial authority of the 
province and cities and prefectures and establish a new revenue 
distribution system compatible with Shandong's reality. In 
compliance with the central authorities' basic principles for 
and requirements on the provincial financial system, we should 
unify the provincial methods for revenue division and transfer 
payment of tax revenues and strengthen the provincial-level 
necessary macroeconomic regulating and controlling capacity to 
boost the enthusiasm of all localities for increasing revenues 
and reducing expenditures. To build the basic framework of the 
revenue-sharing system in an active and prudent manner, we will 
implement the old and the new systems simultaneously this year, 
continuing the subsidies, delivery to higher authorities, and 
some final accountings of the original system to maintain the 
vested interest of various sectors. Regarding the tax categories 
of the province, as well as cities and prefectures, the original 
pattern will basically remain unchanged except for the revenues 
to be handed over to the central authorities so that the 
province, as well as cities and prefectures, will have their own 
major tax categories and all levels will have steadily 
increasing sources of revenues. 
  We should facilitate the reform of the tax system in an 
active and prudent manner and enhance the tax regulating and 
controlling function. We should implement the principle of 
"unifying tax laws, levying taxes fairly, simplifying the tax 
system, and sharing power in a rational manner," conscientiously 
enforce the state's tax laws and regulations, and use the local 
tax legislation authority to establish a local tax collection 
system conducive to economic development. We should improve the 
tax collection and management work, actively popularize the tax 
payment report system and tax affairs agent system, and 
establish a strict auditing system. In line with the principle 
of stabilizing the contingent and helping the development of 
undertakings, we should do a good job in establishing branch 
offices of tax organizations and establish a management system 
under which sate and local tax organizations coordinate and 
closely cooperate with each other. 
  Beginning this year, all state-owned enterprises should 
implement the new profit distribution system. A good job should 
be done in linking it with the contract system, and transitional 
methods should be applied to the enterprises whose contracts 
have not expired. We should formulate new policies to help 
enterprises handle their hidden deficits and get rid of their 
burdens. 
  C. Reform of the Banking System 
  A success in the banking work is very important to 
Shandong's 
economic development. Governments at all levels should support 
and coordinate with the reform of the banking system, establish 
the new banking system more rapidly, and effectively distribute 
and flexibly lend funds. Implementation of the credit policy 
should be combined with that of industrial policy, and all 
monetary organizations should be guided to arrange and use 
credit funds focusing on Shandong's economic development plan 
and priorities and in a rational manner, to speed up the 
turnover of funds, and to achieve unity in their own benefits 
and social benefits. We should strive for establishment of 
branch offices of relevant state monetary departments and 
establishment of foreign-funded banks in Shandong Province. We 
should make active efforts to organize urban and rural local 
cooperative banks. Based on rural credit cooperatives, we 
should first organize county joint cooperatives and then 
gradually build rural shareholding cooperative banks. Based on 
urban credit cooperatives, we should organize central 
cooperatives and then build urban cooperative banks group after 
group at different times. Cities and prefectures where 
conditions permit may carry out this work ahead of others. We 
should attach importance to and develop the role of commercial 
insurance and establish specialized and regional institutions to 
promote beneficial competition. We should improve local 
money-lending institutions, enhance their money- lending 
capacity, expand and improve the security and bond trading 
markets, and establish a complete money market system as soon as 
possible. In the reform of foreign exchange management, we 
should adopt effective measures to successfully regulate, 
collect, and use foreign exchange and use it on a priority basis 
in key construction projects, key technical transformation 
projects, agriculture- oriented projects, and scientific and 
technological projects. We should step up efforts to establish 
a new system of debt repayment funds to ensure timely repayment 
of foreign debts. 
  D. Reform of the Investment Structure 
  We should bring into full play the market mechanism's 
functions in the investment spheres and comprehensively 
implement the principle that "whoever makes investment and makes 
policy decisions should take risks." We should scientifically 
divide the rights to handling the investment affairs among the 
province, the city, prefectural, and county governments, and 
enterprises. According to the projects' economic results and 
social benefits, we should define the main body of investment 
and the forms to circulate capital. The basic projects should 
mainly be invested by the governments in the form of collecting 
funds. The province should assume sole responsibility for the 
construction of transregional large key infrastructural 
facilities and basic industries that are related to the overall 
situation. The prefectural, city, and county governments should 
collect funds to build the projects for themselves. The 
province should appropriately give subsidies to the economically 
underdeveloped areas. The public welfare projects that belong 
to the province should be undertaken by the province. Each 
level should undertake the projects of its own level. 
Enterprises play a key role in making investment in competitive 
projects, have decisionmaking power, and take risks by 
themselves. From now on, legal persons should be defined for 
construction projects. The legal persons should assume 
responsibility for the entire process of making plans for 
projects, making investment, organizing construction, engaging 
in production and management, and returning loans and run risks 
for investment. According to the requirements for optimizing 
structures, developing leading industries, and cultivating 
financial resources and on the basis of scientific appraisals, 
we should select the projects with competitiveness, make 
positive efforts to gain state investment out of policy 
consideration, and attract investment by commercial banks. 
  E. Reform of the Foreign Trade System 
  According to the orientation of unified policies, 
decentralized management, equal competition, sole responsibility 
for profits and losses, combination of industry and trade, and 
implementation of the system whereby foreign trade corporations 
act as agents for other enterprises, we should set up, 
step-by-step, a new-typed foreign economic and trade system 
suitable to the development of the market economy and the 
international provisional regulations. It is necessary to 
reform the import and export management system, the system of 
issuing fixed quotas of licenses, and various examination and 
approval systems. We should strive to have increasingly more 
production and circulation enterprises gain external management 
rights; and set up a multilayered, multichanneled, and all- 
directional foreign trade pattern. We should set up an export 
encouragement mechanism, extensively carry out the method of 
"wages involving U.S. dollars," link distribution with foreign 
exchange earnings and economic results, and encourage to export 
more and create more foreign exchange. According to the ideas 
of institutionalization, industrialization, and 
internationalization, foreign trade enterprises should 
accelerate the implementation of the shareholding system and 
organize, as soon as possible, a large number of export-oriented 
enterprise groups. We should gradually reform the method of 
management of overseas enterprises, internationalize the 
circulation of capital, localize the management, and develop 
various professions. It is necessary to set up the export 
development fund, the risk-running fund, and the overseas 
enterprise development fund; and to promote a stable increase in 
creating foreign exchange through exports. 
  F. Price Reform 
  On the premise of maintaining a relative stability of the 
general goods prices and according to the principle of linking 
readjustment with decontrol, we should positively and steadily 
carry out the price reform and set up a perfect price mechanism 
mainly formed by markets. This year, we should emphatically 
reform the prices of energy resources and farm products, reduce 
the scale of prices fixed by the governments, and balance the 
prices of the small number of commodities whose prices are fixed 
by the governments and service charges. We should strictly 
enforce the price discipline and carefully organize forces to 
implement the items on price reforms as arranged by the central 
authorities. No levels are allowed to raise prices or charges. 
We should try as soon as possible to stagger the time to 
implement the price reform measures formulated by the province, 
cities, and prefectures and by the central authorities to reduce 
social repercussions. As for the important commodities that 
have a bearing on the people's daily lives, we should set up a 
perfect storage system, a risk-running price fund system, and a 
regulation fund system to stabilize the prices of these 
commodities. We should intensify the monitoring of the general 
market price tendency and the prices of the people's basic daily 
necessities and the major farm products, strictly investigate 
and handle the units and individuals that wantonly raise prices 
and collect fees and charges, and realistically protect the 
legal rights and benefits of enterprises and the broad masses of 
consumers. 
  G. Reform of the Housing System 
  We should reform the old housing investment and distribution 
system and accelerate the pace of commercializing and 
socializing houses. This year we should give simultaneous 
attention to selling, renting, and building houses, enlarge the 
degree of reform on rent, and comprehensively promote the 
housing public accumulation fund system. Positive and reliable 
steps should be taken to sell public houses, rationally set the 
prices in line with the economic capacity of normal families, 
sell houses at a standard price, and gradually effect the 
transition of selling houses at a low-profit price. We should 
strictly implement the unified stipulations of the central and 
provincial authorities and prevent and check the practice of 
selling houses at a low price. It is necessary to raise the 
proportion of expenditure on rent of family income and gradually 
make the burden of rent approach or attain a rational level. 
Efforts should be made to comprehensively promote the housing 
public accumulation fund system and establish relevant 
management organs. All administrative units, enterprises, and 
institutions and their staff and workers should pay housing 
public accumulation funds in line with the principle of "saving 
funds personally with housing allowances from their own units 
and placing these funds under unified management for special 
use." We should pay attention to developing and building 
economy and useful houses and solve the housing problems of 
staff and workers with an average income. 
  H. Change of Government Functions and Organizational Reform 
  It is necessary to improve the relationship between the 
governments and enterprises in line with the principle of 
separating government functions from enterprise management. 
Governments should delegate the functions which are within the 
scope of operational decisionmaking power to enterprises, shift 
the functions of resources allocation to the market, delegate 
some social service and supervisory functions to intermediary 
organs in the course of conducting economic activities, and make 
public and standardize and institutionalize the administrative 
functions and the examination and approval functions which they 
have retained. Governments at all levels should be good at 
applying economic, legal, and essential administrative means to 
manage the economy and social affairs, shift their main energy 
to macroeconomic regulation and control and overall 
coordination, to the building of infrastructure facilities, the 
establishment of social guarantee system, and the creation of a 
good development environment, and enhance their ability to 
control the market. This year, on the basis of consolidating 
the achievements of county and township organizational reform, 
we should comprehensively complete the provincial, city, and 
prefectural organizational reform and gradually implement the 
public service system. Through organizational reform, we may 
initially establish an applicable and highly efficient 
administrative management system with comprehensive functions, 
rational structure, and coordinated operation, and can promote 
the development of the socialist market economy in the province. 
  Under the new situation in which the market economic system 
is being accelerated, rapidly establishing and improving a 
multilayered socialist guarantee system is of great significance 
in promoting reform and development and maintaining social 
stability. In line with the current development of productive 
forces and our province's actual situation, we should fully 
mobilize the enthusiasm of all sectors according to the basic 
principle of "unified leadership, division of responsibility, 
each performing their own duties, and service throughout the 
whole course," and accelerate the establishment and improvement 
of the social guarantee system with enterprise labor insurance, 
rural old-age pension insurance, and social security insurance 
of organs, institutions, and units as the main aspect. 
Governments at all levels should accelerate the change of 
functions and render all sorts of support services; departments 
concerned should actively coordinate with the governments, 
maintain close cooperation with them, pay attention to working 
efficiency, build our province's social guarantee system in a 
coordinated way, and gradually standardize and improve it to 
ensure its sound operation. 
  Fellow deputies: This year's reform degree will be big, the 
scope will be large, and the reform work will be carried out in 
a concentrated manner. It will involve the readjustment of 
interests, classification of powers, the creation of new 
systems, and other in- depth major issues. All levels should 
fully understand the necessity, urgency, and arduousness of 
reform, thoroughly study the guidelines, conduct propaganda and 
mobilization, pay close attention to the new situation and solve 
new problems in our work, strengthen leadership, and carry out 
reform carefully. As long as we persist in emancipating the 
mind, seek truth from facts, do experiments boldly, and work 
diligently, we will surely fulfill all reform tasks and make a 
decisive step in the course of building the socialist market 
economic structure. 
  5. We Should Persistently Attend to and Be Competent in Two 
Tasks Simultaneously, and Achieve Success in Building the 
Spiritual Civilization and Building the Government Itself 
  The socialist spiritual civilization is an important 
characteristic of the socialist modernization and an important 
guarantee for the healthy development of reform, opening up, and 
economic construction. The more we accelerate reform, opening 
up, and economic development, the more we should promote the 
socialist spiritual civilization and build the government well. 
We should let the principle of attending to and being competent 
in these two tasks simultaneously be manifest in the entire 
process of the modernization drive, in all trades and 
professions, and in all our specific work. 
  A. We should persistently arm the vast number of cadres and 
the masses with the theory of building socialism with Chinese 
characteristics. 
  Comrade Deng Xiaoping's theory of building socialism with 
Chinese characteristics is the spiritual pillar of the entire 
party and the people across the country and a powerful 
ideological weapon to continuously facilitate reform, opening 
up, and the modernization drive. Arming the vast number of 
cadres and the masses with this theory is a strategic task of 
far-reaching significance. At present, we should adopt various 
measures to extensively organize cadres and the masses to study 
well the third volume of the "Selected Works of Deng Xiaoping," 
conscientiously read it in the original, and master its essence 
to guide our work practice. Leading comrades at all levels 
should take the lead in studying it well. We should do a good 
job in studying the theories on the socialist market economy and 
studying scientific and general knowledge to further emancipate 
our minds and update our ideas. Aiming at training 
socialist-minded people who have lofty ideals and moral 
characters and who are better educated and well-disciplined, we 
should strengthen the ideological and political work in the new 
situation, intensify the education on the party's basic line and 
on patriotism, collectivism, and socialism, carry out extensive 
activities to learn from heroes and models, attach importance to 
improving social morality and professional ethics, educate 
cadres and the masses to embrace correct outlook on life and 
value, develop healthy trends, eliminate evil trends, and 
establish good social conduct. 
  B. We should actively promote socialist democracy and legal 
system. 
  We should fully develop democracy and exert continuous 
efforts to make our policy making more scientific and 
democratic. Governments at all levels should earnestly subject 
themselves to the supervision of people's congresses and their 
standing committees and the supervision of the masses. They 
should further develop the role of CPPCC, democratic parties, 
and personages without party affiliation in political 
consultation and democratic supervision, attach importance to 
the role of trade unions, Communist Youth League, women's 
federations, and other mass organizations as bridges and 
channels, and achieve success in the nationalities and religious 
work. They should formulate and implement major policies, 
adhere to the mass line, and extensively give heed to the 
opinions of all circles of society. They should continue the 
system of "making work procedures and work results public to the 
scrutiny of the masses" and do a good job in the democratic 
appraisal of government personnel. They should handle well in a 
serious and responsible manner the suggestions, criticisms, and 
opinions of people's congress deputies and motions of the CPPCC 
and improve the quality in handling them. They should attach 
importance to people's letters and visits and address well the 
hot issues and difficulties that concern their vital interests. 
  We should persist in ruling the province according to law, 
improve the socialist legal system, and legally codify and 
standardize the management of economic and social affairs 
step-by- step. We should strengthen legislation work and 
improve local laws and regulations in compliance with the 
objective requirements of the development of the market economy. 
At present, we should particularly speed up establishment of 
the laws designed to standardize the mainstay of the market, 
safeguard the market order, improve and strengthen macroeconomic 
regulation and control, and improve social security. We should 
strictly enforce laws, establish and improve the system to 
supervise law enforcement by administrative departments and the 
intermediary legal service institutions, do a good job in 
disseminating and publicizing the knowledge on laws, enhance all 
the people's sense of respect for the legal system, and make 
sure that laws are abided by and strictly enforced and law 
violations are dealt with. We should strengthen grass-roots 
political power, improve the neighborhood and villagers' 
autonomous organizations, establish systems according to law, 
rule according to systems, run villages, plants, and schools in 
a democratic manner, and ensure people's rights as masters. 
  Governments at all levels and their personnel should take 
the initiative in studying, mastering, and applying laws, 
persist in handling administrative work according to law, learn 
to use the legal means to manage economic and social affairs, 
work in strict accordance with the law, and resolutely deal with 
and correct law and discipline breaches. We should do a better 
job in the education on national defense to enhance people's 
sense of state security, carry out in-depth activities to 
support the Army and give preferential treatment to families of 
revolutionary martyrs and servicemen and to build civilized 
units by the Army and civilians together, support the endeavor 
to build a regular and modern Army, achieve success in the 
militia and reserve service work, and consolidate and develop 
the Army-government and Army-civilian relations in the new 
situation. 
  C. We should attach importance to and achieve success in 
cultural, public health, and sports work. 
  We should accelerate the development of cultural 
undertakings 
to enrich the people's spiritual and cultural life. We should 
adhere to the orientation of "serving socialism and serving the 
people" and the principle of "letting a hundred flowers blossom 
and a hundred schools of thought contend" and establish more 
quickly a new system for cultural management that conforms to 
the market economy. We should improve the development plans for 
cultural undertakings and pay attention to construction of key 
facilities. We should correctly handle the relations between 
social benefits and economic benefits, put social benefits 
first, advocate the main melody of this era, train outstanding 
personnel, and greatly make art production flourish. We should 
actively develop the cultural undertakings of enterprises, 
school campuses, and communities. Taking advantage of the 
satellite relay of radio and television programs, we should step 
up construction of rural radio and television networks, expand 
their coverage, raise the quality of programs, and make 
propaganda more effective. We should intensify the construction 
and management of cultural markets, improve policies and laws, 
build a good contingent, and resolutely check and eliminate 
spiritual garbage. 
  We should implement the principle of prevention first and 
combination of traditional Chinese medicine with Western 
medicine, develop public health undertakings, and improve 
medical service. We should intensify construction of medical 
facilities, improve the medical service networks at various 
levels, and strive to alleviate people's difficulty in receiving 
medical service. We should attach importance to the technical 
training and professional ethics of medical personnel and 
conscientiously correct unhealthy trends. We should carry out 
extensive a mass patriotic public health campaign, continue to 
put the focus of medical care and public health on rural areas, 
replenish grass-roots medical personnel, improve the means of 
medical service, and actively develop rural cooperative medical 
service. 
  The development of sports is the overall reflection of our 
levels of the two civilizations. We should extensively carry 
out physical culture and sports to improve people's physique. 
We should give particular attention to competitive sports, 
reform the training, contest, and management systems, and 
improve the mechanisms of competition, encouragement, and 
restraint to make able persons step up and unable ones step 
down. We should strengthen scientific and technological joint 
research on sports and sports service, manage sports teams 
strictly, do a good job in ideological and political work, 
cultivate the work styles characterized by indomitable efforts 
and courage to fight tough battles and win championships, 
upgrade the level of competitive sports as soon as possible, and 
regain the magnificent bearing of "Shandong big fellows" and 
Shandong sports. 
  D. We should continue to strengthen comprehensive management 
of public security. 
  We should correctly distinguish and properly handle the 
contradictions among the people emerging in the new situation, 
stimulate the enthusiasm of all quarters, and turn negative 
factors into positive ones. We should strengthen the function 
of people's democratic dictatorship, strictly implement the 
leadership responsibility system in the comprehensive management 
of public security, combine the efforts of special organs and 
the masses, crack down on and prevent crimes simultaneously, 
adopt both stopgap and radical measures, deal strict blows to 
criminal and economic offenses according to law, and, in 
particular, resolutely crack down on and never be softhearted 
toward smuggling and sales of smuggled goods, abduction and 
trade of women and children, drug abuse and trafficking, 
prostitution and patronage of prostitutes, and other ugly 
phenomena that disrupt social order and undermine social 
conduct. We should wage special struggles to particularly 
tackle the criminal activities and public security problems at 
which the masses are strongly indignant. Major and serious 
cases should be strictly and promptly investigated and handled 
according to law. To achieve success in the comprehensive 
management of public security, we should rely on the masses and 
make persistent efforts to resolve contradictions while they are 
still at the grass-roots levels, still within departments, and 
still in the bud. We should replenish and rectify public 
security, procuratorial, and judicial contingents, standardize 
their law-enforcing activities, upgrade their quality, and 
improve their means so that we will serve reform and 
construction better and make sure that people live and work in 
peace and contentment. 
  E. Anticorruption campaign should be launched profoundly, 
persistently, and more effectively. 
  The anticorruption campaign is a major matter bearing on the 
future and destiny of the state, and thus it should not be 
neglected at the slightest degree. The objectives for 
anticorruption work set forth by the central and the provincial 
party committees must be fulfilled so that the government will 
win confidence among the people. All corrupt elements, whatever 
their ranks are and no matter who they are, should be 
investigated seriously and punished resolutely according to 
party discipline and state laws. While deepening the reform, we 
should pay attention to establishing regulations and systems, as 
well as effective supervisory and controlling mechanisms, to 
root out the soil that may cause corruption. Leading comrades 
at all levels should take the lead in maintaining honesty and 
being strict with themselves, should set an example for 
enforcing relevant regulations, and should, beginning with 
provincial-level organs, resolutely ban all sorts of unhealthy 
trends, such as unwarranted pooling of funds, arbitrary 
requisition of donations, exaction of fees from enterprises, 
tour at public expenses, and wining and dining at public 
expenses. With the idea of long-term fighting, we should 
persistently and unremittingly oppose corruption and maintain 
administrative honesty in the whole process of reform, opening 
up, and development of the market economy. 
  F. Self-construction of the government should be stressed. 
  New situation and tasks set even higher demands on 
self-construction of the government. Governments at all levels 
should further carry forward the "three major styles of work," 
namely, integrating theory with practice, maintaining close ties 
with the masses, and conducting criticism and self-criticism, 
and should strive to "make innovations of reform, be honest and 
diligent, work hard in unity, and render high-efficient service" 
in order to make new progress in building of ideology and style 
of work. First, the practice of study should be encouraged 
energetically. Leading cadres at all levels should every year 
schedule a considerable period of time to go deep into the 
grass-roots areas, particularly the places with more 
difficulties and problems, to conduct investigation and study 
and resolve problems simultaneously. Leading cadres should 
conduct forecasting in advance, be circumspect and resolute, and 
strive to improve their expertise of policy making and the 
quality of their work. Second, efforts should be made to 
maintain even closer ties with the grass roots and the masses. 
Leadership and administration should be combined with service. 
Governments at all levels should wholeheartedly depend on the 
working class, respect the pioneering spirit of the masses, 
firmly embrace the mass concept, care for the weal and woe of 
the masses, listen to the voice of the masses, and bear in mind 
the production, lives, and wills of the masses. For the people 
without enough food and clothes, for the workers of the 
enterprises whose production has stopped partly or completely, 
and for the retired persons with low income, special care and 
regular visits should be given, and effective measures should be 
adopted to resolve their problems. Third, practical work should 
be ensured. Governments at all levels should actually change 
their style of work, extricate themselves from tedious social 
intercourse, guard against formalism, subjectivism, and 
bureaucratism, and perfect the system concerning enforcement of 
and supervision over policy decisions and the feedback system. 
Fourth, governments at all levels should seek truth from facts, 
tell the truth, do tangible things, strive for practical 
results, report both good and bad news, oppose boasting and 
making false reports, and be responsible for both higher levels 
and the masses. Fifth, the concept of the whole should be 
enhanced, and discipline should be enforced strictly to ensure 
the smooth implementation of policies, decrees, and prohibitions. 
  Fellow deputies: In this new year, we should accelerate the 
pace of reform, opening up, and modernization and successfully 
fulfill all the tasks. Thus, our duties are glorious but 
arduous. Let us closely rally around the party Central 
Committee with Comrade Jiang emin as the core, hold high the 
great banner of building socialism with Chinese characteristics, 
emancipate the mind, seek truth from facts, enhance morale, and 
bravely pioneer the road under the leadership of the provincial 
party committee in order to constantly win a new and even 
greater victory in reform, opening up, and modernization. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-1867 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "drchi064_b_94002" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-CHI-94-064 </AU>
Daily Report 
<DATE1>  2 Apr 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> United States &amp; Canada </F>
<H3> <TI>   Reportage on Cyrus Vance Visit </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Reportage on Cyrus Vance Visit </PHRASE></F></HT>
<H4>    Further on Li Peng Meeting </H4>

<F P=102> OW0204125794 Beijing XINHUA Domestic Service in Chinese 0912 
GMT 2 Apr 94 </F>

<F P=103> OW0204125794 </F>
<F P=104>  Beijing XINHUA Domestic Service </F>
<F P=105>  Chinese </F>


<TEXT>
BFN 

<F P=106> [By reporter Zhang Yijun (1728 4135 0193)] </F>
  [Text] Beijing, 2 Apr (XINHUA) -- When meeting with Cyrus 
Vance, former U.S. secretary of state, and his party at 
Zhongnanhai this morning, State Council Premier Li Peng said: 
Improving and developing Sino-U.S. relations is favorable to 
economic cooperation between the two countries. 
  Li Peng said China attaches great importance to Sino-U.S. 
relations and expressed the hope that relations between the two 
countries will develop toward a good direction [hao de fang 
xiang 1170 4104 2455 0686]. He said: As China and the United 
States are two big and influential countries, statesmen of the 
two countries should look toward the future and the 21st century 
when handling bilateral relations. 
  Li Peng said: China and the United States are very strongly 
complementary to each other economically [jing ji hu bu xing hen 
qiang 4842 3444 0062 5943 1840 1771 1730]. The United States 
has a very strong economic force and leads the world in the 
fields of high technology and infrastructures, while China 
enjoys sustained economic growth and has a vast market, rich 
labor force resource, and fairly strong technical force. There 
are bright prospects for Sino-U. S. multiform economic and 
technological cooperation. 
  He said: "We are pleased to see that many large U.S. 
corporations have recently submitted tenders in China. They are 
very enthusiastic about participating in China's infrastructures 
constructions." 
  Li Peng said: If Sino-U.S. relations were to continually 
improve and develop, this would undoubtedly [wu yi 2477 3992] be 
very favorable for U.S. enterprises to expand their business in 
China. 
  At the guest's request, Li Peng gave a briefing on the 
progress of reform of China's taxation system, policies for 
attracting foreign funds, the role played by the People's Bank 
of China as a central bank, and how interest rates are fixed. 
  Vance said he was very pleased to have the opportunity to 
visit China again. He said he personally saw the tremendous 
changes in Beijing on his arrival. 
  Vance will revisit Shanghai, where he visited in 1984. He 
believed there would be even greater development and prosperity 
over there. 
  Vance said that to his knowledge, President Clinton attaches 
great importance to establishing a stable and healthy 
relationship with China. He believed there would be further 
development of the mutually beneficial Sino-U.S. cooperation in 
various fields. 
  Li Peng said: The doors leading to China were opened when 
the Republican Party was in power while diplomatic relations 
were established under the rule of the Democratic Party. "We 
have many friends in both parties." 
  Vance said: The United States will work to develop relations 
with China no matter which party is in power. This is a 
unanimous point. 
  The meeting was held in a warm and friendly atmosphere. 
Premier Li Peng's wife Zhu Lin, Mrs Vance, and former U.S. 
deputy secretary of state Whitehead and his wife were present at 
the meeting. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-1868 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "drchi064_b_94003" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-CHI-94-064 </AU>
Daily Report 
<DATE1>  1 Apr 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> United States &amp; Canada </F>
<H3> <TI>   Reportage on Cyrus Vance Visit </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Reportage on Cyrus Vance Visit </PHRASE></F></HT>
<H4>    Talks With Qiao Shi </H4>

<F P=102> OW0104120594 Beijing XINHUA in English 1143 GMT 1 Apr 94 </F>
<F P=103> OW0104120594 </F>
<F P=104>  Beijing XINHUA </F>
<F P=105>  English </F>


<TEXT>
BFN 

  [Text] Beijing, April 1 (XINHUA) -- Top Chinese legislator 
Qiao Shi met Cyrus Vance, former U.S. secretary of state, this 
afternoon in the Great Hall of the People. 
  In the meeting Qiao, chairman of the Standing Committee of 
the Chinese National People's Congress (NPC), said that the NPC 
plays a major role in the country's legislation. 
  China is accelerating its pace of legislation and the NPC is 
playing an important role in this regard, Qiao said. The NPC is 
focusing on economic legislation, which he said is necessary for 
the building and development of a socialist market economy. 
  Vance said he had taken note of the NPC's efforts in 
building 
China's legal system, and the United States can benefit from 
China's experience in this regard. 
  Qiao extended a welcome to Vance on his current visit to 
China and expressed appreciation for the efforts Vance made for 
the establishment and development of Sino-U.S. diplomatic ties 
while serving as state secretary in the Carter administration. 
  Qiao said that China and the United States should strengthen 
their cooperation and maintain a sound relationship which would 
not only be in line with the fundamental interests and common 
desire of both peoples but also be beneficial to the peace, 
stability and prosperity of the Asia-Pacific region and the 
world as a whole. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-1869 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "drchi064_b_94004" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-CHI-94-064 </AU>
Daily Report 
<DATE1>  4 Apr 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> United States &amp; Canada </F>
<H3> <TI>   Li Lanqing Meets U.S. Business Delegation </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Li Lanqing Meets U.S. Business Delegation </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   OW0404084494 Beijing XINHUA in English 0810 GMT 4 Apr 94 </F>
<F P=103> OW0404084494 </F>
<F P=104>  Beijing XINHUA </F>
<F P=105>  English </F>


<TEXT>
BFN 

  [Text] Beijing, April 4 (XINHUA) -- Chinese Vice-Premier Li 
Lanqing met with Whitney MacMillan, chairman of the board and 
chief executive officer of the U.S. Cargill Incorporated, and 
his party here this afternoon. 
  MacMillan and his party arrived here yesterday as guests of 
China National Cereals, Oils and Foodstuffs Import and Export 
Corporation. 
  Cargill Incorporated, founded in 1868, is now one of the 
largest trans-national companies in the world. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-1870 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "drchi064_b_94005" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-CHI-94-064 </AU>
Daily Report 
<DATE1>  2 Apr 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> United States &amp; Canada </F>
<H3> <TI>   Police Question WASHINGTON POST Correspondent 2 Apr </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Police Question WASHINGTON POST Correspondent 2 Apr </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   OW0204132094 Beijing XINHUA in English 1254 GMT 2 Apr 94 </F>
<F P=103> OW0204132094 </F>
<F P=104>  Beijing XINHUA </F>
<F P=105>  English </F>


<TEXT>
BFN 

  [Text] Beijing, April 2 (XINHUA) -- Lena H. Sun, a 
Beijing-based correspondent of the U.S. WASHINGTON POST, was 
questioned here this morning by Chinese police after taking 
photographs in a graveyard without having gone through necessary 
procedures. 
  She was intervened in line with China's relevant laws and 
regulations and was asked to abide by them. And she then left 
to resume her Beijing work, according to police sources. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-1871 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "drchi065_o_94005" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-CHI-94-065 </AU>
Daily Report 
<DATE1>  5 Apr 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> REGIONAL AFFAIRS </F>
<F P=101> East Region </F>
<H3> <TI>   Foreign Investment Said Crucial in Pudong </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Foreign Investment Said Crucial in Pudong </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   HK0404075594 Beijing CHINA DAILY (BUSINESS WEEKLY) in 
English 3-9 Apr 94 p 4 </F>

<F P=103> HK0404075594 </F>
<F P=104>  Beijing CHINA DAILY (BUSINESS WEEKLY) </F>
<F P=105>  English </F>


<TEXT>
BFN 

<F P=106> [By Zhang Yijun: "Overseas Financing Now Crucial to Pudong"] </F>
  [Text] With the country facing a shortage of capital, 
foreign investment is becoming more crucial in the development 
of the Pudong New Area in east Shanghai, a senior government 
official said recently. 
  According to Kang Huijun, director of the Pudong Economic 
and 
Trade Bureau, by the end of last year, Pudong had attracted 
foreign investment of $3.27 billion, 28 per cent more than all 
domestic investment. 
  By the end of last month, Pudong had registered 1,831 
foreign-funded projects, more than half of all those in the new 
area. 
  "If there weren't a lot of foreign funds flowing into the 
new 
area, it would be impossible for Pudong to ensure rapid economic 
growth," said Kang. 
  Kang also said that since the foreign-funded enterprises are 
established according to international practices, they will 
speed up the formation of a modern enterprise management system 
in Pudong. 
  According to Kang, Pudong has become the top place in China 
for foreign enterprises to invest. 
  Kang said Pudong approved 924 foreign-funded enterprises 
last 
year, and they involved foreign investment of $1.73 billion. 
  This year, Pudong will mainly attract investments from 
transnational corporations, according to Kang. 
  By the end of last year, 32 transnationals had invested in 
Pudong. 
  This year, the new area will strengthen the relationship 
with 
the top 102 transnationals in the United States and the top 100 
in Europe. 
  Kang expects nearly 20 multinational corporations to invest 
in Pudong. 
  Kang also said more and more foreign enterprises in Pudong 
will deal in service industries. 
  By the end of last year, nearly 42 percent of Pudong's 
foreign-funded corporations were engaged in service trades. 
  This year Pudong will focus on developing foreign-funded 
banks, insurance companies and finance companies. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-1872 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "drchi065_o_94006" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-CHI-94-065 </AU>
Daily Report 
<DATE1>  4 Apr 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> REGIONAL AFFAIRS </F>
<F P=101> East Region </F>
<H3> <TI>   Real Estate Spring Fair Opens in Shanghai </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Real Estate Spring Fair Opens in Shanghai </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   OW0404103994 Beijing XINHUA in English 1012 GMT 4 Apr 94 </F>
<F P=103> OW0404103994 </F>
<F P=104>  Beijing XINHUA </F>
<F P=105>  English </F>


<TEXT>
BFN 

  [Text] Shanghai, April 4 (XINHUA) -- The '94 Shanghai 
spring fair for the real estate business opened here today. 
  Sources said that housing with a collective total floor 
space 
of about 10 million square meters is on sale at the fair. 
  In recent years, the Shanghai real estate market has been 
going along healthily, under the macro control policies of the 
central government and since Shanghai Municipal Government 
decided to accelerate construction of commodity housing. 
  According to city government officials, this year will see a 
boom in residential housing construction. 
  There are also medium and low grade -- that is, cheaper -- 
commodity houses on sale to residents, at the fair. 
  The relevant departments have also set up consultancy 
counters to serve citizens on housing policies and guide them on 
buying and selling housing. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-1873 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "drchi065_o_94007" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-CHI-94-065 </AU>
Daily Report 
<DATE1>  4 Apr 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> REGIONAL AFFAIRS </F>
<F P=101> East Region </F>
<H3> <TI>   Infrastructure Attracts Investors to Zhejiang </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Infrastructure Attracts Investors to Zhejiang </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   OW0404142394 Beijing XINHUA in English 1344 GMT 4 Apr 94 </F>
<F P=103> OW0404142394 </F>
<F P=104>  Beijing XINHUA </F>
<F P=105>  English </F>


<TEXT>
BFN 

  [Text] Hangzhou, April 4 (XINHUA) -- Convenient 
communications and ample energy supplies have made East China's 
Zhejiang Province one of the best choices for discriminating 
foreign investors. 
  Thanks to its booming processing industry, which has enjoyed 
priority in development, the province has jumped up during the 
15-year reform drive to join the richest in the country. 
  But it found that further development was being hindered by 
poor infrastructures, which had been neglected for a long time. 
  In the past five years, with a strategic shift to capital 
construction, a great number of infrastructural projects have 
been completed. 
  Last year, nearly four billion yuan was poured into the 
field, 2.4 times as much as in the previous year and one-fifth 
of the province's fixed asset investment. 
  In the sphere of posts and telecommunications, the province 
has completed eight optic-fiber items and opened 13 new air mail 
routes. 
  Telephones installed in cities can be connected with both 
domestic lines and international lines. Portable phones and 
pagers have even appeared in remote towns. 
  Transportation often has a great effect on investors' 
decisions on where to invest their funds. 
  With dozens of projects having gone into operation in the 
province, more than 70 of Zhejiang's airlines [as received] are 
now carrying passengers to 20-odd cities at home and abroad, 
such as Beijing, Shanghai, Hong Kong and Tokyo. 
  Cargoes pass through the province's 58 ports, which link the 
province with over 50 countries and regions. 
  Apart from thermal power and hydropower, the province is set 
to make full use of other energy sources like wind, tides and 
nuclear power. 
  Qinshan nuclear power station, the first Chinese-designed 
and 
Chinese-built nuclear facility, is under construction in the 
province's Haiyan County. 
  Infrastructural facilities in the province will see a great 
improvement when a batch of projects on the drawing board are 
realized. 
  They include a hydropower station invested with two billion 
yuan, a freeway link-up with Shanghai and a railway from Jinhua 
city to Wenzhou city within the province. 
  In addition, the local government has joined hands with 
foreign partners to explore crude oil and natural gas in the 
east sea off Zhejiang's coast. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-1874 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "drchi065_o_94008" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-CHI-94-065 </AU>
Daily Report 
<DATE1>  4 Apr 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> REGIONAL AFFAIRS </F>
<F P=101> East Region </F>
<H3> <TI>   Zhejiang Industrial Output Increases by 40% </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Zhejiang Industrial Output Increases by 40% </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   OW0404092294 Beijing XINHUA in English 0644 GMT 4 Apr 94 </F>
<F P=103> OW0404092294 </F>
<F P=104>  Beijing XINHUA </F>
<F P=105>  English </F>


<TEXT>
BFN 

  [Text] Hangzhou, April 4 (XINHUA) -- The co-existence of 
the state-owned, collectively-owned and private sectors has 
enabled Zhejiang Province in east China to become increasingly 
prosperous. 
  An official of the provincial statistics bureau said that 
Zhejiang's value of industrial output shot up 40 percent in 1993 
to 87 billion yuan. 
  State-owned enterprises registered a 14-percent increase in 
output value, collectively-owned companies scored a 49 percent 
rise and private companies reported a 110 percent surge, he said. 
  He described foreign-funded businesses as a "newly emerging" 
economic sector in Zhejiang. 
  In 1993 the provincial authorities approved the setting up 
of 
4,487 foreign-funded businesses, up 92 percent over the previous 
year. Exports from operational foreign-funded businesses 
climbed nearly 65 percent in 1993 to 850 million U.S. dollars. 
  The official said that these businesses accounted for 19 
percent of Zhejiang's exports in 1993, up five percentage points. 
  Multi-economic sectors began to co-exist in the province in 
the late 1970s, he recalled. 
  Since then the ratio of the state-owned sector to Zhejiang's 
economy has dropped to 30 percent from 60 percent, while that of 
the collectively-owned sector grew to 60 percent from 40 percent 
and that of the private sector rose to 10 percent, he said. 
  Local economists said that the simultaneous growth of 
various 
sectors has led to intense competition, benefiting both 
consumers and manufacturers. 
  The co-existence of these sectors has also made it possible 
to rationalize the distribution of natural resources, they noted. 
  Township-run factories, a major component of the 
collectively-owned sector, have become a new driving force 
behind Zhejiang's economic expansion, one economist said. 
  Zhejiang now has 550,000 such factories, which produce 60 
percent of its industrial output value, he said. 
  Furthermore, the number of self-employed people reached 1.24 
million and that of private companies 19,400 at the end of 1993, 
he said. 
  These two sectors were virtually non-existent in Zhejiang 
before China initiated the policy of reform and opening to the 
outside world in 1979, he said. 
  The co-existence of various sectors has enabled populous yet 
resource-deficient Zhejiang to become a rising economic power in 
China, he explained. 
  For example, Zhejiang's gross domestic product -- the value 
of goods and services produced -- totaled 164.5 billion yuan in 
1993, almost matching that of Shanghai, China's leading 
manufacturing center. 
  The average per-capita income of rural residents in Zhejiang 
was 1,746 yuan last year, higher than any other province-level 
area in the country, he said. 
  Moreover, during the 1953-1978 period, when the state-owned 
sector dominated, Zhejiang's economy's grew at an annual rate of 
seven percent. 
  However, its economy has been growing at an annual rate of 
18 
percent since 1979, he said. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-1875 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "drchi065_a_94002" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-CHI-94-065 </AU>
Daily Report 
<DATE1>  4 Apr 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> INTERNATIONAL AFFAIRS </F>
<F P=101> General </F>
<H3> <TI>   UN Holds Training Course on Power Station Technologies </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    UN Holds Training Course on Power Station Technologies </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   OW0404140394 Beijing XINHUA in English 1318 GMT 4 Apr 94 </F>
<F P=103> OW0404140394 </F>
<F P=104>  Beijing XINHUA </F>
<F P=105>  English </F>


<TEXT>
BFN 

  [Text] Hangzhou, April 4 (XINHUA) -- A United 
Nations-sponsored training course on technologies of small 
hydropower stations started here today. 
  The two-month course has drawn more than 40 students from 20 
countries. 
  Small hydropower stations offer clean energy, and China has 
more than 60,000 such stations generating a total of 48.2 
billion kWh of electricity. 
  To date, 20 training courses have been held since the 
program 
was organized in Hangzhou, capital of East China's Zhejiang 
Province, in 1981. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-1876 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "drchi065_a_94003" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-CHI-94-065 </AU>
Daily Report 
<DATE1>  4 Apr 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> INTERNATIONAL AFFAIRS </F>
<F P=101> General </F>
<H3> <TI>   International Spark Program Symposium Opens in Hangzhou </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    International Spark Program Symposium Opens in Hangzhou </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   OW0404135694 Beijing XINHUA in English 1331 GMT 4 Apr 94 </F>
<F P=103> OW0404135694 </F>
<F P=104>  Beijing XINHUA </F>
<F P=105>  English </F>


<TEXT>
BFN 

  [Text] Hangzhou, April 4 (XINHUA) -- An international 
symposium on China's Spark Program and an exhibition featuring 
the program opened here today under the sponsorship of the 
United Nations Development Program (UNDP) and China. 
  More than 140 delegates from 18 developing nations including 
Pakistan, Thailand, Malaysia and Brazil and 17 of China's 
provinces, municipalities and autonomous regions as well as the 
UNDP and several Chinese ministries attended today's meeting. 
  The Spark Program, initiated in 1986, is part of the plan 
the 
Chinese Government has undertaken to boost the rural economy 
through science and technology. After eight years of effort, 
the program has covered 85 percent of China's counties. Some 
25,000 projects have achieved evident social and economic 
returns. 
  The symposium was held to explore possibilities and ways for 
rural economic and technological cooperation. The exhibition is 
also expected to help promote technology transfers, product 
exports and establishment of joint ventures. 
  Abebe Ambatchew and Romulo Garcia, two officials from the 
UNDP, praised the Spark Program highly, saying that the program 
has played a great role in boosting local economy through 
science and technology, and the experience can now be studied by 
other developing nations. 
  In addition, they say that the program has helped China in 
fighting against poverty, in environmental protection and in 
enhancing steady development of the rural economy. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-1877 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "drchi065_a_94004" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-CHI-94-065 </AU>
Daily Report 
<DATE1>  5 Apr 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> INTERNATIONAL AFFAIRS </F>
<F P=101> General </F>
<H3> <TI>   XINHUA Notes Paris Club Dissolved on 1 Apr </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    XINHUA Notes Paris Club Dissolved on 1 Apr </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   OW0504021194 Beijing XINHUA in English 0143 GMT 5 Apr 94 </F>
<F P=103> OW0504021194 </F>
<F P=104>  Beijing XINHUA </F>
<F P=105>  English </F>


<TEXT>
BFN 

  [Text] Bonn, April 4 (XINHUA) -- The Paris Committee 
(COCOM), founded 45 years ago to control Western exports to 
communist countries, has disbanded itself as from April 1 and 
will be replaced by a new organization this fall. 
  Local press reported that the decision was made at a recent 
meeting of the 17 member states of the committee, commonly known 
as the Paris Club. The committee included Japan, Australia and 
all NATO member countries except Iceland. 
  The Paris-based committee, which was also called 
Consultative 
Group Cooperation Committee, was the product of the Cold War and 
designed to control the East-West trade, especially export of 
"strategic" materials to communist nations. 
  Local reports said that the former COCOM member states will 
still maintain restrictions on their exports to Libya, Syria, 
Iran, Iraq, Cuba and the Democratic People's Republic of Korea. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-1878 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "drchi065_a_94005" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-CHI-94-065 </AU>
Daily Report 
<DATE1>  5 Apr 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> INTERNATIONAL AFFAIRS </F>
<F P=101> General </F>
<H3> <TI>   XINHUA on U.S. Comments on Rescuing Gorazde by Force </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    XINHUA on U.S. Comments on Rescuing Gorazde by Force </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   OW0504021994 Beijing XINHUA in English 0130 GMT 5 Apr 94 </F>
<F P=103> OW0504021994 </F>
<F P=104>  Beijing XINHUA </F>
<F P=105>  English </F>


<TEXT>
BFN 

  [Text] Washington, April 4 (XINHUA) -- The United States is 
looking at rescuing the Bosnian Muslim enclave of Gorazde but 
would make sure that the step should contribute to the overall 
peace process, the State Department said today. 
  State Department Spokesman Michael McCurry reiterated 
Defense 
Secretary William Perry's remarks on Sunday that Washington was 
not prepared to recommend to the allies to rescue Gorazde for 
the time being. 
  The enclave, one of the UN-declared "safe havens" for the 
Bosnian Muslims, has been under Serb attacks in recent days and 
there were calls for NATO military steps or threats to halt the 
Serbs, just like the recent success in making the Serbs pulling 
out heavy guns from Sarajevo, the Bosnian capital. 
  In Cleveland, President Bill Clinton said "whether we can 
recreate the conditions of Sarajevo anywhere else depends in 
part on the facts of each specific case." 
  At the White House, Spokeswoman Dee Dee Myers said "at this 
point we don't have any specific plans around any of the safe 
havens." 
  Meanwhile, the ASSOCIATED PRESS reported that the 
administration strategy on Bosnia could change after John 
Shalikashvili, chairman of the Joint Chiefs of Staff, returns 
tomorrow from the former Yugoslavia. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-1879 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "drchi065_b_94002" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-CHI-94-065 </AU>
Daily Report 
<DATE1>  5 Apr 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> U.S. &amp; Canada </F>
<H3> <TI>   `Roundup' Views AT&amp;T Chairman's Calls For MFN Extension </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    `Roundup' Views AT&amp;T Chairman's Calls For MFN Extension </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   OW0504004394 Beijing XINHUA in English 0016 GMT 5 Apr 94 </F>
<F P=103> OW0504004394 </F>
<F P=104>  Beijing XINHUA </F>
<F P=105>  English </F>


<TEXT>
BFN 

<F P=106> ["Roundup" by Zhao Renfang: "AT&amp;T Urges U.S. To Renew </F>
China's MFN] 
  [Text] New York, April 4 (XINHUA) -- AT&amp;T, one of the 
giant 
telecommunications company in the world, today urged the United 
States to renew China's most favored nation (MFN) status 
unconditionally. 
  Addressing a corporate luncheon organized by the Asia 
Society, AT&amp;T Chairman Robert Allen said that it was his 
fervent 
hope that the U.S. and Chinese government will cooperate in the 
next two months to achieve unconditional MFN renewal so that "we 
can all redirect our energies from preventing disaster to 
creating opportunity." 
  "There are not many people who really believe either that 
MFN 
status is the right lever to improve human rights in China -- or 
that the failure to renew the MFN would significantly set back 
China's economic progress," the chairman noted. 
  In his speech entitled "Asia: New Horizons for New Century," 
Allen, who is chief executive officer (CEO) of AT&amp;T, said 
that 
he believed that the U.S. must continue to strengthen its 
relationship with China. "We won't be able to affect change if 
we close the trade doors and lock out American industry." 
  According to him, as each renewal date for the MFN status 
came near, the business community began collective 
"nail-chewing" as the stability of the relationship teetered. 
At the same time, the Chinese customers naturally began to 
wonder if the U.S. businessmen may be something less than long 
term supplies and reliable partners. 
  Allen, who suggested shifting the human rights debate away 
from the MFN to other avenues, added that the best way to 
promote progress was to support and encourage China's economic 
reforms, and integrate China more fully into the world economy. 
  The argument was not whether to promote human rights, but 
how 
to do so in ways that the Chinese themselves will embrace, said 
Allen, a strong supporter of China's MFN. 
  Speaking to about 150 participants at this afternnon's 
corporate program, which drew some big U.S. and Asian companies, 
the AT&amp;T chief deemed that nowhere was the opportunity 
greater 
than in the People's Republic of China as Asian countries were 
concerned. He said the most spectacular developments in the 
recent economic history of Asia were being written in China. 
  After citing impressive progress China has made during the 
past 15 years of reform and the massive size of its economy, 
Allen noted that China still remained the world's largest 
developing countries, with enormous institutional and 
infrastructural challenges to overcome. Therefore the chairman 
foresaw great opportunity in China's telecommunications 
industry, a multi-billion dollar job as he predicted. 
  Allen, while visiting China last August, was received by 
Chinese President Jiang Zemin. 
  During their meeting, the Chinese president spoke highly of 
AT&amp;T's long standing cooperation with China in 
telecommunications and said the cooperation was conducive to 
further development of relations between the United States and 
China in the fields of economy and technology. 
  Allen, commenting then on his first visit to China which had 
left a deep impression on him, said that his company and China 
should become cooperative partner forever. 
  AT&amp;T, which established an office in China in 1985, 
signed in 
February 1993 a memorandum of understanding with China's State 
Planning Commission creating a long term, comprehensive 
partnership to help modernize China's telecommunications network. 
  A global company that provides communications service and 
products, as well as network equipment and computer, AT&amp;T 
planned to work in China through joint ventures with Chinese 
partners to establish manufacturing facilities, Allen mentioned. 
  He disclosed his company will set up a "Chinese version of 
AT&amp;T Bell Laboratories". Half jokingly the AT&amp;T leader 
said 
Bell Laboratories were more famous in China than the AT&amp;T 
sign. 
  As the CEO put it, few industries in the United States, and 
even the rest of the world, could look at China and not see 
incredible opportunity. China was becoming the largest market 
in the world for almost any products you could name, said. 
  "AT&amp;T, along with thousands of other American 
companies, is 
excited by the opportunity to participate in the modernization 
of China," he said. 
  Despite the debate on China's MFN status, more than 2,000 
U.S. Firms invested in China last year, with nearly 6 billion 
U.S. dollars. And some 167,000 U.S. jobs depended on trade with 
China. 
  Warning the danger of removing China's MFN on U.S. business 
in China, America's third largest invest territory, Allen said 
only America's competitors, such as Japan and Europe, benefit if 
U.S. Trade options with China were diminished. 
  "Their exports are considerably greater than our 9 million 
dollars and their reliance on China's market is significantly 
greater than ours," the AT&amp;T leader commented. 
  Besides the business side of China's importance in the 
world, 
Allen also called for attention to the many areas where Chinese 
cooperation with the U.S. will be crucial to dealing with 
serious regional and global problems. 
  The AT&amp;T leader also discussed business prospects in 
Asia and 
Pacific region, one of the most powerful economic engines in the 
world as he described. However, the topic about China accounted 
nearly one third of his key note speech. 
  AT&amp;T, with a total revenue of 667.156 billion dollars in 
1993, does business in more than 120 countries. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-1880 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "drchi065_b_94003" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-CHI-94-065 </AU>
Daily Report 
<DATE1>  1 Apr 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> U.S. &amp; Canada </F>
<H3> <TI>   New Book on U.S.-China Relations Noted </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    New Book on U.S.-China Relations Noted </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   HK0504021794 Hong Kong WEN WEI PO in Chinese 1 Apr 94 p a2 </F>
<F P=103> HK0504021794 </F>
<F P=104>  Hong Kong WEN WEI PO </F>
<F P=105>  Chinese </F>


<TEXT>
BFN 

<F P=106> ["Special article" by WEN WEI PO Washington special </F>
correspondent Chu Hsing-fu (2612 6580 4395): "United States 
Should Not Apply MFN as a Weapon"] 
  [Text] Washington, 30 Mar (WEN WEI PO) -- The American 
Enterprise Institute, an important U.S. Republican think tank, 
held a luncheon in Washington today to mark the publication of a 
new book on China. Entitled "Transcend MFN [Most Favored 
Nation] Status -- Trade With China and U.S. Interest," the book 
is co-edited by James Roderick Lilley, former U.S. assistant 
secretary of defense and former U.S. ambassador to China, and 
Wendell L. Willkie II, former acting deputy secretary of 
commerce. Its chief authors include Dave Lampton, president of 
the All-American Committee for U.S.-Chinese Relations. 
  The book reviews the complicated economic, strategic, and 
human rights issues facing U.S. decision-makers today. In 
addition to their speeches today, the editors and authors 
stressed in the book that the United States should see further 
in handling U.S.-Chinese relations. The resolution of human 
rights and trade issues should be separated. They indicated 
that almost all countries in the world, regardless of their 
human rights conditions, enjoy MFN status granted by the United 
States. If the the United States were to apply MFN status as a 
weapon with which to threaten China, this would run counter to 
U.S. interests. 
<H5>  It Does Not Pay for the United States To Upset China </H5>
  Democrat Lee Hamilton, chairman of the House Foreign Affairs 
Committee, wrote a preface to the book in which he discusses the 
importance of U.S.-Chinese relations from four angles. In the 
preface, Hamilton indicates that political stability in China is 
in line with U.S. interests, whereas upsetting the Chinese 
Government or dividing China is not in U.S. interests. A 
Chinese Government that has rallying force, is highly efficient, 
and is concerned with the well-being of its people is in line 
with U.S. interests because in this case the international 
community does not have to provide the 1.2 billion Chinese 
people with clothing, food, housing, transportation, employment, 
and medical services and care. 
  Economically, China's economic development has improved the 
people's material life, and at the same time has promoted 
gradual political democratization. All these changes are in 
line with U.S. interests. The United States should offer a 
helping hand to China in its economic modernization and reform; 
in turn, the United States will benefit. The Memorandum of 
Understanding on Market Access signed between the United States 
and China, the Agreement on Intellectual Property Rights 
Protection, and the consideration in accepting China's 
application to restore its GATT membership, are all useful 
apparatuses to guarantee mutual benefit and interest in 
U.S.-Chinese economic relations. 
  From the angle of security, a militarily powerful China that 
does not pose a threat to regional peace is in line with U.S. 
interests. The best way to prevent a tense situation in the 
region and to control the arms race is to unfold multilateral 
regional security talks aimed at increasing transparency, 
establishing mutual trust, and encouraging military restraint. 
In addition, the United States needs to adopt a cooperative 
attitude with China in controling the proliferation of 
biochemical and guided-missile weapons and in limiting nuclear 
tests. 
  From a diplomatic angle, a China that continues to work hard 
with the United States and other countries to resolve 
complicated world issues in the wake of the Cold War is in line 
with U.S. interests. China is one of the five permanent members 
of the UN Security Council. That China should make positive 
contributions to the resolution of international problems is far 
better than otherwise, and better still than creating additional 
trouble for the international community. To promote global 
peace and stability, to prevent the further worsening of 
nature's ecological environment, and to crack down on drug 
production and trafficking, the United States should win China's 
support as best it can. 
<H5>  The Old, Amended Act Is Out of Date </H5>
  In the preface, Hamilton also indicates: From a long-range 
view, U.S. decision-makers should not cancel China's MFN status. 
The Jackson-Vanek amendment, which sets out guidance on 
granting MFN status, and the practice of extending MFN status 
conditionally, were policies and measures formulated in 
different times which aimed to achieve different policy goals. 
Time has passed and circumstances have changed. What U.S. 
political leaders should consider today is transcending China's 
MFN status and formulating a sound policy capable of protecting 
and promoting U.S. national interests. 
  In the book, Lampton, president of the All-American 
Committee 
for U.S.-Chinese Relations, reviews the importance of 
U.S.-Chinese relations, and indicates the reasons for the 
difficult situation the U.S. Government faces on the issue of 
human rights. He said: The United States must acknowledge the 
tremendous social and political changes underway in China. If 
the United States hopes to promote its value concepts 
effectively, it should add fuel to China's engine, not try to 
shut off the fuel pump. However, should the United States 
regard China's MFN status as some kind of hostage, it will never 
control the direction of development in the situation. This 
being the case, the United States should formulate a realistic, 
sustained, and constructive policy toward China. 
  Directing his remarks at some people in the U.S. Government 
and Congress who say there is need to selectively sanction 
China's state-owned enterprises, Lampton indicates that the 
practice of sanctioning or selectively sanctioning China's 
state- owned enterprises would be wrong and would not work 
because the U.S. Customs would find it very difficult to tell 
which products are those of state-owned enterprises and which 
are not. Furthermore, the raw materials and semifinished goods 
of many of China's state- owned enterprises are supplied by 
enterprises in the private sector of the economy or by 
foreign-funded enterprises. If the United States were to 
partially cancel China's MFN status, this would lead inevitably 
to the Chinese side's taking retaliatory action in trade. Then 
where would the United States find new markets for its wheat, 
aircraft, electronics, telecommunications, and power-generating 
equipment?! 
<H5>  It Is Wise To Talk Less About Human Rights From Now On </H5>
  In the book, James Roderick Lilley, former assistant 
secretary of defense and currently director of Chinese Studies 
at the American Enterprise Institute, indicates that the United 
States has been deeply involved in Asian affairs for a long 
time, thus guaranteeing peace and security in Asia. The greater 
the pressure the Clinton administration places on China 
concerning the human rights issue, the tougher will be the 
Chinese stance and the smaller the concessions it will make. 
Should China's MFN status be cancelled, the United States will 
pay a very high price in international issues, and the 
foundation for peaceful cooperation and competition between the 
United States and China will be jeopardized. 
  Ambassador Lilley indicates that in the Asian Conference on 
Human Rights held in Bangkok in March 1993, 38 out of 39 
countries were for the human rights position of China and 
Indonesia. If the United Sates were to cancel China's MFN 
status, this move would compel the Asian countries to lean 
toward China and to keep their distance from the United States; 
consequently, U.S. influence in Asia would be reduced and the 
fruits of U.S. diplomatic efforts over the years would go down 
the drain. Should such a scenario surface, it would be tragic. 
This being the case, if the Clinton administration does not 
want to cancel China's MFN status, it should stop its all-too- 
frequent verbal condemnation of China. Furthermore, it should 
not overemphasize the human rights issue from now on. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-1881 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "drchi065_e_94001" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-CHI-94-065 </AU>
Daily Report 
<DATE1>  4 Apr 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> Southeast Asia &amp; Pacific </F>
<H3> <TI>   Qiao Shi Meets New Zealand Parliament Speaker </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Qiao Shi Meets New Zealand Parliament Speaker </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   OW0404133994 Beijing XINHUA in English 1301 GMT 4 Apr 94 </F>
<F P=103> OW0404133994 </F>
<F P=104>  Beijing XINHUA </F>
<F P=105>  English </F>


<TEXT>
BFN 

  [Text] Beijing, April 4 (XINHUA) -- Qiao Shi, chairman of 
the Standing Committee of the National People's Congress (NPC), 
met here today with Peter Tapsell, speaker of the New Zealand 
Parliament, and the parliamentary delegation he is leading. 
  The Sino-New Zealand relations have been developing steadily 
since the establishment of diplomatic ties between the two 
countries in 1972 and the parliaments of the two countries have 
also kept in contact, Qiao said. 
  He believed, the current visit by Tapsell would play 
important role in advancing the relations between the two 
parliaments. 
  Both China and New Zealand are in the Asia-Pacific region 
and 
are both attaching great heed to the region's peace and 
development, Qiao said, adding a peaceful and stable 
Asia-Pacific region would benefit the world as a whole. In this 
sense, the NPC wished to promote the cooperative relations 
between the two countries through joint efforts. 
  China had made great achievements over the past 15 years 
thanks to the reform and opening to the outside world and the 
prospects are still brighter, Qiao said, adding however, efforts 
of several generations are still needed before China could catch 
up with some developed countries. Therefore, he noted, the 
Chinese Government has maintained an "objective and cool-minded" 
attitude in its future economic development. 
  Tapsell is New Zealand's first speaker from the opposition 
party and the first speaker from the indigenous Maori people. 
He said New Zealand has been shifting its trade and economic 
ties focus from the traditional European Market to the 
Asia-Pacific region, in particular to China, which has 
registered a high economic growth. 
  Among those present at the meeting was vice-chairman of the 
NPC Standing Committee Tian Jiyun who also greeted the speaker 
at the airport upon his arrival Sunday [3 April]. 
  Zhu Liang, chairman of the NPC Foreign Affairs Committee, 
held talks with NZ [New Zealand] delegation on a wide-range of 
issues of mutual interest. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-1882 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "drchi065_e_94002" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-CHI-94-065 </AU>
Daily Report 
<DATE1>  5 Apr 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> Southeast Asia &amp; Pacific </F>
<H3> <TI>   Meets With Vice President </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Meets With Vice President </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   OW0504091794 Beijing XINHUA in English 0851 GMT 5 Apr 94 </F>
<F P=103> OW0504091794 </F>
<F P=104>  Beijing XINHUA </F>
<F P=105>  English </F>


<TEXT>
BFN 

  [Text] Beijing, April 5 (XINHUA) -- Chinese Vice-President 
Rong Yiren met Peter Tapsell, speaker of the New Zealand 
Parliament, and his party in Beijing today. 
  Rong said that China and New Zealand should enhance friendly 
relations, cooperation and exchanges so as to contribute to 
peace and stability in Asia and the Pacific region. 
  He said he expected more entrepreneurs of the two countries 
to increase investments in the other country, to promote 
economic relations and trade. 
  Rong Yiren visited New Zealand in 1991. 
  Tapsell said that his country and China have long-term 
friendly relations. China was now in a period of reforms and 
opening to the outside world, and New Zealand, which is also 
observing changes, puts its hope in the Asian and Pacific region. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-1883 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "drchi065_e_94003" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-CHI-94-065 </AU>
Daily Report 
<DATE1>  4 Apr 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> Southeast Asia &amp; Pacific </F>
<H3> <TI>   Thai Foreign Minister Meets Chinese Vice Foreign Minister </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Thai Foreign Minister Meets Chinese Vice Foreign Minister </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   OW0404164994 Beijing XINHUA in English 1623 GMT 4 Apr 94 </F>
<F P=103> OW0404164994 </F>
<F P=104>  Beijing XINHUA </F>
<F P=105>  English </F>


<TEXT>
BFN 

  [Text] Bangkok, April 4 (XINHUA)-- Thai Foreign Minister 
Prasong Soonsiri met the visiting Chinese vice foreign minister, 
Tang Jiaxuan, here this afternoon and they exchanged viewpoints 
on the bilateral relations and regional issues of common concern. 
  The two sides agreed that there has been achieved great 
progress in the friendly relations and cooperations in all 
fields between the two countries in the past 19 years since the 
establishment of diplomatic ties. They expressed confidence 
that the existing good cooperation will surely obtain even 
greater development in the future. 
  Before the meeting the Chinese vice foreign minister had met 
and discussed with his Thai counterpart Deputy Foreign Minister 
Surin Phitsuwan and other high ranking officials on the 
bilateral and regional issues. The two sides agreed that the 
two countries will make fresh efforts to promote the cooperation 
among the countries along the upper reaches of the Mekong River 
to develop the bordering areas. 
  Another agreement also has been reached between the two 
sides. The Buddhist relics preserved in Chinese ancient capital 
Xian, northwest China, will be shipped to Bangkok to be 
exhibited on the occasion of the birthday of the Thai King 
Phumiphon Adunyadet in December this year. 
  Vice Foreign Minister Tang Jiaxuan will leave here for 
Malaysia and Brunei tomorrow. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-1884 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "drchi065_e_94004" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-CHI-94-065 </AU>
Daily Report 
<DATE1>  4 Apr 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> Southeast Asia &amp; Pacific </F>
<H3> <TI>   Malaysia's Maybank Opens Representative Office in Beijing </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Malaysia's Maybank Opens Representative Office in Beijing </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   OW0404140194 Beijing XINHUA in English 1324 GMT 4 Apr 94 </F>
<F P=103> OW0404140194 </F>
<F P=104>  Beijing XINHUA </F>
<F P=105>  English </F>


<TEXT>
BFN 

  [Text] Beijing, April 4 (XINHUA) -- Maybank of Malaysia, 
the largest bank in the Southeast Asian country, opened a 
representative office here today. 
  At the press conference, managing director of the Maybank 
Ahmad Mohd Don [spelling of name as received] said that the move 
is aimed at facilitating business people of the two countries so 
as to promote Sino-Malaysian economic and trade exchanges and 
cooperation. 
  Ahmad said that the Malaysian side is confident in China's 
brisk market, which can be best illustrated by the opening of 
this office in Beijing. 
  Preparation to open the office started in October last year, 
and the facility will go into operation in July. 
  This is the second Malaysian bank to open a representative 
office in China. The first one was the Malaysian Public Bank. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-1885 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "drchi065_e_94005" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-CHI-94-065 </AU>
Daily Report 
<DATE1>  3 Apr 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> Southeast Asia &amp; Pacific </F>
<H3> <TI>   110 Water Pumps Donated to Philippines </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    110 Water Pumps Donated to Philippines </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   OW0304160094 Beijing XINHUA in English 1540 GMT 3 Apr 94 </F>
<F P=103> OW0304160094 </F>
<F P=104>  Beijing XINHUA </F>
<F P=105>  English </F>


<TEXT>
BFN 

  [Text] Manila, April 3 (XINHUA) -- China has turned over 
110 water pumps in assistance to the Philippines, the Chinese 
embassy in the Philippines announced today. 
  The donation of the 110 six-horse power water pumps to the 
Philippines was committed by the National People's Congress 
(NPC) of China last August when NPC Chairman Qiao Shi visited 
the country. 
  On behalf of China's NPC, Chinese Ambassador to Manila Huang 
Guifang last week formally transferred the pumps to the 
recipients -- Philippine Congress and the government of Cebu 
Province. 
  The pumps will benefit not only water conservancy in the 
rural areas, but also the promotion of the afforestation in the 
national parks. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-1886 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "drchi065_f_94002" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-CHI-94-065 </AU>
Daily Report 
<DATE1>  4 Apr 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> Near East 7 South Asia </F>
<H3> <TI>   Joint Venture Paper Mill Discussed With Bangladesh </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Joint Venture Paper Mill Discussed With Bangladesh </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   OW0404140694 Beijing XINHUA in English 1107 GMT 4 Apr 94 </F>
<F P=103> OW0404140694 </F>
<F P=104>  Beijing XINHUA </F>
<F P=105>  English </F>


<TEXT>
BFN 

  [Text] Dhaka, April 4 (XINHUA) -- China and Bangladesh 
will possibly set up a joint venture paper mill with a yearly 
capacity of 50,000 tons in this South Asian country. 
  This was discussed on Sunday [3 April] between a visiting 
delegation of the China National Chemical Engineering Group 
Corporation and the Bangladesh Chemical Industries Corporation. 
  The Chinese visitors were impressed with the quality of 
industrial grade paper made from green jute and expressed their 
optimism about the possibility of setting up the paper mill and 
eventual export of green jute based pulp from Bangladesh to 
China. 
  At present, Bangladesh has tried hard to diversify the use 
of 
its rich jute resources as the prices of raw jute are too low in 
the world market and the country's jute industry has been 
shrinking drastically over the past decade. 
  Recently, local paper makers have successfully produced 
quality paper from green jute while the government has urged 
local and overseas investors to pour their money into the jute 
sector which has been suffering huge losses. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-1887 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "drchi065_f_94003" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-CHI-94-065 </AU>
Daily Report 
<DATE1>  4 Apr 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> Near East 7 South Asia </F>
<H3> <TI>   Pakistan Asks Afghanistan To Help Release Abducted Chinese </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Pakistan Asks Afghanistan To Help Release Abducted Chinese </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   OW0404142494 Beijing XINHUA in English 1243 GMT 4 Apr 94 </F>
<F P=103> OW0404142494 </F>
<F P=104>  Beijing XINHUA </F>
<F P=105>  English </F>


<TEXT>
BFN 

  [Text] Islamabad, April 4 (XINHUA) -- Pakistan today again 
asked the Afghan Government to help seek the safe and 
unconditional release of two abducted Chinese and several 
Pakistanis held by Mullah Salam in the Afghan territory. 
  The Afghan Ambassador to Pakistan Sardar Mohammad Roshan was 
summoned to the foreign office here this morning and handed over 
a diplomatic note urging the Afghan Government to intercede 
urgently for arranging the safe release of these people, said a 
Foreign Office press release issued here today. 
  Mullah Salam, an Afghan warrior belonging to 
Ittehad-i-Islami 
of Sayyaf, the coalition partner of President Rabbani, kidnapped 
two Chinese engineers, Wang Qinbin and Zheng Gongbao in Bostan 
area, some 40 kilometers from Quetta, capital of Baluchistan 
Province on June 21, 1993. 
  He has been demanding ransom, return of Stinger missiles 
allegedly captured by Pakistani troops and release of his 
relatives jailed in Pakistan for the release of these two 
persons which Pakistan refused. 
  His men also abducted eight Pakistanis in March and April 
1993 separately as well as the deputy commissioner of 
Baluchistan's Ziarat along with his driver and bodyguard in 
March this year. 
  Besides kidnappings, Mullah Salam attacked Pakistan several 
times by firing from across the border with multi-barreled 
rocket launchers, mortars and automatic weapons resulting in a 
number of casualties and heavy damage to property, the press 
release said. 
  The Government of Pakistan has been trying its best to 
secure 
the safe and unconditional release of the abductees and resolve 
the matter but unfortunately these efforts have not yielded a 
positive outcome, said the release. 
  Pakistan called upon the Afghan Government to take urgent 
and 
meaningful measures not only to ensure the safe and 
unconditional release of the abductees but also to prevent the 
recurrence of such incidents, it added. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-1888 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "drchi065_h_94001" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-CHI-94-065 </AU>
Daily Report 
<DATE1>  4 Apr 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> West Europe </F>
<H3> <TI>   Wu Xueqian Vice Chairman Meets Former French Adviser </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Wu Xueqian Vice Chairman Meets Former French Adviser </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   OW0404134294 Beijing XINHUA in English 1304 GMT 4 Apr 94 </F>
<F P=103> OW0404134294 </F>
<F P=104>  Beijing XINHUA </F>
<F P=105>  English </F>


<TEXT>
BFN 

  [Text] Beijing, April 4 (XINHUA) -- Wu Xueqian, 
vice-chairman of the Chinese People's Political Consultative 
Conference National Committee, met here today with Jacques 
Attali, former special advisor to French President Francois 
Mitterrand. 
  Attali, arriving here yesterday at the invitation of the 
Chinese People's Institute of Foreign Affairs, came to acquaint 
himself with China's reform and open-up and economic development. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-1889 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "drchi065_h_94002" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-CHI-94-065 </AU>
Daily Report 
<DATE1>  4 Apr 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> West Europe </F>
<H3> <TI>   Xie Qimei Hosts Banquet for Waldheim, Delegation </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Xie Qimei Hosts Banquet for Waldheim, Delegation </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   OW0404134494 Beijing XINHUA in English 1312 GMT 4 Apr 94 </F>
<F P=103> OW0404134494 </F>
<F P=104>  Beijing XINHUA </F>
<F P=105>  English </F>


<TEXT>
BFN 

  [Text] Beijing, April 4 (XINHUA) -- President of the U.N. 
Association of China and former U.N. Under Secretary General Xie 
Qimei hosted a banquet for a delegation led by Dr. Kurt 
Waldheim, former U.N. secretary general and president of the 
U.N. Association of Austria here tonight. 
  Waldheim, also former federal president of Austria, and his 
delegation arrived in Beijing today for a 10-day visit to China 
at the invitation of the U.N. Association of China. 
  This afternoon, the Austrian visitors held talks with Wang 
Shiyuan, vice-director of China's State Commission for 
Restructuring the Economy. During the talks, Waldheim said 
Austria is willing to strengthen bilateral cooperation in 
upgrading infrastructures, which have restricted China's 
economic development and in which field Austria is far more 
advanced than China. 
  Additionally, he expressed interest in cooperation with 
China 
in producing medical apparatus and instruments in Beijing. 
  Prior to the banquet, the two U.N. associations exchanged 
views on issues concerning the U.N. Charter and sovereignty, and 
reform of the United Nations. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-1890 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "drchi065_h_94003" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-CHI-94-065 </AU>
Daily Report 
<DATE1>  5 Apr 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> West Europe </F>
<H3> <TI>   Jiang Enzhu Meets Former French Adviser </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Jiang Enzhu Meets Former French Adviser </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   OW0504095194 Beijing XINHUA in English 0933 GMT 5 Apr 94 </F>
<F P=103> OW0504095194 </F>
<F P=104>  Beijing XINHUA </F>
<F P=105>  English </F>


<TEXT>
BFN 

  [Text] Beijing, April 5 (XINHUA) -- Chinese Vice-Foreign 
Minister Jiang Enzhu met with Jacques Attali, former special 
advisor to the French president, and his party here this 
afternoon. 
  Attali was special advisor to the French president from 1981 
to 1991. He and his party arrived here last Sunday [3 April] as 
guests of the Chinese People's Institute of Foreign Affairs. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-1891 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "drchi065_h_94004" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-CHI-94-065 </AU>
Daily Report 
<DATE1>  5 Apr 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> West Europe </F>
<H3> <TI>   Finnish Prime Minister Interviewed on Ties With Beijing </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Finnish Prime Minister Interviewed on Ties With Beijing </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   OW0504105394 Beijing XINHUA Domestic Service in Chinese 0806 
GMT 5 Apr 94 </F>

<F P=103> OW0504105394 </F>
<F P=104>  Beijing XINHUA Domestic Service </F>
<F P=105>  Chinese </F>


<TEXT>
BFN 

<F P=106> [By XINHUA reporter Zhao Changchun (6392 7022 2504), RENMIN </F>
RIBAO reporter Ding Gang (0002 0474), and GUANGMING RIBAO 
reporter Sang Hongchen (2718 3163 5256)] 
  [Text] Helsinki, 5 Apr (XINHUA) -- Finnish Prime Minister 
Esko Aho recently said here that Finland maintains very good and 
extensive friendly relations with China and plans to further 
develop these relations with it in various fields. 
  Prime Minister Esko Aho made the above remarks in reply to a 
written questionnaire by XINHUA, RENMIN RIBAO, and GUANGMING 
RIBAO reporters on the eve of his forthcoming visit to China. 
At the invitation of State Council Premier Li Peng, Prime 
Minister Asko Aho and his wife will pay an official visit to 
China from 6 to 11 April. 
  Prime Minister Asko Aho emphatically pointed out that 
Finland 
was one of the first countries to establish diplomatic relations 
with China. He said: Since then, "the relations between the 
two countries have always been stable and have undergone tests 
during difficult periods." "The current visit is to further 
strengthen friendly relations between Finland and China." 
  He said that, during his visit, he would hear with great 
interest Chinese leaders' introduction of the situation of 
China's economic reform and, in particular, the influence of the 
reform on China's foreign trade and Chinese leaders' views on 
the outlook of development and cooperation in the Asian region. 
He himself will also introduce Finland's views of the European 
situation to the Chinese leaders. 
  Touching on the outlook of the development of relations 
between the two countries in the future, Prime Minister Asko Aho 
pointed out: "There are broad prospects for developing relations 
between Finland and China. The trade between the two countries 
has been expanded to cover all rapidly developed fields in 
Finland." He said: Although Finland is a small country, it 
occupies a leading position in certain fields. Finland is 
prepared to share with China those specialized technologies. 
  Prime Minister Asko Aho said: "Finland is world-renowned for 
forestry and forestry industry. Other advanced technologies 
which will attract China's interest include the development of 
energy sources and communications. I would like to stress the 
significance of environmental protection technologies, which 
will be a new field of cooperation between the two countries. 
Under the current situation in which China has been attaching 
increasingly greater importance to environmental protection, 
Finland can provide environmental protection technologies for 
China." 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-1892 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "drchi065_p_94003" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-CHI-94-065 </AU>
Daily Report 
<DATE1>  1 Apr 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> Central-South Region </F>
<H3> <TI>   Guangdong Sets Goal of More Foreign Investment </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Guangdong Sets Goal of More Foreign Investment </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   OW0104111894 Beijing XINHUA in English 1019 GMT 1 Apr 94 </F>
<F P=103> OW0104111894 </F>
<F P=104>  Beijing XINHUA </F>
<F P=105>  English </F>


<TEXT>
BFN 

  [Text] Guangzhou, April 1 (XINHUA) -- South China's 
Guangdong Province, a leader in China's reform and opening, has 
set the objective of attracting ten billion U.S. dollars of 
foreign investment this year, according to provincial Governor 
Zhu Senlin. 
  He revealed the province's plan at the on-going foreign 
investment promotion conference here in Guangzhou. 
  He said that foreign investment will be channelled into such 
areas as energy, communications, telecommunications, petroleum 
and petrochemical industries, iron and steel, electronics, 
automobile and high and new technology, agricultural development 
and export projects and services as well as poor areas. 
  While continuing cooperation with medium-sized and small 
enterprises from overseas, Zhu said, the province will strive to 
attract more internationally known enterprises and financial 
groups. 
  He called on all economic and trade departments in the 
province to study and solve new problems and make concerted 
efforts to realize the goal. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-1893 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "drchi065_p_94004" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-CHI-94-065 </AU>
Daily Report 
<DATE1>  2 Apr 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> Central-South Region </F>
<H3> <TI>   Striking Traders in Guangdong Resume Business </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Striking Traders in Guangdong Resume Business </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   HK0404051694 Hong Kong WEN WEI PO in Chinese 2 Apr 94 p A3 </F>
<F P=103> HK0404051694 </F>
<F P=104>  Hong Kong WEN WEI PO </F>
<F P=105>  Chinese </F>


<TEXT>
BFN 

<F P=106> [By staff reporter Liu Chun (0491 6511): "Striking </F>
Self-Employed Traders in Gongbei Resumed Business Yesterday"] 
  [Text] Zhuhai, 1 Apr--All 68 striking shops run by 
self-employed traders on Buxing Street in Zhuhai City's Gongbei 
Market resumed normal business at 1400 this afternoon after the 
industry and commerce department temporarily suspended the move 
to raise shop rents. 
  At about 1000 yesterday, the owners of all 68 shops on 
Gongbei's Buxing Street closed their shops and went on strike to 
show their resentment against the industry and commerce 
department's decision to raise shop rents. This attracted the 
great attention of the concerned departments in Zhuhai City. 
Early this morning, the leaders of the City Bureau of Industry 
and Commerce went to the Gongbei subbureau to hold a meeting to 
find a solution to the issue. They also held separate meetings 
of the directors of the self- employed laborers association, 
some shop owners, advanced backbone self-employed traders, and 
family dependents, to listen to their views and to discuss how 
to settle the matter. 
  At 1100, this reporter found that all 68 shops in the 
Gongbei 
Market had closed their doors and stopped doing business. An 
official in charge of the Gongbei Industry and Commerce 
Subbureau told this reporter that, at about 0800, six shops 
opened their doors to do business, but closed them again not 
long after. At 1200, the industry and commerce department put 
up a placard in Buxing Street that read: "Business Suspended 
for Consolidation." 
  At noon, the industry and commerce department decided to 
postpone the rent readjustment and hoped the owners of the shops 
would first resume business and then negotiate for a solution 
later. At about 1400, all 68 shops resumed business. 
  The striking shop owners said that the shop rents were also 
readjusted in the past, but the readjustments were all within 
the range of 10 to 20 yuan, and that they went on strike because 
this time the readjustments were greater than they could afford. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-1894 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "drchi065_p_94005" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-CHI-94-065 </AU>
Daily Report 
<DATE1>  4 Apr 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> Central-South Region </F>
<H3> <TI>   Villagers Attack Police Station in Huizhou </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Villagers Attack Police Station in Huizhou </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   HK0404141494 Guangzhou Guangdong People's Radio Network in 
Mandarin 0400 GMT 4 Apr 94 </F>

<F P=103> HK0404141494 </F>
<F P=104>  Guangzhou Guangdong People's Radio Network </F>
<F P=105>  Mandarin </F>


<TEXT>
BFN 

  [Text] On 1 April, a small number of scoundrels incited 
some villagers, who were unaware of the truth, to obstruct 
public security officers and policemen from arresting two 
criminals in Jiachong Town in the Daya Bay Administrative 
District of Huizhou City. The villagers stormed the Jiachong 
Town Police Station, smashed police equipment, and beat up 
police officers and policemen, resulting in a serious incident. 
  At about 0500 on the morning of 1 April, Jiachong Town 
Police 
Station under the Daya Bay Public Security Bureau dispatched 
about 10 police officers and policemen to Baigang Village to 
arrest the criminals Chen Renshan and Chen Yonghui on blackmail 
charges. As scheduled, the two criminals were soon rounded up 
by the police. However, as the police were taking away the 
criminal Chen Renshan, he suddenly shouted: "Help!" 
Immediately, Chen Renshan's brothers and sisters-in-law ran 
forward with sticks and rocks in their hands. Policeman Liu 
Jinxin, who was at the front of the police squad, was hit in the 
head by a brick thrown by Chen Renchao, Chen Renshan's elder 
brother. Liu Jinxin lost consciousness. The crowd then rescued 
Chen Renshan amidst chaos. After rescuing Chen Renshan, Chen 
Renchao turned and began chasing and beating the policeman Zhou 
Jinbao. Zhou fired a warning shot at once, but failed to stop 
Chen. With his life under threat, Zhou again opened fire and hit 
Chen Renchao in the leg, thus temporarily bringing the situation 
under control. 
  At about 0900 on the morning of 1 April, Liu Rihua, the 
political instructor of Jiachong Town Police Station, set out 
for Baigang Village with a team of police officers and policemen 
to explain the truth to the villagers. However, on their way to 
the village, they were met by a group of villagers armed with 
all types of weapons who were heading for Jiachong Town Police 
Station to cause trouble. After being persuaded and educated by 
the police, some villagers returned to the village. However, 
incited by Chen Renshan and some other people, more than 100 
villagers still went ahead and reached the police station where 
they demanded the immediate release of the criminal Chen 
Yonghui. The police then formed a human wall to repel the 
crowd. Failing to enter the police station, Chen Renshan 
incited the villagers to take down the station's sign board. 
The crowd then smashed the sign board and began frenziedly 
cuffing and kicking the police officers and policemen. At that 
moment, Zhang Xinde, chief of Daya Bay Public Security Bureau, 
arrived at the scene with a team of police officers and 
policemen. While educating the villagers on the legal system, 
the police acted resolutely and arrested Chen Renshan, Chen 
Shaowen, Chen Renhua, Chen Huijun, Chen Qiaoning, and some other 
ring leaders, thereby putting an end to the incident. 
  At present, Daya Bay Public Security Bureau is investigating 
the incident and is expected to mete out, in accordance with the 
law, stern punishment to those principal culprits who brazenly 
obstructed public security police officers and policemen from 
performing their official duties, incited the masses to storm 
the police station, and beat up police officers and policemen. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-1895 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "drchi065_p_94006" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-CHI-94-065 </AU>
Daily Report 
<DATE1>  5 Apr 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> Central-South Region </F>
<H3> <TI>   Five Arrested for Assaulting Police in Huizhou </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Five Arrested for Assaulting Police in Huizhou </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   HK0504070994 Hong Kong WEN WEI PO in Chinese 5 Apr 94 p A3 </F>
<F P=103> HK0504070994 </F>
<F P=104>  Hong Kong WEN WEI PO </F>
<F P=105>  Chinese </F>


<TEXT>
BFN 

<F P=106> [By staff reporter: "Police Assault Case Ends in Huizhou, </F>
Troublemakers Arrested"] 
  [Text] Guangzhou, 4 Apr--According to an informed person 
in Huizhou, no villagers from Bogang Village of Xiayong Town in 
Huizhou's Daya Bay administrative area -- where a few days ago a 
handful of ruffians incited villagers to hinder public security 
personnel from arresting criminals according to the law -- have 
gone to the city government today to make petitions or hold 
demonstrations. The incident was limited to that day. 
  It has been learned that, at around 0500 on 1 April, 10 
public security personnel from the Xiayong police substation of 
the Daya Bay Public Security Bureau went to Bogang Village to 
arrest blackmailers Chen Renshan and Chen Yonghui. These two 
criminals committed four crimes last July and August, extorting 
over 13,000 yuan. When the public security personnel were ready 
to escort both criminals to the police substation, they were 
intercepted by Chen Renshan's brothers and his wife, who were 
armed with sticks and stones. Chen Renshan's elder brother Chen 
Renchao hit the policeman walking in front on the head with a 
brick, knocking him unconscious. In the chaos that ensued, Chen 
Renshan was taken away. Unwilling to let the matter drop, Chen 
Renchao picked up a 1.5 meter-long thick stick and gave chase to 
special policeman Zhou Xinbao. The latter fired a warning shot, 
but Chen kept on rushing at him. At the critical moment, when 
his life was seriously threatened, Zhou opened fire and hit Chen 
Renchao at the leg, forcing the mob to abandon their siege. 
  At approximately 0900 that day, at the instigation of Chen 
Renshan and others, over 100 villagers went to the police 
substation, called for the release of Chen Yonghui and tried to 
force their way into the substation. The public security 
personnel formed a human barricade to stop the villagers from 
storming the substation. Finding it impossible to enter the 
substation, Chen Renshan incited the villagers to smash the 
substation signboard and attack the policemen. Eventually, 
public security personnel arrived led by Zhang Xinde, chief of 
the Daya Bay Public Security Bureau. While vigorously conducting 
education on the need to observe the law, they rounded up the 
chief troublemakers, including Chen Renshan, Chen Shaowen, Chen 
Renhua, Chen Huijun, and Chen Qiaoling, and thus put an end to 
the incident. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-1896 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "drchi065_p_94007" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-CHI-94-065 </AU>
Daily Report 
<DATE1>  5 Apr 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> Central-South Region </F>
<H3> <TI>   Farmers Protest in Guangdong's Huiyang County </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Farmers Protest in Guangdong's Huiyang County </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   HK0504053594 Hong Kong SOUTH CHINA MORNING POST in English 5 
Apr 94 pp 1, 2 </F>

<F P=103> HK0504053594 </F>
<F P=104>  Hong Kong SOUTH CHINA MORNING POST </F>
<F P=105>  English </F>


<TEXT>
BFN 

<F P=106> [By Stella Lee] </F>
  [Text] Angry protests are continuing in Huiyang County, 
near Shenzhen, over the amount of compensation offered to 
farmers whose land is being developed in an urban renewal 
programme. Yesterday, dozens of landowners from Xinhua village 
petitioned the county Government over the issue and accused 
their village representatives of corruption. They say they are 
concerned because their land was confiscated last year but so 
far they have not received the government compensation they were 
promised. They suspect that someone in their village may have 
already received the payments and not passed them on. 
  A strong force of Public Security Bureau officers supervised 
the protest yesterday, following a violent clash between 
villagers and police last week. This time, however, the 
officers turned their attention to reporters trying to cover the 
demonstration. Officers checked the identity of anyone going 
into the village. Hong Kong reporters were detained for four 
hours for failing to seek permission from the authorities to 
conduct interviews in the region. They were eventually escorted 
to the border and put on trains back to the territory. 
  About 30 Xinhua villagers had gone to the Huiyang government 
building at about 9.30 am with banners saying they wanted their 
compensation. One of the Xinhua villagers said: "Our 
agricultural lands were sold last year, but we have not been 
given any compensation so far. 
  "We believe the village representatives are corrupt and we 
want the Government to investigate." Another villager said the 
county Government had promised to send representatives to the 
village on Friday [1 April] to hear the complaints. 
  Similar tales emerged from Baigang village where rioting 
took 
place last week when hundreds of angry residents mobbed nearby 
Xiachong police station in protest at "unsatisfactory" 
compensation. The farmers said yesterday that each had been 
given only $1,600 over the past three years as compensation for 
their 900 hectares of land, although they estimated they were 
owed between $6 million and $7 million by the Government. 
  Last week's riot started on Thursday night when about 80 
villagers staged a demonstration at the police station demanding 
the release of one of the farmers who had been accused of 
blackmail. Daya Bay Public Security Bureau head Chen Xinde said 
staff had used no force until the villagers tried to damage the 
office. Five villagers were arrested for causing damage and 
attacking public security officers. One villager, Chen 
Rongchao, was shot in the leg twice by the public security 
officials as they were trying to arrest his brother Chen 
Rongsheng, another blackmail suspect. 
  Chen Xinde said the shooting was carried out in self-defence 
when Chen tried to attack his staff. His family said they did 
not know at which hospital he was being treated and so could not 
check on his condition. Residents said police fired warning 
shots to disperse the crowd and that sporadic fighting had taken 
place. Some of the police station's windows were smashed. The 
farmers accused the village representatives of trying to 
suppress an organisation formed by one of the brothers which 
called for a clear account of the compensation issue. Other 
organisers were in hiding yesterday. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-1897 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "drchi065_p_94008" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-CHI-94-065 </AU>
Daily Report 
<DATE1>  22 Mar 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> Central-South Region </F>
<H3> <TI>   Experts Report on Guangdong Water Resources Crisis </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Experts Report on Guangdong Water Resources Crisis </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   HK0104104494 Hong Kong ZHONGGUO TONGXUN SHE in Chinese 0618 
GMT 22 Mar 94 </F>

<F P=103> HK0104104494 </F>
<F P=104>  Hong Kong ZHONGGUO TONGXUN SHE </F>
<F P=105>  Chinese </F>


<TEXT>
BFN 

  [Text] Guangzhou, 22 Mar (ZHONGGUO TONGXUN SHE)--A number 
of water conservation specialists of Guangdong Province 
yesterday (21 March) warned against a water resources crisis in 
Guangdong. 
  The specialists gave the warning at a meeting here on the 
eve 
of the "World Water Day." 
  At the meeting, the specialists sounded the alarm with a 
series of figures. The average volume of water resources of 
Guangdong Province is about 186 billion cubic meters, ranking 
fifth in China, and the per capita volume is about 2,800 cubic 
meters, ranking tenth in China, 20 percent higher than the 
average for the whole country, but less than the world's average 
by one-third. The specialists pointed out that these water 
resources cannot be fully utilized because of extremely uneven 
distribution in terms of time and place. Each year, 80 percent 
of the water flows into the sea as floods, while the volume of 
water is very small in dry seasons. Zhanjiang is one of the 
five dry areas in China. Water pollution has intensified the 
contradiction between supply and demand of water resources. The 
water shortage will spread from coastal and economically 
developed areas to other areas except the "Xi Jiang corridor." 
At present, the economic development of coastal areas such as 
Shanwei, Shenzhen, Zhanjiang, Honghai Bay, Daya Bay, 
Shangxiachuan Island, Hailing Island, Donghai Island, and Haian, 
have been seriously impeded by the shortage of water resources. 
  In view of the increasingly serious crisis of water 
resources, the specialists urged the whole society to strengthen 
the sense of water, and to change the practice of using water at 
will and of using water free of charge. They called for unified 
planning for water resources, rational development and 
exploitation of water resources, saving water, and using market 
mechanisms to protect water resources. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-1898 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "drchi065_p_94009" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-CHI-94-065 </AU>
Daily Report 
<DATE1>  26 Feb 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> Central-South Region </F>
<H3> <TI>   Guangdong Governor on Ties With Hong Kong </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Guangdong Governor on Ties With Hong Kong </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   HK1503131894 Hong Kong TA KUNG PAO in Chinese 26 Feb 94 p 10 </F>
<F P=103> HK1503131894 </F>
<F P=104>  Hong Kong TA KUNG PAO </F>
<F P=105>  Chinese </F>


<TEXT>
BFN 

<F P=106> [Interview with Guangdong Governor Zhu Senlin by </F>
unidentified TA KUNG PAO reporter in Guangzhou on 25 February: 
"Guangdong Governor Zhu Senlin Answers TA KUNG PAO Reporter's 
Questions"] 
  [Text] Guangzhou, 25 Feb (TA KUNG PAO)--Guangdong Governor 
Zhu Senlin was interviewed by this reporter in Guangzhou today. 
The full text of the interview follows: 
  [TA KUNG PAO] Looking toward the next few years of the post- 
transition period of Hong Kong, how will Guangdong and Hong Kong 
cooperate? Have any new plans and measures been promulgated 
which can help the two places to converge with one another on 
economic affairs, trade, and key projects and to jointly fight 
against crime? 
  [Zhu] Economic exchanges and cooperation between Guangdong 
and Hong Kong has been getting closer and closer since we 
started implementing the policy of reform and opening up. 
Approximately 80 percent of the trade volume of the entire 
province goes through Hong Kong, and 80 percent of direct 
investment by Chinese and foreign businessmen which utilizes 
foreign capital originates from Hong Kong. Likewise, our 
province's rapid economic growth during the 15 years of reform 
and opening up, the vigorous development of joint-venture 
enterprises, and the investment in Hong Kong by enterprises from 
our province has also played a vital role in promoting Hong 
Kong's prosperity. At present, the economic ties between 
Guangdong and Hong Kong are as close as lips and teeth. Over 
the next few years of the post-transition period, Hong Kong will 
be able to bring into full play its superiority as an 
international financial, trade, transport, and information 
center. At the same time, our province will be able to bring 
into full play our superiority of having rich human and land 
resources, a full complement of production industries, low 
production costs, and a certain level of scientific and 
technological strength. While supplementing one another, our 
cooperation in many areas can advance to a new stage, such as 
the construction and convergence of infrastructure, the 
adjustment and upgrading of the industrial structure, the 
vigorous development of new- and high-technological industries, 
and the opening up of the international market. Moreover, the 
two places can further cooperate with one another in fighting 
crime. 
  As far as economic cooperation and trade is concerned, we 
are 
formulating the following plans: (1) Guangdong and Hong Kong 
can work through various channels, such as business circles, the 
financial sector, various social groups, and government 
departments. These exchanges can take many forms, such as 
conducting reciprocal visits and holding symposiums, trade 
fairs, and sales promotions to explore and enhance economic 
exchange and cooperation between the two places. (2) Guangdong 
will widen the scope of foreign economic cooperation, will 
improve the investment atmosphere, will create a market 
environment for fair competition, and will vigorously attract 
financial groups from Hong Kong which have good reputations and 
abundant funds to invest in public utilities and basic 
industries, including power, communications, and some large 
industrial projects (for example, ethylene, oil refining, iron 
and steel, automobile, and other projects.) (3) Guangdong will 
utilize these channels and client relationships to open up a 
plural market, will vigorously take part in the international 
division of labor and competition, and will make our own efforts 
in maintaining economic prosperity in Guangdong and Hong Kong. 
  Regarding convergence on key projects, the construction of 
all key projects in our province will be stringently proved in a 
scientific manner. For those that are linked to Hong Kong, all 
factors -- including social, economic, environmental, and 
security issues -- will be carefully considered. At present, 
the concerned departments from both sides are making frequent 
contacts with one another to accomplish the work of converging 
key projects. This year, we are prepared to hold a symposium on 
the development of transportation and communications between 
Guangdong and Hong Kong, with the key lying in coordinating the 
development and convergence of transportation and communications 
between the two places. 
  As far as the task of fighting crime is concerned, we intend 
to enhance our cooperation with the Hong Kong side in the 
following areas: First, efforts will be made to exchange more 
information on crime, to quickly inform one another about 
criminal activities, and to provide timely assistance to the 
other side in finding clues and investigating and prosecuting 
criminals. Second, efforts will be made to enhance cooperation 
in fighting all types of crimes, particularly in cracking cases 
of armed crimes, kidnapping, drug trafficking, smuggling, and 
swindling, pursuing and capturing those listed as wanted 
criminals at large, and retrieving spoils. Third, efforts will 
be made to enhance cooperation in cracking down on triad crime. 
As far as the triad issue is concerned, our principles are as 
follows: (1) Overseas triad societies are not allowed, under 
whatever circumstances, to seek development and expand their 
influence on the mainland, and we will resolutely crack down on 
and ban any triad activities that are found; (2) Overseas triad 
elements who violate the law and commit crimes in the mainland 
will be severely punished in accordance with the law; (3) 
Overseas triad elements and all criminals who have committed 
offenses should harbor no illusions about escaping to the 
mainland, as we will pursue and capture them once they have been 
found and will turn them over to the police at their place of 
origin; (4) We will fight against activities conducted by 
criminal rings on the mainland which are triad groups by nature. 
They should never be tolerated. Fourth, efforts will be made 
to enhance cooperation and exchange in anticrime skills, and the 
two places will take concerted actions to discuss this issue and 
study new skills. 
  [TA KUNG PAO] As Guangdong is going to select a site for 
the construction of its second nuclear power station, and Zhuhai 
is gong to build the Lingding Yang Bridge, which will link up 
with Tuen Mun. How are the plans for these projects progressing? 
  [Zhu] Regarding the selection of a site for the construction 
of our second nuclear power station, because our province is 
rapidly developing its economy and has a great demand for 
energy, it will not work if we simply rely on coal, petroleum, 
and other conventional energy sources. Instead, we must have a 
multiple structure, and, hence, it is necessary to vigorously 
develop nuclear power. From a long-term point of view, this is 
an important way to solve the problem of the demand for energy 
in our province. In order to develop and to meet the power 
supply needs for the next century, it is not only necessary for 
Guangdong to build a second nuclear power station but third and 
fourth ones as well. The work of selecting the sites for the 
second and third power stations has been carried out for many 
years, and both Lingao of Daya Wan and Dongping of Yangjiang 
have been determined ideal sites. Of course, the construction 
project of the second nuclear power station must be finally 
examined and approved by the State Council. 
  As far as the site selection and construction of the second 
and third nuclear power stations is concerned, I know the people 
of Hong Kong are very concerned about it. I can definitely tell 
all of you that a set of strict surveillance measures will be 
used in the area within 5 km of the stations and another set 
will apply between 5 and 50 km. In any case, in building the 
new power stations, we will follow Premier Li Peng's 
instructions that "safety must be the top priority." 
  The construction of the Lingding Yang Bridge in Zhuhai is a 
project which will straddle the centuries and a requirement of 
reform, opening up, and economic development. It plays an 
important part in perfecting the layout of the coastal highways 
in western Guangdong and in linking up with Hong Kong and Macao. 
The feasibility report for the Lingding Yang Bridge project has 
been completed and examined, and the project will be implemented 
after receiving state approval. 
  The construction of Lingding Bridge was an original idea of 
Zhuhai. The section from Zhuhai to Qiao Dao will be built in 
the first phase, and the section from Qiao Dao to Hong Kong will 
be built after 1997. When the time comes, I believe that it 
will be much easier to talk to the Hong Kong Special 
Administrative Regional Government. 
  [TA KUNG PAO] How will Guangdong curb commodity price rises? 
  [Zhu] This year, our province wants to keep the overall 
level of commodity price rises within 12 percent, and our 
government will try every possible means to achieve this goal, 
even though it will be quite difficult to do so. First, we will 
strengthen macroscopic regulation and strive to keep total 
supply and demand in balance; in particular, we will guard 
against excessively rapid growth in fixed-assets investment and 
consumption. Second, we will pay close attention to the 
production and supply of the residents' daily necessities and 
try to keep the prices of the "rice bag" and "shopping basket" 
stable. Third, we will further implement price reform in a 
timely and moderate manner. Fourth, we will strengthen the 
administration, supervision, and inspection of commodity prices 
and of charges. Our government will strive to properly control 
and manage prices and charges which are monopolistic, 
compulsory, and protective in nature and which belong to public 
welfare. Meanwhile, the practices of arbitrary price rises and 
unreasonable charges will be sternly punished in accordance with 
the pricing laws and policies so as to maintain the price order 
of fair competition and safeguard consumers' interests. Fifth, 
more work will be done to give publicity to and explain reforms 
in such key areas as taxation, finance, investment, and prices 
and to strive to eliminate man-made price rises. 
  Of course, the control we have over inflation is determined 
to a very large extent by the macroeconomic environment of the 
state, which will take vigorous measures to keep the scale of 
fixed-asset investment and currency circulation in check so as 
to control the overall level of commodity prices. The issue of 
price increases is closely related to the people's lives, and 
governments at all levels must make efforts to regulate 
commodity prices. 
  [TA KUNG PAO] The central authorities have implemented key 
reforms in many areas this year. Will Guangdong make some major 
breakthroughs in financial and taxation reform? 
  [Zhu] The central authorities have implemented major reforms 
in finance and taxation. Our province will strictly carry out 
the reform measures taken by the central authorities and will 
introduce some reform measures under the reform framework 
devised by the central authorities. 
  As far as financial work is concerned, we must fulfill the 
following tasks: (1) We must support and help the provincial 
branch of the People's Bank of China to transform its functions 
and strengthen monetary control, and we must also transform the 
operating mechanism of professional banks, take gradual steps to 
transform them into state-owned commercial banks which bear 
their own risk and are truly responsible for their profits and 
losses, and implement assets-liabilities ratio administration. 
(2) We will take gradual steps to run urban cooperative banks 
on a trial basis in major cities. (3) We will vigorously seek 
the state's approval for the establishment of the Overseas 
Chinese Bank. (4) We will create conditions to attract more 
foreign banks and PRC-invested banks from Hong Kong and Macao to 
set up branches in our province in accordance with the law, and 
we will also encourage competitive financial organizations to 
set up overseas branches. (5) We will develop and perfect the 
provincial monetary market, which mainly relies on bank 
financing, which is strictly administered, centralized and open, 
and which stresses fair competition. We will also accelerate 
the formation of a financial center in Guangzhou and will set up 
a standardized and united provincial financing center as soon as 
possible. 
  Guangdong and Shanghai are simultaneously creating 
conditions 
to accelerate the establishment of a financial center. 
Shanghai, the historical financial center which is now 
implementing a great plan, has vacated approximately a dozen 
large buildings in order to run financial businesses and set up 
the financial center of the Far East. Guangdong will set up the 
financial center of South China. These two centers will have 
their own particular superiority and will not be able to be 
replaced by the other. Hong Kong is an international financial 
center with decades of experience. Guangdong, Hong Kong, and 
Macao should cooperate with one another, and this is precisely 
Guangdong's superiority. 
  [TA KUNG PAO] When Guangdong cooperates with foreign 
enterprises in various large-scale construction projects -- for 
example, the Guangzhou subway and ethylene projects -- how 
important are political considerations? 
  [Zhu] When cooperating with foreign enterprises in 
large-scale construction projects, we always insist on 
considering each case according to our national interests, our 
industrial policies, and the needs of our national economic 
development on the basis of equality and mutual benefit. Taking 
the Guangzhou subway project as an example, we bore six 
principles in mind when choosing partners: (1) They were to 
possess high prestige and have had concrete experience similar 
to that required by the Guangzhou subway project; (2) the 
equipment and systems provided must conform to the functional 
requirements stated in the letter of requirements for 
introducing equipment for the Guangzhou subway; (3) the 
equipment provided should be better in terms of technology, 
price, and capital (loans); (4) the equipment and systems 
provided should be safer and more advanced, mature, and reliable 
and must have a certain proven track record of operation; (5) 
the overall package should be favorable to project management 
and smooth project implementation and can also lower the overall 
project investment scale; and (6) we chose the best by upholding 
the principle of fair competition in line with our country's 
overall economic, trade, and foreign policies. Good inter-state 
relations constitute favorable conditions for our cooperation 
with foreign enterprises. If inter- state relations are in a 
state of abnormal development, they will inevitably affect our 
cooperation with enterprises from these countries. 
  [TA KUNG PAO] As Guangdong and Hong Kong are closely 
related, some of the reform measures introduced by Guangdong 
will immediately affect Hong Kong investors. How have you taken 
this into consideration? 
  [Zhu] Some of the current reform measures introduced by our 
country -- for example, foreign exchange and foreign trade 
restructuring -- will help our country administer foreign 
exchange in accordance with market standards. Meanwhile, the 
unitary and manageable floating exchange rate, which is set on 
the basis of market demand and supply, will further strengthen 
the role of market regulation in our country's foreign trade 
activities. The unification of exchange rates can settle the 
conflict that foreign businessmen encountered in the past when 
their registered capital was calculated at the official rate, 
but the profits sent out of the country were calculated at the 
swap rate. The foreign exchange administration for 
foreign-invested enterprises will remain unchanged, and this 
will be favorable to foreign investors in China, including 
investors from Hong Kong. 
  [TA KUNG PAO] What measures are being taken to guarantee the 
safe production of a large number of foreign-invested 
enterprises and to safeguard the rights and interests and 
well-being of their staff and workers? 
  [Zhu] Over the past few years, the provincial people's 
congress and the provincial government have formulated a series 
of laws and regulations on guaranteeing safe production of 
enterprises and safeguarding the working rights and interests of 
staff and workers, including: The Guangdong Provincial 
Regulations on Working Safety and Health, the Guangdong 
Provincial Regulations on the Labor Administration of 
Foreign-Invested Enterprises, and the Guangdong Provincial 
Regulations on the Working Rights and Interests of Enterprise 
Staff and Workers. These regulations are equally applicable to 
foreign-invested enterprises. In the future, we will vigorously 
strengthen law enforcement and supervision and guarantee the 
implementation of the regulations. We are taking effective 
measures to settle the existing problems and loopholes. 
  [TA KUNG PAO] In some counties and cities, laborers from 
other provinces outnumber the number of local laborers. What is 
Guangdong's attitude towards laborers from other provinces? 
  [Zhu] Laborers from other provinces make great contributions 
to Guangdong's economic development. At present, more than 6.5 
million laborers from other provinces are working in Guangdong, 
thus meeting our province's labor needs in the process of 
economic development. Meanwhile, laborers from other provinces 
can learn skills and become more capable when they are working 
in our province, which is also an important channel for bringing 
Guangdong's influence and its "window" role into play. 
Therefore, we welcome laborers from other provinces to work in 
Guangdong. However, we must strengthen the administration and 
arrangement of laborers from other provinces who are working in 
Guangdong and recruit them according to our province's needs of 
economic development in an organized and planned manner. At 
present, the labor departments of our province have established 
ties with their counterparts in eight neighboring provinces to 
enhance cooperation in this respect. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-1899 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "drchi065_p_94010" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-CHI-94-065 </AU>
Daily Report 
<DATE1>  15 Mar 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> Central-South Region </F>
<H3> <TI>   Unauthorized Trade Unions Emerge in Guangdong </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Unauthorized Trade Unions Emerge in Guangdong </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   HK2403030694 Hong Kong TANGTAI in Chinese No 36, 15 Mar 94 
pp 38-39 </F>

<F P=103> HK2403030694 </F>
<F P=104>  Hong Kong TANGTAI </F>
<F P=105>  Chinese </F>


<TEXT>
BFN 

<F P=106> [Article by Wei Shang-li (7279 1424 4409): "Trade Unions </F>
Founded Spontaneously in Various Localities in Guangdong"] 
  [Text] There are now over five million "non-resident 
workers" in Shenzhen and adjacent areas in Guangdong, most of 
whom are farmers-turned workers employed by foreign-funded or 
private enterprises. Because foreign businessmen and private 
enterprise operators -- who are only too interested in making 
use of cheap labor -- pay very low wages, labor trouble is a 
common occurrence. 
<H5>  A Worker's Monthly Pay Is Only 300 Yuan </H5>
  According to a restricted report, factory operators in 
Shenzhen and nearby areas seriously encroach on workers' rights 
and interests to in the following ways. 
  1. Factory operators pay workers very low wages. Statistics 
from the labor personnel department show that a non-resident 
worker only gets 300 yuan a month in Shenzhen and adjacent 
areas, much lower than wages for local people. Though the 
Guangdong Provincial and Shenzhen governments set the minimum 
monthly wage at 300 yuan, factory operators in Shenzhen and the 
adjacent areas usually pay this minimum figure. As a result, 
many "non-resident workers" can save little after spending their 
wages on food, clothing, and other daily necessities. 
Complaints from these workers, who live a miserable life, are 
heard everywhere. 
  2. The workers' living conditions are extremely inadequate. 
To lower their production costs, factory operators cut back 
their expenditures on housing for workers and other basic 
facilities. In some places, over a dozen workers are packed 
into one room, which results in a foul smell. Sanitation 
facilities also leave much to be desired, with only one water 
tap or water closet provided for many people. Usually the smell 
in the water closet is so offensive that one feels like vomiting 
when using it. Some factories do not even provide dormitories, 
and the workers have to sleep in the workshops, which is rather 
dangerous. 
  3. Safety facilities are not installed as required. Many 
factories try to earn as much money as possible and pay no 
attention to safety. 1) The equipment is outdated, resulting in 
an increasing number of injured and disabled workers; 2) fire 
fighting equipment and escape mechanisms are so backward that 
the number of fire victims has become alarming. The 
conflagration in a foreign-funded factory in Shenzhen, in which 
approximately 100 workers were killed, shocked the world; and 3) 
working conditions are very poor. The workshops, which are 
dirty, noisy, and poorly illuminated, are frightening. And, 
  4. Workers' welfare is not guaranteed. Workers are not 
given subsidies when they fall ill and receive no attention when 
they become disabled due to industrial accidents. Many workers 
do not have the minimum guarantee of welfare. 
<H5>  Workers' Certificates Are Retained To Prevent Them Seeking </H5>
Employment in Other Factories 
  Workers frequently "change their employers" due to the poor 
working conditions. To prevent workers seeking new jobs in 
other factories, enterprise operators in Shenzhen and nearby 
areas typically illegally retain their employees' certificates. 
A restricted investigation report states that Shenzhen 
government departments often receive complaints from workers 
against their employers for illegally detaining their 
certificates. Some enterprises in Shenzhen have collected the 
workers' identity certificates and border passes and then locked 
them in drawers on the excuse of helping them get temporary 
residence permits. An employer in a garment processing factory 
in Shenzhen did not apply for temporary residence permits for 
over 100 workers eight months after collecting their identity 
certificates and border passes and refused to give the 
certificates back to the workers, despite repeated demands, 
using the excuse that the "necessary procedures for applying 
temporary residence permits are underway" or that the 
"certificates were lost in the process." When the department 
concerned, after receiving the complaints, inquired with the 
employer about the matter, the latter continued to lie, saying 
that they "kept" the certificates because the police substation 
rejected the workers' applications for temporary residence 
permits. A factory, which specializes in processing supplied 
materials, set aside the workers' certificates for fear that 
they would seek jobs in other factories, and the employer, when 
questioned by the department concerned as to the reason, 
shouted: "If I do not retain their certificates, will my 
factory not be forced to suspend production if they `go over to 
other factories'!" 
<H5>  Both Employers and Employees Lack Awareness of the Need To </H5>
Abide by the Law 
  Putting on a long face, a female worker told the following 
story: When she, along with a number of fellow villagers, was 
employed by a garment factory, the boss took away their 
certificates. After receiving a telegram from home telling her 
that "her father was seriously ill" and urging her to come home, 
she asked the boss for leave and to return her certificate. 
Instead of getting back her certificate, she was scolded by her 
boss. 
  Many workers complained: "Since our employer has retained 
our certificates, we dare not go out, for fear that we will be 
arrested by public security officers if we fail to produce a 
certificate. We are on tenterhooks when we are in bed at night, 
because public security officers could come to our dormitory and 
ask us to produce certificates." 
  An analysis has revealed that there are three reasons why 
employers retain workers' certificates. 1) Some enterprise 
operators are undereducated and lack awareness of the need to 
abide by the law, so they know nothing about the regulations 
regarding identity certificates and believe that it is an 
insignificant matter to retain workers' certificates. 2) Some 
enterprises which have poor economic efficiency and offer 
workers low wages retain workers' certificates for fear that the 
workers will seek jobs in other enterprises. 3) Some workers, 
who also know nothing about the regulations regarding the 
identity certificate, still work honestly for the employer after 
their certificates are retained rather than safeguarding their 
rights and interests in a lawful way, thus enabling the 
employers to have their way. And, 4) Some units recruited 
workers before going through the necessary procedures for hiring 
workers and could not get temporary residency permits for their 
workers. But they cheated the workers by saying they "were 
applying for temporary residency permits" for the workers and in 
fact kept the certificates in their own hands, refusing to give 
them back to the owners for quite some time. 
<H5>  The Workers Set Up Trade Unions Simultaneously </H5>
  Having their rights and interests been repeatedly encroached 
upon, workers in Shenzhen and nearby areas set up trade unions 
on their own to deal with the unlawful practices of enterprise 
operators. Initial statistics have indicated that there are 
currently over 800 trade unions at various levels. The main 
task of these trade unions is to seek a solution for the problem 
of unequal payments to workers through discussions with 
employers. Generally speaking, workers are willing to join 
trade unions, but they do not do so openly, because they are 
afraid they will be laid off for such activity. 
  Though these trade unions play a positive role in 
safeguarding workers' rights and interests, they have several 
serious defects. First, the trade unions are not very 
well-organized and resemble secret societies, which lack a set 
of management principles and rules, and thus usually act based 
on feelings and personal loyalty. Second, many trade unions do 
not have a well-considered strategy for safeguarding their 
legitimate rights and interests. Instead of dealing with the 
employer in a lawful way, they usually choose the method which 
is so destructive that foreign investors are quaking in their 
boots. Third, some trade unions often set forth inappropriate 
demands which are unacceptable to the employer. And fourth, the 
trade unions often go so far in their disputes with the 
employers that the situation ends up in a mess. 
  Obviously, the trade unions simultaneously organized by 
workers in enterprises in Shenzhen and nearby areas are 
different from those set up by the central authorities in a 
planned way, but governments at all levels do not take any 
action against these unauthorized trade unions. Foreign-funded 
and private enterprises are very disgruntled with these 
unauthorized trade unions, and the two sides are displaying 
great hostility against one another. This has received adequate 
attention from the central authorities and provincial and 
municipal governments, and it is believed that some measures 
will be soon taken to solve the problem. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-1900 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "drchi065_p_94011" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-CHI-94-065 </AU>
Daily Report 
<DATE1>  24 Feb 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> Central-South Region </F>
<H3> <TI>   Article on Use of Fake Military License Plates </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Article on Use of Fake Military License Plates </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   HK2103114094 Hong Kong TA KUNG PAO in Chinese 24 Feb 94 p 8 </F>
<F P=103> HK2103114094 </F>
<F P=104>  Hong Kong TA KUNG PAO </F>
<F P=105>  Chinese </F>


<TEXT>
BFN 

<F P=106> ["Under the Five-Ram City" column by Chang Jou-sang (1728 </F>
2677 2718): "Expose the Phenomenon of Fake Military Vehicles in 
Guangdong"] 
  [Text] The date 28 January was "Black Friday" for a 
handful of lawless persons who were using fake military license 
plates. They never expected to receive such a lousy "New Years 
gift." Scores of vehicles illegitimately using military license 
plates fell into the dragnet set jointly by the garrison forces 
and military transportation department in Guangzhou, Shenzhen, 
and Zhuhai. 
  Although the flow of military vehicles accounts for less 
than 
5 percent of the total traffic in the crowded Zhujiang delta, 
one can see all kinds of military license plates. In Guangdong, 
an official responsible for the transportation section of the 
Logistics Department of the Guangzhou Military Region said 
military license plates from all parts of the country except 
Tibet can been seen here. Experienced officers and men of the 
garrison force who are responsible for exercising supervision 
over military vehicles can easily spot the counterfeit military 
vehicles. In the military vehicle inspection jointly organized 
by the garrison forces and military transportation department of 
the Guangzhou Military Region and investigated by relevant 
departments of the General Staff Headquarters and General 
Logistics Department and the Legal System Bureau of the Central 
Military Commission, they examined more than 600 vehicles which 
had been using military license plates and found that 31 were 
using counterfeit military plates or licenses. 
<H5>  Making Use of Military Vehicles To Smuggle and To Evade Taxes </H5>
  It is difficult to discover where the fake military license 
plates are forged, but Guangdong is surely one of the regions 
where the practice is running wild. Because of the special 
military mission of military vehicles and the preferential 
treatment they enjoy in the Zhujiang delta, they are exempted 
from highway and bridge tolls. As a result, a handful of people 
blinded by greed take the opportunity to fish in troubled waters 
and use counterfeit military license plates to gain advantages 
at the expense of the state and collective. An individual 
engaged in the transportation business said that he would save 
annual highway and bridge tolls of over 10,000 yuan with a 
military license plate. As Guangdong is a coastal province, 
adjacent to Hong Kong and Macao, a tiny handful of lawless 
elements make use of the military plates to cover their crime of 
smuggling, evade supervision by government departments, and 
engage in all kinds of illegal activities. 
  There is great demand for these license plates. Lawless 
elements seeking military plates and licenses stimulate almost 
wild black market transactions. When a "Dongfeng" truck, with a 
fake military license plate but without any license, was 
intercepted in Shenzhen, a reporter asked the driver about the 
source of the fake plate. The driver replied: I bought it for 
600 yuan. When asked where he bought the plate, he said: I do 
not know. The Guangzhou Military Region tracked down a truck 
which was using fake military license plates by following clues, 
and discovered an illegal ring involved in selling temporary 
plates. The ring sold a total of 39 temporary military vehicle 
plates at 10,000 yuan each. As of the time of the 
investigation, the ring had illegally made a profit of 390,000 
yuan. The black market price of a military license plate could 
reach as high as several hundred thousand yuan. In spite of the 
high prices, the forging of military vehicle license plates and 
illegal transactions are spreading. Regarding the lawless 
elements, the illegal gains made from using fake military 
vehicles is several to many times higher than the cost paid for 
getting a genuine military plate. 
<H5>  Bizarre Dress Used To Pass Oneself Off As a Military Official </H5>
  To pass oneself off as an owner or driver of a military 
vehicle, one must pretend to be a serviceman or staff member of 
a military unit. Most of these people appear in the capacity as 
a staff member of a military enterprise. When a military 
vehicle inspection group was examining a "Lingzhi" car with 
military license plates at the Shaba toll collection station on 
the Guangzhou-Foshan expressway, a long-haired female lieutenant 
stepped out. The lady, who claimed to be the deputy director of 
a unit of the Logistics Department stationed in Guangzhou, wore 
a uniform with unmatched buttons and which was attractive, with 
material which was apparently different from the standard. She 
explained that the uniform was the latest issue. The servicemen 
in the inspection group looked at each other in dismay. When 
the inspector examined her "officer identity" card, which had 
the chop of the management bureau of an ordnance factory, she 
begged the female officer: "Please let me go, I am real." At 
the military vehicle inspection post near the Zhuhai 
Banzhangshan tunnel, the driver of a Toyota van, which had a 
military plate, presented his "People's Liberation Army Identity 
Card," which looked similar to the "officer identity" and 
"serviceman identity" cards. "XX Real Estate Development Company 
of XX Unit in Zhuhai" was printed on the cover of the identity 
card. When the inspector asked the driver some questions about 
the identity card, he just smiled and refused to answer. 
<H5>  Huge Profits Result From Mass Production </H5>
  In an office of the Highway Inspection Section of the 
Guangzhou Military Region, this reporter witnessed hundreds of 
various kinds of confiscated fake military license plates. Some 
of the military plates and documents were of poor quality, and 
could be identified at first glance. But the quality of most of 
them was good enough to mistake them for real. According to 
officials of the Transportation Bureau of the Logistics 
Department of the Guangzhou Military Region, the workmanship and 
materials used in making most of the counterfeit military 
license plates were far better than the ones used in making 
genuine military vehicle plates. The forging of driving passes, 
driving licenses, officer identity cards, serviceman identity 
cards, and staff identity cards corresponded with the forging of 
military vehicle license plates. To forge documents, it is 
necessary to forge the chops of military units and the officials 
responsible for the work. One can easily see the mistakes in 
the forged military documents and chops, such as "Logistics 
Department of XX Unit Under General Staff Headquarters" and "XX 
Unit Stationed in XX Office." A forged military vehicle license 
even made the mistake of printing "Zhongguo Renmin Jiefang Jun" 
[Chinese People's Liberation Army] as "Zhongguo Renmin Fangjie 
Jun." An officer in charge of producing military vehicle 
license plates said that he had already found more than a dozen 
forged chops which used his name. 
  Looking at the military cars and trucks which sweep past and 
gazing at the luxurious military cars parked in front of hotels, 
this reporter is at a loss: How many of them are genuine? 
Undoubtedly there are "underground factories" which forge 
military vehicle plates and licenses in large numbers. But when 
can these dens be smashed? 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-1901 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "drchi065_p_94012" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-CHI-94-065 </AU>
Daily Report 
<DATE1>  28 Mar 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> Central-South Region </F>
<H3> <TI>   Guangxi Secretary, Congress Chairman on NPC Spirit </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Guangxi Secretary, Congress Chairman on NPC Spirit </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   HK0504020894 Nanning Guangxi People's Radio Network in 
Mandarin 1130 GMT 28 Mar 94 </F>

<F P=103> HK0504020894 </F>
<F P=104>  Nanning Guangxi People's Radio Network </F>
<F P=105>  Mandarin </F>


<TEXT>
BFN 

  [Text] The regional party committee called a meeting of 
cadres at the regional department deputy director level in the 
regional people's government auditorium on the morning of 28 
March. The meeting was presided over by regional party 
committee Secretary Zhao Fulin and was held to relay the spirit 
of the Second Session of the Eighth National People's Congress 
[NPC]. Also attending the meeting were Liu Mingzu, Ding Tingmo, 
Huang Baoyao, Wei Jisong, and other regional leaders; Tao 
Aiying, NPC Nationalities Committee vice chairman; and Huang 
Yun, former regional advisory committee chairman. 
  Liu Mingzu, regional party committee deputy secretary and 
people's congress standing committee chairman, relayed the 
spirit of the Second Session of the Eighth NPC and made 
arrangements for implementing the NPC session spirit as well. 
  Liu Mingzu's speech was divided into the following six 
parts: 
  1. A Brief Account of the Second Session of the Eighth NPC; 
  2. The Main Spirit of the Government Work Report; 
  3. The Spirit of the NPC Standing Committee Work Report; 
  4. Premier Li Peng's Important Remarks to the Guangxi NPC 
Delegation; 
  5. The Guangxi NPC Delegation's Activities; 
  6. To Conscientiously Implement the Spirit of the Second 
Session of the Eighth NPC and Speed up Guangxi's Reform, Opening 
up, and Economic Growth. 
  When speaking of conscientiously implementing the spirit of 
the Second Session of the Eighth NPC in light of regional 
realities, Liu Mingzu emphatically called for firmly grasping 
the following aspects of work: 
  1. To conscientiously study and profoundly understand the 
"Selected Works of Deng Xiaoping," volume three, in light of 
regional realities and arm the mind as well as guide reform and 
opening up with Comrade Deng Xiaoping's theory of building 
socialism with Chinese characteristics; 
  2. To conscientiously sum up historical experiences, fully 
understand the importance of seizing each and every opportunity, 
strengthen opportunity recognition, firmly grasp each and every 
excellent historical opportunity, work with one heart and one 
mind, and make every possible effort to push ahead with economic 
growth, 
  3. To correctly handle relations between reform, 
development, and stability and fully understand the importance 
of stability. To this end, Liu Mingzu noted, all levels and 
departments in the region should proceed from the overall 
interests of reform, development, and the country's long-term 
stability and security, should make a success of all types of 
work aimed at maintaining social stability, should take measures 
to control price levels, and should guarantee sufficient 
vegetable and grain supplies. They should make continued 
efforts to build a clean government, should strictly enforce 
laws and discipline, should severely crack down on all types of 
corrupt phenomena, should successfully further comprehensive 
social order management, and should maintain political and 
social stability. Moreover, leading cadres at all levels in the 
region should earnestly improve work methods and styles, and go 
deep into the realities and to the grassroots level to guide 
work, educate the masses, and help solve problems, 
  4. To conscientiously study and master socialist market 
economic theories and become more adaptable to reform and 
opening up, 
  5. To grasp each and every excellent opportunity at the 
moment and mobilize people throughout the region to make 
concerted efforts and successfully accomplish all tasks in 1994. 
  Secretary Zhao Fulin delivered a speech in which he offered 
specific views on the future regional work and urged leaders at 
all levels in the region to strive to deepen reform, enable 
reform to push ahead with development, readjust the economic 
structure, accelerate education development, strengthen unity, 
and maintain stability. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-1902 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "drchi065_p_94013" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-CHI-94-065 </AU>
Daily Report 
<DATE1>  3 Apr 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> Central-South Region </F>
<H3> <TI>   Guangxi Benefits From UN-Aided Project </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Guangxi Benefits From UN-Aided Project </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   OW0304151094 Beijing XINHUA in English 1452 GMT 3 Apr 94 </F>
<F P=103> OW0304151094 </F>
<F P=104>  Beijing XINHUA </F>
<F P=105>  English </F>


<TEXT>
BFN 

  [Text] Nanning, April 3 (XINHUA) -- Farmers are benefiting 
from a comprehensive agricultural development project aided by 
the World Food Program (WFP) in three poverty-stricken counties 
in the Guangxi Autonomous Region, southwest China. 
  Mr. Dean Everts, of the WFP, said that the project played an 
exemplary role showing how to relieve poverty in developing 
countries. 
  The project, with the free offer of 93,925 tons of wheat 
from 
the WFP and 103.73 million yuan of coordinating funds from the 
Chinese Government, started on February 1, 1991, and is due to 
be completed in five years' time. 
  The project mainly focuses on building water conservancy 
facilities, upgrading soil quality, planting trees, developing 
orchards, constructing roads and technical training. 
  Thanks to the on-going project, the counties have another 
10,361 ha of fairly well irrigated farmland and additional 1.6 
million kwh. As a result an additional 61,820 tons of grain has 
been produced. 
  Technical training has also helped more and more surplus 
local farmers find other jobs, and thus cut down the exodus of 
labor to other parts of the country. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-1903 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "drchi065_p_94014" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-CHI-94-065 </AU>
Daily Report 
<DATE1>  4 Apr 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> Central-South Region </F>
<H3> <TI>   Hainan Puts Forward Industrial Upgrading Projects </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Hainan Puts Forward Industrial Upgrading Projects </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   OW0404154494 Beijing XINHUA in English 1450 GMT 4 Apr 94 </F>
<F P=103> OW0404154494 </F>
<F P=104>  Beijing XINHUA </F>
<F P=105>  English </F>


<TEXT>
BFN 

  [Text] Haikou, April 4 (XINHUA) -- Hainan Island, China's 
southernmost province and largest special economic zone, will 
put forward 100 industrial upgrading projects for foreign 
investors, officials with the province's industrial department 
announced at a news conference today. 
  At the same time, the province will put forward another 100 
projects for new product development. 
  Foreign businessmen are welcome to cooperate with Chinese 
companies or factories in various ways, such as through joint 
stocks, contracting, equipment leasing and the buying of 
enterprise property rights. 
  The projects have been carefully chosen in an attempt to 
ensure profits as long as sufficient investments are made, the 
officials said. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-1904 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "drchi065_p_94015" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-CHI-94-065 </AU>
Daily Report 
<DATE1>  3 Apr 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> Central-South Region </F>
<H3> <TI>   Wuhan Housing Cooperatives Benefit Residents </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Wuhan Housing Cooperatives Benefit Residents </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   OW0304065294 Beijing XINHUA in English 0557 GMT 3 Apr 94 </F>
<F P=103> OW0304065294 </F>
<F P=104>  Beijing XINHUA </F>
<F P=105>  English </F>


<TEXT>
BFN 

  [Text] Wuhan, April 3 (XINHUA) -- Housing cooperatives 
have proved to be an effective way to help more residents in 
Wuhan, capital of Hubei Province, move into new homes. 
  According to local officials, 13,000 urban households have 
so 
far moved into new homes through joining housing cooperatives. 
  The funds to build housing cooperative homes come mainly 
from 
future dwellers themselves, coupled with a small subsidy from 
their employer and certain preferential treatment from the city 
government. 
  Wuhan is believed to be one of the first cities to pilot the 
housing cooperative system in China. Over the past several 
years, more and more factories and institutions got together and 
set up housing cooperatives, to help solve the housing problem 
for their own workers. 
  Some 61 housing cooperatives have now been established in 
the 
city, constructing flats with floor space totalling 945,000 sq m. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-1905 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "drchi065_p_94016" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-CHI-94-065 </AU>
Daily Report 
<DATE1>  1 Apr 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> Central-South Region </F>
<H3> <TI>   Disaster Reduction Association Founded in Henan </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Disaster Reduction Association Founded in Henan </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   OW0104090594 Beijing XINHUA in English 0822 GMT 1 Apr 94 </F>
<F P=103> OW0104090594 </F>
<F P=104>  Beijing XINHUA </F>
<F P=105>  English </F>


<TEXT>
BFN 

  [Text] Zhengzhou, April 1 (XINHUA) -- An association for 
the prevention and mitigation of natural disasters has been 
founded in central China's Henan Province, which suffers from 
frequent natural disasters. 
  The association consists of a dozen departments and 
enterprises in the fields of agriculture, meteorology, geography 
and industry. It aims to promote efficiency in natural disaster 
reduction and prevention. 
  Henan is a major grain and cotton producer, but natural 
disasters such as drought, flood, plant disease, and pests have 
hampered the growth of agricultural production. 
  In 1986 over 5.33 million ha of farmland, about 80 percent 
of 
the total, was hit by a serious drought, causing a loss of two 
billion kg of grain. 
  In 1992 its cotton crop was hit by bollworms, causing a loss 
of 1.386 billion yuan (about 154 million U.S. dollars). 
  In order to seek more effective ways of reducing disasters, 
local scientists and other experts have carried out a series of 
major research projects in the field. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-1906 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "drchi065_p_94017" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-CHI-94-065 </AU>
Daily Report 
<DATE1>  4 Apr 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> Central-South Region </F>
<H3> <TI>   Henan Highway Construction Promotes Economy </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Henan Highway Construction Promotes Economy </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   OW0404094594 Beijing XINHUA in English 0706 GMT 4 Apr 94 </F>
<F P=103> OW0404094594 </F>
<F P=104>  Beijing XINHUA </F>
<F P=105>  English </F>


<TEXT>
BFN 

  [Text] Zhengzhou, April 4 (XINHUA) -- Highways have been 
built linking all the townships and 91.8 percent of the villages 
in central China's Henan Province, greatly promoting economic 
prosperity in rural areas. 
  The total length of the roads has reached 35,359 km. 
  Although it is rich in natural resources, 50 percent of 
Henan 
is mountainous, and transportation problems have hampered rural 
economic development. 
  In the drive for reform and opening to the outside world, 
the 
provincial government has worked out a strategy for the 
development of transportation by collecting funds from various 
channels. 
  In the past eight years the province's Luanchuan County 
alone 
has invested over 14.9 million yuan (about 1.5 million U.S. 
dollars) in rural highway construction. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-1907 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "drchi065_p_94018" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-CHI-94-065 </AU>
Daily Report 
<DATE1>  26 Mar 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> Central-South Region </F>
<H3> <TI>   Hunan Praised for Reeducation-Through-Labor Work </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Hunan Praised for Reeducation-Through-Labor Work </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   HK0404065694 Changsha Hunan People's Radio Network in 
Mandarin 2300 GMT 26 Mar 94 </F>

<F P=103> HK0404065694 </F>
<F P=104>  Changsha Hunan People's Radio Network </F>
<F P=105>  Mandarin </F>


<TEXT>
BFN 

  [Text] At a recently concluded national conference of 
provincial and regional justice departments directors, justice 
bureaus chiefs, reform-through-labor bureau chiefs, and 
reeducation- through-labor bureau chiefs, the state ministry of 
justice and some central leaders highly praised Hunan's justice 
work. 
  A total of 10 advanced reeducation-through-labor 
institutions 
across the country, two of which are in Hunan, were commended at 
the national conference. Hunan now ranks third among the 
country's advanced reeducation-through-labor institutions. 
  At a national conference convened eight years ago, Hunan was 
criticized for its poor reeducation-through-labor work. Since 
then, the province's reeducation-through-labor bureau party 
committee has summed up lessons, readjusted leading bodies, and 
improved management with the result that the province's 
reeducation-through-labor work has made significant headway: 
The province's reeducation-through-labor bureau has formed a 
highly trained special police unit, the first of its kind in the 
entire country, has summed up experiences, has mapped out a 
"three grades, six levels" reeducation method, and has built a 
reeducation campus, a reeducation barracks, and a reeducation 
garden. At a result, the province's prisoner escape rate has 
dropped from 31.7 percent eight years ago to 0.25 percent at the 
moment. 
  Thanks to a series of successful internal reforms, such as 
the labor system reform, personnel system reform, and 
distribution system reform, the province's 
reeducation-through-labor institutions have made unremitting 
efforts to improve product quality and raise economic 
efficiency. Over the past few years, they have developed a 
total of 56 new products, 10 of which have been awarded 
scientific and technological progress prizes by the state, 
ministries, or provincial departments. In 1993, Hunan's 
reeducation-through-labor institutions realized a total output 
value of $120 million yuan and a total profit of 12 million 
yuan, up by 70 million yuan and 8 million yuan respectively over 
1988. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-1908 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "drchi065_p_94019" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-CHI-94-065 </AU>
Daily Report 
<DATE1>  23 Mar 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> Central-South Region </F>
<H3> <TI>   Shenzhen Mayor on Plan To Simplify Port Procedures </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Shenzhen Mayor on Plan To Simplify Port Procedures </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   HK0504054594 Hong Kong WEN WEI PO in Chinese 23 Mar 94 p A6 </F>
<F P=103> HK0504054594 </F>
<F P=104>  Hong Kong WEN WEI PO </F>
<F P=105>  Chinese </F>


<TEXT>
BFN 

<F P=106> ["Special report" by staff reporter Lin Yu-tung (2651 5940 </F>
2767): "Shenzhen To Reform Port Management System, To Practice 
72-Hour Visa Exemption System"] 
  [Text] Shenzhen, 22 Mar--The Sixth Session of the First 
Shenzhen City People's Congress solemnly opened here this 
afternoon. At the meeting, Li Youwei, secretary of the Shenzhen 
City CPC Committee and city mayor, delivered a government 
report. When reviewing the achievements in various fields of 
endeavor in 1993 and talking about the work goals and duties in 
1994, he said Shenzhen should open wider to both the interior 
region and the outside world and develop a new pattern. 
  Li said: To open wider to the outside world, Shenzhen should 
first tighten and improve management at the first and second 
lines and apply the special policy toward the bonded area fully, 
satisfactorily, and flexibly. He said: Further efforts should 
be made to revise and improve the plan for managing the first 
and second lines to make it more in keeping with reality. It is 
necessary to step up hardware and software construction in the 
second line and manage the second line satisfactorily and 
strictly so as to create conditions and lay a good foundation 
for implementing the policy toward the bonded area. Li said: 
The work of designing a bonded area in Yantian Port and 
submitting it for approval should be accelerated in a bid to 
start operation this year. 
  Second, it is necessary to reform the port management 
structure. Li said: With support from the relevant central 
departments and provincial authorities, Shenzhen will further 
reform the port management structure, simplify examination 
procedures, and improve examination equipment to make the port 
"convenient, highly efficient, safe, and free-flowing." We 
should gradually establish a port management structure operating 
according to international practice and in better coordination 
with the Hong Kong and international markets. We shall strive 
to practice a 72-hour visa exemption system for foreign tourists 
coming to the Shenzhen Special Economic Zone. 
  Third, it is necessary to expand the scope and sphere of 
foreign capital introduction and raise the grade and level of 
its use. Li Youwei said: Shenzhen should actively create 
conditions for introducing funds and technology from large 
multinational corporations and financial groups in Europe, the 
United States, and other countries, and expand capital 
introduction to many spheres, such as infrastructure 
construction, trade, finance, insurance, tourism, and real 
estate. We shall set up a China Merchants Steam Navigation 
Company to strengthen leadership over investment invitation. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-1909 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "drchi065_p_94020" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-CHI-94-065 </AU>
Daily Report 
<DATE1>  1 Apr 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> Central-South Region </F>
<H3> <TI>   Shenzhen Generates 6 Billion Yuan Tax Revenue </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Shenzhen Generates 6 Billion Yuan Tax Revenue </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   HK0104111894 Hong Kong HONGKONG STANDARD (FINANCIAL REVIEW) 
in English 1 Apr 94 p 2 </F>

<F P=103> HK0104111894 </F>
<F P=104>  Hong Kong HONGKONG STANDARD (FINANCIAL REVIEW) 
in English 1 Apr 94 p 2 </F>

<F P=105> English </F>


<TEXT>
BFN 

<F P=106> [Report by Chan Po-chung] </F>
  [Text] Shenzhen's taxation bureau chief claims the special 
economic zone generated tax revenue of about six billion yuan 
(HK$5.34 billion [Hong Kong dollars]) last year, with about one 
billion yuan garnered from Sino-foreign joint ventures. 
  Shao Mingyun, director of Shenzhen's Taxation Bureau, 
speaking after a seminar on China's new taxation system 
yesterday, said this year's revenue would surge to even greater 
heights. 
  "Last year, the Shenzhen government contributed to the 
central government a total of 1.1 billion yuan," he said. 
  "The amount will grow by at least three times this year," he 
said. 
  China's new taxation system, which came into effect on 1 
January, introduced new taxes and various administrative changes 
throughout the country. 
  Among these, most concern was voiced about value-added tax, 
business tax and consumption tax. 
  Local manufacturers, wholesalers and retailers have shown 
great concern about the implementation of value-added tax, 
seeing themselves as the major targets. 
  However, some of the new taxes might not actually be levied 
during the current year, according to Liu Xiaoguang, vice 
director of the planning commission for Beijing's Municipal 
Government. 
  "For example, the new capital-gains tax on land will not be 
coming into force in Beijing this year," Mr Liu said. 
  While denying the new capital-gains tax was being ignored by 
regional governments keen on attracting foreign property 
investors, Mr Liu said the lack of detailed plans from the 
central government was behind the non-implementation so far. 
  He claimed the Beijing government's directorate had been 
followed by the municipal governments of Guangzhou and Shenzhen. 
  Nevertheless, Mr Liu acknowledged that Beijing's property 
development would benefit from any delay in implementation. 
  Nationally, meanwhile, industrial and commercial taxes 
brought in 40.7 billion yuan in the seven weeks up to 20 
February, up by 27.3 percent on the same period last year. 
  Industrial production in January increased 33.2 percent 
compared with the same month last year, proof that the new tax 
system has so far not had an affect on productivity, according 
to some Chinese officials. 
  But some misunderstanding had arisen as some merchants added 
new value-added taxes to prices which already incorporated taxes 
under the old system. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-1910 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "drchi065_p_94021" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-CHI-94-065 </AU>
Daily Report 
<DATE1>  22 Mar 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> Central-South Region </F>
<H3> <TI>   Ten Hong Kong People Become Shenzhen CPPCC Members </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Ten Hong Kong People Become Shenzhen CPPCC Members </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   HK0104095494 Hong Kong ZHONGGUO TONGXUN SHE in Chinese 0618 
GMT 22 Mar 94 </F>

<F P=103> HK0104095494 </F>
<F P=104>  Hong Kong ZHONGGUO TONGXUN SHE </F>
<F P=105>  Chinese </F>


<TEXT>
BFN 

<F P=106> [By reporter Wang Min (3769 2549)] </F>
  [Text] Shenzhen, 22 Mar (ZHONGGUO TONGXUN SHE) -- This 
reporter learned from the Fifth Session of the First Shenzhen 
City Committee of the Chinese People's Political Consultative 
Conference [CPPCC] that following repeated exchanges of views 
and consultations, the election of 69 additional members -- 10 
Hong Kong personalities among them -- was approved at the 18th 
meeting of the Standing Committee of the First Shenzhen City 
CPPCC. 
  These 10 Hong Kong personalities are Huang Shih-hsin, 
chairman of the Board of Directors of the Hong Kong Hong Thai 
Citizens Travel Limited; Huang Cheng-kang, vice executive 
president of the Ching Tai Group; Chang Hsun-hsien, chairman of 
the Board of Directors of the Hong Kong Sisters Publishing 
Company Limited; Teng Chao-ming, director and general manager of 
the Man Ah Jewelry Company Limited; Sun Chi-lieh, executive 
director and general manager of the Jian Le Shi (Shenzhen) 
Company Limited; Chao Chih-chang, administrative director and 
general manager of the Hong Kong Fong Shing Securities and 
Investment Company; Lin Wen-tsan, president of the Hong Kong Ai 
Lick Industrial Group; Chiang Yen-wen, honorary chairman of the 
Board of Directors of the Tung Fong Ferries; Chang Wei-ming, 
director and consultant of the Hong Kong Yun Mei Precision 
Products Company Limited; and Liang Yung-chih, director and 
consultant of the Shenzhen Xindu Hotel Company Limited. 
  After the election of additional members, the total number 
of 
members of the Fifth Session of the First Shenzhen City CPPCC is 
229, of which 85 are CPC members, accounting for 37.1 percent of 
the total; 144 are non-communists, accounting for 62.9 percent 
of the total; 32 are women, accounting for 14 percent of the 
total; and 29 are Hong Kong personalities, accounting for 12.7 
percent of the total. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-1911 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "drchi065_p_94022" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-CHI-94-065 </AU>
Daily Report 
<DATE1>  1 Apr 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> Central-South Region </F>
<H3> <TI>   Self-Employed Traders Go on Strike in Zhuhai </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Self-Employed Traders Go on Strike in Zhuhai </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   HK0104095194 Hong Kong WEN WEI PO in Chinese 1 Apr 94 p A6 </F>
<F P=103> HK0104095194 </F>
<F P=104>  Hong Kong WEN WEI PO </F>
<F P=105>  Chinese </F>


<TEXT>
BFN 

<F P=106> [Report: "Self-Employed Traders in Gongbei Go on Strike </F>
Yesterday"] 
  [Text] At 1100 on 31 March, some shops on Buxing Street in 
Zhuhai City's Gongbei market went on strike. This has drawn the 
attention of various quarters. 
  There are 68 shops on Buxing Street, only a stone's throw 
away from Gongbei Customs. Built by the Zhuhai City Bureau of 
Industry and Commerce, the shops have been leased to 
self-employed traders. As they are situated in a busy street, 
business is brisk and the self-employed traders make handsome 
profits. 
  When the lease contracts expired on 31 July last year, the 
Gongbei Sub-Bureau of Industry and Commerce planned to take back 
the shop space and fix the rent through public bidding. But 
some self-employed traders disagreed. To carry out fair, just, 
and open competition, the Gongbei Sub-Bureau decided to assign 
shop spaces by drawing lots but this move was also rejected. 
  To show consideration for the interest of self-employed 
traders and properly renew the shop leases, the Gongbei 
Sub-Bureau conducted a thoroughgoing and meticulous 
investigation. They discovered that the monthly rent in nearby 
places ranged between 300 and 500 yuan per square meter, but it 
was only 40-50 yuan on Buxing Street. Moreover, a handful of 
self-employed traders were also found to have rerented or sold 
their shop spaces to other people at a profit. This move 
contravened the lease contracts. Consequently, the Sub-Bureau 
decided in March this year to adjust the shop space rent on 
Buxing Street according to the following criteria: For the two 
rows on the front gate, the rent is 300 yuan per square meter a 
month on the ground floor and 150 yuan in the loft; for the two 
rows in the middle, the rent is 250 yuan on the ground floor and 
125 yuan in the loft. As Buxing Street is located in an 
excellent place where business is brisk, such terms are quite 
favorable. 
  At 1100 on 31 March, a shopkeeper and several others decided 
to go on strike. This move affected business activities around 
the Gongbei market. 
  On learning this, the Zhuhai City Bureau of Industry and 
Commerce called for strict management according to relevant 
rules and regulations. The Gongbei Sub-Bureau is holding talks 
with directors of the local association of self-employed workers 
in an effort to gain a better understanding of the situation. 
The incident is still being dealt with. 
  [Hong Kong TA KUNG PAO in Chinese on 1 April carries a 
similiar report on page 4 stating that all 68 self-employed 
traders on Buxing Street went on strike in protest yesterday] 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-1912 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "drchi065_g_94002" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-CHI-94-065 </AU>
Daily Report 
<DATE1>  4 Apr 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> Sub-Saharan Africa </F>
<H3> <TI>   Confers With Jiang Zemin </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Confers With Jiang Zemin </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   OW0404145194 Beijing XINHUA in English 1418 GMT 4 Apr 94 </F>
<F P=103> OW0404145194 </F>
<F P=104>  Beijing XINHUA </F>
<F P=105>  English </F>


<TEXT>
BFN 

  [Text] Beijing, April 4 (XINHUA) -- Chinese President Jiang 
Zemin said here today that the Chinese Government and people 
attach great importance to their relationship with Eritrea. 
  They also desire to continuously develop friendly bilateral 
ties and cooperation together with Eritrea, said Jiang during 
talks with visiting Eritrean President Isayas Afewerki here this 
afternoon. 
  Jiang said the time since China and Eritrea established 
diplomatic ties has been short, but the relationship has 
developed rapidly, adding: "We are satisfied with the smooth 
growth of such ties." 
  He expressed the belief that Isayas' current visit to China 
will lay a solid foundation for the enhancement of bilateral 
friendship and cooperation and the promotion of such ties to a 
new level. 
  Jiang expressed his appreciation of the "one-China" policy 
that the Eritrean Government has pursued and its principled 
stand not to establish official relations with Taiwan. 
  Isayas said though Eritrea and China are far apart 
geographically, their friendly ties bring them closer together. 
  He thanked the Chinese Government and people for their 
recognition of Eritrea's independence and the results of its 
referendum. 
  Isayas said that, in the long struggle for independence, the 
Eritrean Government and people have always regarded China as 
their reliable partner. 
  Referring to bilateral economic cooperation, Jiang said 
China 
and Eritrea established diplomatic ties less than one year ago, 
but their mutually beneficial cooperation has gradually grown 
and shows great potential. 
  China is willing to become actively involved in Eritrea's 
economic reconstruction, he said. 
  Jiang noted that China is a developing country whose 
governmental assistance extended to Eritrea is limited. 
However, he said, the offer of assistance is a demonstration of 
friendship. 
  "We place greater importance on conducting diverse non- 
governmental and economic cooperations with Eritrea on the basis 
of equality, mutual benefit and common development," he said. 
  Isayas thanked the Chinese Government for its assistance to 
Eritrea, adding that his country experienced sufferings from an 
extended war. "It is badly needed to rebuild our country," he 
said. 
  He described China's assistance as sincere and being full of 
kindness, saying: "We regard this kind of assistance as an 
important factor for Eritrea's reconstruction." 
  Isayas said Eritrea agrees with China's point of view on 
actively conducting non-governmental economic cooperation. 
  Eritrea will concentrate its efforts on cooperation with 
Chinese enterprises in every field, he added. 
  On international issues, Jiang said that the new world 
political order should be established on the basis of the five 
principles of peaceful co-existence. The core of these 
principles is non- interference in other countries' internal 
affairs and respecting their peoples' choices of social systems 
and the modes for development in accordance with their own 
national conditions. 
  He said that there are no unified political and economic 
modes suitable to all countries in the world. One country's 
specific political system and means for economic growth can only 
be established according to its actual national conditions, he 
added. 
  Jiang stressed that the Chinese experience has shown that 
only by taking the development of its economy as its key work 
can a newly established country strengthen its political 
independence and get rid of its poverty and backwardness. 
  Isayas said that he agreed with Jiang's view on the 
principles of non-interference in other countries' internal 
affairs, and that every country's cultural tradition should be 
respected. 
  He said Eritrea attaches great importance to China's 
experience and is closely following its tremendous changes, 
which he said have inspired the whole continent of Africa, 
including Eritrea. 
  During the talks, the two leaders briefed each other on 
their 
respective countries' domestic situations. 
  They agreed that the two sides share identical or similar 
views on many major international or regional issues and the 
issues on democracy and human rights as well. 
  After the talks, two agreements between the two governments 
were signed. One regards the Chinese Government's providing the 
Eritrean Government with loans. The other is a cultural 
agreement. 
  The two presidents attended the signing ceremony. 
  Prior to the talks, Jiang hosted a solemn ceremony welcoming 
Isayas and his party. 
  This evening, Jiang gave a banquet in honor of Isayas and 
his 
entourage including Minister of National Defense Mesfin Hagos 
and Minister of Trade and Industry Ogbe Abraha. 
  Qian Qichen, Chinese vice-premier and foreign minister, 
attended the banquet. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-1913 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "drchi065_q_94002" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-CHI-94-065 </AU>
Daily Report 
<DATE1>  2 Apr 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> Southwest Region </F>
<H3> <TI>   Guizhou Introduces Measures on Land Policy </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Guizhou Introduces Measures on Land Policy </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   HK0504062494 Hong Kong ZHONGGUO TONGXUN SHE in Chinese 0821 
GMT 2 Apr 94 </F>

<F P=103> HK0504062494 </F>
<F P=104>  Hong Kong ZHONGGUO TONGXUN SHE </F>
<F P=105>  Chinese </F>


<TEXT>
BFN 

<F P=106> [Unattributed report: "Guizhou Province Introduces Two </F>
Major Policies To Promote Stability in Rural Areas" -- ZHONGGUO 
TONGXUN SHE headline] 
  [Text] Guiyang 2 Apr (ZHONGGUO TONGXUN SHE)--To further 
stabilize basic rural policy and the two-tier management 
structure with the contract responsibility system on a household 
basis with remuneration linked to output, Guizhou Provincial 
Government has recently presented two major policies which will 
ease the peasants' minds for quite some time. 
  These two major policies are as follows: When a 15-year 
contract for farmland responsibility has expired, the contract 
can be renewed for another 30 years. Non-arable land, such as 
waste hills and slopes can be renewed for 60 years or even 
longer. Second, land-use rights can be inherited, transferred, 
swapped, mortgaged, or converted into shares according to the 
law. Land and waste slope use rights can be leased and 
auctioned in an organized fashion. At the same time, it is made 
explicit that, during the contracted period, the implementation 
of the policy of making the area of contracted land constant 
regardless of increase or decrease in the number of people in a 
household will continue. 
  To augment leadership in agricultural and rural work, 
Guizhou 
has recently set up a leading group for rural work. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-1914 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "drchi065_q_94003" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-CHI-94-065 </AU>
Daily Report 
<DATE1>  2 Apr 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> Southwest Region </F>
<H3> <TI>   Sichuan Develops Sister City Ties With States </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Sichuan Develops Sister City Ties With States </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   OW0204080994 Beijing XINHUA in English 0652 GMT 2 Apr 94 </F>
<F P=103> OW0204080994 </F>
<F P=104>  Beijing XINHUA </F>
<F P=105>  English </F>


<TEXT>
BFN 

  [Text] Chengdu, April 2 (XINHUA) -- China's Sichuan 
Province and its 17 cities and prefectures have formed sister 
city relations with 32 states or cities in foreign countries 
since 1981. 
  Local officials said that the relations have promoted the 
province's opening to the outside world. 
  Last year, Sichuan Province received 85 delegations with 
1,200 people from its sister cities and sent 45 visiting groups 
to the cities abroad. 
  Sichuan and its sister cities jointly held 11 trade fairs or 
cultural exhibitions and concluded 65 economic and trade 
projects with cooperation funds of 70 million U.S. dollars. 
  Last September, North Rhine-Westphalia State of Germany sent 
a business group with more than 40 entrepreneurs to visit 
Sichuan Province and investigate its investment environment. 
  The group made inspections in the sectors of environmental 
protection, energy, mining, machinery and metallurgical and 
light industries. 
  Since Sichuan and North Rhine-Westphalia formed friendly 
relations, more than 60 students have gone to study in the 
state, majoring in agriculture, industry, environmental 
protection, tourism and finance. 
  Of the groups from Sichuan's sister cities and states in 
foreign countries, the group from Hiroshima, Japan, was the 
largest. 
  In 1992, the Diet of Hiroshima started a "Green Program" to 
support Sichuan's afforestation. By the end of 1993, donations 
from the program amounted to more than 100 million yen (about 
7.5 million yuan). 
  Chongqing City in the province resumed its sister-city 
relations with Toronto in Canada, and now the two cities have 
signed nine agreements involving urban construction, 
communications and transportation, entertainment facilities, 
light industry and education. 
  Chengdu City, capital of Sichuan Province, has sent 258 
students to study at her sister city in Japan and now 120 have 
returned to Chengdu to make remarkable contributions. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-1915 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "drchi065_q_94004" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-CHI-94-065 </AU>
Daily Report 
<DATE1>  4 Apr 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> Southwest Region </F>
<H3> <TI>   Chongqing Takes Measures To Curb Commodity Prices </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Chongqing Takes Measures To Curb Commodity Prices </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   HK0504065594 Beijing ZHONGGUO XINWEN SHE in Chinese 0724 GMT 
4 Apr 94 </F>

<F P=103> HK0504065594 </F>
<F P=104>  Beijing ZHONGGUO XINWEN SHE </F>
<F P=105>  Chinese </F>


<TEXT>
BFN 

<F P=106> [By reporter Liu Xiaoqing (0491 1420 7230)] </F>
  [Text] Chongqing 4 Apr (ZHONGGUO XINWEN SHE) -- Chongqing, 
the largest city in southwest China, is adopting various 
measures to curb consumer prices, including temporarily holding 
back several price increases and comprehensively checking all 
prices. 
  Sun Tongchuan, CPC Chongqing City Committee secretary, 
speaking at a session of the city committee of the Chinese 
People's Political Consultative Conference today, said that 
Chongqing did great work in stabilizing prices last year, 
revising the catalogue of price control, restructuring prices, 
and insuring the basic market stability of grains, edible oil, 
and vegetables. Presently, because of a comparatively 
conspicuous contradiction between price-curbing, price 
readjustment, and the expansion in investment scope, Chongqing's 
retail price index rose by 20.8 and 28 percent in the first two 
months of the year respectively, and the situation was stern. 
  Sun Tongchuan said to pursue the socialist market economy 
does not mean that the government rejects price control. The 
government should exercise control in such areas as studying and 
formulating policies, organizing and insuring the supply of 
important consumer goods, setting up a price regulating fund, 
and augmenting supervision and control over market prices. 
Chongqing has already decided to temporarily hold back the 
price adjustments scheduled for April, and at the same time, a 
great price check will be undertaken in order to resolutely halt 
arbitrary price rises and charges. The government will strictly 
encourage the practice of attaching explicit price tags to 
various consumer goods and making public service charges. In 
addition, Chongqing is to accelerate the completion and 
perfection of the market price mechanism, set up, complete, and 
perfect necessary regulating and monitoring systems to keep 
Chongqing's price rises to a minimum, and work hard to maintain 
Chongqing's economic and social stability. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-1916 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "drchi065_q_94005" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-CHI-94-065 </AU>
Daily Report 
<DATE1>  30 Mar 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> Southwest Region </F>
<H3> <TI>   State-Owned Firms in Chongqing Incur Major Losses </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    State-Owned Firms in Chongqing Incur Major Losses </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   HK0504021194 Hong Kong ZHONGGUO TONGXUN SHE in Chinese 1211 
GMT 30 Mar 94 </F>

<F P=103> HK0504021194 </F>
<F P=104>  Hong Kong ZHONGGUO TONGXUN SHE </F>
<F P=105>  Chinese </F>


<TEXT>
BFN 

  [Text] Chongqing, 30 Mar (ZHONGGUO TONGXUN SHE) -- In 
recent years, business losses incurred by the state-owned 
enterprises continued to plague Chongqing's economic 
development. This year, losses incurred by enterprises in 
Chongqing have shown a tendency to increase further. The 
Federation of Trade Unions in Chongqing is trying to stabilize 
the feelings of workers in enterprises that are operating in the 
red, and is organizing workers to increase production and carry 
out self-salvation in order to free the enterprises from the 
mire of business losses. 
  Chongqing is one of the six largest old industrial bases in 
China. As its industrial structure was not adjusted across the 
board for a long time, the state-owned enterprises there failed 
to achieve satisfactory economic results, and an increasing 
number of such enterprises incurred business losses. According 
to the data offered by the department concerned in the city, in 
January this year, 58.96 percent of the state-owned enterprises 
in Chongqing incurred losses, and the proportion increased to 
66.94 percent in February, with total losses in the city 
amounting to 140 million yuan. The industrial economy there 
once again faced the danger of decline. 
  This year, Chongqing put forward the guideline of "combining 
assistance with elimination, taking both radical and stopgap 
measures, enlivening assets, and making breakthroughs in various 
fields" so as to change the loss-incurring situation. It 
planned to make a breakthrough by reforming the property rights 
system. Zhang Xuanyuan, chairman of the city's federation of 
trade unions, said at a recent meeting on halting business 
losses that trade unions in the city should take an active part 
in the work of transforming the enterprise operation system, and 
should sign joint-guarantee contracts with the enterprise 
management and the government departments concerned in order to 
perform their duties in the course of halting business losses. 
  Zhang Xuanyuan said: The trade unions should serve the 
purpose of raising the enterprises' competitive power in the 
market by means of organizing various types of labor emulation 
and encouraging them to raise rationalization proposals. They 
should help promote technological progress in the enterprises 
through structural adjustment, and should carry out activities 
of supporting the poor by means of science and technology. 
Zhang Xuanyuan stressed, in particular, that the trade unions 
must organize workers to carry out self-salvation through 
increased production, thus reducing the burdens on enterprises 
and freeing enterprises from their predicament as soon as 
possible. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-1917 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "drchi065_q_94006" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-CHI-94-065 </AU>
Daily Report 
<DATE1>  3 Apr 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> Southwest Region </F>
<H3> <TI>   Varieties of Markets Multiply in Sichuan </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Varieties of Markets Multiply in Sichuan </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   OW0304144394 Beijing XINHUA in English 1343 GMT 3 Apr 94 </F>
<F P=103> OW0304144394 </F>
<F P=104>  Beijing XINHUA </F>
<F P=105>  English </F>


<TEXT>
BFN 

  [Text] Chengdu, April 3 (XINHUA) -- In Sichuan Province 
more than 85 percent of industrial materials and 95 percent of 
daily necessities can be bought from various markets, according 
to local government officials. 
  In 1993 the total transaction volume at the province's more 
than 8,600 markets reached 30.2 billion yuan (about 3.47 billion 
U.S. dollars), up by 29.53 percent over 1992. 
  The majority of these markets are engaged in both retailing 
and wholesale business, and there are also some specific 
exchanges relating to commodities such as means of production, 
metals, grain and meat. 
  Local officials attributed the boom of markets to 
preferential policies offered by the provincial government with 
regard to financial assistance, land-use and taxation. 
  During the past two years, the province devoted some 1.2 
billion yuan (about 137.9 U.S. dollars) to building up various 
forms of markets. 
  The governments at all levels are also putting emphasis on 
taking macro-control over the management of markets to get rid 
of activities such as unfair competition, fraud and 
counterfeiting and make their development more healthy. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-1918 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "drchi065_q_94007" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-CHI-94-065 </AU>
Daily Report 
<DATE1>  4 Mar 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> Southwest Region </F>
<H3> <TI>   Lu Huimin Addresses Tibet Personnel Meeting </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Lu Huimin Addresses Tibet Personnel Meeting </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   OW0404125994 Lhasa XIZANG RIBAO in Chinese 4 Mar 94 p 1 </F>
<F P=103> OW0404125994 </F>
<F P=104>  Lhasa XIZANG RIBAO </F>
<F P=105>  Chinese </F>


<TEXT>
BFN 

<F P=106> [By reporter Zheng Weifu (6774 4580 1381): "Strengthen and </F>
Improve Organization and Personnel Work To Ensure a Rapid 
Economic Development in Tibet"] 
  [Text] Lu Huimin, member of the Standing Committee and 
director of the organization department of the Tibet Regional 
CPC Committee, addressed a regional organization and personnel 
work meeting on 3 March. He pointed out: Under the new 
situation, we should step up party building and strengthen and 
improve the organization and personnel work to provide a strong 
organizational guarantee for the establishment of a socialist 
market economic structure. This is a major task of Tibet's 
organization and personnel departments this year, and for a 
considerable period henceforth, and we should strive to 
accomplish it. 
  In 1993, our organization and personnel work was done in a 
situation in which we thoroughly implemented the guidelines of 
the 14th Party National Congress and the fourth enlarged plenary 
meeting of the Fourth Tibet Regional CPC Committee, and we 
further accelerated reform, opening up, and economic 
construction in this region. Under the direct leadership of the 
regional party committee and the regional government, and with 
the attention and guidance of the Central Organization 
Department and the Ministry of Personnel, the cadres and workers 
of the autonomous region's organization and personnel 
departments, seriously implementing the party's basic line and 
displaying a reform spirit and realistic attitude, worked hard 
and successfully accomplished their tasks. 
  To clarify the concept and tasks, and to make organization 
and personnel work better in the new year, Comrade Lu Huimin 
pointed out: In organization and personnel work, we should pay 
attention to six aspects this year. (1) It is necessary to arm 
the whole party ideologically with the theory on building 
socialism with Chinese characteristics, and improve the overall 
quality of the party members and cadres. Under the new 
situation, the basic task of the party's ideological education 
is to organize the vast number of party members and cadres to 
thoroughly study Volume 3 of the "Selected Works of Deng 
Xiaoping," and arm themselves ideologically with the theory on 
building socialism with Chinese characteristics. It is necessary 
to persistently integrate theory with practice and pay attention 
to applying in practical work what we have studied. It is 
necessary to enhance the cadres' ability of engaging in and 
managing socialist market economy. (2) It is necessary to 
vigorously strengthen the leading groups at all levels, with 
emphasis on improvement of their thinking and work style. First 
of all, we should raise the awareness of the leading members at 
all levels in the need to practice democratic centralism, so as 
to ensure a high degree of unity in party organization and 
action. We should make efforts to further enhance the ability 
of the leading groups in solving their own problems, 
particularly their unity problem. The efforts to improve 
cadres' thinking and work style should be combined with the 
anti-corruption struggle, and with the efforts to promote 
ethical integrity and diligence among party and government 
cadres, as well as with relevant measures adopted by the party 
organizations. In strengthening the leading groups, another 
task this year is to readjust and strengthen some leading groups 
according to the requirements of the socialist market economic 
structure. (3) Attention should be paid to training and 
selecting reserve cadres and to stepping up the training of 
outstanding, young, cross-century cadres. In the training and 
selection of young and middle-aged reserve cadres, we must do 
away with outmoded hiring concepts, and we must select talent 
without sticking to one pattern. We must correctly understand 
the relationship between "employment" and "retirement," and 
handle well the relationship between the treatment of priorities 
and the treatment of routines. We should pay special attention 
to the training and selection of the "number one man" of the 
party and the government. (4) It is necessary to meet the needs 
of deepening reforms and accelerating development, and 
strengthen primary party organizations. The primary party 
organizations are the grass-roots organizations for our party to 
exercise strong leadership over the socialist modernization 
drive and to consolidate its ruling party status. In 
strengthening the primary party organizations in rural and 
pastoral areas, the stress of our work this year is put on 
continuing to rectify backward party branches, enhance the 
cohesiveness and fighting power of the primary party 
organizations in Tibet, and make them play a greater fighting 
bastion role in light of their own characteristics and tasks 
under the new situation. The primary party organizations should 
be concerned about the wellbeing of party members and make them 
feel the warmth of party organizations. (5) We should actively 
and steadily advance the reform of government organizations and 
the reform of the cadre and personnel systems, and gradually 
establish a new system for administering cadres and personnel 
that meets the needs of a socialist market economic structure. 
This year the reform of government organizations in the region 
will be carried out in all spheres. In carrying out the reform 
of government organizations, we should aim at meeting the 
requirements for the development of a socialist market economy, 
focus on the crucial matter of transforming government functions 
and strengthening macroeconomic regulation and control, improve 
relationships among various sectors, strengthen the grassroots 
units, and heighten efficiency. On the basis of the reform of 
the wage system and the reform of government organizations, we 
should concentrate on the concrete implementation of the public 
service system. While energetically pushing forward these three 
reforms, this year we will, on the basis of carrying out and 
improving our existing reform measures, expand the reform of the 
cadre and personnel systems. (6) We will strengthen 
investigation and study in connection with policies and overall 
guidance, and improve the policy-making process of 
organizational and personnel departments. We will do a good job 
in conducting investigation and study in connection with our 
region's organizational and personnel policies for the new 
situation, attach importance to resolving practical issues, and 
pay attention to practical results. Lu Huimin called on 
comrades on the region's organizational and personnel fronts to 
take note of the situation, to work hard with a high sense of 
political responsibility and political enthusiasm, and strive to 
bring about a marked improvement in the region's existing 
organizational and personnel work. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-1919 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "drchi065_q_94008" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-CHI-94-065 </AU>
Daily Report 
<DATE1>  2 Mar 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> Southwest Region </F>
<H3> <TI>   Editorial Views Tibet's United Front Work </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Editorial Views Tibet's United Front Work </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   OW0304105894 Lhasa XIZANG RIBAO in Chinese 2 Mar 94 pp 1, 3 </F>
<F P=103> OW0304105894 </F>
<F P=104>  Lhasa XIZANG RIBAO </F>
<F P=105>  Chinese </F>


<TEXT>
BFN 

<F P=106> [Editorial: "Strive To Initiate a New Prospect for Our </F>
Region's United Front Work"] 
  [Text] The regional united front work meeting, held by 
Tibet regional party committee, has successfully concluded. It 
earnestly studied and implemented the guidelines of the National 
United Front Work Conference and Comrade Jiang Zemin's important 
speech. It also planned for relevant work for the next stage, 
closely integrating Tibet's actual conditions and studying the 
situation and tasks for Tibet's united front work in the new 
era. Deepening and implementing the national and regional 
meetings' guidelines on united front work, bringing every 
positive factor into play, as well as strengthening the unity of 
all party and nonparty nationalities and people will definitely 
further consolidate and develop stability and unity. It will 
also quicken the pace of reform, opening up, and modernization, 
as well as initiate a new prospect for Tibet's united front work. 
  United front work, which the party established under Comrade 
Mao Zedong's leadership, is an important magic weapon for 
achieving victory for our country's revolution and construction. 
Due to historical and social reasons, there is a special 
position and role for Tibet's united front work. The work 
consistently came under the kind attention and direct guidance 
of Mao Zedong and other revolutionaries of the older generation. 
In the course of peaceful liberation, democratic reform, as 
well as socialist revolution and construction, our party has 
extensively united nationalities, religious patriots, and upheld 
the banner of patriotism, unity, and progress. The people have 
firmly safeguarded the motherland's reunification and opposed 
splittism and retrogression. They have stood together with the 
party through thick and thin, and participated in political 
consultations and cooperation. They have made contributions to 
consolidating Tibet's political power, as well as economic and 
cultural development. Practical social experiences over a long 
period have fully proven that there is great vitality in the 
party's united front work in Tibet. The work is closely linked 
to the region's revolution and construction, as well as 
nationality development and progress. In the course of reform, 
opening up, and modernization, we must continue and magnify the 
fine tradition of united front work, the advantages of wide 
contacts between the work and people, insist on basing all tasks 
on Tibet's actual conditions, as well as strive to initiate a 
new trend and prospect for Tibet's united front work to make it 
more dazzlingly brilliant. 
  Quickening the pace of reform, opening up, economic 
development, and establishing the socialist market economic 
system will definitely produce a profound impact on the united 
front work. It will bring new characteristics and demands for 
the work. First, united front work must be centered on economic 
development. We must bring every positive factor into play to 
contribute more toward Tibet's reform, opening up, economic 
construction, and social stability. Thus, great structuring has 
taken place in Tibet's united front team. It has transformed 
from a team with nationality and religious circles as the main 
body into an enormous and powerful force composed of 
nationality, religious, intellectual, and economic circles as 
well as Tibetan compatriots of insight outside the country. It 
is necessary to widen our vision and unite to the utmost. The 
scope of united front has enlarged, its tasks increased, and the 
work has developed in various fields and grass-roots level. It 
is more obvious that the united front work has developed toward 
the people and society. It is necessary to vigorously develop 
socialist democracy and continue to strengthen and perfect the 
political consultation system. We must widely adopt the 
people's suggestions and good ideas, as well as pool together 
the force and wisdom from all sides to change Tibet's 
backwardness as quickly as possible. We must bring into play 
our party's historical experiences and special advantages in the 
united front work. We bring every positive factor of all sides 
into play and struggle together to fulfill the glorious mission 
entrusted to us by the era. Just as Comrade Gyaincain Norbu 
pointed out at the meeting: "The tasks of Tibet's united front 
are not reduced, but increased. It is not that the tasks are 
not indispensable, they are even more important than at anytime 
in the past." 
  The patriotic united front must earnestly do a good job in 
nationality and religious work. Tibet is a nationality 
autonomous region mainly populated by the Tibetan nationality. 
The majority of the people believe in religions. It bears 
significance to the overall situation, whether in the past, 
present, or future, to earnestly do a good job in religious 
work. We should adopt patriotism and socialism as our political 
foundation to bring about unity of the Tibetan-Han nationality, 
unity of Tibet's nationalities, as well as unity within the 
Tibetan nationalities. In addition, we should bring about the 
great unity of Tibetan compatriots in and outside the region, 
aimed at safeguarding the motherland's reunification. We should 
comprehensively and correctly implement the party's religious 
policy, strengthen the management of religious affairs in 
accordance with the law, and actively guide religious circles to 
adapt to social development and progress. Patriotic united front 
should actively undertake the antisplittism struggle to 
safeguard the motherland's reunification, nationality unity, and 
social stability for creating a good social environment for 
Tibet's reform, opening up, and modernization. 
  United front work is the entire party's work that requires 
the attention of party committees and governments at all levels 
and great support of relevant departments. This is a 
fundamental guarantee for consolidating and developing united 
front to make it glow. Leading comrades at all levels must 
deepen their understanding of the importance, necessity, and 
protracted nature of united front, as well as realistically 
strengthen their leadership over the work. They must 
incorporate united front work into party committees' agenda and 
tackle it unremittingly. They should earnestly strengthen 
cooperation and political consultations with nonparty 
personages, make more and close friends outside the party, as 
well as modestly listen to their opinions to truly practice 
democracy in policymaking. The important requirement of whether 
or not a leading cadre possesses a sense of united front, 
knowledge of the united front policy, and capability of 
implementing the united front work is used for evaluating his 
policymaking and leadership quality. Party committees at all 
levels in the region must earnestly implement the guidelines of 
the national and regional united front work meetings, do a good 
job in united front work, not indulge in empty talk, and do more 
practical work so that the party's "magic weapon" will bring 
into play its true role for Tibet's economic development and 
social progress. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-1920 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "drchi065_q_94009" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-CHI-94-065 </AU>
Daily Report 
<DATE1>  5 Mar 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> Southwest Region </F>
<H3> <TI>   Tibet Makes Headway in Infrastructure Construction </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Tibet Makes Headway in Infrastructure Construction </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   OW0304081594 Lhasa Tibet People's Radio Network in Mandarin 
1430 GMT 5 Mar 94 </F>

<F P=103> OW0304081594 </F>
<F P=104>  Lhasa Tibet People's Radio Network </F>
<F P=105>  Mandarin </F>


<TEXT>
BFN 

<F P=106> [From the "News" program] </F>
  [Text] According to a XIZANG RIBAO report, Tibet made 
headway in improving its infrastructure last year, focusing on 
energy and communications construction. Investments in fixed 
assets were up 15 percent from 1992 to reach 1.59 billion yuan, 
guaranteeing a sustained and healthy development of the regional 
economy. 
  Judging from a comprehensive analysis of the situation last 
year, remarkable achievements were made in the capital 
construction of telecommunications in Tibet. In communications, 
achievements were made mainly in upgrading the existing highways 
and ensuring their traffic. Investments in energy were focused 
on the construction of the (Yanghu) and (Chalong) power 
stations. As Tibet's electricity is mostly generated by 
hydroelectric power plants, the region paid particular attention 
to ensure power supply during winter drought season for the next 
two years. In transport, the annual plan for renovating major 
highways was completed on schedule. Last year the region 
invested 300 million yuan in highway capital construction. 
Maintenance and construction proceeded relatively smoothly on 
the Qinghai-Tibet, Sichuan-Tibet, and China-Nepal highways, the 
three major national highways in which the Ministry of 
Communications invested and are covered by the state's Eighth 
Five-Year Plan and the 10-Year Program. The reconstruction of 
the (?Xigaze-Gonggar) highway, a key regional construction 
project, was started last October. After completion, the 
highway will improve the traffic condition between Lhasa and 
Shannan. In aviation construction, expansion of the Gonggar 
Airport was completed and put into operation. The project to 
upgrade the main runway of the (?Baingoin) Airport was basically 
completed. 
  Last year, construction of the (Yanghu) and (Chalong) power 
stations, two key regional projects, overfulfilled the annual 
construction plan with good quality. An investment of 240 
million yuan was made in the construction of the (Yanghu) 
water-pumping and pumped storage station; and the station's 
first generating unit is expected to generate electricity on 
schedule at the end of 1995. At that time, the problem of power 
supply for production and everyday life in Lhasa will be solved 
once and for all. The (Chalong) power station in Nagqu was 
throttled last year ahead of schedule. The whole project is 
expected to be completed and put into operation in 1996. To 
alleviate the current power shortage, the Lhasa thermal power 
plant, in which 14 million yuan was invested to upgrade its 
technology, was put into operation last December. The total 
investment scale in 1994 will reach 2.05 billion yuan, and most 
of the investment will be spent on projects related to 
infrastructure. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-1921 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "drchi065_q_94010" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-CHI-94-065 </AU>
Daily Report 
<DATE1>  27 Mar 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> Southwest Region </F>
<H3> <TI>   Yunnan Secretary Reviews Kunming Police Parade </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Yunnan Secretary Reviews Kunming Police Parade </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   HK0504020994 Kunming Yunnan People's Radio Network in 
Mandarin 1000 GMT 27 Mar 94 </F>

<F P=103> HK0504020994 </F>
<F P=104>  Kunming Yunnan People's Radio Network </F>
<F P=105>  Mandarin </F>


<TEXT>
BFN 

  [Excerpts] The Yunnan Provincial Armed Police Corps held a 
grand parade in Kunming yesterday afternoon. Reviewing the 
parading armed police troops were such provincial and Kunming 
City leaders as Pu Chaozhu, Ling Huan, Liang Jinquan, Lang 
Dazhong, Yang Zhenqiang, Zhao Tingguang, Sun Gan, Wang 
Tingsheng, and others. [passage omitted] 
  The parade began at 1400. Accompanied by Feng Jiatong, 
director of the provincial public security department and first 
political commissar of the armed police corps, provincial party 
committee Secretary Pu Chaozhu reviewed the parading armed 
police troops. 
  At the ceremony, Vice Governor Yang Jianqiang delivered a 
speech, in which he said: Over the past decade or more, the 
provincial armed police corps has made outstanding contributions 
to the maintenance of stability in Yunnan. The broad masses of 
the armed police officers and armed policemen have accomplished 
their tasks successfully. Yang Jianqiang also called for arming 
the broad masses of armed police officers and armed policemen 
with Comrade Deng Xiaoping's theory of building socialism with 
Chinese characteristics and for contributing more to Yunnan's 
stability and social security. 
  More than 200,000 Kunming residents watched the parade. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-1922 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "drchi065_q_94011" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-CHI-94-065 </AU>
Daily Report 
<DATE1>  1 Mar 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> Southwest Region </F>
<H3> <TI>   Yunnan Party Chief on Development Issues </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Yunnan Party Chief on Development Issues </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   HK2003073294 Hong Kong TA KUNG PAO in Chinese 1 Mar 94 p 6 </F>
<F P=103> HK2003073294 </F>
<F P=104>  Hong Kong TA KUNG PAO </F>
<F P=105>  Chinese </F>


<TEXT>
BFN 

<F P=106> [Interview with Pu Chaozhu, secretary of the Yunnan </F>
Provincial CPC Committee, by TA KUNG PAO staff reporter; date 
and place not given: "Pu Chaozhu Answers Questions Raised by TA 
KUNG PAO Reporter"] 
  [Text] [Pu Chaozhu] Situated in China's northwestern 
frontier, Yunnan borders on Burma, Laos, and Vietnam. It has a 
4,000-km long boundary line and a population of 38 million 
people, which is slightly bigger than that of Guangdong. With 
25 minority nationalities living in Yunnan, the province ranks 
first in China in terms of the number of minority nationalities. 
In the past, the province was very hard to get to and 
culturally backward. Although it had abundant material 
resources, its economy failed to develop for a long time. From 
1979 to 1983, the provincial government made vigorous efforts to 
develop agriculture, and thus basically solved the problem of 
food and clothing in five years time. Then, in light of its own 
strong point in resources, the government concentrated efforts 
on developing such crops as tobacco, tea, sugarcane, and rubber. 
Yunnan's tobacco is the best in China. Its geographical 
conditions, such as a big temperature gap between day and night, 
a long periods of sunshine, and soil, are particularly suitable 
for the growth of these commercial crops. Through six or seven 
years of efforts, production of these crops has expanded, thus 
laying a solid foundation for the development of light industry. 
Since 1983, the government has concentrated the province's 
human, material, and financial resources on vigorously 
developing the processing industries and technology of these 
commercial crops, set up new factories, and transformed old 
factories. Today after 10 years of efforts, the province has 
seven large cigarette factories, of which two rank very high in 
Asia with a production capacity of 5.5 million cases [xiang 
4630] a year; 84 sugar refineries with an annual output of 1 
million tonnes; 100 or so tea processing plants with an annual 
output of 55,000 tonnes; and an annual rubber output of 40,000 
tonnes. These undertakings which require little investment have 
yielded large taxes and profits and are of high efficiency. In 
1983, Yunnan had just 1.17 billion yuan in financial revenue, 
but in 1993, the figure had topped the mark of 20 billion yuan, 
or an increase of 1.7 times. In the terms of ratio alone, this 
increase was the highest level in the country. We handed over 4 
billion yuan to the central authorities and retained 1.2 billion 
for our own disposal. Even with money ready at hand, the 
provincial government dared not spend it wantonly. There were 
two major factors causing the province's prolonged backwardness. 
One was the "software" question, namely, people's cultural and 
education quality was too poor, and the other was the "hardware" 
question, including backward infrastructures in the energy 
industry, communications, and water conservancy. This being the 
case, for Yunnan to develop further, it is necessary to 
introduce vigorous transformation in these two aspects. The 
provincial government decided that money should not be spent on 
construction of non-productive projects and even on repairing 
the Government Conference Hall, which was built in the 1950's 
and has now became dilapidated. The provincial authorities 
decided, first of all, to invest a large amount of funds in 
capital construction. Yunnan has abundant mineral resources. 
However, without electricity, there would be no way to exploit 
them. Through 10 years of efforts, the province and the 
Ministry of Water Resources have managed to jointly establish 
the Lancang Jiang Power Station, with a generating capacity of 
1.5 million kwh. In 1983, the province had just 1.5 million kwh 
in generating capacity. Hence, the generating capacity of a 
Lancang Jiang Power Station was equal to the total generating 
capacity of the province in the previous year. The waters of 
the Lancang Jiang, which come from the glaciers of the Qinghai 
Plateau, have a stable source and will certainly not dry up. In 
cooperation with Guangdong Province, Yunnan is now building a 
larger power station in the upper reaches of the Lancang Jiang, 
with a generating capacity of 4.2 million kwh. After completion, 
all electricity will go to Guangdong Province for its use. At 
first, Guangdong provincial leaders did not believe that and 
thought that we lured them to get hooked and we just took a 
fancy to their money. In fact, with the completion of the 
construction of a power station in the upper reaches of the 
river, if we use the drawn waters of the lower reaches to 
irrigate farmland in the dry season, this will help solve many 
problems. 
  In transportation, the province has 27 million tonnes of 
goods and materials to be shipped out. However, in the past we 
just relied on the Chengdu-Kunming and Guiyang-Kunming railways 
whose highest total carrying capacity was just 10 million 
tonnes. The province was thus compelled to "carry out 
production according to the amount of goods and materials 
shipped out." The production of goods and materials which could 
not be shipped out was not allowed. After enduring enough 
sufferings in this regard, provincial authorities were 
determined to vigorously solve the problem. Now we have three 
new railways under construction, of which the Nanning-Kunming 
Railway can be said to be the artery of the whole Southwest 
region. The construction is undertaken jointly by Yunnan, 
Guangxi, Guizhou, and the Ministry of Railways, and after 
completion, it will have a carrying capacity of 10 million 
tonnes, and the province will be able to ship out 100 percent 
more goods and materials. Moreover, there are arterial 
highways, airports, and waterways under construction. In the 
days to come, we are prepared to spend another seven to 10 years 
opening wider to the outside world, importing new and high 
technologies, developing major industrial projects worth five to 
10 billion yuan, and changing the economic structure. For 
example, as an anti-smoking trend has become common practice in 
the international community, it will be dangerous for us to 
develop the tobacco industry on a single-line basis. Maybe the 
industry will collapse at any time. In the days ahead, with the 
exception of tobacco, tea, sugar, and rubber, we still hope to 
strengthen development of such areas as the machinery and 
electrical industries, nonferrous metals, iron and steel, 
timber, food and drinks, spices, and Chinese herbal medicine. 
For example, the results of a study show that Chinese medicine 
pseudo-ginseng [san qi 0005 0003], a special product of Yunnan, 
is not inferior to the ginseng grown in northeast China in terms 
of useful ingredients. Since the drive of reform and opening up 
to the outside world was launched, there has been a tilt in the 
state's investment policy. To put it another way, the state has 
invested more in the eastern coastal areas and less in the 
southwestern border areas. For instance, according to the state 
plan, Yunnan was expected to be built into a nonferrous metal 
base in the 1950's and the state's investment in the province 
constituted 2.5 percent of its total investment. However, in 
the Sixth and Seventh Five-Year Plans, the ratio dropped to 1 
percent or so, and even less than 1 percent. Under these 
circumstances, should Yunnan passively wait for state assistance 
or actively try to find a way out by relying on its own efforts 
and hard work? We decided to rely on our own efforts and go all 
out to develop ourselves instead of waiting. We started with 
the development of agriculture and light industry, and after 
accumulating funds, we used them in education and capital 
construction, and as the investment environment improved, we 
developed major industries.... Practice in the last decade has 
proven that this line of thinking is correct and workable. This 
is roughly the case in the last 10 years. In the coming 10 
years, we will surely be able to develop faster with better 
results on the basis of what we have achieved in the last 10 
years. 
  [TA KUNG PAO] In Yunnan minority nationalities live in 
compact communities. What is the situation of nationality 
concord and unity? 
  [Pu] Before the founding of the People's Republic of China, 
in Yunnan there were more than 20 minority nationalities who 
lived in different social formations, ranging from primitive 
communal societies where there was no conception of private 
property, land was publicly owned, and earnings were equally 
distributed, to slave societies, to societies under the rule of 
feudal lords or hereditary headmen, to feudal societies. After 
liberation, they "entered socialism in a single bound" as one 
may well say. For many years, we have put stress on the 
nationality cadre policy. Of Yunnan's population totaling 30 
million people or so, the combined population of 25 minority 
nationalities constitute less than one third. However, of the 
contingent of cadres at all levels, cadres of minority 
nationalities make up 25 percent. The more senior the cadres, 
the greater the ratio becomes. Of the members of the provincial 
party committee and government, deputies to the provincial 
people's congress, and members of the provincial committee of 
the Chinese People's Political Consultative Conference, 40 
percent are people of minority nationalities and the remaining 
60 percent are people of the Han nationality. In the past few 
year, we have managed to ensure that minority nationalities are 
not oppressed politically and not exploited economically. 
However, this does not mean that we have solved all the 
problems. Because of some long- standing historical reasons, 
the gap between the minority and Han nationalities in the 
cultural and economic fields still exist. Moreover, as the Han 
nationality's economy and culture expand, the gap will become 
wider and wider. This will probably cause problems. Only when 
the economy and culture of minority nationalities are upgraded 
and developed can the contradictions between the two sides be 
solved and can genuine unity and concord achieved. Provincial 
authorities attach great importance to this problem. 
  [TA KUNG PAO] There is a rumor circulating abroad that 
Yunnan Province is beset with the problems of drug cultivation 
and trafficking. What is actually the true situation? 
  [Pu] Yunnan Province has a long boundary line. 
Intermarriage is common among people living in the frontiers 
which are not separated by big rivers, and it is impossible to 
surround them with wire entanglements. These people are 
relatives of each other. For a long time, people living inside 
and outside the frontiers have lived together in peace and have 
been law-abiding on the whole. However, there are also 
difficulties. Outside our borders, people grow 1 million mu of 
opium poppies. So long as they have a bumper harvest of opium 
poppies, we will have bad luck. For our part, the Yunnan 
provincial government firmly bans the cultivation, trafficking, 
and selling of drugs. Even dozens of mu or a piece of land sown 
to opium poppies will be promptly weeded out as soon as they are 
discovered. Last year over 100 mu of opium poppies were rooted 
out. However, banning cultivation of opium poppies does not 
solve the problem. As long as you look out at the places across 
the frontier line you stand on, a sea of red opium poppies will 
meet your eyes. Making use of Yunnan as a thoroughfare for drug 
trafficking, drug trading groups ship drugs to Guangzhou and 
Hong Kong via Kunming. We also firmly ban and crack down on 
such activities. Last year, we arrested more than 3,000 people 
and dealt with some of the cases based on solid evidence 
according to law. Drug traffickers who are arrested will 
certainly be dealt with according to law, be they from other 
provinces or outside the borders. While strengthening border 
customs inspection, we rely mainly on the joint defense of the 
people, the Army, and the police and form a gigantic net so that 
there is no escape for drug traffickers. Last year, we seized 
and confiscated drugs totaling some five tonnes, or 3.5 tonnes 
of heroin and 1.5 tonnes of opium. However, according to our 
calculation, this was only the tip of the iceberg. The 
traffickers succeeded in smuggling out most of their drugs. As 
long as there are drug markets abroad, it is difficult to solve 
the problem. Last year, the number of drug cases dropped but 
that of major cases increased, and there were even cases of 
armed smuggling and escorting of drugs. This is a complicated 
international problem. Now we are seeking cooperation with 
international anti-drug organizations to jointly crack down on 
drug trading activities. In a word, on no account does Yunnan 
grow and traffic drugs. The province firmly bans drugs. 
  [TA KUNG PAO] Will you please say something about the recent 
developments of border trade? 
  [Pu] On the 4,000-km frontier line, 28 counties are slated 
as border trade areas, with 186 materials being duty-free as 
approved by the customhouse. We have adopted some flexible 
measures in areas such as currency exchange and communications 
and transportation. Now a border trade coordinating organization 
of five provinces and seven parties in southwest China has taken 
shape, hundreds of companies are engaged in border trade, and 
they are expanding markets. Last year, the transactions of 
border trade totaled 3 billion yuan and the 1985 figure was just 
30 million yuan. Now, in reality, goods traded on the frontiers 
come from all parts of the country. Hence, border trade has 
become, in reality, a form of foreign trade. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-1923 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "drchi065_q_94012" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-CHI-94-065 </AU>
Daily Report 
<DATE1>  5 Mar 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> Southwest Region </F>
<H3> <TI>   Governor Addresses Yunnan Congress Presidium </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Governor Addresses Yunnan Congress Presidium </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   HK2203073594 Kunming Yunnan People's Radio Network in 
Mandarin 1000 GMT 5 Mar 94 </F>

<F P=103> HK2203073594 </F>
<F P=104>  Kunming Yunnan People's Radio Network </F>
<F P=105>  Mandarin </F>


<TEXT>
BFN 

  [Text] The Second Session of the Eighth Yunnan Provincial 
People's Congress held its second presidium meeting yesterday 
afternoon. The meeting was presided over by Presidium Executive 
Chairman Yin Jun. Attending were provincial party committee 
Secretary Pu Chaozhu and Governor He Zhiqiang. The meeting 
adopted the following two reports: 
  1. The Yunnan Provincial People's Congress Financial and 
Economic Affairs Committee Report on the Implementation of the 
1993 Yunnan Provincial National Economic and Social Development 
Plan and on the Examination of the 1994 Yunnan Province Draft 
National Economic and Social Development Plan; 
  2. The Yunnan Provincial People's Congress Financial and 
Economic Affairs Committee Report on the Implementation of the 
1993 Yunnan Provincial Financial Estimates and on the 
Examination of the 1994 Yunnan Province Draft Financial 
Estimates. 
  These two reports stated: Since both the 1994 Yunnan 
Province Draft National Economic and Social Development Plan and 
the 1994 Yunnan Provinc Draft Financial Estimates, which were 
submitted by the Yunnan Provincial People's Government, tally 
with the realities in Yunnan, it is thereby proposed that the 
Second Session of the Eighth Yunnan Provincial People's Congress 
adopt the two draft documents. 
  The meeting also adopted the following five resolutions: 1) 
The Draft Resolution on the Yunnan Provincial People's 
Government Work Report; 2) The Draft Resolution on the 
Implementation of the 1993 Yunnan Provincial National Economic 
and Social Development Plan and on the 1994 Yunnan Provincial 
National Economic and Social Development Plan; 3) The Draft 
Resolution on the Implementation of the 1993 Yunnan Provincial 
Financial Estimates and on the 1994 Yunnan Provincial Financial 
Estimates; 4) The Draft Resolution on the Work Report of the 
Yunnan Provincial People's Congress Standing Committee; 5) The 
Draft Resolution on the Work Report of the Yunnan Provincial 
Higher People's Court and on the Work Report of the Yunnan 
Provincial People's Procuratorate. 
  The meeting decided to print and distribute these five draft 
resolutions among the delegations to the on-going congress 
session for their deliberation. 
  The meeting also listened to the explanations made by He 
Hualong, deputy director of the provincial party committee 
organization department and deputy secretary general of the the 
current congress session, on a draft namelist of candidates for 
the relevant positions. After approving the draft namelist, the 
meeting decided to submit the draft namelist in the name of the 
presidium to the delegations attending the on-going congress 
session for their deliberation. 
  The presidium meeting also solicited opinions from the 
delegations to the current congress session on the above reports 
submitted by the provincial people's government. 
  Governor He Zhiqiang delivered a speech in which he stated: 
The deputies have advanced a host of proposals and views on how 
improve the work of the provincial people's government. These 
proposals and views are bound to contribute to the work of the 
provincial people's government in 1994. We will sort out these 
proposals and views; handle in a conscientious manner each and 
every motion tabled by the deputies at the current congress 
session according to official procedures; fully consider and 
absorb their opinons on the provincial people's government work 
report; and submit a revised provincial people's government work 
report, together with a written explanation to all the presidium 
executive chairmen for their examination. 
  Governor He Zhiqiang noted: The year 1994 is a crucial one 
for Yunnan's reform, opening up, and economic construction. In 
1994, Yunnan is to unfold a series of major reforms, as well as 
large- scale, wide-ranging, and extremely difficult economic 
structural readjustments. We inevitably will encounter some new 
problems in this process, but we will exert our utmost efforts 
to make much greater strides forward in building a socialist 
market economy structure. We will continue to build projects 
aimed at assisting poverty-stricken areas in accordance with the 
State Council plan, as well as in light of the realities in 
Yunnan. We will strengthen agricultural production in a 
comprehensive way, as it is the foundation of China's national 
economy. We will further expand our opening up to the outside 
world and will carry out large-scale, comprehensive agricultural 
exploitation across the province, with a view to developing a 
high-yield, high-quality, and high-efficiency agriculture, and 
to enhancing agriculture as the foundation of China's national 
economy. 
  Governor He Zhiqiang said: This year, we are going to 
observe the World Tourism Festival and the China Historical and 
Cultural Tourism Festival, during which we will strive to open 
up new vistas for the development of tourism in Yunnan. We also 
have decided to concentrate human, material, and financial 
resources on the construction of key projects. In order to push 
forward reform and opening up, and to safeguard social and 
political stability, the provincial people's government will 
take a series of measures, and will try to achieve tangible 
results in the comprehensive management of social order. While 
accelerating the pace of inviting foreign capital and advanced 
foreign technology, we also will try to build several large 
projects with foreign capital and make new breakthroughs in 
inviting foreign capital. 
  Governor He Zhiqiang asserted: In 1994, when confronting 
arduous tasks and new difficulties, the provincial people's 
government will try to absorb the proposals and views advanced 
by the people's deputies at the current congress session; will 
rely on the people of the whole province; will further 
emancipate our minds; work harder; and score more achievements 
under the leadership of the provincial party committee, and the 
support and supervision of the provincial people's congress, as 
well as the democratic supervision and support of the provincial 
committee of the Chinese People's Political Consultative 
Conference. We will exert our utmost efforts to live up to the 
trust placed in us by the people's deputies to the current 
congress session! 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-1924 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "drchi065_r_94002" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-CHI-94-065 </AU>
Daily Report 
<DATE1>  24 Mar 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> North Region </F>
<H3> <TI>   Hebei Secretary Talks With Cotton Growers </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Hebei Secretary Talks With Cotton Growers </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   SK0304084294 Shijiazhuang HEBEI RIBAO in Chinese 24 Mar 94 p 
1 </F>

<F P=103> SK0304084294 </F>
<F P=104>  Shijiazhuang HEBEI RIBAO </F>
<F P=105>  Chinese </F>


<TEXT>
BFN 

  [Excerpts] On the morning of 22 March, excited speeches 
and warm applause repeatedly came out of a classroom of 
Dongluobao Village Primary School in Dingxing County. There, 
Cheng Weigao, secretary of the provincial party committee; Gu 
Erxiong, vice governor of the province; and responsible comrades 
of pertinent provincial-level departments were discussing with 
some 40 peasant households in Dongluobao and Datian villages the 
major event of making this year's cotton production a success 
and bringing about an upswing in cotton production, which has a 
bearing on the overall stability of the province. 
  Cheng Weigao said straightly: "Hebei is a major cotton 
growing province. Cotton output declined in the past two years. 
This year, we are determined to bring about an upswing in 
cotton production. This year's cotton sowing is about to begin. 
So, I made a special trip here to see how you are prepared and 
what demands and problems you have." 
  "Our village has grown cotton for many years. Last year, we 
planted more than 1,000 mu, and per-mu yield was about 60 kg. 
This year, we will again grow 1,000 mu of cotton," said Shi 
Juncheng, an old farmer. 
  Gu Erxiong asked: "Last year, how much cotton did you grow, 
and how much did you earn?" 
  Shi answered: "I planted two mu of cotton and gained some 
1,300 yuan. After deducting the cost of seeds, chemical 
fertilizers, and pesticide, the actual income is some 400 yuan." 
  Cheng Weigao frankly chipped in: "Realistically speaking, 
what do you think about cotton growing on earth, and what other 
opinions and demands do you have?" 
  Shi answered: "We communists do not tell a lie. So far as 
economic income is concerned, growing cotton is not as good as 
growing grain, still less good as growing other cash crops. In 
growing grain, we need less manpower but can gain 400 yuan from 
per mu. However, in growing cotton, we need 40 laborers but 
only gain 200 yuan." 
  Gu Erxiong again asked farmers with great concern: "How much 
cotton has your county procured this year, and what is the 
market situation?" 
  A comrade of the county supply and marketing cooperative 
replied: This year, our county has already procured 300 tonnes 
of cotton at both parity prices and negotiated prices. Because 
outside places and enterprises directly came here to purchase 
our cotton, about half of our cotton has been sold to other 
places. [passage omitted] 
  After the discussion, Cheng Weigao said with feeling: Your 
counties have grown cotton for many years and most of your 
cotton has been sold to the state. You have done a very good 
job. We hope that you will have a clear sight of our province's 
overall situation and comprehend the concern of the CPC Central 
Committee and the state to cotton growers. In the past two 
years, Hebei Province witnessed a consecutive decline in cotton 
production. There have been not only natural factors, such as 
consecutive years of drought, but also policy factors, such as 
the low prices of cotton, and work factors, such as poor 
service. This year, the provincial party committee and the 
provincial government have made up their mind to bring about an 
upswing in cotton production. We should try our best to beef up 
cotton production. Party committees and governments at all 
levels should also mobilize peasants to grow cotton in full 
amount and in good quality in order to make contributions to the 
state and ensure the normal production of the province's textile 
industry. 
  With regard to cotton sowing at present, Cheng Weigao 
stressed the necessity of ensuring cotton growing acreage, 
growing cotton on irrigated fields, expanding the acreage of 
cotton grown with plastic sheets, growing more transplanted 
cotton, choosing good seeds, and strengthening management in a 
bid to lay a good foundation for the high yield of cotton this 
year. 
  Cheng Weigao said in conclusion: Dingxing County is only 90 
km from Beijing and the transportation condition is good. 
However, the per capita income of the county was only 700 yuan 
last year, lower than the average level of the province. To 
fulfill the goal of making the people better-off in 1997, you 
are faced with a very arduous task. You should not only grow 
cotton well, but also accelerate the readjustment of rural 
industrial structure and the agricultural growing structure and 
vigorously develop township and town enterprises in a bid to 
increase peasants' income by a big margin. 
  Cheng Weigao seriously said to Yan Zengnian, secretary of 
the 
party committee of Zhengding County, and Zheng Kaijun, head of 
the county: If you do a good job and attain the goal of making 
the people better-off in 1997, you will be commended; otherwise, 
you will be dismissed. County leaders expressed right away that 
they will certainly do a solid job to ensure the fulfillment of 
the goal. 
  The firmness of county leaders and the concern of provincial 
leaders aroused warm applause then and there. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-1925 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "drchi065_r_94003" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-CHI-94-065 </AU>
Daily Report 
<DATE1>  15 Mar 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> North Region </F>
<H3> <TI>   Hebei Secretary Speaks Before NPC on 14 Mar </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Hebei Secretary Speaks Before NPC on 14 Mar </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   SK3003064994 Shijiazhuang HEBEI RIBAO in Chinese 15 Mar 94 p 
1 </F>

<F P=103> SK3003064994 </F>
<F P=104>  Shijiazhuang HEBEI RIBAO </F>
<F P=105>  Chinese </F>


<TEXT>
BFN 

<F P=106> [By special correspondent Han Shaojun (7281 4801 0689): "Use </F>
Reform To Promote Science, Technology, and Education"] 
  [Excerpts] On the morning of 14 March, accelerating the 
transformation of scientific and technological achievements and 
the technological progress of enterprises to ensure education's 
priority position was the major subject of the discussion of 
Hebei Province's deputation to the National People's Congress 
session. 
  Entrusted by the State Council, Song Jian, state councillor 
and minister of the State Scientific and Technological 
Commission, discussed the "government work report" together with 
Hebei deputies and listened to their opinions. 
  Deputy Liu Zongyao said: "As indicated by Premier Li Peng in 
his government work report, we should closely combine scientific 
and technological progress with the economy and should translate 
scientific and technological achievements into practical 
productive forces. These remarks have inspired us greatly." 
Liu Zongyao said: At present, the construction of synthetic 
materials is developing very quickly in the world. To 
facilitate exchange and cooperation between China and the world, 
we are required to establish a nationwide association with 
regard to this discipline as quickly as possible. However, this 
is a cross-professional discipline, and thus its establishment 
has not yet been decided. 
  After hearing this, Song Jian said: "Give me one copy of the 
data, and I will help you in this work." 
  Deputy Liu Zongyao revealed that at present a product must 
undergo too many reckless technological appraisals, and that 
quality control is not strict. On hearing this, Deputy Ye 
Liansong said: "The more the market economy develops, the more 
quality control should be strengthened. We should rapidly 
develop some authoritative intermediate organizations to 
strictly conduct appraisals in order to prevent fake and 
inferior products from passing the inspections." 
  Deputy Zhou Deman revealed that some large and medium-sized 
enterprises are overloaded with burdens and thus are having 
difficulties in operation. Deputies Cheng Weigao and Ye 
Liansong said: We should invigorate large and medium-sized 
enterprises. If we refuse to increase investment in science and 
technology and refuse to develop readily marketable products 
through technological progress, invigoration will be an empty 
talk. Enterprises should not depend on the state to increase 
the investment in science and technology, but should be willing 
to release a portion of their funds for research and development 
of new products. All products have an infancy period, growth 
period, mature period, and old period. We should produce a 
generation of products, research a generation of products, and 
store a generation of products from a long-term point of view. 
By saying that some enterprises bear heavy burdens, it means, 
in the final analysis, that they lag behind in products and 
efficiency. Refusing to exert great efforts in technological 
progress, an enterprise will witness a down cycle and its 
situation will become difficult increasingly. 
  In her speech, Deputy Chen Bingzhen expressed with deep 
feeling: Several years ago, some hot issues concerning education 
began to cool down. Conducting a series of major reform 
measures among institutions of higher learning for this, the 
state has provided a two-way choice for distribution of college 
graduates and encouraged college graduates to study abroad and 
return freely. The state has also popularized the credit 
system. These measures have encouraged students to make 
positive progress and has stabilized campuses. She added: 
Reform has forced the research achievements of colleges to go 
beyond the laboratory. [passage omitted] 
  Song Jian said: Both the promotion of technological progress 
of enterprises and the operation of education, science, and 
technology requires funds and requires economic strength as 
their backing. This year, the state has again increased the 
input in science, technology, and education, thus manifesting 
its high attention to them. He said: For a long time in the 
past, we were accustomed to conservative, backward, and narrow 
traditional concepts and to outmoded production forms so our 
productive forces were very low. With the start of reform and 
opening up, however, we have effected great change and 
enhancement. We should further seize the opportunity, deepen 
reform, expand opening up, maintain stability, and enhance labor 
productivity on a large scale. 
  Song Jian said: Achieving success in reform, opening up, and 
socialist modernization, we should fully depend on and exploit 
the creativity of the people and pay attention to the pioneering 
spirit of the people. We should dare to make innovations, try 
everything, and conduct reform. So long as we unite as one 
under the guidance of Comrade Deng Xiaoping's theory of building 
socialism with Chinese characteristics, we will be able to 
overcome difficulties and press forward reform, opening up, and 
modernization. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-1926 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "drchi065_r_94004" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-CHI-94-065 </AU>
Daily Report 
<DATE1>  4 Apr 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> North Region </F>
<H3> <TI>   Shanxi Farmers Develop Fish Farming </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Shanxi Farmers Develop Fish Farming </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   OW0404141494 Beijing XINHUA in English 1117 GMT 4 Apr 94 </F>
<F P=103> OW0404141494 </F>
<F P=104>  Beijing XINHUA </F>
<F P=105>  English </F>


<TEXT>
BFN 

  [Text] Taiyuan, April 4 (XINHUA) -- People in northern 
China's dry inland Shanxi Province are eating more fish and 
farmers have even become prosperous by raising it. 
  "When Shanxi people eat fish, they never take their hands 
off 
it" -- this used to an oft-used expression to described people 
in Shanxi who did not know how to cook and eat fish. There was 
virtually no fish farming in the province before 1980. 
  However, that has changed. Figures show that during the past 
few years, fish production grew at 7 percent to 15 percent 
annually. All over the province, reservoirs, lakes and rivers, 
plus newly-dug ponds, have been used for fish farming. 
  Ponds were dug along major river banks of the province, 
including the Yellow River, the Fenhe River and the Huotuo 
River, and at all possible areas around major cities and mines 
to raise fish. Large reservoirs became fish ponds as well. 
  New techniques like small "net-cage culture", which was 
imported from the United States, were spread from only 70 cubic 
meters of water to over 800 cubic meters. New species of pond 
fish and fresh water butterfish were developed. 
  So far, among all the province's 111 counties, 108 have 
established their own fishery industry. Annual total fish catch 
has grown from only 650 tons before 1980 to 14,000 tons last 
year. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-1927 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "drchi065_r_94005" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-CHI-94-065 </AU>
Daily Report 
<DATE1>  4 Apr 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> North Region </F>
<H3> <TI>   Tianjin Offers Help in Three Gorges Area </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Tianjin Offers Help in Three Gorges Area </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   OW0404141994 Beijing XINHUA in English 1155 GMT 4 Apr 94 </F>
<F P=103> OW0404141994 </F>
<F P=104>  Beijing XINHUA </F>
<F P=105>  English </F>


<TEXT>
BFN 

  [Text] Tianjin, April 4 (XINHUA) -- Residents of areas 
around the planned Three Gorges project are getting effective 
help from northern China's port city of Tianjin. 
  The city has offered many kinds of techniques to help local 
ventures, through technical cooperation or setting up joint 
ventures, officials in Tianjin said. 
  The Tianjin "Dengta" paint factory, for instance, offered 
technical help to Xingshan County paint factory in Hubei 
Province and upgraded the local factory's annual production 
capability from 1,500 tons to 5,000 tons. That has brought 
considerable economic returns for local people. 
  With techniques from Tianjin, automobile and steel joint 
companies have also been established in local areas around the 
Three Gorges. So far, some 22 projects have been completed. 
  Tianjin was designated in 1992 by the State Council to help 
16 counties and regions in Sichuan and Hubei provinces around 
the Three Gorges areas, where the world's highest dam will be 
built on the Chang Jiang river. More than a million local 
residents will be resettled. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-1928 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "drchi065_u_94001" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-CHI-94-065 </AU>
Daily Report 
<DATE1>  1 Apr 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> PRC MEDIA ON TAIWAN AFFAIRS </F>
<H3> <TI>   RENMIN RIBAO Article Calls For Mainland, Taiwan Consensus </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    RENMIN RIBAO Article Calls For Mainland, Taiwan Consensus </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   HK0504065494 Beijing RENMIN RIBAO OVERSEAS EDITION in 
Chinese 1 Apr 94 p 5 </F>

<F P=103> HK0504065494 </F>
<F P=104>  Beijing RENMIN RIBAO OVERSEAS EDITION </F>
<F P=105>  Chinese </F>


<TEXT>
BFN 

<F P=106> [By Han Zhuping (7281 4376 1627) and Wang Lianwei (3769 6647 </F>
0251): "Earnestly Maintain Consensus Between the Association 
and the Foundation"] 
  [Text] The Association for Relations Across the Taiwan 
Straits [ARATS] and the Straits Exchange Foundation [SEF] have 
held their fourth working talks in Beijing. Through further 
exchanging opinions, they deepened their understanding of each 
other's viewpoints and put forward new opinions for settling the 
differences. This should be affirmed. However, the talks did 
not reach written agreement on the issue of "sending back people 
who enter the other side's area in violation of the regulations 
concerned" and two other technical issues according to the 
expectations of the leaders of the two organizations while in 
Beijing, and failed to exchange opinions and talk about the 
issues of "jointly cracking down on maritime smuggling and 
robbery and other criminal activities," "protecting intellectual 
property rights on the two sides of the straits," "building up 
ties and mutual assistance between law courts on both sides of 
the straits," and a number of economic and technological issues 
enumerated by the "Agreement of the Wang-Ku Meeting." This was 
indeed a regrettable point. 
  The fourth working talks between ARATS and SEF were arranged 
during the Beijing talks in February, and the subjects of the 
talks were also written into the "joint press bulletin." After 
major consensus was achieved at the Beijing talks, the principle 
issues for the working talks were solved. In the general 
framework of the draft agreements on the three issues, the 
working talks should have made smooth progress. However, after 
the two sides held repeated discussions over six days, and 
although ARATS continued to adjust its opinion by accepting many 
of SEF's opinions, they still failed to reach agreement on the 
three issues. This made people think that, just before the 
fourth working talks, some institutions in Taiwan had overthrown 
part of the consensus reached by the Tang- Chiao talks and 
called for "maintaining the bottom line of the ARATS-SEF Taipei 
talks under the precondition of giving consideration to the 
dignity of legal jurisdiction." It seemed that one could not 
just blame technical factors for the failure of the recent talks 
to make major progress. 
  The understandings reached by ARATS and SEF in their Beijing 
talks must be treated seriously. Only by maintaining the 
consensus can the two sides reach agreement on the relevant 
subjects in their working talks. From the Wang-Ku talks to the 
Tang-Chiao talks, ARATS and SEF were solemnly authorized to 
handle relevant affairs, and should conscientiously deal with 
such affairs. They responsibly signed relevant agreements and 
press bulletins. The important agreements and consensus formed 
the principle for the development of mainland-Taiwan relations 
in the future, and also formed the precondition and foundation 
for the working talks between the two organizations. The Taiwan 
side overthrew part of the "Tang-Chiao consensus," and this 
damaged the foundation and atmosphere for the working talks 
between the two organizations. This inevitably had a serious 
impact on the fourth working talks. Some people on the Taiwan 
side often said that the two sides of the straits should have 
"sincerity" and should "keep good faith" and "respect each 
other." Did the haphazard negation of the consensus reached by 
the responsible officials of the two organizations represent 
such "sincerity" and "good faith"? 
  Zou Zhekai, deputy chairman and secretary general of ARATS, 
recently said that in the course of settling various technical 
issues between the two sides of the straits, it is necessary to 
follow the principle of "avoiding politics, considering things 
as they stand, handling easy things before difficult ones, and 
seeking common ground while reserving differences." Adopting a 
realistic attitude and avoiding political issues was the 
consensus reached by responsible officials of the two 
organizations. Settling problems by consensus is not only a 
sensible and understandable way of settling the differences 
between the two organizations, but also represents the principle 
for developing mainland-Taiwan relations in current 
circumstances that should be followed and safeguarded. Only 
thus can the linkage between ARATS and SEF be freed from the 
obstruction of various political issues and function as a smooth 
channel of communication, thus guaranteeing the development of 
relations between the two sides of the strait. 
  There is no wonder that differences exist in the working 
talks between the two organizations, and this is very normal. 
They should jointly seek solutions through increasing mutual 
trust and understanding in the course of discussion. As long as 
both sides are sincere in making efforts to make progress, they 
may succeed in reaching agreement next time if they fail this 
time. Continuous exchanges and discussions will bring the two 
sides' opinions closer and closer, and they will eventually 
solve their problems. However, it is the common wish of the 
people on both sides of the straits that there be a consensus 
and less differences in the development of relations between the 
two sides of the strait and that a written agreement will be 
reached on the three technical issues [shi wu xing yi ti 0057 
0523 1840 6231 7344]. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-1929 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "drchi065_v_94001" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-CHI-94-065 </AU>
Daily Report 
<DATE1>  25 Mar 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> TAIWAN </F>
<H3> <TI>   Defense Minister on Troop Drawdown </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Defense Minister on Troop Drawdown </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   OW0404162494 Taipei CHUNG YANG JIH PAO in Chinese 25 March 
94 p 7 </F>

<F P=103> OW0404162494 </F>
<F P=104>  Taipei CHUNG YANG JIH PAO </F>
<F P=105>  Chinese </F>


<TEXT>
BFN 

  [Text] Defense Minister Sun Chen pointed out on 23 March 
that in accordance with the policy of reduction-in-strength, the 
troops of the republic's armed force will be reduced from the 
current 498,000 to 400,000 in the next 10 years. After the 
reduction, the current combat capacity will be maintained with 
better weaponry, more firepower, and greater mobility. He 
stressed that it is absolutely essential to maintain the minimum 
requirements of security defense strength. 
  The portion of the National Defense Report 1993-94 released 
by the Ministry of National Defense [MND] on 23 March dealing 
with national defense troops notes that the number of troops has 
dropped from 503,000 to 498,000, a reduction of 5,000, in the 
past year. The 10-year reduction-in-strength plan that starts in 
1994 projects that in 10 years the number of troops will be 
reduced to 400,000. The White Paper notes that troop draw-down 
will be accelerated in the next nine years. 
  The number of males that can be drafted has been dropping 
steadily in recent years. The MND will use more civilian and 
women personnel in the future to reduce its dependence on 
enlistees. 
  National Defense Minister Sun Chen said that in view of the 
aforementioned major changes in manpower, the armed forces will 
maintain its current level of combat readiness by upgrading its 
weaponry. To meet this need, we have made active efforts in the 
past two years to purchase such high-performance fighters as 
F-16's and Mirage 2000's. 
  Sun Chen also emphasized that a nation's combat readiness is 
not determined by its armed forces alone. Rather, it is 
determined by the nation's overall resources. If too much 
manpower and resources are spent on national defense, it will 
have an adverse effect on the nation's economic development and 
will prove ill-advised in the long run. Therefore, it is 
necessary to strike a balance between the short and long terms 
and reduce the troops as a percentage of the whole population. 
  Sun Chen said: The National Defense Report notes that the 
ratio of the troops as a percentage of the whole population will 
drop to 1.7. The defense budget will also drop as a percentage 
of the general budget of the central government, the budgets of 
governments at three levels, and the GNP. It is hoped that, in 
spite of the percentage drop, the absolute defense expenditure 
figure -- and the resources spent on the maintenance of national 
defense -- will continue to grow as a result of fast economic 
growth. 
  We have our own standards for assessing the minimum 
requirements of national defense strength. The purpose of our 
military is to defend our country and our people's safety. We 
are not in an arms race against the Chinese Communists. 
However, we need to maintain the minimum needs of national 
defense as a guarantee for our safety. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-1930 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "drchi065_v_94002" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-CHI-94-065 </AU>
Daily Report 
<DATE1>  21 Mar 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> TAIWAN </F>
<H3> <TI>   Taipei May Build Communications Station on Spratly Island </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Taipei May Build Communications Station on Spratly Island </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   OW0204052394 Taipei TZU LI WAN PAO in Chinese 21 Mar 94 p 2 </F>
<F P=103> OW0204052394 </F>
<F P=104>  Taipei TZU LI WAN PAO </F>
<F P=105>  Chinese </F>


<TEXT>
BFN 

  [Text] The South Sea Group, which is comprised of various 
government departments and commissions, held its second meeting 
on 21 March. It was presided over by the convener, Interior 
Minister Wu Po-hsiung. At the meeting, participants 
provisionally decided to build a communications equipment 
station and weather station on Taiping Island [Spratly Island]. 
However, in discussing the most critical issue of building an 
airfield on the island, the participants chose to await further 
assessment before making a decision, arguing the airfield will 
be restricted by several factors: The runway will be only 1.5 
km long; the construction cost is high; the type of aircraft 
able to land and take off is limited; and the airfield will only 
serve "non military aircraft." 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-1931 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "drchi065_v_94003" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-CHI-94-065 </AU>
Daily Report 
<DATE1>  2 Apr 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> TAIWAN </F>
<H3> <TI>   Taipei Revises Strategy for Automobile Industry </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Taipei Revises Strategy for Automobile Industry </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   OW0304114794 Taipei Voice of Free China in English 0200 GMT 
2 Apr 94 </F>

<F P=103> OW0304114794 </F>
<F P=104>  Taipei Voice of Free China </F>
<F P=105>  English </F>


<TEXT>
BFN 

<F P=106> [From the "News" program] </F>
  [Text] The Economics Ministry is revising the nation's 
automobile industry development strategy in a bid to prepare 
Taiwan for admission into the General Agreement on Tariff and 
Trade, or GATT. According to the revision, import duties on 
compact passenger cars will be slashed and the ban on imports 
from Japan and South Korea will be lifted. Officials said 
Japan, South Korea, and Hungary have requested specifically that 
Taiwan open its automobile market. On the other hand, Taiwan 
will emulate other countries in dealing with the imports of 
Japanese-made cars; that is, Japan will be required to impose a 
quota on such exports to Taiwan on its own in order not to 
disrupt market order on the island. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-1932 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "drchi065_w_94002" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-CHI-94-065 </AU>
Daily Report 
<DATE1>  5 Apr 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> HONG KONG &amp; MACAO </F>
<F P=101> Hong Kong </F>
<H3> <TI>   MING PAO Statement </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    MING PAO Statement </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   HK0504051194 Hong Kong MING PAO in Chinese 5 Apr 94 p a1 </F>
<F P=103> HK0504051194 </F>
<F P=104>  Hong Kong MING PAO </F>
<F P=105>  Chinese </F>


<TEXT>
BFN 

  [Text] MING PAO's statement: 
  The family members of MING PAO reporter Xi Yang were 
notified 
on 1 April that the Beijing Municipal Intermediate People's 
Court completed the first trial of Xi Yang's case on 28 March 
and sentenced Xi Yang to 12 years imprisonment. At the same 
time, Xi Yang was deprived of political rights for two years. 
The sentence was made in an unopen trial, and was notified to 
Xi Yang's family at 0600 on the fourth day after the sentence 
was made. MING PAO was grieved and extremely disappointed [yi 
han 6695 2013] at this. 
  MING PAO reporter Xi Yang was arrested by the Beijing 
Municipal State Security Bureau on 27 September on a charge of 
stealing and prying into state monetary secrets. From the 
official arrest and prosecution to the unopen trial, the 
authorities only dispatched two reports through the XINHUA News 
Agency, saying that the monetary secrets stolen by Xi Yang 
"included the plan, which had not been made public, of the 
People's Bank of China for changing the interest rates of 
deposits and loans, the confidential decision of the People's 
Bank of China on participating in international gold trading, 
and other major monetary secrets." Apart from that, the 
authorities have never made public any concrete evidence of a 
crime committed by Xi Yang. In the long period of detention 
over six months, the authorities only arranged a 30-minute 
meeting between Xi Yang and his father. They were not allowed 
to talk about the details of the case. So far, Xi Yang's 
employer, legal counsel, and other family members have not been 
allowed to contact Xi Yang personally. In this period, we tried 
many times to seek help by contacting the XINHUA Hong Kong 
Branch, the Hong Kong and Macao Affairs Office of the State 
Council, the Information Office of the State Council, the 
National Association of Journalists, and some Hong Kong deputies 
to the National People's Congress and members of the Chinese 
People's Political Consultative Conference; and people in 
various circles also made innumerous appeals. However, Xi Yang 
was still given a severe sentence. 
  The Chinese authorities concerned just laid a general and 
vague charge against Xi Yang. In the period of detention, Xi 
Yang was completely separated from the outside. When he met 
with his father, they were not allowed to talk about the details 
of the case. Then came the secret trial and the stern sentence. 
All this will inevitably frustrate Hong Kong journalists who 
are trying to cover and report Chinese news objectively on the 
spot, will inevitably shake everybody's belief in Hong Kong's 
news freedom after 1997, and will inevitably do greater harm to 
China's image in the minds of Hong Kong people. China is 
striving to advance reforms and opening, to strengthen the 
system of rule of law, and to establish the market economy. 
However, the method that Chinese authorities used to handle Xi 
Yang's case obviously went against this set of correct national 
policies and the underlying spirit. 
  MING PAO will continue to make every possible effort to help 
Xi Yang's family seek legal assistance and go through appeal 
procedures. In addition, MING PAO solemnly demands that the 
authorities openly make arrangements for Xi Yang's appeal and 
make an objective and fair final judgment by allowing Xi Yang's 
family members, representatives of his employer, and his legal 
counsel to meet him. 
  MING PAO follows the principle of being objective, fair, 
authentic, and accurate in reporting news. Such editorial 
principles have never changed and will never change. Xi Yang is 
a journalist faithful to his job. The materials revealed by the 
Chinese authorities do not show that Xi Yang was engaged in any 
activities out of line with his profession as a reporter. Xi 
Yang was concerned about China's reform, opening, and economic 
development. He wrote a large number of reports about Chinese 
trends that overseas readers were concerned about. Therefore, 
we deeply feel that the 12 years imprisonment is not only Xi 
Yang's personal tragedy but also the tragedy of Hong Kong's 
journalism. However, MING PAO will always be proud of Xi Yang 
and regards him as an outstanding journalist. Even if the 
appeal fails and Xi Yang unfortunately has to serve the prison 
sentence, MING PAO will still continue to take care of Xi Yang 
and his family as before. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-1933 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "drchi065_w_94003" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-CHI-94-065 </AU>
Daily Report 
<DATE1>  1 Apr 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> HONG KONG &amp; MACAO </F>
<F P=101> Hong Kong </F>
<H3> <TI>   Civil Servants Urged To Stay On After 1997 </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Civil Servants Urged To Stay On After 1997 </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   HK0404140094 Beijing RENMIN RIBAO OVERSEAS EDITION in 
Chinese 1 Apr 94 p 5 </F>

<F P=103> HK0404140094 </F>
<F P=104>  Beijing RENMIN RIBAO OVERSEAS EDITION </F>
<F P=105>  Chinese </F>


<TEXT>
BFN 

<F P=106> ["Random Talk on Hong Kong" column by Lian Tian (6647 1131): </F>
"Live and Work in Peace and Contentment; Usher In 1997"] 
  [Text] Hong Kong has a large contingent of civil servants. 
There is a total of more than 200,000 positions, ranging from 
those as senior as government department heads to those as 
junior as street cleaners. Hong Kong's civil service system, 
which has taken shape and operated effectively over many years, 
ensures the Hong Kong Government's highly efficient operation. 
  Generally speaking, Hong Kong civil servants are better paid 
and well fed. They also understand clearly that their pay comes 
from Hong Kong taxpayers' money, so they work with might and 
main. When staying in Hong Kong, this writer, as required by my 
job, came into contact with government departments concerned on 
many occasions and had the personal experience of being warmly 
received by functionaries who responded to my queries and 
dispelled my doubts with their adept professional knowledge. 
Moreover, this writer witnessed scenes in which the police 
risked their lives to capture robbers in the street. My general 
feeling is that Hong Kong civil servants are of high quality and 
quite professional, and most of them are dedicated to their 
duties. 
  Today, Hong Kong has become the "Pearl of the East," 
enjoying 
prosperity and stability, but this success is inseparable from 
the efforts made by vast numbers of civil servants. As far as 
this writer understands, a well-knit mechanism of inspiration 
and supervision has been built in the Hong Kong civil service 
system and a stringent system for assessing civil servants has 
been implemented, with rewards and punishments meted out fairly. 
In addition, the Independent Commission Against Corruption is 
responsible for monitoring corrupt practices committed by civil 
servants of the executive. As proved by practical experience, 
these measures help government organs bring their executive 
functions into play. The mainland also drew on Hong Kong's 
relevant practices in the process of studying the implementation 
of a civil service system. 
  More important is that if our country wants to realize a 
smooth transition when resuming the exercise of our sovereignty 
over Hong Kong, a stable contingent of civil servants is a very 
essential aspect and a direct factor. To stabilize the 
contingent of civil servants, it is necessary to maintain the 
continuity of the civil service system. Actually, issues 
related to civil servants have been defined clearly in the Basic 
Law. Under the principles of "Hong Kong people ruling Hong 
Kong" and "a high degree of autonomy," the Basic Law stipulates 
that following our country's resumption of the exercise of 
sovereignty over Hong Kong, civil servants serving in all Hong 
Kong Government departments may all remain in employment in the 
Hong Kong Special Administrative Regional [SAR] Government. 
Entering the post-transition period, with the year 1997 
approaching, some misgivings have arisen among Hong Kong civil 
servants which are largely unnecessary worries, such as concerns 
over a "great reshuffle" and the possible loss of existing 
positions and benefits. To deal with these misgivings, the 
Preliminary Work Committee's political sub-group studied them as 
major issues and openly dispelled relevant doubts, thus more 
explicitly and concretely guaranteeing the future of civil 
servants. This move should pacify some of the civil servants 
who are in a state of disquiet. 
  The Chinese Government sets much store by the role of Hong 
Kong civil servants and has repeatedly made clear its wish for 
the continued service of Hong Kong civil servants in the SAR 
Government after 1997 so as to serve the people of Hong Kong. 
This is a sincere invitation sent by the Chinese Government. 
It is believed that Hong Kong civil servants -- particularly 
the Chinese civil servants, who account for over 90 percent of 
the contingent -- will positively orient themselves toward 1997, 
in a gesture of mastery, along with vast numbers of the people 
of Hong Kong, will live and work in peace and contentment, and 
will develop their capabilities to the full. In addition, the 
issue of having better communications, stronger ties, and closer 
cooperation between Hong Kong and the mainland in the 
post-transition period also should be placed on the agenda. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-1934 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "drchi065_w_94004" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-CHI-94-065 </AU>
Daily Report 
<DATE1>  5 Apr 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> HONG KONG &amp; MACAO </F>
<F P=101> Hong Kong </F>
<H3> <TI>   Reorganization at Hong Kong, Macao Affairs Office </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Reorganization at Hong Kong, Macao Affairs Office </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   HK0504041194 Hong Kong WEN WEI PO in Chinese 5 Apr 94 p A1 </F>
<F P=103> HK0504041194 </F>
<F P=104>  Hong Kong WEN WEI PO </F>
<F P=105>  Chinese </F>


<TEXT>
BFN 

<F P=106> [Report: "Transfer of Department-Level Officials at Hong </F>
Kong and Macao Affairs Office"] 
  [Text] Beijing, 4 Apr (WEN WEI PO)--This newspaper has 
learned that the department-level officials and organs of the 
Hong Kong and Macao Affairs Office of the State Council were 
recently readjusted. Beside the addition of the Hong Kong Social 
and Cultural Department, officials at the department level have 
also been readjusted as follows: Zhang Liangdong [1728 5328 
2767] and Deng Qiang [6772 1730] are head and deputy head of the 
Hong Kong Economic Department (formerly the First Department); 
Xu Ze [1776 3419] and Lu Ping [0712 1627] are head and deputy 
head of the Hong Kong Political Affairs Department (formerly the 
Second Department); Zhao Bingxin [6392 4426 2946] and Wei 
Lingyan [5898 7117 1750] are head and deputy head of the Hong 
Kong Social and Cultural Department; and Chai Dongliang [2693 
2639 0081] and Liu Chenlie [0491 5256 3525] are head and deputy 
head of the Secretarial and Administrative Department (formerly 
the Fourth Department). 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-1935 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "drchi065_w_94005" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-CHI-94-065 </AU>
Daily Report 
<DATE1>  4 Apr 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> HONG KONG &amp; MACAO </F>
<F P=101> Macao </F>
<H3> <TI>   Meeting Marks Promulgation of Macao Basic Law </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Meeting Marks Promulgation of Macao Basic Law </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   OW0404154394 Beijing XINHUA in English 1445 GMT 4 Apr 94 </F>
<F P=103> OW0404154394 </F>
<F P=104>  Beijing XINHUA </F>
<F P=105>  English </F>


<TEXT>
BFN 

  [Text] Beijing, April 4 (XINHUA) -- The Basic Law of the 
Macao Special Administrative Region reflects the "one country, 
two systems" principle and complies with Macao's features and 
reality, a senior official said here today. 
  Wang Hanbin, vice-chairman of the Standing Committee of the 
National People's Congress, made the remark at a meeting to mark 
the first anniversary of the promulgation of the Basic Law. 
  He said, "as there are only five years or so for the 
transition period, we will follow the stipulations of the Basic 
Law and make preparations for transfer of power and smooth 
transition. It is necessary to give the whole nation, including 
Macao compatriots, an understanding of basic state principles 
and policies towards Macao through publicity on the Basic Law." 
  At present, the Chinese and Portuguese Governments have 
cooperated well and made smooth progress on the Macao issue, 
which will promote the smooth transition of power and the 
economic development and prosperity of Macao, he said. 
  Ma Man-kei, vice-chairman of the National Committee of the 
Chinese People's Political consultative Conference, said that 
since the promulgation of the Basic Law, both the Chinese and 
Portuguese sides and the local legislators have reached 
consensus on convergence with the Basic Law. 
  He urged the Macao Government to cooperate more actively in 
accelerating various activities, including the solution of 
various specific issues, to ensure smooth convergence with the 
Basic Law. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-1936 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "drchi065_s_94003" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-CHI-94-065 </AU>
Daily Report 
<DATE1>  26 Mar 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> Northeast Region </F>
<H3> <TI>   Heilongjiang Holds Foreign Affairs Work Conference </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Heilongjiang Holds Foreign Affairs Work Conference </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   SK2903132694 Harbin Heilongjiang People's Radio Network in 
Mandarin 2200 GMT 26 Mar 94 </F>

<F P=103> SK2903132694 </F>
<F P=104>  Harbin Heilongjiang People's Radio Network </F>
<F P=105>  Mandarin </F>


<TEXT>
BFN 

  [Text] At the provincial foreign affairs work conference 
which ended on 26 March, Governor Shao Qihui pointed: It is 
necessary to combine foreign affairs work with the overall 
situation of reform and opening up, and enable foreign affairs 
work to become an important force for promoting reform, opening 
up, development, and stability. 
  Governor Shao said: At present, the international situation 
and the situation of neighboring countries are very advantageous 
to our province. Border trade has rapidly expanded; the number 
of open ports have increased to 21; and the transaction volume 
made at the four successive Harbin trade fairs has increased 
every year. We have established friendly relations with 29 
cities of nine countries, such as Japan and the United States, 
and economic contacts and friendly exchange relations with more 
than 120 countries and regions in the world. This has provided 
an important opportunity and laid an important foundation for 
further creating a new situation in foreign affairs work. In 
China, many fake and inferior products have flowed to the 
markets in Russia and other CIS countries through various 
illegal channels. Problems on some evildoers and unlawful 
elements who sneaked to other countries through various 
relations to form criminal cliques to engage in fighting, 
killing, and robbery must be resolutely checked. 
  Governor Shao stressed: It is not realistic to rely only on 
the efforts of foreign affairs departments in strengthening 
management over foreign affairs work and rectifying the chaotic 
phenomenon. Party committees and governments at all levels must 
give unified instruction, coordinate with various sectors, and 
concentrate time and energy on comprehensively improving this 
situation. The discipline inspection and supervision 
departments should strictly investigate and handle cases on 
discipline and law breaches in examination and approval of 
procedures for leaving the country and in management. Public 
security and armed police departments should strengthen 
management over the border areas and deal strict blows to 
criminal activities outside the territory. 
  Governor Shao pointed out: Governments at all levels should 
attach prime importance to foreign affairs work; leaders at all 
levels should take the lead in observing the state's relevant 
stipulations on foreign affairs work, and must not disturb 
foreign affairs departments to implement policies through human 
relationship. They should also do a good job in maintaining 
coordination and cooperation among departments. As the foreign 
affairs functional departments of local governments, foreign 
affairs offices should conscientiously supervise, inspect, and 
coordinate this work. No phenomena of shifting responsibility 
onto other people and disputing over trifles should emerge. 
  The three-day provincial foreign affairs work conference 
relayed the guidelines of foreign affairs office meetings of 
directors of various provinces, prefectures, and cities across 
the province. Responsible comrades in charge of foreign affairs 
work from various prefectures, cities, and counties across the 
province studied and discussed this work. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-1937 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "drchi065_s_94004" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-CHI-94-065 </AU>
Daily Report 
<DATE1>  28 Mar 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> Northeast Region </F>
<H3> <TI>   Heilongjiang Holds Standing Committee Meeting </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Heilongjiang Holds Standing Committee Meeting </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   SK3103035894 Harbin Heilongjiang People's Radio Network in 
Mandarin 1000 GMT 28 Mar 94 </F>

<F P=103> SK3103035894 </F>
<F P=104>  Harbin Heilongjiang People's Radio Network </F>
<F P=105>  Mandarin </F>


<TEXT>
BFN 

  [Text] The enlarged standing committee meeting of the 
provincial party committee was held today. Sun Weiben, 
secretary of the provincial party committee, presided over the 
meeting. The main topics for discussion at this meeting were to 
relay the major directives of the central leading comrades for 
the work of Heilongjiang Province, report on the basic situation 
of the provincial party committee and government's trip to 
Beijing to report the province's economic development issues, 
relay the guidelines of the central rural work conference, 
devise plans for several current tasks on seizing the 
opportunity, deepening reform, expanding opening up, promoting 
development, and maintaining stability which must be grasped 
well. 
  Members of the standing committee of the provincial party 
committee, including Shao Qihui, Ma Guoliang, Tian Fengshan, 
Shan Rongfan, Yang Guanghong, Wang Xianmin, Li Qinglin, and Yu 
Jingchang, attended the meeting. At the meeting, Shao Qihui, 
deputy secretary of the provincial party committee and 
provincial governor, relayed the directives given by the central 
leading comrades on the work of Heilongjiang. Vice Governor Sun 
Kuiwen relayed the guidelines of the central rural work 
conference and devised plans for Heilongjiang Province's current 
rural work. 
  Sun Weiben, secretary of the provincial party committee, 
gave 
an important speech. He said: From the directives of the 
central leading comrades, we notice that the central authorities 
have been concerned about Heilongjiang's development, fully 
realized Heilongjiang's difficulty, affirmed the contributions 
of the people in our province and the work ideas of the 
provincial party committee and the provincial government, 
supported our province to overcome difficulties, and pinned 
great hopes on our province. 
  Sun Weiben said: The guidelines of the speeches of the 
central leading comrades have defined an orientation of advance 
for building and developing Heilongjiang and for revitalizing 
the old industrial base. Sun Weiben pointed out: We must 
promote the spirit of keeping the eyes inward, not adopting a 
wait-and-see attitude, and making unremitting efforts to improve 
oneself among the broad masses of party members, cadres, and the 
people, and overcome the difficulties on our way of advance by 
deepening reform, expanding opening up, promoting development, 
and maintaining stability. 
  Sun Weiben said: Our province's petroleum, animal husbandry, 
coal, grain, and war industries have all witnessed new economic 
difficulties. In addition to the factors of improper systems 
and structure, and price hike, the most prominent issue is that 
we are shackled by the system of larger in size and collective 
in nature and three unified managements in enterprises. We 
should strive to create a good external environment for these 
enterprises, guide them to make unremitting efforts to improve 
themselves, deepen reform, change operational mechanism, and 
enhance vitality. 
  Sun Weiben said: Over the past few years, border trade has 
developed continuously and become an important channel for 
opening the province to the outside world and an important 
economic growing point. In order to give further play to this 
special advantage of our province and to develop the 
international market to alleviate the difficulties in our 
economic life, we must further emancipate the mind, decontrol 
policies, simplify procedures, and open the green light for 
expanding opening up. While making continued efforts to occupy 
the CIS markets, we should also implement the strategy of 
establishing various markets and actively develop markets in 
ROK, Northeast Asia, and east European countries. 
  Sun Weiben pointed out: To overcome difficulties and to 
accelerate development, a task of top priority is to give 
prominence to three priorities and grasp two key points. The 
three priorities are to implement the guidelines of the recent 
central rural work conference and strive to reap a bumper 
agricultural harvest this year; exert efforts to invigorate 
large and medium-sized enterprises; and promote the project of 
establishing township enterprises in other counties. The two key 
points are projects and funds. Party committees and governments 
at all levels must further emancipate their mind, broaden their 
field of vision, and have a stronger sense of drawing support 
from other localities to seek development. 
  Sun Weiben stressed: Under such a difficult situation, we 
should all the more try in every possible way to maintain 
stability. At present, the key to handling the relations of 
reform, development, and stability is to stabilize the market 
and commodity prices and to control inflation. Principal 
leaders of the party committees and governments at all levels 
should personally grasp three affairs well. Prior to the end of 
May, they should promote the system of carrying a price tag in 
all commodities throughout the province; implement the system of 
supervising and controlling the prices of 22 government-set 
daily necessities that are essential to the life of residents; 
and conduct an overall price inspection among all enterprises, 
individual industrial and commercial traders, and scientific 
research institutes rendering paid service. 
  Leading comrades of the provincial people's congress, the 
provincial government, the provincial committee of the Chinese 
People's Political Consultative Conference, and the provincial 
discipline inspection commission, and secretaries of various 
prefectural and city party committees attended the meeting as 
observers. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-1938 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "drchi065_s_94005" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-CHI-94-065 </AU>
Daily Report 
<DATE1>  16 Mar 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> Northeast Region </F>
<H3> <TI>   Heilongjiang Joint-Stock Oilfield Improves </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Heilongjiang Joint-Stock Oilfield Improves </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   OW1603072294 Beijing XINHUA in English 0649 GMT 16 Mar 94 </F>
<F P=103> OW1603072294 </F>
<F P=104>  Beijing XINHUA </F>
<F P=105>  English </F>


<TEXT>
BFN 

  [Text] Beijing, March 16 (XINHUA) -- China's first 
joint-stock oilfield in Zhaoyuan County of the country's 
northernmost Heilongjiang Province has gained momentum since its 
trial exploration early last year. 
  The oilfield, located in the western part of Daqing 
Oilfield, 
one of China's biggest oil producers, covers an area of 60 sq 
km, with a reserve of 36 million tons of crude oil with low 
permeability. 
  With a total investment of 1.64 billion yuan, the oilfield 
is 
being built jointly by four local companies as its main share- 
holders. 
  It is expected to go into operation at the end of 1995, with 
plans to drill more than 600 wells and the total annual output 
to reach 436,000 tons. More than 50 wells have been completed 
so far. 
  Experts involved predict that when completed, the oilfield 
will earn 136 million yuan per year. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-1939 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "drchi065_s_94006" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-CHI-94-065 </AU>
Daily Report 
<DATE1>  10 Mar 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> Northeast Region </F>
<H3> <TI>   Heilongjiang Propaganda, Ideological Forum Ends </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Heilongjiang Propaganda, Ideological Forum Ends </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   SK1203021594 Harbin Heilongjiang People's Radio Network in 
Mandarin 1000 GMT 10 Mar 94 </F>

<F P=103> SK1203021594 </F>
<F P=104>  Harbin Heilongjiang People's Radio Network </F>
<F P=105>  Mandarin </F>


<TEXT>
BFN 

  [Text] The provincial propaganda and ideological work 
conference ended in Harbin this morning. The conference relayed 
and studied guidelines of the national propaganda and 
ideological work conference, listened to reports given by Sun 
Weiben, Shao Qihui, and other leading comrades, discussed 
Heilongjiang Province's policies on strengthening propaganda and 
ideological work and press relations and on implementing the 
cultural economy, studied ways to strengthen and improve the 
province's tasks, objectives, and measures for conducting 
propaganda and ideological work, commended a number of 
outstanding propaganda cadres who have engaged in propaganda and 
ideological work for more than 20 years. 
  Shan Rongfan, deputy secretary of the provincial party 
committee, gave a speech at the closing ceremony, entitled: 
"Pay Attention to Construction and Implementation, and Further 
Create a New Situation in Propaganda and Ideological Work." 
  He said: It is necessary to enhance understanding of 
propaganda and ideological work and implement the principle of 
taking a two-handed approach in work and be tough with both. 
Comrades on the propaganda and ideological front across the 
province should take action actively in order not to disappoint 
the deep trust, and creatively fulfill all tasks. In referring 
to the topic of using correct public opinions to guide the 
people, Shan Rongfan said: We must submit our propaganda and 
ideological work to and make it serve the overall situation of 
the whole party's work, take the party's basic line as the 
guiding principle, actively, comprehensively, and accurately 
publicize the aim and meaning of reform, opening up, and the 
series of reform measures, guide the masses to devote their 
enthusiasm and creativity to deepening reform, expanding opening 
up, and promoting the development of the socialist market 
economy, to the grand objective of realizing the socialist 
modernization, and to creating first-grade achievements at their 
own work posts. It is necessary to actively publicize 
Heilongjiang's great achievements since reform and opening up 
and the people's lofty moral character and brilliant 
contributions. 
  Shan Rongfan stressed in particular: In propaganda work, we 
must uphold materialist dialectics, guard against one-sideness 
and oversimplification, promptly and effectively persuade the 
people and help them resolve some ideological problems that 
emerged in the course of reform caused by the adjustment of 
relations of interests, strictly observe propaganda discipline, 
help them not to create chaos, create a main melody but not 
noise, guard against the work style of only paying attention to 
invigoration and [words indistinct] at the expanse of social 
effect, strengthen press contingents, and select those who are 
politically sound, professionally competent, and upright in work 
style to the press posts. 
  Shan Rongfan said: In propaganda and ideological work, we 
must make it serve reform, opening up, and economic 
construction, expand strength, and actively explore new ways and 
methods to serve economic work under the new situation and on 
the basis of issuing major measures in the course of 
Heilongjiang's reform, opening up, and economic construction and 
carrying out major projects, comprehensively and accurately 
analyze the current economic situation, including Heilongjiang's 
economic situation, guide the masses of cadres to clearly 
recognize the relationship between major and minor aspects, the 
part and the whole, and the rate and efficiency, strive to do a 
good job in guiding and protecting the people's enthusiasm and 
creativity, and provide favorable mass media support for 
creating a good ideological and media environment. We should 
unceasingly enhance Heilongjiang's international renown and 
appeal by carrying out activities related to foreign countries, 
such as activities to publicize the Asian winter games and the 
holding of trade talks. 
  Shan Rongfan called on comrades on the propaganda and 
ideological front to strengthen and improve ideological and 
moral education in line with the new siuation, continue to grasp 
the production of spiritual products with the project of issuing 
one good book, one good drama, one outstanding television drama, 
one outstanding film, and one persuasive article in the lead, do 
meticulous and practical work, pay attention to quality and 
efficiency, and fulfill the demand of improving the propaganda 
and ideological work style. 
  Shan Rongfan pointed out: We should strengthen policies, 
laws, and regulations governing propaganda and ideological work, 
and enable propaganda and ideological work to have laws and 
regulations to follow and be managed in line with law. He hoped 
that all people will make common efforts to build a contingent 
of propaganda and ideological personnel who are politically 
strong, professionally competent, and upright in work style. 
  Yang Guanghong, member of the standing committee of the 
provincial party committee and director of the propaganda 
department, summarized the coference. He called on all 
localities and departments across the province to rapidly 
implement the guidelines of the provincial propaganda and 
ideological work conference, proceed from their reality of their 
own localities and departments, enrich and improve this year's 
major work priorities and work plans in line with this 
conference's guidelines, adopt essential measures for 
implementing systems and guaranteeing working funds for 
propaganda and ideological work and for building the contingent, 
and strive to make breakthroughs in resolving major problems in 
their own localities and departments. 
  Provincial leaders, including Ma Guoliang, Tian Fengshan, Qi 
Guiyuan, Cong Fukui, and Huang Feng attended today's conference. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-1940 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "drchi065_s_94007" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-CHI-94-065 </AU>
Daily Report 
<DATE1>  1 Apr 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> Northeast Region </F>
<H3> <TI>   Jilin Governor Views Industrial Priorities </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Jilin Governor Views Industrial Priorities </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   SK0304020994 Changchun Jilin People's Radio Network in 
Mandarin 1030 GMT 1 Apr 94 </F>

<F P=103> SK0304020994 </F>
<F P=104>  Changchun Jilin People's Radio Network </F>
<F P=105>  Mandarin </F>


<TEXT>
BFN 

  [Text] The provincial government held a provincial meeting 
at Nanhu Guesthouse on 1 April on profoundly launching the 
activities of transforming mechanisms, strengthening management, 
tapping potentials, and improving efficiency. Vice Governor Wei 
Minxue presided over the meeting. Governor Gao Yan made a 
report entitled "Fulfilling All Tasks on This Year's Industrial 
Economy." (Zhu Tao), deputy secretary general of the State 
Economic and Trade Commission, made a speech in which he called 
for efforts to launch the activities among all enterprises in 
the country. 
  This meeting was devoted to extensively mobilizing all 
enterprises in the province to profoundly launch the activities 
of transforming mechanisms, strengthening management, tapping 
potential, and improving efficiency, which should be combined 
with all items of this year's industrial work. The purpose of 
the activities is to guide all enterprises to voluntarily 
transform operational mechanism around the establishment of the 
modern enterprise system, to consciously strengthen and improve 
management and operation, to promote technological progress, to 
comprehensively improve the quality and economic efficiency, and 
to enhance the adaptability to the market and the abilities to 
copy with changes and participate in market competition in order 
to effect a sustained, rapid, and sound development of the 
province's economy under the new situation of comprehensively 
deepening reform and opening even wider to the outside world. 
  Governor Gao Yan offered four opinions on the basic tasks of 
this meeting and on the realization of the objective of pushing 
the economy onto a new height this year. 1) The opinion on the 
current economic situation of the province; 2) launching the 
activities of transforming mechanisms, strengthening management, 
tapping potential, and improving efficiency by regarding it as 
the major task of this year's industrial economy; 3) going all 
out to organize well the industrial production in the second 
quarter; and 4) strengthening leadership and paying attention to 
implementation. 
  Governor Gao Yan stressed: Transforming mechanisms, 
strengthening management, tapping potential, and improving 
efficiency are interrelated. The transformation of mechanisms 
is the foundation for establishing the modern enterprise system. 
Only by transforming mechanisms can enterprises turn the 
pressures from the market into the internal motivation to 
strengthen management, promote technological progress, and 
improve the expertise of laborers and economic efficiency. 
[Words indistinct] launching the activities is an important 
part to establish the modern enterprise system and is a useful 
exploration to guide enterprise work under the new situation. 
The launching of the activities is of great immediate and 
strategic significance in promoting the province's reform, 
opening up, and economic development, in maintaining the 
province's social stability, and in building a developed border 
near-the-sea province. 
  The meeting also pointed out the goal of the activities as 
follows: Autonomy should be put in place among the 428 large 
and medium-sized state-owned enterprises, that are covered by 
the three-year plan, and the inventory and check of the 
stockpiles and capital of these enterprises should be completed. 
State enterprises should begin to carry out the program of 
making their management embark on a new height in three years, 
and a good foundation should be laid. Among state-owned 
enterprises, the enterprises with advanced management should 
account for 20 percent, the enterprises up to standard in 
management should account for 50 percent, and the enterprises 
under standard in management should account for 30 percent or 
lower. Most enterprises should establish the policymaking, 
information, development, and other management systems and 
should enhance their abilities to overcome unfavorable factors, 
to keep breast of the changes in markets, and to restrict 
themselves. The profit- and tax-yielding rate of the capital of 
the industrial enterprises exercising independent accounting 
should be raised by 2 percentage points. The per capita labor 
productivity of these enterprises should be raised by 14 
percent, the comprehensive energy consumption for each 10,000 
yuan of output value should drop by 3 percent, the turnover of 
the funds retained from their profits should be accelerated, and 
the marketing rate of their products should reach 97 percent. 
The range of unprofitable industrial enterprises covered by the 
budget should drop by 5 percentage points, and the amount of 
deficits should decrease by 10 percent. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-1941 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "drchi065_s_94008" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-CHI-94-065 </AU>
Daily Report 
<DATE1>  23 Mar 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> Northeast Region </F>
<H3> <TI>   Jilin Holds Agricultural Development Conference </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Jilin Holds Agricultural Development Conference </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   SK2403134194 Changchun Jilin People's Radio Network in 
Mandarin 1030 GMT 23 Mar 94 </F>

<F P=103> SK2403134194 </F>
<F P=104>  Changchun Jilin People's Radio Network </F>
<F P=105>  Mandarin </F>


<TEXT>
BFN 

  [Text] Station Reporter (Zhao Xinting) learned of the facts 
from the provincial overall agricultural development work 
conference that over the past years, Jilin Province has made 
satisfactory achievements in comprehensively developing 
agriculture. 
  Over the past years, the province has developed five major 
agricultural auxiliary service projects, such as cultivating 
fine seeds and offering service of farm machines and explored 
new ways for providing a good-quality and high-efficient 
operation mechanism for the agricultural production areas. 
Simultaneously, the province has made serialized development in 
such 10 major aspects as farming, breeding, and processing; and 
created 500 million yuan of output value and 160 million yuan of 
profits and taxes through the development. 
  Sang Fengwen, vice governor of the provincial government, 
made a speech at the provincial overall agricultural development 
work conference that was held on 23 March. 
  He pointed out in his speech: The overall development of 
agriculture is an important strategic measure of the state for 
regulating and controlling, on a large scale, the development of 
agriculture as well as an important means for helping the 
peasants seek wealth and become fairly well-off. This year, the 
second-phase overall agricultural development project of the 
province should pass through the state acceptance test, and the 
third-phase project will comprehensively start. Therefore, this 
year is a key year serving as a link between past and future. 
At present, we should emphatically grasp the work in the 
following few aspects. First, we should attend to the 
winding-up work of the second-phase project and make 
preparations for the third-phase project. Second, according to 
the guidelines of the national overall agricultural development 
work conference, we should ceaselessly strengthen and improve 
new methods for management of agricultural development. Third, 
we should ensure the supply of funds for development. From now 
on, we should try every possible to arrange, in a coordinate 
manner, the development of the overall agricultural development 
items, the items involving the loans granted by the World Bank, 
and the items involving the capital provided by the 
international agricultural development fund so as to solve the 
difficulties in providing necessary funds for these items. 
Simultaneously, we should make a unified plan to arrange the 
special agricultural loans, increase the [words indistinct] 
efficiency of loans, and reduce the losses from loans. Fourth, 
we should strengthen organizational leadership. The overall 
agricultural development is a task with various departments 
involved, large amounts of work load, and strict demands. So, 
the governments at various levels should strengthen the 
leadership over this work and support this work so as to 
accomplish this task with high standards, high quality, and high 
efficiency and to create a new overall agricultural development 
situation. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-1942 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "drchi065_s_94009" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-CHI-94-065 </AU>
Daily Report 
<DATE1>  22 Mar 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> Northeast Region </F>
<H3> <TI>   Jilin Peasants Improve Living Standard </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Jilin Peasants Improve Living Standard </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   SK2303123694 Changchun Jilin People's Radio Network in 
Mandarin 1030 GMT 22 Mar 94 </F>

<F P=103> SK2303123694 </F>
<F P=104>  Changchun Jilin People's Radio Network </F>
<F P=105>  Mandarin </F>


<TEXT>
BFN 

  [Text] Thanks to the correct leadership of the provincial 
party committee and government, people in Jilin Province 
effected a tremendous change in rural areas, and peasants' 
living standard was greatly improved. Peasants' per capita net 
income came to 891.61 yuan in 1993, up 390 percent from 1978 
when reform just began. When allowing for price rises, the 
increase was 236 percent. Peasants had 512.5 yuan in their 
hands per capita, up 56.6 times from 1978. Thanks to the 
increase in their income, peasants began to become particular 
about their food. In 1993, their per capita grain consumption 
totaled 324.16 kg, up 24.2 percent from 1978, of which rice and 
flour accounted for 51.5 percent. Food on their table became 
varied, which included rice, steamed buns, chicken, duck, fish, 
and other kinds of meat. 
  By the end of 1993, there were 68 radios and 85 black and 
white television sets in every 100 peasant households. Peasants 
spent most of their spare time listening to radio and watching 
television. Per 100 peasant households had 70 sewing machines, 
235 clocks and watches, and 123 bicycles, up 140, 180, and 280 
percent, respectively, from 1978. They also had one camera, 31 
washing machines, one refrigerator, two electric fans, two 
motorcycles, and 2.7 pieces of large furniture. 
  In addition to increasing their durable goods, peasants also 
notably improved their housing conditions. In 1993, their per 
capita housing space increased to 16 square meters, up 84.1 
percent from 1978. Under such circumstances, they began to pay 
attention to interior decoration. In 1978, most of them lived 
in thatched or earth cottages. Now, brick-and-tile houses can 
be found everywhere in rural areas, small multi-story houses 
have been built, and interior decoration has become more 
urbanized, with telephones, carpets, and ceramic-tile floors and 
walls entering the peasant family. Some peasants also have 
heaters to keep their houses warm all year. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-1943 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "drchi065_s_94010" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-CHI-94-065 </AU>
Daily Report 
<DATE1>  15 Mar 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> Northeast Region </F>
<H3> <TI>   High-Tech Zone To Increase Agriculture in Jilin </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    High-Tech Zone To Increase Agriculture in Jilin </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   OW1503082394 Beijing XINHUA in English 0746 GMT 15 Mar 94 </F>
<F P=103> OW1503082394 </F>
<F P=104>  Beijing XINHUA </F>
<F P=105>  English </F>


<TEXT>
BFN 

  [Text] Changchun, March 15 (XINHUA) -- Northeast China's 
Jilin Province, one of the country's major commodity grain 
producers, has built an agricultural high-tech development zone 
in a bid to boost its farm production. 
  The newly-built zone, located southeast of the provincial 
capital city of Changchun, is an extension of the city's new and 
high-tech industry development zone, covering an area of 1,200 
hectares. 
  The province plans to turn the zone into an integrated 
center 
with agricultural high-tech development, experimentation, 
production, processing and marketing. 
  According to a Changchun-based Agricultural University 
professor, the zone will enjoy all the relevant preferential 
policies formulated for the city's development zones and 
university-run enterprises. 
  Future research and development of the new zone will focus 
on 
products including health food, fertilizers and veterinary 
medicines, additives, chemicals for controlling plant growth, 
and special foods. 
  Also included are breeding of high-quality strains of 
vegetables, animals, flowers and trees, and planting of 
high-yield crops. 
  A high-tech industry official said that the project has 
already attracted many investors from Japan, the Republic of 
Korea, Canada and the United States. 
  So far, the zone has set up a ginseng company funded jointly 
by China and Canada, one biological product company financed by 
a Hong Kong firm and one Sino-American pets company, which are 
expected to go into operation soon. 
  Jilin, rich in agricultural resources, is one of the biggest 
corn and ginseng producers in China, but the agricultural 
economic returns used to be small because of a disproportionate 
emphasis on grain output. 
  To drive the development of fine-hybrid and high-yielding 
grain production, the province has established dozens of 
experimental farm zones over the past few years. 
  It has also made great efforts to bring the role of its 
institutions of higher learning into full play. Located in the 
new zone, the Jilin Agricultural University has 72 teaching and 
research sections, about one hundred laboratories and six 
institutes specializing in modern farm technology. 
  Other institutions involved in the drive are the Jilin 
Forestry Institute, Jilin Vegetable Research Institute and the 
Jilin Aquatic Products Research Institute. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-1944 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "drchi065_s_94011" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-CHI-94-065 </AU>
Daily Report 
<DATE1>  20 Mar 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> Northeast Region </F>
<H3> <TI>   Drilling in Horqin Region Produces Crude Oil, Gas </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Drilling in Horqin Region Produces Crude Oil, Gas </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   SK2103015394 Shenyang Liaoning People's Radio Network in 
Mandarin 1000 GMT 20 Mar 94 </F>

<F P=103> SK2103015394 </F>
<F P=104>  Shenyang Liaoning People's Radio Network </F>
<F P=105>  Mandarin </F>


<TEXT>
BFN 

  [Text] Crude oil is now being produced at Changcheng Oil 
Field at the south end of Horqin Grasslands. This indicates 
that Liaohe Oil Field has made a new breakthrough in prospecting 
oil and gas deposits in Horqin Region and also indicates that 
the oil-deposit region of Horqin as a whole will become an 
important area of Liaohe Oil Field in developing its oil 
resources. Throughout the year of prospecting, five wells were 
drilled in Changcheng Oil Field and gushed with varying degrees 
of oil and gas. Of these wells, the daily output of two exceeds 
30 tonnes. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-1945 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "drchi065_s_94012" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-CHI-94-065 </AU>
Daily Report 
<DATE1>  31 Mar 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> Northeast Region </F>
<H3> <TI>   Liaoning Governor Attends Youth Federation Meeting </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Liaoning Governor Attends Youth Federation Meeting </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   SK0104075994 Shenyang Liaoning People's Radio Network in 
Mandarin 2300 GMT 31 Mar 94 </F>

<F P=103> SK0104075994 </F>
<F P=104>  Shenyang Liaoning People's Radio Network </F>
<F P=105>  Mandarin </F>


<TEXT>
BFN 

  [Text] The third meeting of the sixth standing committee of 
the provincial youth federation concluded on 31 March. Governor 
Yue Qifeng attended the meeting and delivered a speech in which 
he urged the youth organizations throughout the province to lead 
the broad masses of youths to display their talent in markets 
and to be a vanguard in the course of turning the planned 
economy into a market one. He said: Youths are the least 
conservative and accept new things rapidly. In the current 
period, a large number of youths across the province have scored 
a large number of typical and good deeds in developing the 
market economy and played an important role in the province's 
economic development. We should attach importance on the role 
played by middle-aged and young scientific and technological 
personnel, including some technical workers. They constitute a 
very important force for restoring the province's prestige. 
  During the meeting, the participating members elected the 
supplementary vice chairmen of the provincial youth federation 
and elected (Yao Zhiping), deputy secretary of the provincial 
Communist Youth League committee, chairman of the provincial 
youth federation. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-1946 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "drchi065_s_94013" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-CHI-94-065 </AU>
Daily Report 
<DATE1>  8 Mar 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> Northeast Region </F>
<H3> <TI>   Liaoning Holds Meeting on Curbing Inflation </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Liaoning Holds Meeting on Curbing Inflation </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   SK0903045894 Shenyang Liaoning People's Radio Network in 
Mandarin 1000 GMT 8 Mar 94 </F>

<F P=103> SK0903045894 </F>
<F P=104>  Shenyang Liaoning People's Radio Network </F>
<F P=105>  Mandarin </F>


<TEXT>
BFN 

  [Text] The provincial people's government sponsored a 
telephone conference on the work of commodity prices on 8 March. 
Vice Governor Wen Shizhen delivered a speech at the conference, 
in which he urged governments at all levels throughout the 
province to go into action immediately, to enhance the price 
readjustment and control in line with the arrangements and 
demands made by the central authorities, to carry out price 
inspection, to strengthen the price management, and to 
realistically do a good job in the province's price work. 
  Wen Shizhen pointed out: The current general situation in 
the province's economy is fine. The province continued to 
maintain a trend of faster economic development in January and 
February and smoothly published major and important measures for 
the reforms of tax systems and foreign exchanges. However, what 
merits attention is that the pressure of current inflation has 
increased further. Repercussions still remain of price hikes 
cropping up at the end of 1993 in some commodities. Problems 
concerning commodity prices are still the general concern of 
society. 
  Wen Shizhen emphatically pointed out: In successfully 
handling the matters of commodity prices, governments at all 
levels should put their work emphasis on vigorously maintaining 
relative stability in the prices of vegetables and grains; on 
establishing the foundation of copying with grain risks, on 
perfecting the foundation systems for the prices of nonstaple 
foodstuffs; and on doing a good job in carefully organizing the 
issuance of measures for reform in various prices. They should 
also put their work emphasis on guarding against excessive price 
hikes, on earnestly implementing the price policies of 
supporting agricultural development and protecting peasants' 
interests, on establishing or improving as soon as possible 
commodity price system, and on perfecting the systems of price 
management. As for important living commodities and the means 
of production whose price restrictions have been relaxed and 
whose price fluctuation is larger, governments should enforce 
the systems of putting price hikes on file and submitting 
application for price hikes. As for some of these commodities, 
they may also enforce measures for differentiating their rate, 
conducting control, and imposing temporary restriction. 
  Attending the provincial telephone conference of commodity 
prices were the province's vice governors and vice mayors in 
charge of commodity prices and responsible persons from the 
departments concerned. 
  During the conference Xie Guangren, director of the 
provincial price bureau, delivered a speech in which he made 
arrangements for the province's mass price inspection. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-1947 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "drchi065_s_94014" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-CHI-94-065 </AU>
Daily Report 
<DATE1>  25 Mar 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> Northeast Region </F>
<H3> <TI>   Liaoning Holds Meeting on Grain, Oil Prices </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Liaoning Holds Meeting on Grain, Oil Prices </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   SK2603082994 Shenyang Liaoning People's Radio Network in 
Mandarin 1000 GMT 25 Mar 94 </F>

<F P=103> SK2603082994 </F>
<F P=104>  Shenyang Liaoning People's Radio Network </F>
<F P=105>  Mandarin </F>


<TEXT>
BFN 

  [Text] The provincial government recently held an 
executive meeting to call for stabilizing the prices of grain 
and oil and guaranteeing market supply. 
  Liaoning Province reaped a bumper grain harvest in 1993, 
having a large stock of paddy rice. However, affected by the 
rise of grain prices in south China, and plus our province's 
failure in adopting a timely macroeconomic regulation and 
control measure, the prices of grain and oil, particularly the 
prices of rice and soybean, began to fluctuate. The masses of 
people showed strong reaction to this. In order to stabilize the 
market prices, the provincial government executive meeting put 
forward important measures for stabilizing grain and oil prices 
and for guaranteeing market supply. 
  1. Regard the efforts in grasping grain and nonstaple foods 
production as an important measure for guaranteeing supply and 
stabilizing fluctuations and attend to this work realistically 
and successfully. Prior to the end of this month, we must keep 
the prices of grain and oil stable. The price of rice should be 
reduced to below 1.7 yuan per kg; the cost of rice which is 
lower than this price must not be raised. The price of soybean 
must be controlled at below 7 yuan per kg, and the price of 
first-grade white flour must be controlled at below 1.7 yuan per 
kg. 
  2. Strengthen management over the grain market, 
realistically 
attend to the processing and delivery of rice, and guarantee 
that the market will not run short of rice. Continued efforts 
should be made to grasp the grain and oil purchasing work and 
the purchase of grain for delivering to other localities so as 
to have a sufficient source of grain. Grain Departments should 
go deeply to grain depots and peasant households to conduct 
investigation and study and try to find out the province's grain 
reserve and the amount of grain in the hands of peasants as 
quickly as possible in an effort to provide an accurate basis 
for the overall regulation and control of grain. Financial and 
banking departments should guarantee funds for grain purchase; 
state grain shops should play a role as the main channel, sell 
grain according to the price tag, and must not raise the grain 
price. 
  3. Strengthen management over grain purchase to other 
provinces. Grain departments should coordinate with relevant 
departments to organize the export of rice in a unified manner. 
  4. Industrial, commercial, price, and grain departments 
should maintain close coordination, strengthen supervision and 
management over the grain market, prevent people from forcing up 
the grain prices or engaging in hoarding and speculation, and 
deal strict blows to manipulation of markets and other illegal 
business activities. 
  The provincial government executive meeting stressed: All 
localities, while strengthening management over the grain 
markets and organizing supply, should conscientiously attend to 
the nonstaple foods project, and guarantee an ample supply of 
nonstaple foods. Regarding the problems emerged during market 
supply, we must rapidly adopt measures and solve them, and 
report the situation to the departments concerned as quickly as 
possible. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-1948 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "drchi065_s_94015" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-CHI-94-065 </AU>
Daily Report 
<DATE1>  31 Mar 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> Northeast Region </F>
<H3> <TI>   Liaoning Commentary Urges Curbing Price Hikes </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Liaoning Commentary Urges Curbing Price Hikes </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   SK0104042794 Shenyang Liaoning People's Radio Network in 
Mandarin 1000 GMT 31 Mar 94 </F>

<F P=103> SK0104042794 </F>
<F P=104>  Shenyang Liaoning People's Radio Network </F>
<F P=105>  Mandarin </F>


<TEXT>
BFN 

<F P=106> [Report on reporter's commentary entitled "Commodity Prices </F>
Also Need Comprehensive Management"] 
  [Text] In the first quarter of this year, the increased 
scale of retail prices has reached more than 18 percent. The 
higher prices of retail commodities, which have prevailed since 
the beginning of this year, is unprecedented for many year. If 
we fail to adopt strong and effective measures to readjust or 
control them, the continuously excessive price hikes in markets 
certainly will affect the economic construction and the people's 
normal lives. It should be said that governments at all levels 
throughout the province have attached great importance on the 
work of commodity prices. They have issued many legal documents 
to prevent from rising prices and collecting fees arbitrarily 
each year and spent more than 20 million of financial revenues 
on curbing the price hikes. Over the past three months, the 
provincial people's government has organized two mass 
inspections over commodity prices throughout the province, in 
which it discovered more than 500 price violation cases as well 
as confiscated the illegal profits and imposed on fines that 
total 1.57 million yuan. Although the results scored in the 
inspections conducted with all methods, including economic, 
legal, and administrative ones, are obvious; the evil trend of 
rising commodity prices and collecting fees arbitrarily has not 
been totally rooted out. As soon as the mass inspection has 
been over, the prices of the necessities of the people's lives, 
such as rice and cooking oil, are still being risen again and 
again. The price tags issued in a unified way for many 
commodities have been replaced with the self-made ones with 
exorbitant prices. Nobody cares the price maximum and relevant 
price regulations issued by the governments at all levels. 
  Since the enforcement of reform and opening up over the past 
more than 10 years, the economic construction has gone ahead by 
leaps and bounds and the demands of the people's lives have 
increased day by day. Adequate price hikes under such a 
situation may stimulate the commodity production and are 
favorable for the country's construction and the people's lives. 
However, excessive price hikes will surpass the masses' 
bearing; curtail the consumption, and lead to the withering of 
commodity production. They will not only affect the livelihood 
of consumers but also directly affect the producer and dealers 
of commodities, as well as will damage the social stability. As 
for excessive price hikes, not only China but also developed 
capitalist countries will not sit by idly and remain indifferent 
and they will be able to adopt economic, legal, and 
administrative means to meddle them. Many commodity dealers 
have contended that relaxing the restrictions on commodity 
prices means to ask prices at will. Thus, they have become 
price violators again and again. Therefore, abiding by the 
price regulations set by the government, running business 
legally, and consciously safeguarding the price order represent 
the duty exercised by every dealer. The price departments 
should strictly investigate and handle the price violations. 
It is unfortunate that there are only more than 10,000 work 
personnel in the price departments throughout the province. 
Successfully managing the market prices requires the joint 
efforts made the relevant departments and the masses. They 
should jointly conduct comprehensive management of commodity 
prices as they did for public security. For example, the 
departments of industry and commerce, tax affairs, and quality 
inspection at all levels, should concurrently take up the work 
of price management. The mass organizations and communities, 
such as women's federations and trade unions, should enliven 
their contingents of staff members and workers to conduct price 
supervision. Consumers should actively supervise the market 
prices. Only by so doing are the price violation dealers unable 
to avail themselves of loopholes and can we fundamentally deal 
with the problems of rising prices and collecting fees 
arbitrarily and truly and successfully manage the market prices. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-1949 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "drchi065_s_94016" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-CHI-94-065 </AU>
Daily Report 
<DATE1>  31 Mar 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> Northeast Region </F>
<H3> <TI>   Liaoning Readjusts State-Cooperative Business </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Liaoning Readjusts State-Cooperative Business </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   SK0104075894 Shenyang Liaoning People's Radio Network in 
Mandarin 1000 GMT 31 Mar 94 </F>

<F P=103> SK0104075894 </F>
<F P=104>  Shenyang Liaoning People's Radio Network </F>
<F P=105>  Mandarin </F>


<TEXT>
BFN 

  [Text] The provincial work conference of supply and 
marketing cooperatives ended in Shenyang on 31 March. It was 
put forward at the conference that supply and marketing 
cooperatives at all levels should adopt every possible way and 
means to broaden their business and service fields, to 
extensively open markets at home and abroad, to enliven their 
operation, to enhance their management, and to increase economic 
results so as to extricate themselves from a difficult position 
as soon as possible and to get on a track of healthy development. 
  It was contended at the conference that although the supply 
and marketing cooperatives across the province had played an 
inestimable role in developing the rural economy, the 
difficulties they are facing are very serious. In particular, 
the rate of supply and marketing cooperatives at the grass-roots 
level of rural areas, which are suffering losses, surpasses 80 
percent. These cooperatives at all levels must further do a 
good job in conducting reforms with the combination of control 
and decontrol and the enforcement of contracting system as its 
mainstay. They should break away from their traditional 
business structure and operation pattern and bring about a 
change to their operation model of large or small and 
all-embracing. They should actively bring in the modern styles 
and methods of business and sales, such as conducting overall 
sales on commission, acting as an agent, and combining operation 
between industry and commerce. They should also engage in 
specialized and standardized business so as to seek a new way 
for their development. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-1950 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "drchi065_s_94017" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-CHI-94-065 </AU>
Daily Report 
<DATE1>  11 Mar 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> Northeast Region </F>
<H3> <TI>   Liaoning Views Promoting Export-Oriented Agriculture </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Liaoning Views Promoting Export-Oriented Agriculture </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   SK1203074394 Shenyang Liaoning People's Radio Network in 
Mandarin 1000 GMT 11 Mar 94 </F>

<F P=103> SK1203074394 </F>
<F P=104>  Shenyang Liaoning People's Radio Network </F>
<F P=105>  Mandarin </F>


<TEXT>
BFN 

  [Text] The provincial forum on developing export-oriented 
agriculture concluded in Shenyang on 11 March. Attending the 
forum to jointly discuss the issues of developing 
export-oriented agriculture, developing agriculture that can 
earn more foreign exchanges, and coordinating agricultural 
production with foreign trade and exports were vice mayors in 
charge of agricultural affairs from 14 cities throughout the 
province, responsible persons from the provincial level 
departments for foreign economic relations and foreign trade, 
and managers from various import and export companies at the 
provincial level. 
  According to the calculation conducted by the foreign trade 
department, since the early 1990's the average annual increase 
of the province in the exports of farm and sideline products has 
been 10 percent. The province realized $800 million in foreign 
exchange from exporting farm and sideline products last year, 
which accounted for about 20 percent of the total volume of 
foreign exchanges earned by local export units in the year. 
However, the exports of farm and sideline products still suffer 
the problems of inflexible information of markets, insufficient 
goods resources, small patches of exports, product quality that 
cannot meet international demands, and of separation between 
production and sale. All of these need to be handled along with 
deepening the reform in the rural economy. 
  Vice Governor Xiao Zuofu delivered a speech at the forum, in 
which he pointed out: Accelerating the production structure in 
rural areas to enable agriculture to enter international markets 
as soon as possible represents the major task for the province 
to deepen the development of the rural economy. The gap of per 
capita income between mountainous areas in east and north 
Liaoning and coastal areas is over 500 yuan. However, these 
mountainous areas are just the bases of developing 
export-oriented agriculture. Therefore, building the bases of 
farm and sideline products that can earn foreign exchanges 
through exports and establishing the production system for these 
farm and sideline products represent an emphasis for the 
province to readjust its rural production structure in next 
step. He pointed out: In building the bases of farm and 
sideline products that can earn foreign exchanges, various 
localities should do a good job to develop the enterprises whose 
products can earn the largest profits and upgrade the added 
volume of farm and sideline products. As for the production 
projects that can earn foreign exchanges, we should give 
preferential consideration in funds and material supply to them. 
The provincial people's government will establish its leading 
group in charge of the export-oriented rural economy, which will 
provide information, materials, services, for export-oriented 
enterprises and households in rural areas. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-1951 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "drchi065_s_94018" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-CHI-94-065 </AU>
Daily Report 
<DATE1>  18 Mar 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> Northeast Region </F>
<H3> <TI>   Bankrupt Shenyang Enterprises Ruled Shut Down </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Bankrupt Shenyang Enterprises Ruled Shut Down </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   OW1803144494 Beijing XINHUA in English 1333 GMT 18 Mar 94 </F>
<F P=103> OW1803144494 </F>
<F P=104>  Beijing XINHUA </F>
<F P=105>  English </F>


<TEXT>
BFN 

  [Text] Shenyang, March 18 (XINHUA) -- Shenyang Intermediate 
People's Court recently ruled that the No. 7 machine tool 
factory should be shut down, making it the 32nd enterprise to 
have gone bankrupt in this capital of Liaoning Province. 
  A collectively-owned enterprise with 388 employees, the No. 
7 
machine tool factory had suffered losses for eight consecutive 
years. 
  The losses for the eight years totalled to 560,000 yuan in 
all, and the factory in addition was saddled with debts 
totalling 2.24 million yuan. But the factory's fixed assests 
were only about 240,000 yuan. 
  When Tian Shuangquan, director of the factory, signed an 
adjudication paper in court, some of the employees wept. 
  But some of the employees in court were glad. They said that 
if the enterprise was not declared bankrupt, they could not 
apply for relief funds from the insurance company. 
  In August, 1986, Shenyang was named as an experimental city 
where bankrupt enterprises could be shut down. 
  A government official said that before the law on enterprise 
bankruptcies came into being, Shenyang decided about bankruptcy 
of an enterprise by administrative means. 
  Since 1993, the city has begun to handle the problem through 
the courts. 
  Shenyang Intermediate People's Court has so far declared 13 
enterprises bankrupt. 
  The official said that about 8,000 employees of bankrupt 
enterprises have been well looked after. Most of them have been 
re- employed by other enterprises or social services and about 
200 laid off people each got 100 yuan per month. 
  Now a legal procedure must be followed by any enterprise on 
the verge of bankruptcy, including application for bankruptcy, a 
court declaration of bankruptcy, check on the assets of bankrupt 
enterprises, and paying off creditors by using the property and 
other assets of the bankrupt enterprise. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-1952 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "drchi065_s_94019" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-CHI-94-065 </AU>
Daily Report 
<DATE1>  8 Mar 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> Northeast Region </F>
<H3> <TI>   Industry Absorbs Half of Liaoning's Surplus Labor </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Industry Absorbs Half of Liaoning's Surplus Labor </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   OW0803160594 Beijing XINHUA in English 1244 GMT 8 Mar 94 </F>
<F P=103> OW0803160594 </F>
<F P=104>  Beijing XINHUA </F>
<F P=105>  English </F>


<TEXT>
BFN 

  [Text] Shenyang, March 8 (XINHUA) -- The development of 
rural industry in Northeast China's Liaoning Province has 
absorbed half of the labor force in its rural areas. 
  The rural labor force in Liaoning Province totals 8.5 
million. But the province only has 0.5 hectare of farmland per 
capita. 
  In the past, most of the surplus labor in rural areas could 
do nothing but rely on farm production. 
  Experts estimated that about half of the rural labor force 
is 
enough for the province's agriculture. 
  Since the mid-1980s, the province has attached importance to 
the development of rural industry so as to absorb more surplus 
rural labor. 
  Last year, the number of rural enterprises in Liaoning 
increased to about 700,000 from 300,000 in 1990. 
  The output value of the rural industry in the province 
reached more than 16 million yuan, accounting for 80 percent of 
the total output value in agriculture, and the profit of the 
rural industry was 10.6 billion yuan. 
  Now about 4.5 million rural laborers have turned to the 
rural 
industry in the province. 
  Statistics show that over the past 14 years, about 110 
million of the labor force in China's rural areas have shifted 
to non- agricultural services. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-1953 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "drchi065_s_94020" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-CHI-94-065 </AU>
Daily Report 
<DATE1>  18 Mar 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> Northeast Region </F>
<H3> <TI>   High-Technology Improves Liaoning Industry </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    High-Technology Improves Liaoning Industry </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   OW1803092794 Beijing XINHUA in English 0836 GMT 18 Mar 94 </F>
<F P=103> OW1803092794 </F>
<F P=104>  Beijing XINHUA </F>
<F P=105>  English </F>


<TEXT>
BFN 

  [Text] Shenyang, March 18 (XINHUA) -- High technology 
industry has stolen the limelight in this heavy industrial 
center of Shenyang, provincial capital of northeast China's 
Liaoning Province and promised to make the city a high-tech 
center in Liaoning and even in the whole of northeast China. 
  According to statistics, the high-tech industry in the city 
has generated eight billion yuan in output value and expects to 
add up to 10 billion yuan by 1995. 
  Shenyang began to industrialize its high-tech sector in 1992 
when the state chose it for experimenting with reforms in the 
science and technology system. 
  By the end of last year 1,264 high-tech enterprises had been 
set up in the city's Nanhu Science and Technology Development 
Zone, including 195 Sino-foreign joint ventures. These 
enterprises earned 2.8 billion yuan from technology deals, 
industrial production and trade last year. In addition there 
are 1,490 non-governmental research organizations which created 
1.7 billion yuan in output value. 
  The annual industrial output value of such sectors as 
computer peripherals, bio-technology, numerical controlled 
machine tools, and bar code has exceeded 100 million yuan and 
that of all-plastic telecommunications cables and closed-type 
combined electrical appliances has exceeded 50 million yuan. 
  In addition, the city has selected 50 old enterprises for 
technical transformation by high technology. 
  The development of high technology has not only laid a solid 
foundation for the industrialization of the whole sector but 
provided the motive force for the development of research 
institutions. 
  An official from the Shenyang City Commission for Science 
and 
Technology said that the development of high and new technology 
has injected renewed vigor into this heavy industrial center and 
a large number of new industries promising large market 
potential has taken shape. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-1954 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "drchi065_s_94021" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-CHI-94-065 </AU>
Daily Report 
<DATE1>  13 Mar 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> Northeast Region </F>
<H3> <TI>   Liaoning Becomes `Self-Sufficient' in Grain, Pork </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Liaoning Becomes `Self-Sufficient' in Grain, Pork </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   OW1303154294 Beijing XINHUA in English 1352 GMT 13 Mar 94 </F>
<F P=103> OW1303154294 </F>
<F P=104>  Beijing XINHUA </F>
<F P=105>  English </F>


<TEXT>
BFN 

  [Text] Shenyang, March 13 (XINHUA) -- Five years ago, 
officials of Liaoning Province asked the central government to 
supply this key industrial province with two million tons of 
grain. 
  Last year saw the officials go to Beijing to ask for help 
once more. 
  But this time they did not request for grain supply, but for 
helping sell its two million tons of surplus grain. 
  "This was a historical change," a provincial official said, 
"Liaoning Province, used to depend on other provinces for 
living, is self-sufficient in grain and pork." 
  According to the figures provided by the Provincial 
Statistical Bureau, the province turned out 17 million tons of 
grain last year, averaging 400 kilograms per capita and 
exceeding the national average. 
  Its output of livestock products amounted to 2.32 million 
tons, averaging 34 kilograms of meat, 18 kilograms of eggs and 
four kilograms of milk per capita, also higher than the national 
average. 
  By the end of last year, the province sold 2.5 million tons 
of rice and maize and 300,000 live pigs to other parts of the 
country. 
  In addition, it exported 300,000 tons of rice to Japan last 
year. 
  Local officials attributed their achievements to the 
government's sustained efforts in promoting agricultural 
development. 
  Liaoning is China's only province, of which the urban 
population accounts for more than 70 percent of the province's 
total. 
  To feed its residents, the provincial government had to buy 
at least three million tons of grain and 70,000 tons of pork 
from development. 
  A senior Chinese official has called on other provinces and 
regions with grain shortage to follow the example of Liaoning in 
northeast China. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-1955 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "drchi065_s_94022" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-CHI-94-065 </AU>
Daily Report 
<DATE1>  16 Mar 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> Northeast Region </F>
<H3> <TI>   Increased Funds Bolster Liaoning Transport </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Increased Funds Bolster Liaoning Transport </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   OW1603065994 Beijing XINHUA in English 0632 GMT 16 Mar 94 </F>
<F P=103> OW1603065994 </F>
<F P=104>  Beijing XINHUA </F>
<F P=105>  English </F>


<TEXT>
BFN 

  [Text] Shenyang, March 16 (XINHUA) -- Northeast China's 
Liaoning Province last year poured in huge amounts of funds to 
bolster the transportation and telecommunications industries, 
which grew 60.3 percent from 1992. 
  Investment in the development of transportation and 
telecommunications in 1993 reached 1.87 billion yuan, accounting 
for seven percent of the province's total capital construction 
funds. 
  These fast-growing industries boosted the province's gross 
national product and financial revenue by 28 percent last year. 
  The Shenyang Railway Bureau, the biggest of its kind in 
China, pooled 448 million yuan in 1993 to back the construction 
of major projects within and outside the province. A 
147-million-yuan project, the Dayaowan Line, was completed at 
the end of 1993. 
  It also invested 5.25 billion yuan last year in a joint 
effort to renovate the Harbin-Dalian line. 
  In addition, the province put about 1.37 billion yuan in 
1993 
into fixed assets for highway construction, an 82.1 percent rise 
from the previous year. The total investment in highway 
building hit more than 1.19 billion yuan. 
  The 43.3-km expressway of the south section ring road around 
the capital city of Shenyang has now opened to traffic, and the 
construction of the north section of the ring and another 
expressway from Shenyang to Tieling, a grain-producing city in 
northern Liaoning, has started. 
  The province now has highways and expressways totalling 
41,638 km. 
  In 1993 it earmarked a total of 229 million yuan to boost 
port development, up 46 percent over the planned investment. To 
quicken the pace of port construction, it also attracted a 
record 83 million U.S. dollars in foreign investment. 
  The construction of China's biggest ship repair center, 
which 
was built jointly by the Dalian Ocean Shipping Company and a 
Hong Kong firm, has started at Dalian Bay. Four berths of the 
first phase have already been put into operation, and another 
six such berths are well under way. 
  In Jinzhou city a new management system, the joint stock 
system, has been introduced since early 1993 to invigorate port 
construction. One 10,000-dwt [deadweight tons] bulk cargo berth 
has been built, boosting the handling capacity of the port to 
300,000 dwt. 
  In Dandong the building of another three 10,000-dwt berths 
has been completed, and they are expected to go into operation 
soon. 
  Meanwhile, the provincial postal department invested 2.18 
billion yuan in the sector in 1993, up 135.4 percent from the 
previous year. The foreign investment in this field amounted to 
93 million U.S. dollars. 
  The province added a total telephone exchange capacity of 
562,700 lines last year. The annual postal and 
telecommunications business volume and income jumped by 55.7 
percent and 51 percent, respectively in the same year. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-1956 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "drchi065_s_94023" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-CHI-94-065 </AU>
Daily Report 
<DATE1>  15 Mar 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> Northeast Region </F>
<H3> <TI>   Liaoning Citizens' Savings Deposits Reported </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Liaoning Citizens' Savings Deposits Reported </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   SK1603100294 Shenyang Liaoning People's Radio Network in 
Mandarin 1000 GMT 15 Mar 94 </F>

<F P=103> SK1603100294 </F>
<F P=104>  Shenyang Liaoning People's Radio Network </F>
<F P=105>  Mandarin </F>


<TEXT>
BFN 

  [Text] According to the station reporter's dispatch from 
the press briefing held on 15 March by the province's branch 
office of the People's Bank of China, by the end of February 
this year the province's volume of saving deposits made by both 
urban and rural residents surpassed the record of 100 billion 
yuan and reached 101.36 billion yuan. It ranked the province 
fifth among the provinces across the country, which have scored 
the volume of over 100 billion yuan in residents' bank saving 
deposits and include Guangdong, Shandong, Jiangsu, and Hebei. 
The current number of financial institutions in charge of 
saving deposit business or in acting of this business reaches 
more than 1,400 that have accommodated more than 90,000 
full-time or part-time personnel. The number of saving deposit 
categories has increased from the several in the 1970's to more 
than 20 at present. These financial institutions have also 
provided more rooms for customers to select the bank's catalogue 
for saving deposits. 
  Cong Zhenglong, vice governor of the province, delivered a 
speech at the press briefing, in which he said: The large-scale 
increase of saving deposits made by both urban and rural 
residents has expanded the bank resources of funds, reinforced 
the capability of financial departments in releasing credits and 
loans, and provided the strong and effective guarantee of funds 
for promoting the economic development in the province. He 
said: 1994 is a year in which the province will make a crucial 
step in the reform of financial systems. Along with gradually 
accelerating the pace of turning the specialized bank business 
into commercial one, the position occupied by saving deposits in 
handling credits and loans by the financial institutions will 
become more important. Therefore, financial institutions should 
seize the current favorable opportunity to launch a large-scale 
propaganda campaign on saving deposits and to mobilize all 
social forces to further set off a new upsurge of grasping 
saving deposits. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-1957 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "drchi065_s_94024" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-CHI-94-065 </AU>
Daily Report 
<DATE1>  13 Mar 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> Northeast Region </F>
<H3> <TI>   Liaoning Develops Press, Publication Activities </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Liaoning Develops Press, Publication Activities </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   SK1403045594 Shenyang Liaoning People's Radio Network in 
Mandarin 1000 GMT 13 Mar 94 </F>

<F P=103> SK1403045594 </F>
<F P=104>  Shenyang Liaoning People's Radio Network </F>
<F P=105>  Mandarin </F>


<TEXT>
BFN 

  [Text] Since reform and opening up, our province has 
rapidly developed press and publication activities. Books of 
over 200 categories published by Liaoning have annually entered 
the international market over the past years. Since reform and 
opening up, the number of publishing houses, acoustics houses, 
newspaper houses, periodical houses, and book and periodical 
printing houses has increased at a fast speed. So far, the 
province has 17 publishing houses, eight acoustics houses, 84 
newspaper houses, 285 periodical houses, and more than 800 kinds 
of papers and periodicals distributed within the province. 
Besides Xinhua bookstores, a key distribution channel, the 
province has also developed a large number of collectively- and 
individually-run retail-sale bookstores and book stalls. The 
press and publications units in the province have about 130,000 
employees. 
  Grasping the orientation of publishing good books is a 
principle that the press and publication houses in the province 
has persisted in for many years. Over the past years, the 
province has published over 3,000 kinds of books annually, 
including over 2,000 new categories. Nearly 40 percent of the 
books are reprinted. The books published by Liaoning have a 
good reputation on the domestic and international book markets. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-1958 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "drchi065_s_94025" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-CHI-94-065 </AU>
Daily Report 
<DATE1>  28 Mar 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> Northeast Region </F>
<H3> <TI>   Liaoning Cracks Down on Pornography </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Liaoning Cracks Down on Pornography </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   SK0104042994 Shenyang Liaoning People's Radio Network in 
Mandarin 1000 GMT 28 Mar 94 </F>

<F P=103> SK0104042994 </F>
<F P=104>  Shenyang Liaoning People's Radio Network </F>
<F P=105>  Mandarin </F>


<TEXT>
BFN 

  [Text] The special public security detachment under the 
Shenyang City Public Security Bureau recently cracked down in 
line with the report made by the mass on an appalling case of 
selling and printing pornographic books and periodicals and 
illegal publications. It arrested Criminal (Bian Yujie) and 
seized 3,000 pornographic books and periodicals and more than 
15,000 illegal publications. (Bian Yujie), worker of the 
Shenyang cold-rolled steel plant, has engaged in the business of 
selling pornographic books and periodicals and illegal 
publications since 1989. Beginning from April 1993, Criminal 
(Bian) has personally edited pornographic books and periodicals 
and illegal publications in order to further reap staggering 
profits in the name of the Fupin Medical Publishing House, the 
China World Language Publishing House, and the Shannxi People's 
Publishing House. He also colluded with (Bian Guangwen), 
director of the Xinxing Social Welfare Printing House, in Heze 
city of Shandong Province. The composing and printing of these 
obscene books and periodicals and illegal publications were 
carried out by (Bian Guangwen) with the paper provided by 
himself. Then, these publications were consigned for shipment 
to Shenyang. According to the confession made by (Bian Yujie), 
his books and publications were mainly distributed to the 
self-employed books dealers in the cities of Shenyang, Tieling, 
and Anshan, as well as in the cities of Shandong Province. He 
illegally obtained more than 30,000 yuan of staggering profits 
in the transaction. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-1959 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "drchi065_k_94003" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-CHI-94-065 </AU>
Daily Report 
<DATE1>  2 Apr 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> NATIONAL AFFAIRS </F>
<F P=101> Political &amp; Social </F>
<H3> <TI>   Jiang Zemin, Others Plant Trees </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Jiang Zemin, Others Plant Trees </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   OW0404203594 Beijing XINHUA Domestic Service in Chinese 1322 
GMT 2 Apr 94 </F>

<F P=103> OW0404203594 </F>
<F P=104>  Beijing XINHUA Domestic Service </F>
<F P=105>  Chinese </F>


<TEXT>
BFN 

<F P=106> [By RENMIN RIBAO reporter Yang Zhenwu (2799 2182 2976) and </F>
XINHUA reporter Zou Aiguo (6760 1947 0948)] 
  [Text] Beijing, 2 Apr (XINHUA) -- Jiang Zemin, Li Peng, 
Qiao Shi, Li Ruihuan, Zhu Rongji, Liu Huaqing, Hu Jintao, and 
other leading comrades of the party Central Committee planted 
trees, including the Huashan pine, lacebark pine, and weeping 
willows, at the Yuanmingyuan Ruins Park in Beijing's suburbs 
this morning. Thus, new trees were planted in this park, which, 
known as the garden of 10,000 gardens, has witnessed many 
vicissitudes of life. 
  The first Sunday of April is a voluntary tree-planting day 
for all people in the capital. At 1000 in the morning, Jiang 
Zemin and other leading comrades of the party Central Committee 
arrived at a hill beside the scenic Haiyuekaijin area in the 
Yuanmingyuan Ruins Park in the company of Chen Xitong, secretary 
of the Beijing municipal party committee; Li Qiyan, Beijing 
mayor; and Xu Youfang, minister of forestry. They then planted 
the Chinese pine, poplar, and willow trees symbolizing the hope 
of the future. 
  Planting trees with the leading comrades today were 50 Young 
Pioneers, who welcomed Jiang Zemin and the other comrades by 
saying in unison in their children's voice: "Little pine trees, 
grow up quickly with green needles and new branches; you are 
nurtured with sunshine and dew, grow up quickly, grow up 
quickly...." 
  General Secretary Jiang Zemin, Liu Huaqing, and Chen Xitong 
planted a Huashan pine together. Chen Xitong told Jiang Zemin: 
"The trees planted by party Central Committee leading comrades 
last year are growing luxuriantly." Jiang Zemin smiled and 
said: "In planting trees, we are promoting a spirit. The 
post-planting management depends completely on park workers, and 
we are very grateful to them." Then, Jiang Zemin asked: "How 
many trees do we plan to plant today?" Chen Xitong answered: 
"Eighty trees, pines and willows." 
  After planting a tree, Jiang Zemin gladly gave these 
reporters an interview. Jiang Zemin said: Planting trees is an 
important task that can bring benefits to people of this and 
coming generations. We should step up our efforts to publicize 
the importance of tree planting and to enhance all citizens' 
awareness in this regard. He then said: Through years of 
effort, the percentage of forest covering our country has 
increased to 13 percent. We have made tremendous achievements 
in this respect. Compared with advanced countries, however, we 
still lag far behind. So we should persist in planting trees. 
  While planting trees, Premier Li Peng talked about its 
significance. He said: Thanks to more than 10 years of effort, 
people in various parts of the country have now attached great 
importance to tree planting, and people have enthusiastically 
taken part in such activities. As a result, we have scored 
gratifying achievements. However, we should also note that 
cases of felling trees or even destroying forests have occurred 
in some localities. We should step up education in this regard 
and manage forests according to law. The tree-planting momentum 
is pretty strong in some places, but the survival rate is not 
high. This calls for protecting trees and planting more trees 
to increase the survival rate. In some localities, a 
responsibility system is instituted under which barren hills are 
contracted out for tree planting. This practice is worth 
popularizing. 
  While planting trees with a spade, Li Peng inquired about 
Beijing Municipality's conditions. He asked Beijing Mayor Li 
Qiyan: "What are the price parities between the three different 
kinds of stocks issued by Beijing?" Li Qiyan answered: "They 
are as low as 1:3 and as high as 1:8." Then Li Peng said: 
"People should know that buying stocks involves risks." 
  Chairman Qiao Shi of the National People's Congress 
Standing Committee planted three Huashan pine trees in a row, 
without wiping the sweat from his forehead. When he planted a 
lacebark pine, two Young Pioneers brought a bucket of water for 
the pine. He said "we should plant trees conscientiously." 
Discussing environmental protection with comrades from Beijing, 
Li Ruihuan said: "Tremendous changes have taken place in 
Beijing these years. But there is still much to be done, and it 
is all the more necessary to step up work in environmental 
protection." Comrades from Beijing believed that environmental 
damage is mainly caused by people. Li Ruihuan said: "The 
quality of people is crucial. When people's quality is 
improved, many things can be done easily." 
  After planting trees, Jiang Zemin and other comrades wrote 
some words of encouragement for children on their notebooks. 
Jiang Zemin wrote: "Plant trees and educate people" and 
"Yuanmingyuan Park has witnessed many vicissitudes of life." Li 
Peng wrote: "Study hard and be a good successor." Li Ruihuan 
wrote: "Study well" and "Make progress every day." Li Huaqing 
wrote: "Try to be an outstanding student" and "Study well to be 
a successor." 
  Following this, Jiang Zemin and other comrades toured the 
Yuanmingyuan Memorial Hall. Jiang Zemin said: Planting trees 
at Yuanmingyuan Park today is of great significance. China had 
been bullied and humiliated by big powers for some 100 years in 
modern times. Since the founding of New China, the Chinese 
people have stood up. Yuanmingyuan is called a ruins park, with 
a view to letting people see the bitter history of how this 
bright pearl of the Eastern culture was ruined by foreign 
robbers. This will educate people in patriotism. Now we are 
planting trees here and renovating the park because we want 
people across the country and foreign friends to see the 
development and changes of our country. 
  Other leading comrades who participated in today's tree 
planting included Ding Guangen, Tian Jiyun, Li Lanqing, Li 
Tieying, Yang Baibing, Qian Qichen, Wen Jiabao, Wang Hanbin, Ren 
Jianxin, Song Jian, Li Guixian, and Luo Gan. Early this 
morning, more than 180 ministers, vice ministers, and other 
leading comrades from departments directly under the party 
Central Committee and the State Council and from the three 
general departments of the People's Liberation Army and the 
Beijing Military Region joined servicemen and people of the 
capital in voluntary tree-planting activities. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-1960 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "drchi065_k_94004" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-CHI-94-065 </AU>
Daily Report 
<DATE1>  4 Apr 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> NATIONAL AFFAIRS </F>
<F P=101> Political &amp; Social </F>
<H3> <TI>   Relatives Say Wei Jingsheng Still Detained </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Relatives Say Wei Jingsheng Still Detained </PHRASE></F></HT>
<H4>    Public Security Refuses Comment </H4>

<F P=102> HK0404115294 Hong Kong AFP in English 1133 GMT 4 April 94 </F>
<F P=103> HK0404115294 </F>
<F P=104>  Hong Kong AFP </F>
<F P=105>  English </F>


<TEXT>
BFN 

<F P=106> [By Gilles Campion] </F>
  [Text] Beijing, April 4 (AFP)--The family of China's most 
famous dissident, Wei Jingsheng, said Monday [4 April] it was 
afraid he was still being detained, three days after the Beijing 
police said he had been questioned and left their offices. 
  The official XINHUA NEWS AGENCY had announced Saturday "the 
Beijing Public Security Bureau had a conversation with Wei on 
Friday and he left the bureau immediately afterward." The 
Public Security Bureau's public relations office, questioned 
Monday, said it knew "nothing of this affair," and refused to 
say how long Wei's most recent arrest lasted. 
  A Foreign Ministry spokesman said only that "Wei Jingsheng 
violated relevant regulations when he was on parole and while 
still being deprived of his political rights. The Public 
Security department has the right to interrogate according to 
the law." 
  Wei's relatives as well as his close friends said Monday 
they 
had received no word at all from the dissident since his arrest 
at 5:00 p.m. Friday afternoon (0900 GMT) some 20 kilometers (12 
miles) from Beijing, on his way back from an "enforced" 
four-week vacation outside the capital. 
  Tong Yi, Wei's secretary, said Monday by telephone that she 
had no idea where he could be, but ruled out the possibility 
that Wei would have left Beijing voluntarily without informing 
her. 
  Wei brother and sister seemed equally convinced he was not 
free. "If he had gone on vacation outside Beijing, he would 
surely have told me," his brother Wei Xiaotao said by telephone 
from the southern province of Guangxi. 
  The dissident's sister, Wei Ling, who works in Beijing, said 
she had had no sign of her brother's freedom since Friday, when 
he had been expected to return to the capital. 
  Wei Jingsheng, 43, had been detained for 24 hours in early 
March after making remarks critical of China's government during 
a meeting with U.S. Undersecretary of State for Humanitarian 
Affairs John Shattuck on February 27. Following the meeting 
police strongly urged him to leave the capital before the 
ensuing visit of U.S. Secretary of State Warren Christopher. 
  According to his brother, Wei "took a four-week vacation" in 
Dalian, northeastern China and in the eastern city of Qingdao, 
before trying to return to Beijing Friday. As the Chinese 
government's de-facto "public enemy number one," Wei spent 
nearly 15 years in prison for "counter-revolutionary activities" 
during the Democracy Wall period of 1978-79. He was freed on 
parole last September, six months short of completing his 
sentence. 
  Chinese authorities said this week he had been deprived of 
his political rights for three years and that he was therefore 
not allowed to meet foreign journalists or officials during this 
time. His feared "disappearance" comes as China prepares to 
honor its dead Tuesday on the traditional Qing Ming holiday. 
  The authorities appear to dread the prospect of dissidents 
seizing the occasion to commemorate those killed during the 
Tiananmen Square massacre in June, 1989. 
  A reporter for THE WASHINGTON POST was held for questioning 
for several hours Saturday after photographing the Beijing 
gravesites of several young pro-democracy activists who died in 
the massacre. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-1961 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "drchi065_k_94005" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-CHI-94-065 </AU>
Daily Report 
<DATE1>  5 Apr 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> NATIONAL AFFAIRS </F>
<F P=101> Political &amp; Social </F>
<H3> <TI>   Relatives Say Wei Jingsheng Still Detained </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Relatives Say Wei Jingsheng Still Detained </PHRASE></F></HT>
<H4>    Security Department Investigates </H4>

<F P=102> OW0504025094 Beijing XINHUA in English 0237 GMT 5 Apr 94 </F>
<F P=103> OW0504025094 </F>
<F P=104>  Beijing XINHUA </F>
<F P=105>  English </F>


<TEXT>
BFN 

  [Text] Beijing, April 5 (XINHUA) -- The Beijing Public 
Security Department has decided to investigate suspected new 
criminal offences by Wei Jingsheng, XINHUA learned today. 
  Wei is being interrogated and placed under surveillance by 
the Beijing Public Security Department in accordance with the 
law because he violated the law on many occasions and is 
suspected of having committed new crimes when he was deprived of 
his political rights and on parole, according to the public 
security department. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-1962 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "drchi065_k_94006" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-CHI-94-065 </AU>
Daily Report 
<DATE1>  5 Apr 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> NATIONAL AFFAIRS </F>
<F P=101> Political &amp; Social </F>
<H3> <TI>   Relatives Say Wei Jingsheng Still Detained </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Relatives Say Wei Jingsheng Still Detained </PHRASE></F></HT>
<H4>    Wei Under House Arrest </H4>

<F P=102> HK0504021294 Hong Kong WEN WEI PO in Chinese 5 Apr 94 p a1 </F>
<F P=103> HK0504021294 </F>
<F P=104>  Hong Kong WEN WEI PO </F>
<F P=105>  Chinese </F>


<TEXT>
BFN 

<F P=106> [Report: "Wei Jingsheng Put Under House Arrest as of </F>
Yesterday for Suspected Violations of Law"] 
  [Text] Beijing, 4 April (WEN WEI PO)--It is learned from 
sources concerned by a reporter that because Wei Jingsheng 
violated the laws and regulation many times and was suspected of 
committing new crimes while being released on parole and still 
being deprived of political rights, the public security organ in 
Beijing today put him under house arrest [jian shi ju zhu 4148 
6018 1446 0145] and began to investigate his case. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-1963 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "drchi065_k_94007" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-CHI-94-065 </AU>
Daily Report 
<DATE1>  5 Apr 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> NATIONAL AFFAIRS </F>
<F P=101> Political &amp; Social </F>
<H3> <TI>   Activist Zhai Weimin Released From 3-Week Detention </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Activist Zhai Weimin Released From 3-Week Detention </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   HK0504044494 Hong Kong EASTERN EXPRESS in English 5 Apr 94 p 
5 </F>

<F P=103> HK0504044494 </F>
<F P=104>  Hong Kong EASTERN EXPRESS </F>
<F P=105>  English </F>


<TEXT>
BFN 

<F P=106> [By Bruce Gilley] </F>
  [Text] Chinese authorities released a pro-democracy 
activist, Zhai Weimin, from detention in western Henan province 
last Tuesday [29 March], but are not allowing him to return to 
Beijing. Instead, Zhai's normal political rights, which were to 
have been restored on September 13, a year after his release 
from prison, have been suspended for a further 94 days and he 
has been told by public security officers that he will not be 
allowed to leave the province until the end of the year, sources 
said yesterday. 
  Zhai is staying with his parents in Xinan county, about 
three 
kilometres from the Yeshugou jail where he was detained after 
being sent back to the province in a special train carriage 
under police' escort on March 7. Zhai plans to sue the 
provincial public security bureau over the 21-day detention, 
which he was told was due to his participation in unspecified 
"illegal activities". 
  Zhai, who completed a three-and-a-half year sentence for 
"counter-revolutionary propaganda and incitement" last 
September, was picked up by Beijing police in the city's 
university area on March 6. While in Yeshugou prison, Zhai was 
fed only steamed bread and corn meal. He emerged from the 
three-week detention pale and thin, his family said. "He is 
irritable and has a bad temper because he says the authorities 
had no justification to lock him up like that," one source said. 
  Zhai has asked local officials to arrange a job for him in a 
nearby high-technology economic zone so he does not become bored 
at home. Zhai, 23, was number six on the "list of most-wanted 
students" after the 1989 Tiananmen Square movement. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-1964 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "drchi065_k_94008" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-CHI-94-065 </AU>
Daily Report 
<DATE1>  5 Apr 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> NATIONAL AFFAIRS </F>
<F P=101> Political &amp; Social </F>
<H3> <TI>   Crowds Honor Dead Ancestors in Beijing, Police Watch </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Crowds Honor Dead Ancestors in Beijing, Police Watch </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   HK0504083894 Hong Kong AFP in English 0824 GMT 5 April 94 </F>
<F P=103> HK0504083894 </F>
<F P=104>  Hong Kong AFP </F>
<F P=105>  English </F>


<TEXT>
BFN 

<F P=106> [By Philippe Massonnet] </F>
  [Text] Beijing, April 5 (AFP)--Chinese honored their dead 
Tuesday [5 April], as police kept a close eye on families of 
pro-democracy demonstrators killed five years ago in the 
Tiananmen massacre. Crowds gathered at the large Baboashan 
cemetery west of the capital to celebrate Qing Ming, the 
festival of the dead. 
  Hundreds of thousands of Beijing residents went there to 
honour the memory of the deceased, in turn attracting hoards of 
flower and wreath sellers and funeral workers, who plied a 
lucrative trade. There were also a number of police, both 
uniformed and in plain clothes, armed with still and video 
cameras, and portable telephones. 
  Access to Babaoshan, as with other major cemeteries in the 
capital, was banned to foreigners, who were challenged before 
they could even step foot inside the graveyard by hordes of 
police demanding to know who they were. Since the bloody 
crackdown on the pro-democracy movement on June 4, 1989, Qing 
Ming in Beijing has been a date dreaded by the authorities. 
  Families have been forbidden from the simple act of of 
burning incense for their dead relatives because of official 
fears that the accompanying laments might degenerate into slogan 
chanting against the communist party and the government. This 
year, five years after students began their protest on April 15 
for greater democracy and an end to corruption, the situation is 
even more tense. 
  Since the start of the year, the authorities have been 
unsettled by increasingly acute social problems and an uncertain 
political situation as paramount leader Deng Xiaoping approaches 
his 90th birthday in August. 
  The authorities have also been confronted by increasingly 
active dissent, prompting a new wave of repression. 
  As evidence of their worries, Tiananmen Square has been 
ringed day and night by police since Monday. "I haven't been 
able to go out for Qing Ming because there are too many police," 
said the father of one 19-year-old youth killed in 1989, whose 
urn is in Wanan cemetery at the foot of the Fragrant Hills. 
  "It's not that I'm afraid, just that I don't want trouble, 
and the mood is too tense," he said, adding that some parents of 
the Tiananmen dead still went to the graves. The families of 
those who died on June 4 are close to each other and take turns 
to go the cemeteries. Over Qing Ming, they meet and telephone 
each other. 
  Ding Zilin, a philosophy teacher, goes often to Babaoshan 
and 
Wanan to tend the urns of the young people massacred by the army. 
  She lost her only son, Jiang Jielian, a 17-year-old high 
school student. But her child does not rest in the cemetery. 
  Ding, who recently signed an open letter to the authorities 
demanding democracy and the release of all imprisoned 
dissidents, keeps his ashes at home. The urn sits on a small 
altar near photos of the teenager. 
  "For me, Qing Ming is everyday," she said. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-1965 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "drchi065_k_94009" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-CHI-94-065 </AU>
Daily Report 
<DATE1>  4 Apr 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> NATIONAL AFFAIRS </F>
<F P=101> Political &amp; Social </F>
<H3> <TI>   Justice Ministry Releases Prisoner Figures </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Justice Ministry Releases Prisoner Figures </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   HK0504041394 Beijing ZHONGGUO XINWEN SHE in Chinese 1118 GMT 
4 Apr 94 </F>

<F P=103> HK0504041394 </F>
<F P=104>  Beijing ZHONGGUO XINWEN SHE </F>
<F P=105>  Chinese </F>


<TEXT>
BFN 

  [Text] Beijing, 4 April (ZHONGGUO XINWEN SHE)--Jia 
Jingping, press spokesman for the Ministry of Justice recently 
revealed here that at the end of last year, there were a total 
of more than 1,244,000 convicts in prisons and 
reform-through-labor camps throughout the country; more than 
301,000 convicts were released after serving their prison 
sentences. 
  Jia Jingping said when briefing the press about the judicial 
administrative work in the whole country last year: In prisons 
and reform-through-labor camps all over the country, the prison 
management and the work of supervising and reforming convicts 
were in good order. The incidence of criminal cases fell to the 
lowest level since 1984. The rate of convict escapes was 0.14 
percent, remaining at a low level. 
  He revealed that more than 247,000 convicts enjoyed sentence 
reductions because they showed repentance or rendered 
meritorious service; more than 33,000 people were released on 
parole; and more than 34,000 people were allowed to seek medical 
care outside prison. 
  As for the work of re-education-through-labor [lao dong jiao 
yang 0525 0520 2403 7402], Jia Jingping said that at the end of 
last year, more than 153,000 people were receiving re-education 
through labor in the whole country, and the number increased by 
16.1 percent over the same time of last year. Of these, more 
than 3,800 were women practicing prostitution, accounting for 
47.5 percent of women receiving re-education through labor; more 
than 11,800 were drug addicts, accounting for 7.7 percent of the 
total number of people receiving re-education through labor. 
For the whole year, more than 75,900 people were released after 
completing their terms of re-education through labor; more than 
55,800 people enjoyed reduction in their terms of receiving 
re-education through labor because they behaved well. Order in 
reform-through-labor camps remained stable, and the rate of 
escapes remained at an all-time low. 
  Jia Jingping added: Last year, the number of lawyers 
increased at the highest rate after the lawyer system was 
restored in 1980. At the end of last year, more than 66,700 
people were engaged in legal services, and the number increased 
by 46.3 percent as compared with the previous year. Of these 
people, full-time professional lawyers numbered more than 
30,400, an increase of 37.4 percent. The number of law firms 
also increased quickly. At the end of last year, there were 
more than 5,100 law firms in China, increasing by 22.8 percent 
over the previous year and marking the highest rate of increase. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-1966 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "drchi065_k_94010" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-CHI-94-065 </AU>
Daily Report 
<DATE1>  5 Apr 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> NATIONAL AFFAIRS </F>
<F P=101> Political &amp; Social </F>
<H3> <TI>   Beijing Announces Sports Drug Abuse Policy </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Beijing Announces Sports Drug Abuse Policy </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   OW0504090794 Beijing XINHUA in English 0810 GMT 5 Apr 94 </F>
<F P=103> OW0504090794 </F>
<F P=104>  Beijing XINHUA </F>
<F P=105>  English </F>


<TEXT>
BFN 

<F P=106> ["By XINHUA Sportswriter Yi Gaochao"] </F>
  [Text] Beijing, April 5 (XINHUA) -- Overnight fame and 
phenomenal fortune without the labors of Hercules are the 
lead-up of sports drug abuse in China. 
  But its sports officials changed perspective to look into 
the 
headache on Tuesday [5 April] for a cure. 
  An Anti-Doping China'94 seminar was held to arouse the 
attention of all those who call the shots in sporting activities 
in the country's 30 provinces, municipalities and autonomous 
regions. 
  Also present at the seminar were the principals from all 
China's physical education institutions and the top officials 
from its ministerial sports associations. 
  Central warning was sounded to alert freewheeling athletes. 
  Wu Shaozu, director of the State Commission for Sports and 
Physical Culture, emphasized doping controls through clear 
stipulation, tight check and harsh penalty. 
  "Actions must be taken," said the sports minister who took 
his first trip abroad to attend the Second World Anti-Doping 
Congress in Moscow in 1989. 
  The number of positive cases reported on Chinese athletes in 
national and international events is appalling to the central 
control of the country's sports mechanism. 
  From a Chinese markswoman failing her test during a World 
Cup 
meet in late 1987 up till January this year, 33 Chinese were 
tested positive for performance-enhancing substances, mainly 
anabolic steroids. 
  These athletes were in 13 sports of shooting, speed skating, 
modern pentathlon, track and field, volleyball, swimming, 
wrestling, judo, sporting acrobatics, canoeing, weightlifting, 
boxing and rhythmic gymnastics. 
  Among the caught dopers were world and Olympic champions as 
well as global and continental record setters. 
  "We cannot afford to remain passive in merely detecting and 
penalizing them," said Yuan Weimin, vice-sports minister and 
director of China's anti-doping committee set up in July 1992 as 
a subcommittee under the National Olympic Committee. 
  Yuan said that China first conducted doping tests nationwide 
in 1988 and built an IOC-approved doping control laboratory the 
following year. 
  "But each year there always appear athletic drug abusers to 
tarnish China's sports achievement," said Yuan. 
  After six years of trials and errors, the Chinese sports 
commission decided to take an active role. 
  "We are shifting focus from detection to education and 
prevention," said Wu Tuesday. 
  "It's because there are still people who slight the works of 
the anti-doping committee," Yuan said. 
  He recalled that China launched its first intensive 
anti-doping effort prior to the Barcelona Olympics when 
pamphlets were published on moral and medical side-effects of 
drug abuse. 
  Yuan's committee has written down a stipulation of 15 rules 
concerning banned substances and later added rules concerning 
nutrition food and beverage. "China's principle in developing 
sports is to better the physique of the entire population," he 
explained. 
  Wu hit home the key point of the seminar when he said that a 
decree in his name would soon be issued to draw the line between 
medical treatment and performance-enhancing build-up; between 
individual venture and collaboration among athletes, doctors, 
coaches and even officials. 
  Penalties, Wu ordered, will be from moral criticism to 
disciplinary and even legal actions. 
  Yang Tianle, China's member on the IOC Medical Commission 
who 
gave an in-depth lecture on anti-doping Tuesday, added still 
another line between intentional activity and medical illiteracy. 
  Now the lines have been drawn between the do's and don'ts in 
China's anti-doping campaign, offenders, be they individual 
athletes or collaborative teams, will be penalized as severely 
as international federations do or maybe more so to thwart the 
practice among the Chinese, Wu concluded. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-1967 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "drchi065_k_94011" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-CHI-94-065 </AU>
Daily Report 
<DATE1>  4 Apr 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> NATIONAL AFFAIRS </F>
<F P=101> Political &amp; Social </F>
<H3> <TI>   Statistics on Illegal Emigration, Smuggling Cases </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Statistics on Illegal Emigration, Smuggling Cases </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   HK0504031594 Hong Kong ZHONGGUO TONGXUN SHE in Chinese 0825 
GMT 4 Apr 94 </F>

<F P=103> HK0504031594 </F>
<F P=104>  Hong Kong ZHONGGUO TONGXUN SHE </F>
<F P=105>  Chinese </F>


<TEXT>
BFN 

  [Text] Beijing, 4 April (ZHONGGUO TONGXUN SHE)--According 
to the materials provided by the coastal border management work 
meeting currently being held in Beijing, last year, China 
totally cracked 95 cases of collective illegal emigration, 
involving 1,970 people. In these cases, 303 organizers were 
arrested. 
  The meeting also revealed that last year the Chinese police 
totally cracked 887 cases of maritime smuggling, seized 706 
smuggling ships and smuggled goods worth 1.51 billion yuan. In 
addition, the police also cracked 13 maritime robbery cases, 
broke nine armed robber gangs, and arrested more than 30 
criminals. At the same time, the police also discovered and 
cracked some maritime firearms and drugs selling channels and 
criminal gangs involved in such activities. 
  Last year, the border management department of the police 
intensified coastal border management and concentrated efforts 
on dealing with prominent and difficult problems. The boarder 
management departments in Guangxi and Shandong carried out 
antismuggling battles in two areas where smuggling activities 
were rampant in recent years. The border management department 
in Guangdong attached importance to cracking down on both 
smuggling and illegal emigrating activities. The border 
management department in Fujian also made great efforts to check 
illegal emigration, and succeeded in cracking a number of major 
cases. 
  Officials in the public security department said that this 
year, various coastal areas will make greater efforts to carry 
out the crime prevention and crackdown measures, severely crack 
down on the criminal activities of maritime robbery, maintain 
maritime law and order, and more effectively prevent and crack 
down on illegal emigration and smuggling. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-1968 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "drchi065_k_94012" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-CHI-94-065 </AU>
Daily Report 
<DATE1>  22 Mar 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> NATIONAL AFFAIRS </F>
<F P=101> Political &amp; Social </F>
<H3> <TI>   Article Hails Successful Conclusion of NPC Session </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Article Hails Successful Conclusion of NPC Session </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   HK0504104294 Hong Kong ZHONGGUO TONGXUN SHE in Chinese 1344 
GMT 22 Mar 94 </F>

<F P=103> HK0504104294 </F>
<F P=104>  Hong Kong ZHONGGUO TONGXUN SHE </F>
<F P=105>  Chinese </F>


<TEXT>
BFN 

<F P=106> ["Special article" by reporter Xie Zuan (6200 9449): "There </F>
Are Opportunities, Difficulties, and Hopes -- Hailing the 
Satisfactory Conclusion of the Second Session of the Eighth 
National People's Congress"] 
  [Text] Having satisfactorily fulfilled all items on its 
agenda, the Second Session of the Eighth National People's 
Congress ended this afternoon. The session was characterized by 
democracy, solidarity, seeking truth from facts, and dealing 
with concrete matters relating to work. The deputies 
deliberated and approved Premier Li Peng's government work 
report and other work reports, and decided on the work principle 
and tasks of continuing to deepen reform, expand opening up, 
promote production, and maintain stability. 
  The year 1994 is a crucial one for China in the transition 
from the planned economy structure to the socialist market 
economy structure, and one of accelerating the building of the 
socialist market economy structure, maintaining the sustained 
and healthy development of the national economy, and promoting 
social progress in a comprehensive way. This year, a series of 
major reform measures will be presented, and they will be 
implemented steadily. 
  It seems that the tasks for this year are arduous, but the 
prospects are bright. Just as the government work report 
indicates, it is imperative to handle earnestly and well the 
relationships among reform, development and stability. Economic 
construction is the center of all work, and reform and opening 
up are the impetus for development, whereas development and 
reform are the foundation for socialist stability and lasting 
order in the state, and the maintenance of social stability is 
the indispensable condition for the development of the economy 
and the smooth progress of reform. All work in China this year 
will subject to and serve the overall situation of deepening 
reform, expanding opening up, promoting development, and 
maintaining stability. While strengthening reform, opening up 
and economic construction, the principle of "grasping two types 
of work simultaneously, while paying equal attention to both" 
will be adhered to. The building of socialist spiritual 
civilization, socialist democracy, and the legal system will be 
strengthened. All social undertakings will be developed 
enthusiastically. Efforts will be exerted to elevate 
educational, agricultural, cultural and art undertakings to a 
new plane. We believe that through hard work, China will be 
able to achieve these plans one by one. 
  China implemented the planned economy for a long period, now 
it is advancing with long strides toward the market economy. 
Doubtless it will face many difficult problems. In addition, 
the building of a new structure itself is extremely arduous and 
complicated. From building to consolidation and maturity takes 
time and calls for society's all-out support. During the 
session, however, people could see that China has already 
discovered problems, and is beginning to look difficulties 
squarely. As long as the chance is seized, China will be very 
hopeful. 
  In the deputies' own words, the political situation in China 
is stable and the opportunity is rare; the tasks are heavy and 
the road ahead is long. From now on, China's economic 
development and construction will operate by relying on the 
legal system, and the lasting order of the state will be 
guaranteed so that people can live and work in peace and 
contentment. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-1969 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "drchi065_k_94013" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-CHI-94-065 </AU>
Daily Report 
<DATE1>  4 Apr 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> NATIONAL AFFAIRS </F>
<F P=101> Political &amp; Social </F>
<H3> <TI>   University Graduates Face Good Job Opportunities </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    University Graduates Face Good Job Opportunities </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   OW0404140494 Beijing XINHUA in English 1100 GMT 4 Apr 94 </F>
<F P=103> OW0404140494 </F>
<F P=104>  Beijing XINHUA </F>
<F P=105>  English </F>


<TEXT>
BFN 

  [Text] Beijing, April 4 (XINHUA) -- The 40,000 university 
graduates in Beijing this year will have good job opportunities, 
official sources from the municipal education department said 
today. 
  The sources said that, generally speaking, the number of 
university students still falls short of society's needs. 
  Beijing will have 34,000 students graduating from 
universities and colleges, 5,000 from post-graduate study and 
761 from doctorship [as received] study this July, the sources 
said. 
  So far 50 percent of the graduates have found jobs through 
the job market and other means, while the other 50 percent are 
still making their choices, the sources said. 
  They predicted that some 90 percent of the graduates will be 
able to find jobs to their satisfaction by mid-June. 
  The number of graduates going into large and middle-sized 
state-owned enterprises has increased remarkably, but into 
government bodies has been dropping over recent years, the 
sources said. Most of the graduates are going into grass-root 
enterprises. 
  The sources said the education department has set up a 
special fund, which gives each graduate choosing to work in 
remote and less-developed regions one thousand to five thousand 
yuan as an encouragement. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-1970 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "drchi065_k_94014" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-CHI-94-065 </AU>
Daily Report 
<DATE1>  4 Apr 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> NATIONAL AFFAIRS </F>
<F P=101> Political &amp; Social </F>
<H3> <TI>   Beijing Set To Train More High-Level Specialists </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Beijing Set To Train More High-Level Specialists </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   OW0404141194 Beijing XINHUA in English 1136 GMT 4 Apr 94 </F>
<F P=103> OW0404141194 </F>
<F P=104>  Beijing XINHUA </F>
<F P=105>  English </F>


<TEXT>
BFN 

  [Text] Beijing, April 4 (XINHUA) -- Beijing is to train 
more high-level specialists in the next three years, which are 
urgently needed by the booming economy, under the latest 
on-the-job training program. 
  These personnel will be trained in such fields as modern 
enterprise management, foreign trade and commerce, finance and 
insurance, real estate development, urban construction projects 
management, revenue and taxes, auditing, international law and 
foreign trade, rural economy management, tourism, foreign 
languages and computer technology. 
  Candidates to be trained will be professionals with a 
college 
degree and those with intermediate professional titles as well 
as management personnel and technicians who have a bachelor's 
degree. 
  Beijing municipal adult education officials said that by 
1997, more than one million people will have to change their 
jobs. The job-switchers will get training at local vocational 
schools and radio and television universities. 
  The local economy in Beijing, including the rural areas, has 
been growing as one of the fastest in China. On-the-job 
training has become increasingly urgent in some enterprises and 
rural ventures. 
  There are so far more than 170 adult vocational higher 
education institutions in the city, and more than 3,500 other 
kinds of training centers. 
  Last year, a total of 3.01 million people received adult 
education and on-the-job training, officials said. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-1971 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "drchi065_o_94001" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-CHI-94-065 </AU>
Daily Report 
<DATE1>  5 Apr 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> REGIONAL AFFAIRS </F>
<F P=101> East Region </F>
<H3> <TI>   Anhui Province `Key' Light Industrial Base </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Anhui Province `Key' Light Industrial Base </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   OW0504073794 Beijing XINHUA in English 0657 GMT 5 Apr 94 </F>
<F P=103> OW0504073794 </F>
<F P=104>  Beijing XINHUA </F>
<F P=105>  English </F>


<TEXT>
BFN 

  [Text] Hefei, April 5 (XINHUA) -- East China's Anhui 
Province has become one of the country's key light industrial 
producers. 
  With a gross light industry output worth 12.5 billion yuan 
last year, Anhui now has an industrial set-up, mainly in 
domestic electrical appliances, chemicals for daily use, and the 
wine-making industry. 
  Of the 49 key products listed by the China National Light 
Industry Council, Anhui's output of 29 products ranks among the 
top ten in the country, with the number of refrigerators coming 
the second. 
  A provincial official attributed the good results to the 
reform and opening further to the outside world. 
  Since China began its reform in the late 1970s, Anhui has 
focused on importing and absorbing advanced foreign technology 
and equipment. 
  It spent four billion yuan on technically upgrading 80 
percent of its light industry enterprises during the 1978-93 
period. 
  As a result, the provincial light industrial set-up has 
developed an annual output of 2,500 new varieties of products in 
recent years. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-1972 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "drchi065_a_94001" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-CHI-94-065 </AU>
Daily Report 
<DATE1>  5 Apr 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> INTERNATIONAL AFFAIRS </F>
<F P=101> General </F>
<H3> <TI>   UN Delegate Links Population, Economic Development </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    UN Delegate Links Population, Economic Development </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   OW0504083594 Beijing XINHUA in English 0813 GMT 5 Apr 94 </F>
<F P=103> OW0504083594 </F>
<F P=104>  Beijing XINHUA </F>
<F P=105>  English </F>


<TEXT>
BFN 

  [Text] United Nations, April 4 (XINHUA) -- The population 
issue is, in essence, an issue of development, and the two 
issues are interwoven, a Chinese delegate said here today. 
  Peng Yu, head of the Chinese delegation, was speaking at the 
third session of the preparatory committee for the International 
Conference on Population and Development, which opened here 
today. 
  Peng said, only by promoting socio-economic development can 
the population problem be solved in a reasonable way. 
  "Population policies and programs should be treated as an 
integral part of national socio-economic development 
strategies," Peng said. 
  She pointed out that as the situation differs from country 
to 
country, the government of each country should set its own 
policies and objectives that reflect the best interests of the 
nation, local communities, the families and individuals. 
  Governments are duty-bound to achieve their population goals 
through improving economic conditions and upgrading the quality 
of life for their people, Peng said, adding "family planning 
should be promoted without any forms of coercion." 
  Peng also noted that it is of major importance to enhance 
women's status, protect their legal rights and interests, offer 
them with more opportunities for education, and encourage them 
to participate in the process of political and economic 
developments. 
  The international conference on population and development 
will be held in Cairo, Egypt, from September 5 to 13. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-1973 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "drchi065_b_94001" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-CHI-94-065 </AU>
Daily Report 
<DATE1>  5 Apr 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> U.S. &amp; Canada </F>
<H3> <TI>   Tian Jiyun Meets Canadian Business Delegation </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Tian Jiyun Meets Canadian Business Delegation </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   OW0504073694 Beijing XINHUA in English 0636 GMT 5 Apr 94 </F>
<F P=103> OW0504073694 </F>
<F P=104>  Beijing XINHUA </F>
<F P=105>  English </F>


<TEXT>
BFN 

  [Text] Beijing, April 5 (XINHUA) -- Tian Jiyun, 
vice-chairman of the Standing Committee of the Chinese National 
People's Congress (NPC), met here today with a delegation headed 
by Hartley Richardson, chairman of the board of Canadian James 
Richardson and Sons Limited. 
  The 4-member delegation is making an inspection tour on 
China's investment conditions at the invitation of the NPC's 
financial and economic committee. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-1974 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "drchi065_f_94001" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-CHI-94-065 </AU>
Daily Report 
<DATE1>  3 Apr 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> Near East 7 South Asia </F>
<H3> <TI>   Two Chinese Technicians Kidnapped in Yemen </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Two Chinese Technicians Kidnapped in Yemen </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   OW0304150994 Beijing XINHUA in English 1449 GMT 3 Apr 94 </F>
<F P=103> OW0304150994 </F>
<F P=104>  Beijing XINHUA </F>
<F P=105>  English </F>


<TEXT>
BFN 

  [Text] Sanaa, April 3 (XINHUA) -- Two Yemeni gunmen 
kidnapped this morning two members of a Chinese technical team 
supervising the execution of the Jahanna-Maereb Road 
construction project. 
  The two Chinese technicians were kidnapped 49 kilometers 
away 
from Jahanna. 
  The two Yemeni kidnappers claimed they would release the two 
Chinese hostages only on condition that the work on the road 
project should be stopped completely, threatening to kidnap 
other members of the Chinese team supervising the construction 
of the project unless their condition was met. 
  It is the fourth time that members of the Chinese technical 
team were kidnapped since May, 1991. 
  Three members of the same team were kidnapped on February 12 
and were set free after they had been detained for 10 days. 
  The situation in Yemen has been deteriorating in recent 
years 
and there has been recurrent abductions of accredited foreign 
diplomats, tourists and employees of foreign companies operating 
in Yemen. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-1975 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "drchi065_p_94001" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-CHI-94-065 </AU>
Daily Report 
<DATE1>  26 Mar 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> Central-South Region </F>
<H3> <TI>   Guangdong Secretary Inspects Six Cities 14-24 Mar </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Guangdong Secretary Inspects Six Cities 14-24 Mar </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   HK0404051494 Guangzhou Guangdong People's Radio Network in 
Mandarin 0400 GMT 26 Mar 94 </F>

<F P=103> HK0404051494 </F>
<F P=104>  Guangzhou Guangdong People's Radio Network </F>
<F P=105>  Mandarin </F>


<TEXT>
BFN 

  [Text] Xie Fei, CPC Central Committee Political Bureau 
member and Guangdong Provincial CPC Committee secretary, 
recently inspected eastern Guangdong, where he carried out 
investigations and study and called for energetically developing 
an open and export-oriented agriculture and bringing prosperity 
to the peasants as soon as possible. 
  On 14-24 March, Secretary Xie Fei inspected six cities in 
eastern Guangdong, Huizhou, Shanwei, Jieyang, Shantou, Meizhou, 
and Heyuan, where he traveled for nearly 2,000 kilometers and 
visited dozens of units. Despite the fatigue caused by long 
journeys and bad weather situations like strong storms and heavy 
rains, Secretary Xie Fei went from one city to another in hopes 
of seeing more of the local situation and exchanging views with 
more local cadres and masses. 
  Throughout his inspection, Secretary Xie Fei was primarily 
concerned with the issue of maintaining stable grain output. He 
pointed out: In order to stabilize agricultural production, we 
should first and foremost try to stabilize grain production. 
Grain is the ultimate concern of the people. Guangdong should 
make every possible effort to stabilize grain production and put 
an end to reliance on grain imports from other regions. As long 
as we follow this correct guiding ideology, implement correct 
grain production policies, grow good varieties of grain, employ 
scientific farming methods, and embark on operations of scale, 
we will be able to raise grain production efficiency and 
stabilize and increase grain output. 
  When discussing the stabilization of the grain growing area, 
Secretary Xie Fei urged cadres at all levels in the province to 
protect arable land, stabilize grain output, and energetically 
develop a diversified economy. He said: We should strive to 
build an open and export-oriented agriculture. To this end, on 
the one hand, we should strive to produce more quality farm 
products and open up and enter more new markets; on the other 
hand, we should strive to expand opening up to the outside world 
and import good varieties of crops, advanced technology, and 
funds in order to push the province's agricultural production 
onto a new stage and build genuine high-yield, high-efficiency, 
and high-quality agriculture across the province. All areas 
should conscientiously make efforts to identify competitive 
local products, build competitive local products production 
bases, conduct operations of scale, and make a success of both 
post-production processing and intensive processing, thus 
raising the added value of products as well as agricultural 
efficiency. As long as we follow this road, the province's 
agriculture will definitely be able to keep up with the 
province's rapidly growing secondary and tertiary industries in 
the years to come. We should see to it that the province's 
primary, secondary, and tertiary industries develop in a 
coordinated manner. In developing the rural economy, we should 
develop not only agriculture and a diversified economy but also 
township and town enterprises. 
  Wherever he went, Secretary Xie Fei went into the local 
township and town enterprises. He said: Developing township 
and town enterprises is an important way of realizing 
modernization in rural areas, transferring surplus rural labor 
into secondary and tertiary industries, and bringing prosperity 
to the peasants. We should attach great importance to the 
development of township and town enterprises. 
  Secretary Xie Fei asserted: The implementation of a 
joint-stock cooperative system is a major step forward in the 
deep-going rural reform and is bound to mobilize the enthusiasm 
of the various quarters concerned and speed up the development 
of township and town enterprises. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-1976 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "drchi065_p_94002" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-CHI-94-065 </AU>
Daily Report 
<DATE1>  22 Mar 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> Central-South Region </F>
<H3> <TI>   Guangdong Governor Discusses Expressway Plans </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Guangdong Governor Discusses Expressway Plans </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   HK0504070094 Beijing ZHONGGUO XINWEN SHE in Chinese 1148 GMT 
22 Mar 94 </F>

<F P=103> HK0504070094 </F>
<F P=104>  Beijing ZHONGGUO XINWEN SHE </F>
<F P=105>  Chinese </F>


<TEXT>
BFN 

<F P=106> [By reporter Mo Fei (5459 7236)] </F>
  [Text] Beijing, 22 Mar (ZHONGGUO XINWEN SHE) -- Guangdong 
has already drafted a great blueprint for building expressways 
in the next 20 years. 
  When attending the "two sessions" in Beijing, Guangdong 
Governor Zhu Senlin, a deputy to the National People's Congress 
[NPC], responded to a reporter's question and said that there is 
a long-term plan of transportation construction in Guangdong. 
  In order to coordinate with the state's relevant planning 
and 
to meet the need of Guangdong's economic development, Guangdong 
has decided to build a dozen expressways over a period of 15 to 
20 years, which will have a total length of about 3,300 km, to 
penetrate to the eastern, western, and northern parts of 
Guangdong so as to form a network of roads converging on the 
state's main roads, and linking key cities, transportation hubs, 
and ports in the province. 
  The above-mentioned project will require more than 100 
billion yuan, and this year over 10 billion yuan will be 
injected to it. 
  Zhu Senlin said that the funds for building expressways will 
be raised by Guangdong's own efforts, and come from accumulated 
capital. Some foreign funds will also be used. 
  The expressways for which contracts have been signed with 
foreign firms, and on which construction has already begun or 
will soon begin so that they can be completed by 1996, include: 
The 154-km Guangzhou-Shenzhen east route, which is under 
construction; the 140-km Shenzhen-Shantou east route; the 66-km 
Huizhou-Heyuan route; the 150-km Yangjiang-Zhuhai coastal 
expressway; the 146-km Shenzhen-Shantou west route; and the 
80-km Foshan-Kaiping expressway. 
  Letters of intent have also been signed with foreign 
businessmen to build another four expressways, namely, the 
Guangdong section of the Beijing-Guangzhou expressway, 
Guangzhou-Huidong expressway, Kaiping-Yangjiang expressway, and 
Yangjiang-Zhanjiang expressway; according to plan, construction 
will begin next year and will be completed by 1998-1999. 
  At present, Guangdong ranks first among provinces and 
regions 
in construction of roads, and this is also true in terms of road 
density. In the area of building transportation facilities such 
as railways, airports, and ports, Guangdong has also made 
eye-catching achievements. 
  Zhu Senlin said that these big inputs are for enabling 
Guangdong to cast off the "bottleneck" restraint which has 
hindered Guangdong's capital construction for a long time, so 
that good conditions can be created for Guangdong's future 
development. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-1977 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "drchi065_g_94001" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-CHI-94-065 </AU>
Daily Report 
<DATE1>  4 Apr 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> Sub-Saharan Africa </F>
<H3> <TI>   Eritrean President Arrives on 5-Day Visit 4 Apr </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Eritrean President Arrives on 5-Day Visit 4 Apr </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   OW0404033694 Beijing XINHUA in English 0159 GMT 4 Apr 94 </F>
<F P=103> OW0404033694 </F>
<F P=104>  Beijing XINHUA </F>
<F P=105>  English </F>


<TEXT>
BFN 

  [Text] Beijing, April 4 (XINHUA) -- Eritrean President 
Issais Afeworke arrived here by air this morning on a five-day 
state visit to China at the invitation of Chinese President 
Jiang Zemin. 
  Afeworke and his party were greeted at the airport by Tan 
Qinglian, chairman of the Chinese Government Reception Committee 
and vice-minister of construction, Wang Changyi, assistant 
foreign minister, and Zhang Shihua, Chinese ambassador to 
Eritrea. 
  Eritrean Ambassador to China Hidad Ermias Debessai was 
present on the occasion. 
  Jiang is scheduled to host a welcoming ceremony later today 
for Afeworke and his party. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-1978 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "drchi065_q_94001" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-CHI-94-065 </AU>
Daily Report 
<DATE1>  2 Apr 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> Southwest Region </F>
<H3> <TI>   Guizhou Uses Foreign Funds To Promote Agriculture </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Guizhou Uses Foreign Funds To Promote Agriculture </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   OW0204135494 Beijing XINHUA in English 1239 GMT 2 Apr 94 </F>
<F P=103> OW0204135494 </F>
<F P=104>  Beijing XINHUA </F>
<F P=105>  English </F>


<TEXT>
BFN 

  [Text] Guiyang, April 2 (XINHUA) -- Southwest China's 
Guizhou Province is introducing foreign funds to develop its 
agriculture. 
  According to the provincial government, since 1985 the 
province has undertaken 15 foreign-aided programs including 
those introducing talents, technology and funds. 
  The total investment in the programs amounts to 250 million 
yuan. 
  A Japanese-aided grain program started in 1990 and is being 
carried out in about 30 poverty-stricken townships mainly 
inhabited by ethnic minority people. 
  The program has benefited 78,000 households and about 
350,000 
people. 
  The grain program aims to increase yields to cover 20,000 
hectares of farmland and produce 154.5 million kilograms of 
grain by the end of 1993, an increase of 67.75 percent over the 
original yield of the farmland. 
  The grain output per capita in the program target townships 
has increased from 253 kilograms to 439 kilograms and the income 
per capita from 184 yuan to 311.5 yuan, respectively increasing 
by 68 and 69 percent. 
  A land-transformation program supported by the New Zealand 
Government and started in July 1992 has fulfilled its targets in 
grass cultivation and animal husbandry. 
  A survey of 128 households in the program target areas 
showed 
that the grain output in the areas has grown by 34 percent. 
  Investigation in Longli County showed that the grain output 
per capita already reached 336.8 kilograms last year, increasing 
by 15.5 percent over the previous year. 
  The income from livestock farming per household was 1,325 
yuan. 
  The World Food Program's 3,146 project is the largest 
agricultural project in Guizhou Province. 
  The project, which was started in 1988, is to help five 
cities and counties where Miao and Buyi nationalities live to 
transform low-yield farmland in order to raise grain output. 
  The project aims to construct 3,600 hectares of irrigatable 
farmland and provide drinking water for 13,000 people and 7,000 
cattle. 
  Recently an expert group sent to Guizhou by the World Food 
Program pronounced its satisfaction with the ongoing program 
after completing its investigation. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-1979 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "drchi065_r_94001" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-CHI-94-065 </AU>
Daily Report 
<DATE1>  1 Apr 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> North Region </F>
<H3> <TI>   Chen Xitong, Others Donate to `Hope Project' </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Chen Xitong, Others Donate to `Hope Project' </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   OW0104143394 Beijing XINHUA in English 1325 GMT 1 Apr 94 </F>
<F P=103> OW0104143394 </F>
<F P=104>  Beijing XINHUA </F>
<F P=105>  English </F>


<TEXT>
BFN 

  [Text] Beijing, April 1 (XINHUA) -- China's "Hope Project" 
is due to get more help from Beijing, as the city started a 
working group on Thursday [31 March] to take care of the matter. 
  The "Hope Project" aims to help dropouts to return to 
primary 
schools in poverty-stricken areas. 
  On March 8, the city launched a "Hope Project" donation 
center in downtown Beijing, which so far has received 350,000 
yuan in donations from some 4,000 citizens. 
  Beijing has been leading other Chinese regions in the amount 
donated to the "Hope Project" ever since it was launched in 1990 
to raise funds from society to help children in poor areas 
return to classrooms and finish their primary school education. 
  Over the four years, the "Hope Project" has provided help to 
549,000 children in 1,200 counties in 26 Chinese regions, 
reaching across all of China except for Beijing, Shanghai, 
Tianjin and Jiangsu. 
  The project has built 204 primary schools for poor areas and 
given awards to 100 rural school teachers. It has also provided 
special scholarships for 200 university students and 1,361 
middle school students. 
  This year's theme for the "Hope Project" is "One Family 
Helps 
One Dropout", setting the goal for an urban family to donate 300 
yuan to help a child finish five years of education. 
  The project plans to help one million children return to 
classrooms in 1994. 
  [Beijing Central People's Radio Network in Mandarin at 1030 
GMT on 1 April in its "National Hookup" program carries an 
under-minute report on the "Hope Project" fund-raising drive in 
Beijing, which says that "Beijing City leaders Chen Xitong, Li 
Qiyan, Zhang Jianmin, and Wang Daming took the lead in donating 
money to the newly founded Beijing donation center."] 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-1980 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "drchi065_w_94001" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-CHI-94-065 </AU>
Daily Report 
<DATE1>  5 Mar 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> HONG KONG &amp; MACAO </F>
<F P=101> Hong Kong </F>
<H3> <TI>   Journalists, Political Groups Condemn Xi Yang Sentence </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Journalists, Political Groups Condemn Xi Yang Sentence </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   HK0504053294 Hong Kong SOUTH CHINA MORNING POST in English 5 
Mar 94 pp 1, 5 </F>

<F P=103> HK0504053294 </F>
<F P=104>  Hong Kong SOUTH CHINA MORNING POST </F>
<F P=105>  English </F>


<TEXT>
BFN 

<F P=106> [By staff reporters] </F>
  [Text] Official confirmation that China has jailed a Hong 
Kong reporter for 12 years has sent shock waves among 
journalists and political groups, who denounce the verdict as 
unacceptable, unjustifiable and a threat to press freedom. Xi 
Yang's employer Ming Pao, the Hong Kong Journalists' Association 
(HKJA) and political parties called on Beijing to release 
details of Xi's case while allowing the public to attend his 
appeal in court. The Hong Kong Government said in a statement 
yesterday they were seeking more information on the case, while 
top official in charge of territory affairs, Lu Ping, maintained 
that the sentence was not overly stiff. Beijing's Intermediate 
People's Court confirmed yesterday that Xi, in his 30s, had been 
sentenced to 12 years in prison for "spying and stealing state 
secrets", and stripped of political rights for another two years. 
  It also confirmed that Xi's "main accomplice", Tian Ye, a 
clerk at the People's Bank of China, had been sentenced to 15 
years in prison. "Xi has already appealed the sentence to the 
Higher People's Court," the spokesman added. An official of 
Beijing's Higher People's Court confirmed yesterday that Xi's 
appeal was being processed. But she refused to say when the 
case was to be heard. 
  Analysts in Beijing said the Draconian sentences were 
designed to act as a strong warning to Hong Kong journalists not 
to report on confidential documents and for government employees 
not to provide classified information to journalists. 
  Saying that the sentence was "out of proportion and 
unacceptable", HKJA vice chairman Kevin Lau Chun-to said 
yesterday the 12-year jail term was unjustified because the 
Chinese State Security Act allowed very loose interpretation of 
the meaning of "state secret." 
  "Xi Yang was in the course of normal news gathering. No 
serious damage to China's state interest can be discerned," Mr 
Lau said. "The Chinese Government had never alleged any 
involvement of corruption or spying activities. In these 
circumstances, the sentences given to Xi Yang and Tian Ye are 
unreasonable and unproportional." Mr Lau said that this case 
was an alarming sign to journalists because China's definition 
of, state secrets was very arbitrary. And since the whole 
process was conducted in secret, there was no guarantee of a 
fair trial, a right recognised by the Universal Declaration of 
Human Rights of which China was also a signatory, he added. 
  HKJA chairman Li Yuet-wah said the low profile of Ming Pao 
in 
dealing with the case was partly responsible for Xi's heavy 
sentence. It was an atmosphere in which employers did not want 
to speak up for their employees, she said. 
  A group of journalists will petition the local Xinhua (New 
China News Agency) office today for the immediate release of Xi 
and to respect press freedom. In an open letter to Chinese 
premier Li Peng, these journalists said they believed Xi was 
only doing normal reporting and had no intention to "steal" any 
state secrets. They urged the Chinese Government to understand 
the working style of Hong Kong journalists and respect freedom 
of the press. 
  Vowing full support for Xi and his family, Ming Pao said in 
a 
statement yesterday that the ruling was both "deplorable and 
very regrettable". Denouncing Xi's charge as ambiguous and the 
sentence heavy, Ming Pao said that "all this is bound to hamper 
Hong Kong news organisations' efforts to report on China 
on-the-spot to shake any faith in Hong Kong's post-1997 free 
press and to harm China's image among the Hong Kong people". It 
demanded Xi's appeal to be heard as soon as possible. 
  Xi's father, still in hospital after suffering a heart 
attack 
upon hearing of his son's heavy sentence, said he would write 
letters to Hong Kong Affairs Advisers, Hong Kong National 
People's Congress and Chinese People's Political Consultative 
Committee (CPPCC) members seeking help. 
  Law Cheung-kwok, newly-appointed deputy to the CPPCC, said 
he 
was liaising with other CPPCC members to reflect their opinion 
in a letter to the Ministry of Justice and the CPPCC chairman. 
"We will ask them to give a full account of Xi's case and will 
appeal to the mainland authorities for a lenient treatment," Mr 
Law said adding that the penalty was too heavy. 
  Director of the Hong Kong and Macao Affairs, Lu Ping, said 
12 
years imprisonment was not a heavy penalty for offenders on such 
charges. He also said Hong Kong reporters should not worry if 
they did normal news gathering on the mainland. 
  The Hong Kong Government released a statement yesterday 
calling the verdict "disappointing". 
  [Hong Kong EASTERN EXPRESS in English on 5 April carries a 
similar report on page 1 which adds the following: "Lu Ping, 
director of the Hong Kong and Macao Affairs Office, said 
yesterday that the 12-year jail term imposed on a Hong Kong 
journalist was `not too heavy.' `Xi Yang had not come to 
report,' he said. `He came to pry into state secrets.' 
  [`The sentence will not affect Hong Kong reporters' normal 
reporting work. You (Hong Kong reporters) don't have such a 
problem.'"] 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-1981 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "drchi065_s_94001" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-CHI-94-065 </AU>
Daily Report 
<DATE1>  12 Mar 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> Northeast Region </F>
<H3> <TI>   Northeast Works To Protect Water Resources </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Northeast Works To Protect Water Resources </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   OW1203144994 Beijing XINHUA in English 1326 GMT 12 Mar 94 </F>
<F P=103> OW1203144994 </F>
<F P=104>  Beijing XINHUA </F>
<F P=105>  English </F>


<TEXT>
BFN 

<F P=106> ["Roundup"] </F>
  [Text] Changchun, March 12 (XINHUA) -- Shoals of fish have 
returned to the Songhua River in Jilin Province, where the water 
turned black and aquatic products died out two decades ago due 
to heavy pollution. 
  "This is the result of local governments' efforts to protect 
the water resources," said Wang Yongrong, chairman of the 
Songhua and Liaohe River Valley Water Conservancy Committee 
under the Ministry of Water Resources. 
  "Progress has been made in protecting the water resources of 
the Songhua and Liaohe Rivers, one of China's seven key water 
systems, alongside the rapid economic development," the chairman 
noted. 
  China's water resource volume ranks sixth in the world. 
However, average consumption per capita in China is only 
one-fourth the world's average, falling in 88th place. 
  Northeast China, where the Songhua and Liaohe Rivers flow, 
suffers severe shortages of water resources. The average per 
capita consumption of the surface water is only one-half the 
country's average. 
  Northeast China consists of Heilongjiang, Jilin and Liaoning 
Provinces and the Inner Mongolia Autonomous Region. 
  To clean up the pollution and protect the water resources, 
the central government set up a leading group in charge of the 
protection of the Songhua River in 1978. 
  In 1987, the group was expanded from members from 
Heilongjiang and Jilin Provinces and six ministries to include 
representatives from northeast China's provinces and one 
autonomous region and 12 ministries and commissions under the 
central government, and its jurisdiction was enlarged to cover 
both the Songhua and the Liaohe Rivers. 
  Years of practice have proven such a trans-regional leading 
organization is effective in cleaning up and controlling 
pollution and protecting the water resources. 
  A survey shows that the group has ordered 173 enterprises in 
the Songhua and Liaohe River valley to clean up and control 
pollution, involving a sum of 560 million yuan. 
  By the end of last year, these enterprises had completed 200 
projects. 
  These projects are able to treat 309 million tons of waste 
water and reduce the discharge of 650,000 tons of pollutants a 
year into river. They earn 130 million yuan a year through 
recycling and re- using treated water. 
  While helping enterprises in the Songhua and Liaoning [as 
received] River valley to upgrade their technology to cut the 
discharge of mercury into the rivers, the central government and 
Heilongjiang and Jilin Provincial governments have allocated 
special funds to make an epidemiological investigation before 
working out related regulations and measures to protect the 
rivers. 
  According to the regulations, any organization or enterprise 
that violates the set limit for discharging waste water into the 
rivers will be fined. 
  In addition, cities are encouraged to improve their 
environment and make recycled use of treated waste water. 
  Liaoning, China's key industrial province, has launched a 
"water cleaning project" to protect the water resources, improve 
the water environment and save industrial-use water. 
  Governments of Heilongjiang, Liaoning and Jilin Provinces 
and 
the Inner Mongolia Autonomous Region are taking joint efforts to 
monitor the water quality of the Songhua and Liaohe Rivers in 
winter, when water quality tends to deteriorate. 
  They also are carrying out international cooperation and 
exchange in this field. 
  Officials and experts in environmental protection of 
northeast China have paid a visit to Japan to learn from the 
latest achievement and technology in the study and treatment of 
mercury, and extended cooperation with the United States in 
treating organic pollution. 
  They are also striving to gain international cooperation and 
donations for environmental protection. 
  Yan Keqiang, deputy minister of water resources, has 
encouraged people in northeast China to continue their efforts 
to protect the water resources by saying, "we are determined to 
harness and protect the Songhua and Liaohe River system and all 
other major river systems in China." 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-1982 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "drchi065_s_94002" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-CHI-94-065 </AU>
Daily Report 
<DATE1>  22 Mar 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> Northeast Region </F>
<H3> <TI>   Heilongjiang's Xie Yong on Public Security Work </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Heilongjiang's Xie Yong on Public Security Work </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   SK2403133994 Harbin Heilongjiang People's Radio Network in 
Mandarin 1000 GMT 22 Mar 94 </F>

<F P=103> SK2403133994 </F>
<F P=104>  Harbin Heilongjiang People's Radio Network </F>
<F P=105>  Mandarin </F>


<TEXT>
BFN 

  [Text] Xie Yong, vice chairman of the provincial people's 
congress standing committee and secretary of the provincial 
commission on politics and law, was interviewed by reporter of 
Heilongjiang Radio Station during the time when he attended the 
second session of the eighth National People's Congress [NPC]in 
Beijing. He said: Public security comprehensive management 
work, whether good or bad, will directly affect the success or 
failure in reform. Without stability as a guarantee, nothing can 
be accomplished. 
  According to Xie Yong's introduction, our province will base 
on the guidelines of the NPC session and the national Chinese 
People's Political Consultative Conference session to strengthen 
public security comprehensive management work and proceed the 
work from six aspects in an effort to guarantee the creation of 
a good social environment for reform and economic construction. 
These six aspects of work are: 1. Urge leaders at all levels to 
assume responsibility over public security comprehensive 
management work, define the specific responsibilities on 
grasping public security comprehensive management work of the 
party and government leaders at all levels and the specific 
methods of supervision, restraint and award in line with the 
specific rules issued by the province earlier this year. 2. 
Enhance the degree of dealing blows to criminals and strengthen 
its social effect. This year Heilongjiang province will 
continue to carry out the work of dealing strict blows to 
criminals with an emphasis in cracking major cases, dealing 
blows to criminal cliques, and capturing escaped criminals in an 
effort to check the upward trend of major and appalling cases. 
3. Eliminate repulsive social phenomena and consolidate the 
cultural markets. 4. Strengthen control over the crime 
development trend, intensify socialized security defense work, 
and further raise the level of socialized security defense in 
all places across the province. 5. Strengthen education and 
settlement of people who have been reformed through labor or 
education, and help and educate delinquents who have done 
misdeeds. 6. Give priority to improving areas and neighborhoods 
with disorderly public security situation. 
  Xie Yong said: To fundamentally guarantee social stability, 
it is not realistic to rely only on the efforts of the public 
security, judicial, and procuratorial departments. All social 
sectors, particularly the party and government leaders, should 
also exert efforts, set examples with their own conduct and with 
the work of their own departments and units, and strive to 
eliminate all sorts of corrupt and unfair distribution problems 
which the people are much concerned about. In addition, we must 
proceed the work from the formulation of systems and establish 
and improve supporting reform measures to promote social 
stability. The establishment of the socialist market economic 
structure is a profound social reform, which will inenvitably 
bring some social vibrations. In order to reduce 
contradictions, we must step up efforts to establish and improve 
all supporting reform measures. 
  Xie Yong believed that it is necessary to encourage all 
social sectors to use funds at their disposal to run all kinds 
of economic entities and industries, to gradually set up and 
develop all forms of labor markets, and to establish a complete 
set of social security systems, such as the unemployed insurance 
system, old-age pension insurance system, medical insurance 
system, and workers' injury insurance system, which are well 
coordinated with the new labor and distribution system so as to 
eliminate people's trouble back at home. 
  Xie Yong said at the end of his speech: It is also necessary 
to try by all possible means to consolidate the mass security 
defense teams in the urban and rural areas, resolutely solve the 
issue that the formulation of laws can not catch up with the 
public security situation, and form a situation in which all 
levels and sectors jointly grasp and manage public security work 
in line with law. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-1983 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "drchi065_k_94001" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-CHI-94-065 </AU>
Daily Report 
<DATE1>  5 Apr 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> NATIONAL AFFAIRS </F>
<F P=101> Political &amp; Social </F>
<H3> <TI>   Zhu Rongji on `Stern Punishment' of Xi Yang </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Zhu Rongji on `Stern Punishment' of Xi Yang </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   HK0504041694 Hong Kong MING PAO in Chinese 5 Apr 94 p a1 </F>
<F P=103> HK0504041694 </F>
<F P=104>  Hong Kong MING PAO </F>
<F P=105>  Chinese </F>


<TEXT>
BFN 

  [Text] Lu Kang, a senior journalist [fomerly of Hong 
Kong], held that the Xi Yang incident was not an affair only 
concerning Xi Yang alone; nor was it an affair only concerning 
MING PAO. Instead, it was an affair concerning the future of 
Hong Kong's mass media as a whole. So it must not be taken 
lightly. 
  He proposed that the mass media in Hong Kong should stand up 
to argue strongly on just grounds against the Beijing 
authorities, because news freedom is not something being 
bestowed by the authorities but something that people must 
strive for on their own. 
  Lu Kang revealed that according to sources in Beijing, the 
CPC authorities originally did not intend to severely punish Xi 
Yang, but Vice Premier Zhu Rongji strongly demanded that stern 
punishment be meted out to Xi Yang, because Zhu had to establish 
his personal authority while his macro-control policy 
encountered resistance from various quarters. Thus, the case of 
news coverage turned into a political case. Lu Kang pointed out 
that such behavior of haphazardly changing the law according to 
the will of an individual leader was never favorable to the 
nation and was extremely wrong. Zhu Rongji himself also made an 
extremely bad impression on the public. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-1984 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "drchi065_k_94002" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-CHI-94-065 </AU>
Daily Report 
<DATE1>  17 Mar 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> NATIONAL AFFAIRS </F>
<F P=101> Political &amp; Social </F>
<H3> <TI>   Li Peng Issues Rules on Teaching Achievements </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Li Peng Issues Rules on Teaching Achievements </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   OW0504112094 Beijing XINHUA Domestic Service in Chinese 0534 
GMT 17 Mar 94 </F>

<F P=103> OW0504112094 </F>
<F P=104>  Beijing XINHUA Domestic Service </F>
<F P=105>  Chinese </F>


<TEXT>
BFN 

  [Text] Beijing, 17 Mar (XINHUA) -- Premier Li Peng signed 
State Council Decree No. 151 of the People's Republic of China 
on 14 March, promulgating the "Regulations on Commending 
Achievements in Teaching." According to the State Council 
Decree, the "Regulations" will come into force upon promulgation. 
  The 16-article "Regulations" mainly introduce specific 
provisions and rules on commending achievements in teaching. 
The "Regulations" point out: Formulating the regulations is to 
reward collectives and individuals who have scored achievements 
in teaching; to encourage educators to conduct studies on 
education and teaching; and to improve the level of teaching and 
the quality of schooling. Achievements in teaching mentioned in 
the "Regulations" represent a teaching program which reflects 
the creative, original, and practical law of education and 
teaching; and is effective in improving the level of teaching 
and the quality of education and achieving the target of 
training qualified personnel. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-1985 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "drchi065_o_94002" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-CHI-94-065 </AU>
Daily Report 
<DATE1>  4 Apr 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> REGIONAL AFFAIRS </F>
<F P=101> East Region </F>
<H3> <TI>   Anhui Constructs Eight New Coal Mines </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Anhui Constructs Eight New Coal Mines </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   OW0404095594 Beijing XINHUA in English 0716 GMT 4 Apr 94 </F>
<F P=103> OW0404095594 </F>
<F P=104>  Beijing XINHUA </F>
<F P=105>  English </F>


<TEXT>
BFN 

  [Text] Hefei, April 4 (XINHUA) -- Anhui, one of China's 
key energy-producing provinces, is boosting local coal industry. 
  Provided with convenient transport facilities, Anhui began 
to 
develop local coal mines in the early 1980s in addition to the 
expansion of state coal mines. It spent about 200 million yuan 
constructing eight mines last year. 
  The local coal mines still under construction will have a 
combined production capacity of 4.92 million tons upon 
completion. 
  With rich coal reserves, Anhui's local mines turned out 
10.09 
million tons of coal last year. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-1986 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "drchi065_o_94003" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-CHI-94-065 </AU>
Daily Report 
<DATE1>  28 Mar 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> REGIONAL AFFAIRS </F>
<F P=101> East Region </F>
<H3> <TI>   Fujian Governor Discusses Government Work </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Fujian Governor Discusses Government Work </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   HK0504065794 Fuzhou Fujian People's Radio Network in 
Mandarin 2300 GMT 28 Mar 94 </F>

<F P=103> HK0504065794 </F>
<F P=104>  Fuzhou Fujian People's Radio Network </F>
<F P=105>  Mandarin </F>


<TEXT>
BFN 

  [Text] The provincial people's congress and people's 
government held a joint meeting yesterday afternoon. The 
participants exchanged views on the province's work progress and 
pledged to make a success of this year's work. 
  Provincial Governor Jia Qinglin began by briefing the 
participants on this year's provincial people's government work. 
He stated: By following the guiding principle formulated by 
the central authorities of firmly grasping opportunities, 
deepening reform, expanding opening up, promoting development, 
and maintaining stability, the provincial people's government 
has correctly handled relations between reform, development, and 
stability, conscientiously implemented and carried out many 
important policy decisions made by the CPC Central Committee and 
the State Council in light of the provincial realities, smoothly 
pushed ahead with all sorts of work, and comprehensively 
furthered all types of reforms in accordance with a series of 
arrangements made by the provincial party committee. As a 
result, he noted, Fujian has enjoyed sustained, rapid, and 
healthy economic growth, as well as social and political 
stability. 
  Provincial Governor Jia Qinglin also briefed the meeting 
participants on the progress of drafting the provincial people's 
government work report. 
  Yuan Qitong, provincial people's congress standing committee 
vice chairman, also delivered a speech in which he asserted: 
The provincial people's congress standing committee is 
satisfied with and fully affirms the work done by the provincial 
people's government, higher people's court, and people's 
procuratorate this year. 
  Comrade Yuan Qitong also briefed the meeting participants on 
the provincial people's congress work achievements in 1993, a 
basic train of thought for the provincial people's congress 
standing committee work in 1994, and a series of major work 
arrangements for this year. He also put forth some proposals on 
how to improve and enhance the provincial people's government 
work in 1994. 
  The joint meeting was attended by Su Changpei, Liu Yongye, 
and Song Jun, provincial people's congress standing committee 
vice chairmen; Yang Jianzhang and Zhang Jiakun, provincial 
people's government vice governors, and some others. 
  Invited to attend the joint meeting as guests were persons 
in 
charge of the provincial higher people's court and people's 
procuratorate. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-1987 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "drchi065_o_94004" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-CHI-94-065 </AU>
Daily Report 
<DATE1>  4 Apr 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> REGIONAL AFFAIRS </F>
<F P=101> East Region </F>
<H3> <TI>   Fujian Develops Land Use Market, Sets Standards </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Fujian Develops Land Use Market, Sets Standards </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   OW0404140594 Beijing XINHUA in English 1055 GMT 4 Apr 94 </F>
<F P=103> OW0404140594 </F>
<F P=104>  Beijing XINHUA </F>
<F P=105>  English </F>


<TEXT>
BFN 

  [Text] Fuzhou, April 4 (XINHUA) -- East China's Fujian 
Province, which has taken the lead in the development of a land 
use right market in China, is now taking measures to standardize 
land price control. 
  The first plot of state-owned land was leased out in the 
province in 1988. 
  By the end of last year, the province had leased out 454 
plots -- 635 hectares -- in cities and towns, and had received 
5.4 billion yuan from the leases. 
  In small towns and market places in the province, about 60 
hectares of land were also leased, raising 200 million yuan. 
  In addition, Fujian has approved opening up 101 square 
kilometers with total investment 2.65 billion U.S. dollars. 
  For the development, the province set land price standards 
for leasing land in cities and towns. 
  Some 53 counties and cities in the province have by now set 
up land price appraisal committees. 
  The province also set up 13 land price appraisal centers and 
two specialized land asset markets. 
  The Fuzhou specialized land asset market has completed 
appraisal of 60 specific land prices; the funds reached 1.3 
billion yuan. 
  Ye Wenjian, director of Fujian Provincial Land 
Administration, said that Fujian will perfect the system for 
setting standards for land prices and enhance supervision and 
control of land prices. 
  He said that the provincial government will also formulate 
regulations to supervise and manage land-price agencies so as to 
promote normal exchanges in the land market. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-1988 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "drchi065_t_94001" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-CHI-94-065 </AU>
Daily Report 
<DATE1>  17 Mar 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> Northwest Region </F>
<H3> <TI>   Region Actively Works To End Poverty </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Region Actively Works To End Poverty </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   OW1703055594 Beijing XINHUA in English 0504 GMT 17 Mar 94 </F>
<F P=103> OW1703055594 </F>
<F P=104>  Beijing XINHUA </F>
<F P=105>  English </F>


<TEXT>
BFN 

  [Text] Beijing, March 17 (XINHUA) -- More than nine million 
poor people in Northwest China have cast off poverty over the 
past eight years thanks to government efforts, the "ECONOMIC 
INFORMATION NEWS" reported today. 
  Northwest China includes Gansu, Shaanxi and Qinghai 
Provinces, and the Ningxia Hui and Xinjiang Uygur Autonomous 
Regions, where many people still had a per capita share of less 
than 200 kg of grain a year and cash income below 200 yuan in 
the early 1980s, due to historical, natural and economic 
conditions. 
  During the 1986-1990 period the central government expanded 
its allocation of funds to help the poor areas, where local 
governments focused on improving farmland to raise output, 
moving people from ecologically deteriorated areas to areas with 
better living conditions, and organizing labor to contract for 
projects outside, in line with actual conditions. 
  While organizing farmers to undertake farmland capital 
construction to boost grain output, local governments encouraged 
local people to grow more cash crops and breed more domestic 
animals, including sheep and long-haired rabbits, in line with 
their local conditions and the market needs. 
  Yanan Prefecture, in Shaanxi Province, produced 860 million 
yuan-worth of tobacco, fruit, sheep and potatoes last year, 
accounting for two-thirds of its gross agricultural output value. 
  Haidong Prefecture, Qinghai Province, has built four 
commodity production bases for oil-bearing crops, broad beans, 
cattle and sheep, and long-haired rabbits respectively; and the 
poor areas in Gansu Province have set up a number of processing 
industrial bases for fruit, traditional herbal medicine, carpets 
and embroidery. 
  A survey shows that Northwest China's provinces and regions 
have sponsored many technical training courses specially for 
farmers, and sent agro-technicians to help popularize 
cultivation under plastic sheeting, intercropping and 
water-saving irrigation techniques. 
  About 500,000 people living in Xiji, Guyuan and Haiyuan 
Counties in southern Ningxia and Dingxi County in Gansu 
Province, where natural conditions are harsh, have been moved to 
the irrigated areas in the valley of the Yellow River, China's 
second longest such after the Chang Jiang River, over the past 
decade. 
  "With government aid, these people settled down in the areas 
in the first two years and began to make both ends meet in the 
third year," the paper said. 
  To help people in the remote mountainous areas to live 
better 
lives, Haidong Prefectural Government has encouraged local 
people to set up manufacturing plants outside the prefecture by 
using local raw materials. 
  So far, the prefecture has 26 such industrial enterprises, 
which generate a gross output value totalling 40 million yuan a 
year. 
  In addition, Northwest China's provinces and regions have 
organized labor forces in the poor villages to carry out labor 
services in a planned way. 
  Southern Ningxia has sent about 200,000 rural laborers to 
urban areas to contract for construction and other manual work, 
and obtained more than 100 million yuan in remittances a year. 
  Farmers in Qinan County, Gansu Province, have set up 53 
share- holding co-operative businesses, and the Xinjiang Uygur 
Autonomous Region has boosted border trade to help poor people 
in the border areas improve their lives. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-1989 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "drchi065_t_94002" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-CHI-94-065 </AU>
Daily Report 
<DATE1>  3 Mar 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> Northwest Region </F>
<H3> <TI>   Gansu Secretary Speaks at Provincial Meeting </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Gansu Secretary Speaks at Provincial Meeting </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   HK1003044494 Lanzhou Gansu People's Radio Network in 
Mandarin 2300 GMT 3 Mar 94 </F>

<F P=103> HK1003044494 </F>
<F P=104>  Lanzhou Gansu People's Radio Network </F>
<F P=105>  Mandarin </F>


<TEXT>
BFN 

  [Excerpt] At a provincial propaganda and ideological work 
meeting held in Lanzhou yesterday morning, Provincial Party 
Committee Secretary Yan Haiwang stressed that propaganda and 
ideological work should provide effective ideological insurance 
and stable mass relations to support reform, development, and 
conversion. 
  Yan Haiwang said, in the course of studying and implementing 
the spirit of the national conference on propaganda and 
ideological work, we must incorporate the realities of our 
thinking and work, must deepen our understanding of the spirit 
and guiding significance of the speeches made by the central 
leading comrades, including Jiang Zemin, and must strengthen the 
sense of pressure and responsibility in doing a good job of our 
work. All localities should properly perform the various tasks 
in propaganda and ideological work. 
  Yan Haiwang said: It is imperative to exert efforts to grasp 
work in several aspects: First, it is imperative to grasp the 
study of the Selected Works of Deng Xiaoping, Volume Three 
firmly and well as a basic ideological foundation and 
consciously guide all our work with the theory on building 
socialism with Chinese characteristics. Second, it is imperative 
to do a good job in propaganda and ideological work on the 
presentation of important reform measures centering around 
quickening the pace of building the socialist market economic 
structure and do a good job in guiding, protecting, and giving 
play to the mass enthusiasm for reform. 
  Third, it is necessary to augment education in ideology and 
morality with patriotism, collectivism, and socialism as the 
core, and enthusiastically promote the spirit of emancipating 
the mind, being bold at blazing new trails, the spirit of taking 
the bull by the horns, and struggling hard amid difficulties. 
We must do away with the practice of avoiding contact with the 
outside world; instead, we must advocate the spirit of opening 
up in a comprehensive way. We must promote building material as 
well as spiritual civilization across Gansu to mount another new 
plane. Fourth, it is necessary to go all out to do a good job of 
the Fourth Chinese Art Festival to ensure the further success of 
art and literature. [passage omitted] 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-1990 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "drchi065_k_94015" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-CHI-94-065 </AU>
Daily Report 
<DATE1>  1 Apr 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> NATIONAL AFFAIRS </F>
<F P=101> Political &amp; Social </F>
<H3> <TI>   Beijing Radio Inaugurates Literary, Art Station </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Beijing Radio Inaugurates Literary, Art Station </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   OW0404132094 Beijing XINHUA Domestic Service in Chinese 0432 
GMT 1 Apr 94 </F>

<F P=103> OW0404132094 </F>
<F P=104>  Beijing XINHUA Domestic Service </F>
<F P=105>  Chinese </F>


<TEXT>
BFN 

  [Text] Beijing, 1 Apr (XINHUA) -- The Beijing People's 
Broadcasting Station is inaugurating a Literary and Art Station 
today. 
  The Literary and Art station is a comprehensive radio 
station 
broadcasting literary and art programs. Its daily 19-hour 
transmission includes music, drama, literature, and quyi [folk 
art forms including ballad singing, story telling, comic 
dialogues, clapper talks, cross talks, etc]. Among its 
programs, the "serialized radio drama," "daily cross talks," and 
"story telling in the air" are broadcast in lively popular forms 
to the delight of listeners. 
  The Beijing Literary and Art Station, along with the News 
Station, Music Station, Traffic Station, and Children's Station, 
is affiliated to the Beijing People's Radio Broadcasting 
Station. Its frequency is FM 87.6 megahertz. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-1991 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "drchi065_k_94016" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-CHI-94-065 </AU>
Daily Report 
<DATE1>  19 Mar 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> NATIONAL AFFAIRS </F>
<F P=101> Political &amp; Social </F>
<H3> <TI>   NONGCHUN SHENGHUO BAO To Start Publication Soon </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    NONGCHUN SHENGHUO BAO To Start Publication Soon </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   HK0504070794 Beijing NONGMIN RIBAO in Chinese 19 Mar 94 p 1 </F>
<F P=103> HK0504070794 </F>
<F P=104>  Beijing NONGMIN RIBAO </F>
<F P=105>  Chinese </F>


<TEXT>
BFN 

<F P=106> [By reporter Chen Daian (7115 0108 1344): "NONGCHUN </F>
SHENGHUO BAO (RURAL LIFE) To Start Publication Soon"] 
  [Text] With the approval of the PRC Press and Publications 
Administration, the NONGMIN RIBAO office is to run NONGCHUN 
SHENGHUO BAO, which caters to the rural areas, cities, and towns 
across China, while giving prominence to guidance, service, and 
practical value. The paper is to start circulation on 1 July. 
  The targeted readers of NONGCHUN SHENGHUO BAO are peasants, 
rural cadres, and residents of cities and towns. The purpose of 
NONGMIN SHENGHUO BAO is to render service to the material, 
social, and spiritual life of peasants, rural cadres, and 
residents in cities and towns. 
  The tasks of NONGCHUN SHENGHUO BAO are to cover important 
trends, "hot spots," and bottlenecks in people's lives; provide 
the people with new concepts, knowledge, and information; 
promptly reflect the voice and requirements of reform; work hard 
to propagate new ideas and social atmosphere and make selfless 
contributions to improving people's livelihood; and brief 
overseas people on healthy lifestyles, customs, and habits. 
  NONGMIN SHENGHUO BAO is to be published in two and four 
pages. It will be a weekly, published every Friday, and 
circulated at home and overseas. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-1992 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "drchi065_k_94017" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-CHI-94-065 </AU>
Daily Report 
<DATE1>  31 Mar 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> NATIONAL AFFAIRS </F>
<F P=101> Political &amp; Social </F>
<H3> <TI>   Statistics on Living Standards of Peasants </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Statistics on Living Standards of Peasants </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   SK0504092094 Beijing XINHUA Domestic Service in Chinese 2102 
GMT 31 March 94 </F>

<F P=103> SK0504092094 </F>
<F P=104>  Beijing XINHUA Domestic Service </F>
<F P=105>  Chinese </F>


<TEXT>
BFN 

<F P=106> [By Reporter Lu Yongjian (7773 3057 1696) and Correspondent </F>
Sun Jiwei (1327 4949 0251)] 
  [Text] Beijing, 1 Apr (XINHUA) --According to the latest 
information from China's rural social economic investigation 
team, on the basis of witnessing a slight increase in the income 
of peasant households, the living standards of peasants in China 
also improved by a large margin in 1993, the average per capita 
expenditure of peasants on living expenses was 778.7 yuan, an 
increase of 119.7 yuan, or 18.2 percent, over the 1992. If the 
rise of prices was factored in, the actual increase was 3.9 
percent. 
  Based on a sample survey among 67,000 peasant households in 
29 provinces, in 1993, the money which Chinese peasants spent on 
food increased by 19 percent over 1992 and reached 451.4 yuan. 
If the rise of prices was factored in, the actual increase was 
6.2 percent. The expenses on grain, pork, poultry, and eggs all 
increased to some extent. 
  The increase in the expenditure on clothing was not so rapid 
as the increase in the expenditure on foods. The expenditure on 
clothing increased by 5.4 percent and reached 55.3 yuan, showing 
an actual increase of 1.6 percent over 1992. Of this, the 
expenditure on cotton clothing declined by 10 percent and that 
of chemical fabrics increased by 9.5 percent. 
  Since 1990, the craze in building houses has slowed down 
every year. In 1993, peasants' spending on housing noticeably 
declined, and each peasant spent an average of 56.6 yuan in 
housing, a decline of 16.9 percent from the previous year, thus 
marking the biggest decline in the spending on housing during 
recent years. In this connection, the number of new houses 
built by rural residents during 1993 decreased by 7.3 percent 
from 1992. 
  A sharp contract to the slowdown in the housing craze was 
that peasants' expenditure on buying household equipment and 
daily necessities increased quite rapidly. In 1993, the average 
per-capita expenditure of rural residents on buying household 
equipment and daily necessities was 44.9 yuan, an increase of 
8.2 yuan, or 22.5 percent, over 1992, and the actual increase 
was 14.7 percent. Judging from the purchasing volume, the 
increase in the purchase of refrigerators, sewing machines, and 
washing machines was quite rapid. 
  In addition, the average per capita expenditure of peasants 
on medical treatment and health care, communications and 
telecommunications, and cultural and recreational articles 
increased to a fairly great extent, and reached 27.4 yuan, 17.5 
yuan, and 58.9 yuan respectively, or an increase of 13.6 
percent, 43.1 percent, and 34.6 percent respectively over 1992. 
In this way, the living expenses of peasants in China in 1993 
were arranged in the order of foods, housing, education, 
clothing, household equipment and daily necessities, medical 
treatment, communications, and others. 
  Specialists from relevant departments have reminded us that 
we should notice the gap between the expenditures of rural 
residents on consumption and that of urban residents, and that 
the radio between them has reached 1:2.7. In addition, there is 
also a fairly big gap between the degree of improvement in the 
living standards of peasants in different localities. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-1993 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "drchi065_k_94018" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-CHI-94-065 </AU>
Daily Report 
<DATE1>  6 Apr 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> NATIONAL AFFAIRS </F>
<F P=101> Political &amp; Social </F>
<H3> <TI>   Correction -- Compact Disc of Zhou Enlai Speeches Released </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Correction -- Compact Disc of Zhou Enlai Speeches Released </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   OW0504004194 </F>
<F P=103> OW0504004194 </F>
<F P=104></F>



<TEXT>
BFN 

    The following corrections pertains to the editorial report 
headlined Compact Disc of Zhou Enlai Speeches Released, 
published in the 4 April China DAILY REPORT, page 28: 
  Page 28, Column 2, third paragraph, last sentence, make 
read: 
...Wu Jieping, both vice chairmen of the National People's 
Congress Standing Committee and latter was... (changing titles 
and name of organization). 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-1994 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "drchi065_t_94003" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-CHI-94-065 </AU>
Daily Report 
<DATE1>  28 Feb 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> Northwest Region </F>
<H3> <TI>   Gansu Secretary Completes Tour of Dingxi </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Gansu Secretary Completes Tour of Dingxi </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   HK0903073894 Lanzhou Gansu People's Radio Network in 
Mandarin 2300 GMT 28 Feb 94 </F>

<F P=103> HK0903073894 </F>
<F P=104>  Lanzhou Gansu People's Radio Network </F>
<F P=105>  Mandarin </F>


<TEXT>
BFN 

  [Text] Provincial Secretary Yan Haiwan concluded his 
four-day investigation of the work to combat drought and 
undertake spring plowing in Dingxi Prefecture today. He 
stressed the need to consolidate and develop the accomplishments 
of Dingxi and Longxi Counties and quicken the pace in getting 
rid of poverty and becoming comparatively well-off. 
  Yan Haiwan indicated that it was necessary to consolidate 
and 
develop the accomplishments of Dingxi and Longxi Counties, 
continue to spread their good experiences and practice, widen 
the train of thought on building Dingxi and Longxi under the new 
situation of quickening the pace to realize the goal of becoming 
comparatively well-off, deepen rural reform, and develop 
enterprises in townships and towns in a big way. He said it was 
necessary to accelerate the export of labor so that Dingxi could 
steadily resolve the problem of acquiring sufficient food and 
clothing in the next few years, with some of its populace 
achieving the goal of becoming comparatively well-off, while 
getting rid of poverty in a comprehensive way. 
  In addition, Yan Haiwan required doing a good job of 
tackling 
key projects in supporting the impoverished by focusing efforts 
on resolving a number of key projects by fully relying on the 
masses. Key projects such as water conservancy work, road 
building, and energy resources should be determined accurately 
and grasped firmly. As soon as projects are determined, efforts 
should be exerted to have them completed in a down-to-earth way. 
In tackling key projects in supporting the impoverished, 
attention should be paid to education in science and technology, 
bringing up rural qualified people in doing practical work, 
spreading rural applied science and technical know-how in a big 
way, and developing rural education. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-1995 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "drchi065_t_94004" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-CHI-94-065 </AU>
Daily Report 
<DATE1>  3 Apr 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> Northwest Region </F>
<H3> <TI>   Former Gansu Official's Son Executed After Outcry </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Former Gansu Official's Son Executed After Outcry </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   HK0304081894 Hong Kong AFP in English 0808 GMT 3 Apr 94 </F>
<F P=103> HK0304081894 </F>
<F P=104>  Hong Kong AFP </F>
<F P=105>  English </F>


<TEXT>
BFN 

  [Text] Beijing, April 3 (AFP)--The son of a former Chinese 
provincial police chief was executed for drug trafficking, after 
a superior court overturned a more lenient sentence that had 
provoked a public outcry, a report said Sunday [3 April]. Quan 
Xiaoyong, a member of the railway police force and son of the 
former chief of police in the northern province of Gansu, was 
sentenced to death and executed after a suspended death sentence 
handed down two years ago by an intermediate court was 
overturned. 
  Quan was a leading member of a 17-strong drug trafficking 
ring brought to trial in 1992 in the provincial capital of 
Lanzhou, the China Prosecution Daily said. While four leaders 
of the gang were sentenced to death and executed, Quan received 
a suspended death sentence, sparking public accusations of 
favouritism because of his family and professional connections, 
the newspaper said. 
  The provincial authorities ordered an investigation into the 
case, which took 18 months and resulted in the recent decision 
by the province's Superior People's Court to overturn the 
original judgement and sentence Quan to death. The same court 
also overturned a not-guilty verdict handed down to Li Jian, the 
son of a senior Gansu party official, who had been accused of 
acting as an accomplice to the gang's activities. The superior 
court sentenced Li to six months imprisonment. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-1996 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "drchi065_t_94005" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-CHI-94-065 </AU>
Daily Report 
<DATE1>  1 Mar 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> Northwest Region </F>
<H3> <TI>   Gansu Sends Cadres to Rural, Impoverished Areas </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Gansu Sends Cadres to Rural, Impoverished Areas </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   HK1103102794 Lanzhou Gansu People's Radio Network in 
Mandarin 2300 GMT 1 Mar 94 </F>

<F P=103> HK1103102794 </F>
<F P=104>  Lanzhou Gansu People's Radio Network </F>
<F P=105>  Mandarin </F>


<TEXT>
BFN 

  [Excerpts] The Gansu Provincial CPC Committee has decided 
to transfer more than 10,000 provincial, prefectural, and county 
cadres to rural areas and to some enterprises that are 
encountering difficulties so as to help these areas and 
enterprises in their work. Yesterday afternoon [1 March], the 
provincial party committee and government held a mobilization 
meeting on transferring cadres to grass-roots units to help 
these units in their work. The meeting was presided over by 
Vice Governor Yang Huaixiao, member of the provincial party 
committee standing committee. Sun Ying, deputy secretary of the 
provincial party committee, made an important speech at the 
meeting in which she said: The main task of cadres transferred 
to grass-roots units is to help some areas with better 
conditions gradually achieve small-scale prosperity; to help 
some areas that basically have solved the problem of having 
sufficient food and clothing to move toward a relatively 
comfortable lifestyle; to help those comparatively poor and 
backward areas where conditions are hard to do a good job in 
work to support the impoverished, so they can escape poverty and 
become rich; and to help some enterprises that are encountering 
difficulties to turn from deficits to profits and enhance their 
economic results. In the meantime, in accordance with the 
demand of the central authorities and the State Council, we will 
carry out experimental reform work on a trial basis in selected 
enterprises with the aim of establishing a modern enterprise 
system so as to promote in an all-round manner sustained, rapid 
and healthy economic development in both urban and rural areas. 
[passage omitted] 
  In conclusion, Sun Ying stressed: Cadres who are transferred 
to grass-roots units to help with the work there must do their 
work in a down-to-earth manner. This must be regarded as a key 
point in their work. They must do some practical work that 
truly can benefit the local masses. In the meantime, owing to 
the fact that a large number of cadres from various fronts are 
involved and that time is pressing while our tasks are 
strenuous, various localities and units must truly strengthen 
leadership in accordance with the unified arrangements made by 
the provincial authorities, and must do a conscientious job in 
transferring cadres, and fulfill their tasks with quality and 
quantity guaranteed. 
  Provincial leaders who attended the meeting included: Yan 
Haiwang, Lu Kejian, (Sun Xiaozheng), (Shi Zhongyuan), (Luo Tao), 
(Liang Peizhen), and responsible comrades from departments, 
sections, commissions and bureaus directly under provincial 
authorities, as well as from people's organizations, 
universities and colleges, scientific research units, factories, 
mines, and enterprises, and from units of the central 
authorities based in Lanzhou. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-1997 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "drchi065_t_94006" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-CHI-94-065 </AU>
Daily Report 
<DATE1>  16 Mar 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> Northwest Region </F>
<H3> <TI>   Residents Along River in Gansu Grow Prosperous </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Residents Along River in Gansu Grow Prosperous </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   OW1603084094 Beijing XINHUA in English 0712 GMT 16 Mar 94 </F>
<F P=103> OW1603084094 </F>
<F P=104>  Beijing XINHUA </F>
<F P=105>  English </F>


<TEXT>
BFN 

  [Text] Lanzhou, March 16 (XINHUA) -- More and more 
residents of northwest China's Gansu Province are now becoming 
better off with the construction and operation of hydroelectric 
power stations on the upper and middle reaches of the Yellow 
River. 
  Local farmers in drought-hit areas such as Yongjing County, 
Dongxiang Autonomous County, Gaolan County and Lanzhou city have 
built pumping facilities with cheaper electricity generated by 
nearby hydroelectric power stations on the Yellow River. 
  According to local officials, the pumping projects have 
irrigated about 133,000 ha [hectare] of farmland along the 
river. More than 300,000 local residents, who used to have to 
fetch drinking water from wells or rivers far away, are now able 
to drink clean water from the Yellow River, which used to be 
called "China's sorrow". 
  With stable irrigation, some of the areas, such as Jingtai, 
Gaolan, Jingyuan and Yuzhong Counties and Baiyin city have 
developed into high-yield production centers of grain. 
  Jingtai County used to depend on an average of 1.34 million 
kg of grain allocated and moved in from other parts of the 
country each year before the Jingtaichuan Electrical Pumping 
Project was completed in the locality. Now, farmers in the 
county sell 7.5 million kg of surplus grain to the central 
government annually besides reserving enough grain for 
themselves. 
  More than 100,000 residents from other drought-stricken 
areas 
of the province have moved to areas within the irrigation range 
of the Yellow River. 
  Lanzhou, the provincial capital, and Baiyin city, one of the 
country's leading production bases of nonferrous metals, have 
gone a step further; they have made good use of the vast areas 
of tidal zones along the river and have built 1,000 ha of fish 
ponds, which turn out 1,900 tons of freshwater fish a year. 
  Moreover, farmers around Baiyin have also developed some 
2,000 ha of quality rice fields and 2,670 ha of orchards on the 
banks of the Yellow River. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-1998 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "drchi065_t_94007" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-CHI-94-065 </AU>
Daily Report 
<DATE1>  12 Mar 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> Northwest Region </F>
<H3> <TI>   Ningxia High-Tech Zone Said Developing Quickly </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Ningxia High-Tech Zone Said Developing Quickly </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   OW1203094494 Beijing XINHUA in English 0707 GMT 12 Mar 94 </F>
<F P=103> OW1203094494 </F>
<F P=104>  Beijing XINHUA </F>
<F P=105>  English </F>


<TEXT>
BFN 

  [Text] Yinchuan, March 12 (XINHUA) -- The high-tech 
development zone in Yinchuan, capital of northwest China's 
Ningxia Hui Autonomous Region, has developed quickly since being 
launched in May 1992. 
  Sources from the zone authority said it had registered 332 
enterprises by the end of last year. These enterprises involve 
a total capital of 560 million yuan, of which 220 million yuan 
is overseas investment. 
  In 1993, these enterprises produced an industrial output 
value of 50 million yuan, of which 79 percent was by 
overseas-funded enterprises. 
  The overseas-funded enterprises in the zone exported 2.17 
million U.S. dollars worth of products in 1993. This amounted 
to 40 percent of the export value of all the overseas-funded 
ventures in the region in the same period. 
  So far nearly 70 million yuan has been invested in the zone, 
developing 100 ha of land and office buildings totalling 120,000 
square meters in floor space have been constructed. 
  According to plan, by the year 2000, the zone will stretch 
3.7 sq km, attracting 90 high-tech enterprises and producing an 
annual industrial output value of one billion yuan. 
  The sources believe that Ningxia's rich resources in 
minerals 
and energy contributed greatly to the initial success of the 
Yinchuan High-Tech Development Zone. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-1999 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "drchi065_t_94008" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-CHI-94-065 </AU>
Daily Report 
<DATE1>  11 Mar 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> Northwest Region </F>
<H3> <TI>   Ningxia Increases Construction of Market Mechanisms </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Ningxia Increases Construction of Market Mechanisms </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   OW1103144194 Beijing XINHUA in English 1401 GMT 11 Mar 94 </F>
<F P=103> OW1103144194 </F>
<F P=104>  Beijing XINHUA </F>
<F P=105>  English </F>


<TEXT>
BFN 

  [Text] Yinchuan, March 11 (XINHUA) -- Northwest China's 
Ningxia Hui Autonomous Region has made active efforts to 
accelerate its construction of market mechanisms. 
  According to officials with the regional administration of 
industry and commerce, a network of commodities markets of 
various kinds has been formed in Ningxia, one of China's 
relatively undeveloped provinces. 
  At present, large and medium-sized state-owned commercial 
wholesale firms in the region handle wholesale and retail 
businesses at the same time. Local large commercial retail 
stores have adopted various forms of the responsibility system 
in operation, while half of the small commercial shops, which 
make up 80 percent of the region's total number of commercial 
centers, have introduced flexible management methods, with the 
central government as the owner of fixed assets. 
  Last year, the autonomous region, with more than 30,000 
commercial organizations, achieved 4.3 billion yuan in turnover 
from retail trade. 
  So far, the autonomous region has also built 261 rural and 
urban free markets, as well as 31 markets of means of 
production, with 60,000 households engaging in such businesses. 
  While the autonomous region has been making efforts to 
invigorate commodities markets, markets of finance, technology, 
labor and real estate have also come into existence. Last year, 
the autonomous region issued 800 million yuan in valuable papers 
and 30 million yuan in shares, and swapped 20 million U.S. 
dollars through the markets. 
  The autonomous region has issued licenses for the 
establishment of 300 technological and trade organizations and 
non-governmental scientific research units. 
  The business volume at the technological markets hit 230 
million yuan last year. Technology trading has also helped 
launch 80 percent of the region's projects on "Spark program," 
designed to use practical skills to promote local economy, 
transform outdated technology and enhance economic efficiency. 
  The officials said 80,000 people have found jobs with the 
help of various labor organizations. 
  While stepping up market construction, the autonomous region 
has worked out a series of local rules and regulations to 
standardize market operations and ensure a healthy development 
of the market, in accordance with relevant laws of the central 
government and compatible with local conditions. 
  Last year, more than 80 percent of the region's farm 
products 
and by-products, as well as 70 percent of its means of 
production, were traded through markets, said the officials. 
  Ningxia has also made active efforts to win over 
international aid and preferential loans, while luring more 
overseas investors to sink their money into the region. 
  So far, about 300 foreign-funded enterprises have been set 
up 
in the autonomous region, involving a use of 120 million U.S. 
dollars in foreign investment. 
  Meanwhile, the autonomous region has expanded its business 
overseas. Besides setting up six enterprises in foreign 
countries, the region has signed contracts concerning 
contracting foreign projects and exports of labor involving 60 
million yuan. A total of 240 kinds of local products have 
entered the international market. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-2000 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "drchi065_t_94009" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-CHI-94-065 </AU>
Daily Report 
<DATE1>  13 Feb 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> Northwest Region </F>
<H3> <TI>   Ningxia Reports 1993 Industrial Growth Figures </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Ningxia Reports 1993 Industrial Growth Figures </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   HK3103100294 Yinchuan NINGXIA RIBAO in Chinese 13 Feb 94 p 1 </F>
<F P=103> HK3103100294 </F>
<F P=104>  Yinchuan NINGXIA RIBAO </F>
<F P=105>  Chinese </F>


<TEXT>
BFN 

<F P=106> [By the Industrial and Communications Department of the </F>
Regional Statistical Bureau: "Remarkable Industrial 
Achievements Made by Ningxia in 1993"] 
  [Text] In 1993, all levels of government and the regional 
departments concerned strengthened their organized scheduling 
and guidance over industrial production. At the same time, 
industrial enterprises strove to overcome the effect caused by 
such unfavorable factors as financial strain, soaring raw 
material prices, and insufficient transportation capacity, by 
deepening their internal reform. Taking the market as a guide, 
they vigorously readjusted their product mix and organizational 
structure, promoted technical transformation, tapped potentials, 
and cut down on raw material consumption. As a result, the 
industrial output value for the whole region topped 10 billion 
yuan for the first time, and economic efficiency increased 
remarkably. In this way, our region realized the goal of 
increasing output value, sales, profits, and taxes 
simultaneously, thus laying a good foundation for further 
development. 
  Production passed into the realm of accelerated development. 
According to preliminary statistics, our region's total 
industrial output value reached 12.08 billion yuan in 1993. 
With the price factor included, it increased by 13.9 percent 
over 1992. The industrial output value of the industries run by 
townships and above stood at 11.28 billion yuan, an increase of 
12.1 percent. At the same time they were increasing their 
production, enterprises speeded up new product development and 
product structure adjustments to increase their value. In 1993 
all industrial enterprises that practice independent accounting 
run by townships and above increased their output value by 3.22 
billion yuan, an increase of 43.4 percent over the previous year. 
  There was good linkup between production and sales. At the 
same time that industrial enterprises in our region were firmly 
grasping production, they were also developing and broadening 
their various sales promotion activities to improve the linkup 
between production and sales. In 1993 the industrial 
enterprises at the township level and above realized total 
industrial sales of 11 billion yuan. With the price factor 
included, sales increased by 13.5 percent. The product selling 
rate stood at 97.6 percent, an increase of 2.2 percentage points 
over 1992. This surpassed the national average rate by 1.2 
percentage points. The product selling rate of big and 
medium-sized enterprises was as high as 99.1 percent. 
  Efficiency as a whole picked up, and there was remarkable 
improvement in enterprise management and operation. In 1993, 
all the industrial enterprises that practice independent 
accounting in the region succeeded in raising output value and 
sales income by 43.6 percent and 55.1 percent, respectively. 
Their profits and taxes increased by 54.7 percent over 1992, 
reaching an all-time high. Profits were 184 million yuan, 2.4 
times that of 1992. In particular, the big and medium-sized 
enterprises that occupy leading positions achieved great results 
in turning losses into gains. Sixty-nine enterprises, with a 
deficit of 9.33 million yuan in 1992, realized a surplus of 122 
million yuan in 1993. Their profits and taxes stood at 700 
million yuan, increasing by 82.9 percent over 1992, which 
accounted for 71.1 percent of the total profits and taxes of all 
industrial enterprises that practice independent accounting, an 
increase of 11.2 percent over 1992. Their efficiency improved, 
as did their capital utilization result. The reproduction cycle 
tended to be normal, the input-output level was strengthened, 
and the comprehensive economic index improved. In 1990, the 
comprehensive economic efficiency index of industrial 
enterprises that practice independent accounting in our region 
stood at 76.7 percent, rising by nearly 10 percentage points 
over 1992. Looking at six different indexes, their results were 
better than those in 1992, with the exception of the industrial 
added value rate. The comprehensive economic efficiency index 
of big enterprises reached 82.2 percent, increasing by 13.5 
percentage points over 1992. The big enterprises surpassed the 
levels of industrial enterprises that practice independent 
accounting of the whole region in four out of the six indexes. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-2001 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "drchi065_t_94010" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-CHI-94-065 </AU>
Daily Report 
<DATE1>  19 Mar 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> Northwest Region </F>
<H3> <TI>   Farming Conditions Improve in Ningxia Poor Areas </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Farming Conditions Improve in Ningxia Poor Areas </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   OW1903163994 Beijing XINHUA in English 1247 GMT 19 Mar 94 </F>
<F P=103> OW1903163994 </F>
<F P=104>  Beijing XINHUA </F>
<F P=105>  English </F>


<TEXT>
BFN 

  [Text] Yinchuan, March 19 (XINHUA) -- Improved farming 
conditions are helping farmers escape the grip of poverty in 
Xihaigu area, in north-west China's Ningxia Hui Autonomous 
Region, a senior official said here today. 
  Guo Zhanyuan, director of the Regional Committee for 
Agricultural Development, said that since 1982, a massive 
farmland improvement campaign has increased the area's irrigated 
farmland by more than 30,000 ha and ordinary farmland by 120,000 
ha. 
  Compared with ten years ago, the farmland per person in the 
area has risen from less than 0.06 ha to 0.12 ha in 1993, and 
the grain output for each person went up from 92 kg to 275 kg. 
  In the same period, the average income for each farm 
increased from 126 yuan to 375 yuan a year. 
  With a population of 2.1 million in an area of 39,000 square 
km, Xihaigu was once one of the poorest areas in China, due to 
poor farming conditions caused by dry climate, infertile soil 
and severe water loss and soil erosion. 
  Seeing that improving the farming conditions was critical to 
the fight against poverty, the local government launched a 
massive campaign to create more irrigated farmland and to 
transform broken hillsides into larger pieces of terraced land. 
  The larger and flatter pieces of land are not only easier to 
cultivate, they also retain more water and reduce erosion of 
soil and fertilizers, and can therefore increase grain output by 
one half. 
  Encouraged by the initial success, the farmland improvement 
campaign is proceeding on a larger scale and with better 
planning. More and more bulldozers are being used. 
  Guo Zhanyuan said the area plans to create 200,000 ha of new 
farmland in ten years, so that the area of farmland per person 
will rise to 0.2 ha. 
  If that goal is achieved, the area's population will be able 
to get rid of poverty completely, Guo said. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-2002 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "drchi065_t_94011" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-CHI-94-065 </AU>
Daily Report 
<DATE1>  19 Mar 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> Northwest Region </F>
<H3> <TI>   Education Project Helps Improve Ningxia Literacy </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Education Project Helps Improve Ningxia Literacy </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   OW1903161994 Beijing XINHUA in English 1331 GMT 19 Mar 94 </F>
<F P=103> OW1903161994 </F>
<F P=104>  Beijing XINHUA </F>
<F P=105>  English </F>


<TEXT>
BFN 

  [Text] Yinchuan, March 19 (XINHUA) -- There are now 
180,000 more adults who can read in northwest China's Ningxia 
Hui Autonomous Region -- thanks to a three-year farmer's 
education and training project implemented there to help rural 
residents out of illiteracy. 
  The ten-year project aims to wipe out illiteracy and improve 
the overall talents of rural people in this comparatively 
backward region of the country. 
  Previously, illiterate people aged between 14 and 40 made up 
22 percent of the 4.8 million rural population of the autonomous 
region. 
  During the past three years, local government has earmarked 
six million yuan to set up 2,158 cultural and scientific 
schools, 2,800 popular science associations and 200-plus 
specialized technique societies for local farmers. 
  Some 318,000 rural people have participated in literacy 
classes and 180,000 of them can now read and write. 
  Two million farmers have learned some farming techniques 
that 
can help them make more money, thanks to the fruitful work of 
training programs offered by the project. 
  All over the region, more than 20,000 local teachers and 
technicians have enthusiastically taken part in the project and 
work with much patience and devotion. 
  The Asia-Pacific Committee of the United Nations 
Educational, 
Scientific and Cultural Organization has also provided 
assistance to the widely-praised project. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-2003 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "drchi065_t_94012" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-CHI-94-065 </AU>
Daily Report 
<DATE1>  5 Mar 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> Northwest Region </F>
<H3> <TI>   Qinghai Provincial Congress Session Concludes </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Qinghai Provincial Congress Session Concludes </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   HK1703143094 Xining Qinghai People's Radio Network in 
Mandarin 2300 GMT 5 Mar 94 </F>

<F P=103> HK1703143094 </F>
<F P=104>  Xining Qinghai People's Radio Network </F>
<F P=105>  Mandarin </F>


<TEXT>
BFN 

  [Excerpts] The seven-day Second Session of the Eighth 
Qinghai Provincial People's Congress successfully concluded in 
the Qinghai People's Auditorium on the morning of 5 March. 
[passage omitted] 
  Those attending and sitting in the front row at the rostrum 
at the closing ceremony today were the session presidium 
executive chairmen, including Huanjue Cenam, Yang Maojia, Ma 
Wending, Gaisang Doji, Ma Shiqing, Cai Dan, and Wang Enke. 
  Also sitting at the rostrum as guests were the provincial 
party committee, government, Chinese People's Political 
Consultative Conference committee, and military district 
leaders; the locally stationed troops' leaders; the provincial 
higher people's court and people's procuratorate leaders; the 
provincial deputies to the Eighth National People's Congress; 
the provincial people's congress standing committee leaders; the 
provincial party committee and government departments leaders; 
the locally based central units leaders; the provincial-level 
undertakings and people's organizations leaders; some of the 
county-level or city-level people's congresses standing 
committee leaders; and a number of retired veteran leaders. 
  At 0900 in the morning, Sun Zhaoran, the presidium executive 
chairman of the Second Session of the Eighth Qinghai Provincial 
People's Congress, declared the fourth meeting of the Second 
Session of the Eighth Qinghai Provincial People's Congress open. 
[passage omitted] 
  The fourth meeting adopted the following documents: 
  1. Resolution on Qinghai Provincial People's Government Work 
Report; 
  2. Resolution on Qinghai Provincial National Economic and 
Social Development Report 1993 and Qinghai Provincial National 
Economic and Social Development Plan 1994; 
  3. Resolution on Qinghai Provincial Financial Estimates 
Implementation Report 1993 and Qinghai Provincial Financial 
Revenue and Expenditure Plan 1994; 
  4. Resolution on Qinghai Provincial People's Congress 
Standing Committee Work Report; 
  5. Resolution on Qinghai Provincial Higher People's Court; 
  6. Resolution on Qinghai Provincial People's 
Procuratorate Work Report. 
  The fourth meeting maintained: Over the past year, the 
Qinghai Provincial People's Government has conscientiously 
implemented the spirit of the Eighth Qinghai Provincial CPC 
Congress and the spirit of the First Session of the Eighth 
Qinghai Provincial People's Congress. It has successfully 
mobilized and organized the people of all nationalities in 
Qinghai to emancipate the mind, quicken the pace of reform and 
opening up, overcome difficulties, work hard, and live a plain 
life. The result has been that Qinghai has enjoyed rapid 
economic growth, political stability, nationality solidarity, 
and social progress and has basically accomplished the tasks and 
attained the goals outlined at the First Session of the Eighth 
Qinghai Provincial People's Congress. 
  The fourth meeting said: The Qinghai Provincial Government 
Work Report has realistically summed up the Qinghai Provincial 
Government work in 1993, has pointed out the existing problems, 
and has analyzed both the difficulties hampering Qinghai's 
economic growth and the favorable conditions under which Qinghai 
will tide over the difficulties. The Qinghai Provincial 
Government Work Report is bound to exert a positive impact on 
such aspects as improving and strengthening the people's 
government work and mobilizing the people of all nationalities 
in Qinghai to grasp opportunities, stand up to new challenges, 
and make concerted efforts to strive for new victories. 
  The fourth meeting pointed out: The year 1994 is the fourth 
year of the Eighth Five-Year Plan as well as a crucial year for 
pushing ahead with the province's comprehensive reform and 
making some major breakthroughs in this connection. The Qinghai 
Provincial Government Work Report has charted a clear-cut 
guiding ideology, has outlined explicit tasks, and has worked 
out efficient and feasible measures that are commensurate with 
the realities in Qinghai. This year, as the province is bound 
to undertake arduous and urgent reform tasks, the people's 
governments at all levels in Qinghai should strive to further 
heighten understanding, expeditiously build a socialist market 
economic structure, meticulously organize people to actively and 
properly handle problems and contradictions that crop up in the 
course of reform, and see to it that all sorts of reforms will 
go ahead smoothly. 
  They should also attach great importance to agriculture and 
animal husbandry, should vigorously develop township and town 
enterprises, should raise funds through all possible channels, 
should increase inputs in resource exploitation and 
infrastructure construction, should make constant efforts to 
readjust and optimize the market-oriented economic structure, 
should improve the quality of economic operations, should step 
up macroeconomic regulation and control, should place price 
hikes under control, and should make sound arrangements for the 
masses' livelihood. 
  The fourth meeting stressed: Social stability is an 
important guarantee for reform and development. Therefore, the 
people's governments at all levels throughout the province 
should firmly adhere to the principle of firmly grasping two 
major aspects of work simultaneously as well as consolidate and 
develop the political situation of stability and unity. 
  The fourth meeting finally called on people of all 
nationalities in Qinghai to unite closely, further emancipate 
the mind, forge ahead, open up new vistas, and strive to 
accomplish all tasks in 1994 under the leadership of the Qinghai 
Provincial CPC Committee! 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-2004 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "drchi065_t_94013" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-CHI-94-065 </AU>
Daily Report 
<DATE1>  4 Mar 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> Northwest Region </F>
<H3> <TI>   Qinghai Officials Visit Poor Muslim Families </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Qinghai Officials Visit Poor Muslim Families </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   HK0803153294 Xining Qinghai People's Radio Network in 
Mandarin 2300 GMT 4 Mar 94 </F>

<F P=103> HK0803153294 </F>
<F P=104>  Xining Qinghai People's Radio Network </F>
<F P=105>  Mandarin </F>


<TEXT>
BFN 

<F P=106> [Report by station reporter Zhang Henan] </F>
  [Text] On the eve of a traditional Muslim festival, 
provincial and Xining city leading members visited 14 poor 
Muslim households and presented them with flour, edible oil, and 
tea. On the morning of 4 March, Vice Governor La Bingli; Wu 
Youcai, director of the provincial civil affairs department; and 
Xining Mayor Liu Guangzhong separately visited some Muslim 
families in eastern, central, western and northern districts in 
Xining, and inquired about their living and work conditions. 
  In the eastern district, Vice Governor La Bingli heard about 
the living conditions of Ma Qiming, a helpless 78-year-old 
elder, and Zhao Lianfeng, a centenarian. La said that taking 
care of the elderly was the traditional virtue of the Chinese 
nation. It was imperative to do a good job of comforting and 
compensating the bereaved elderly and to resolve their 
difficulties so that they might lead a happy life in their old 
age. 
  It has been learned that to enable Muslims to spend the 
festival joyfully, civil affairs departments at the provincial 
and city levels delivered 500,000 yuan to poor Muslim households. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-2005 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "drchi065_t_94014" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-CHI-94-065 </AU>
Daily Report 
<DATE1>  5 Mar 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> Northwest Region </F>
<H3> <TI>   Qinghai Judicial Administrative Conference Ends </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Qinghai Judicial Administrative Conference Ends </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   HK1703145394 Xining Qinghai People's Radio Network in 
Mandarin 2300 GMT 5 Mar 94 </F>

<F P=103> HK1703145394 </F>
<F P=104>  Xining Qinghai People's Radio Network </F>
<F P=105>  Mandarin </F>


<TEXT>
BFN 

  [Text] In 1994, Qinghai's judicial administrative work is 
to focus primarily on maintaining political and social stability 
and boosting economic growth. 
  This is the exact message from a recently concluded 
provincial judicial administrative work conference. The 
conference, which concluded on 3 March, conscientiously summed 
up the province's judicial administrative work in 1993, 
deliberated a five-year provincial judicial administrative work 
program, and called for further strengthening the province's 
reform-through-labor and reeducation-through-labor work, 
improving the quality of prisoner transformation work, and 
enabling more prisoners to turn over a new leaf. 
  The conference also stressed successfully running special 
schools and called for building one or two model 
provincial-level special schools, strengthening production 
management and deepening the internal reform of the 
reform-through-labor and reeducation-through-labor enterprises, 
and increasing economic efficiency in this connection. 
  The conference stated: The province's judicial service 
should enhance the understanding of reform, intensify work with 
available resources, expand the social influence of lawyers, 
notaries, and the judicial service at the grassroots level, step 
up legal system propaganda and education, publicize market 
economic laws and commercial laws, and strengthen fruitful legal 
system education among primary and secondary school students and 
juveniles. 
  Provincial Vice Governor La Bingli attended the conference 
and delivered a speech in which he called on the people's 
governments at all levels in Qinghai to attach great importance 
to and strengthen leadership over judicial administrative work 
apart from successfully carrying out economic construction and 
to strive to create favorable conditions under which the 
province's judicial administrative work can develop. On the 
other hand, La Bingli noted, judicial administrative organs at 
all levels throughout the province should energetically build a 
strong police force to meet the province's reform and economic 
construction needs. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-2006 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "drchi065_t_94015" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-CHI-94-065 </AU>
Daily Report 
<DATE1>  3 Apr 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> Northwest Region </F>
<H3> <TI>   Cellular Mobile Phone Calls Available in Qinghai </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Cellular Mobile Phone Calls Available in Qinghai </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   OW0304042094 Beijing XINHUA in English 0314 GMT 3 Apr 94 </F>
<F P=103> OW0304042094 </F>
<F P=104>  Beijing XINHUA </F>
<F P=105>  English </F>


<TEXT>
BFN 

  [Text] Xining, April 3 (XINHUA) -- Cellular mobile 
telephone calls are now available in Xining, provincial capital 
of northwest China's Qinghai, following the recent installation 
of a cellular mobile telephone system in the city. 
  Telecommunications business concerning cellular mobile 
telephone calls is now within reach in all provincial capitals 
of the country, as Xining, the last city to start such services, 
switched on its system last Wednesday [30 March]. 
  The new cellular mobile telephone system in the city has the 
capacity to transmit 1,200 calls at one time. At present, the 
city already has 400 users of cellular phones. 
  Cellular mobile telecommunications services have been 
developing rapidly in China since October of 1987, when 
Guangzhou, capital of south China's Guangdong Province, took the 
lead to install and put into use a cellular mobile telephone 
system. 
  At present, the country's mobile telecommunications service 
has the capacity to transmit 1.56 million calls at one time. 
The industry now has 638,000 customers, with the group growing 
at a monthly speed of more than 30,000 clients, officials with 
the Ministry of Posts and Telecommunications told XINHUA. 
  They added that they are working hard on the implementation 
of a national scheme based on a nationwide automatic switching 
network, which was launched in March of 1993. 
  When the scheme is completed, customers with cellular phones 
will only have to go through a simple registration procedure in 
their home provincial capitals to use their portable units 
freely in any other provincial capitals. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-2007 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "drchi065_t_94016" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-CHI-94-065 </AU>
Daily Report 
<DATE1>  9 Mar 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> Northwest Region </F>
<H3> <TI>   Water Control Projects Benefit Qinghai Harvests </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Water Control Projects Benefit Qinghai Harvests </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   OW0903103994 Beijing XINHUA in English 0847 GMT 9 Mar 94 </F>
<F P=103> OW0903103994 </F>
<F P=104>  Beijing XINHUA </F>
<F P=105>  English </F>


<TEXT>
BFN 

  [Text] Xining, March 9 (XINHUA) -- Seven consecutive years 
of bumper grain harvests have been achieved in northwest China's 
Qinghai Province due to years of hard efforts in building water 
control facilities. 
  The province has limited precipitation and water resources. 
While ensuring a proper use of the existing water conservancy 
facilities, the province each year uses 80 percent of its 
development fund for building a group of water control works 
capable of storing water, preventing floods, irrigating farmland 
and generating electricity. 
  In the past four years, the province has constructed 800 
water control projects, including more than 2,000 km of 
irrigation channels. 
  Farming conditions have also been improved. For instance, 
the province has in the past four years created 124,000 hectares 
of terraced fields, reclaimed 26,664 hectares of farmland, 
enlarged the province's total irrigated area by 21,332 hectares, 
carried out comprehensive treatment of over 100 small river 
valleys, and planted 5,333 hectares of trees. 
  The efforts have not only guaranteed plenty of water for 
agricultural production, but also helped solve drinking water 
shortages for farmers, herdsmen and livestock in poverty-hit 
areas in eastern Qinghai and in areas around Qinghai Lake. 
  Small hydro-electric stations built in valleys of the Yellow 
River, Golmud River and Datong River have helped alleviate the 
shortage of electricity in nearby rural areas. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-2008 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "drchi065_t_94017" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-CHI-94-065 </AU>
Daily Report 
<DATE1>  3 Mar 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> Northwest Region </F>
<H3> <TI>   Xinjiang Congress Session Elects Chairman, Closes </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Xinjiang Congress Session Elects Chairman, Closes </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   OW3103142894 Urumqi XINJIANG RIBAO in Chinese 3 Mar 94 p 1 </F>
<F P=103> OW3103142894 </F>
<F P=104>  Urumqi XINJIANG RIBAO </F>
<F P=105>  Chinese </F>


<TEXT>
BFN 

<F P=106> [By reporter Jin Ruiyong (6855 3843 8673) -- "Second Session </F>
of Eighth Xinjiang Uygur Autonomous Regional People's Congress 
Concludes"] 
  [Text] The seven-day Second Session of the Eighth Xinjiang 
Uygur Autonomous Regional People's Congress closed victoriously 
on 2 March upon completing its agenda. 
  Under the guidance of Comrade Deng Xiaoping's theory of 
building socialism with Chinese characteristics and the party's 
basic line, and using reform and development as its main theme, 
the meeting extensively reviewed and summed up various tasks 
performed by the autonomous region in 1993. It conducted 
serious discussions on the current situation in the autonomous 
region, and on opportunities and superiorities for economic 
development and difficulties and problems facing relevant 
efforts. It discussed and planned the tasks and goal of 
struggle for the autonomous region in 1994 by taking into 
consideration the overall situation of seizing the opportunity, 
deepening reform, opening up wider, promoting development, and 
maintaining stability. It also held a by-election for the 
autonomous regional chairman and vice chairman, and Standing 
Committee members of the Eighth Xinjiang Uygur Autonomous 
Regional People's Congress. 
  The meeting called on all nationalities in the autonomous 
region to earnestly implement the guidelines of the Third 
Plenary Session of the 14th CPC Central Committee and the Sixth 
(Enlarged) Plenary Session of the Fourth Xinjiang Uygur 
Autonomous Regional Party Committee, to further emancipate their 
minds, to get a clear understanding of the situation, to seize 
opportunities, to unite as one, to arouse their enthusiasm, and 
to struggle hard to achieve long-term stability and rapid and 
highly efficient economic development [jing ji de kuai su gao 
xiao fa zhan 4842 3444 4104 1816 6643 7559 2400 4099 1455] in 
Xinjiang. 
  The closing ceremony held yesterday morning was presided 
over 
by Amudun Niyaz, who served as executive chairman of both the 
meeting and the presidium. Also serving as executive chairmen 
at the meeting were executive chairmen of the presidium Song 
Hanliang, Tomur Dawamat, Xie Fuping, Herdebai, Yusufu Muhanmode, 
Turbayim, Xu Peng, Ma Cunliang [7456 1317 0081], Xie Hong, 
Hu-ji-han Ha-ke-mo- fu [5170 0679 3352 0761 0344 5459 1133], 
A-mi-na A-pa-er [7093 4717 1226 7093 1584 1422], and Maimaiti 
Ismail. 
  Deputies of various nationalities at the meeting first 
elected A-bu-lai-ti A-bu-du-re-xi-ti [7093 0008 0171 2251 7093 
0008 6757 3583 6007 2251] as the autonomous regional chairman 
and Yusufu Aisha as the autonomous regional vice chairman by 
secret ballot at a by-election; Cao Guoqin (2580 0948 3830) and 
Ku-wa-da-li (1655 3907 6671 0500) were also elected as Standing 
Committee members of the Eighth Xinjiang Uygur Autonomous 
Regional People's Congress in the by-election. The deputies 
then voted by a show of hands to adopt, respectively, 
resolutions of the Second Session of the Eighth Xinjiang Uygur 
Autonomous Regional People's Congress on the government work 
report, on the report on the implementation of the autonomous 
regional economic and social development plan for 1993 and the 
draft plan for the autonomous regional economic and social 
development for 1994, on the report on the implementation of the 
autonomous regional budget for 1993 and the draft budget for 
1994, on the work report of the autonomous regional people's 
congress standing committee, on the work report of the 
autonomous regional higher people's court, and on the work 
report of the autonomous regional people's procuratorate. 
  After the voting, Abulaiti Abudurexiti, newly elected 
chairman of the autonomous region, delivered a speech to thank 
people's deputies of all nationalities for putting their trust 
in him. He said: Holding the important post of autonomous 
regional chairman and having the party and people putting their 
great trust in me make me feel that my responsibility has grown. 
He indicated that, under the correct leadership of the party 
Central Committee and the autonomous regional party committee, 
and with the support and help of people of all nationalities in 
the region, he will work hard to promote closer unity and mutual 
support between government bodies; give full play to collective 
wisdom and roles; and encourage the government bodies to be 
honest in performing official duties, to fulfill their duties 
and responsibilities, advance bravely as one, do solid work, 
work hard to complete all the government's tasks and goals of 
struggle, and live up to the great expections of the party and 
all nationalities in Xinjiang. 
  Present at the closing ceremony were leaders of the 
autonomous regional party, government, and army; the autonomous 
regional committee of the Chinese People's Political 
Consultative Conference; and the Xinjiang Production and 
Construction Corps Janabil, Zhang Fusen, Wang Lequan, Kayum 
Bawudun, Fu Bingyao [0265 4426 5069], Guo Gang, Zhou Guofu, 
Hailiqiemu Silamu, Li Fengzi, Abdurehim Amiti, Wang Yousan, 
Wu-fu-er A-bu-du-la [0710 3940 1422 7093 0008 6757 2139], Li 
Donghui, Mijiti Nasier, Rouzi Wushouer, Feng Dazhen, Yiblayan 
Rouzi, Mao Dehua, Di-ya-er Ku-ma-shi [6611 7161 1422 1655 7456 
0087], Wen Kexiao, Wang Shizhen, Han Youwen, Sha Ming [3097 
2494], Pa-xia Yi-xia [1584 1115 0181 1115], Ismail Mahsut, and 
Chen Zhong. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-2009 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "drchi065_t_94018" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-CHI-94-065 </AU>
Daily Report 
<DATE1>  3 Mar 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> Northwest Region </F>
<H3> <TI>   New Regional Chairman Abudurexiti Interviewed </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    New Regional Chairman Abudurexiti Interviewed </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   OW0204005594 Urumqi XINJIANG RIBAO in Chinese 3 Mar 94 p 1 </F>
<F P=103> OW0204005594 </F>
<F P=104>  Urumqi XINJIANG RIBAO </F>
<F P=105>  Chinese </F>


<TEXT>
BFN 

<F P=106> [By reporter Wu Yadong (0702 0068 2639): "Plant Our Feet on </F>
Solid Ground, Fulfill the Great Trust Placed in Us -- An 
Interview With Abulaiti Abudurexiti, Newly Elected Chairman of 
the Autonomous Region"] 
  [Text] "I will accomplish nothing without the support of 
the masses." This was the first sentence uttered by Abulaiti 
Abudurexiti, newly elected chairman of the Xinjiang Uygur 
Autonomous Region, during an interview with our reporter. His 
words lead us to believe he is a modest person. 
  Chairman Abulaiti Abudurexiti graduated from Xinjiang 
Engineering Institute in the 1960's and spent more than a decade 
at a drawing desk. His leadership and understanding of work 
concerning the overall situation gradually matured after he held 
the posts of autonomous regional planning commission chairman 
and autonomous regional vice chairman. The great trust placed 
in him by the party and people have made him feel that his 
responsibility is heavier now. He said: "The burden is 
heavier, but with the correct leadership of the party Central 
Committee and the autonomous regional party committee; with 
support and help from people of all nationalities in Xinjiang 
and veteran comrades who have accumulated rich experience; with 
the sound foundation laid and rich experience accumulated by 
previous governments which governed from the period of the 
autonomous region's founding to the time when Comrade Tomur 
Dawamat was in charge; and with the formation last year of the 
Eighth Xinjiang Uygur Autonomous Regional People's Government -- 
a good working body which is united, pragmatic, and full of 
fighting power -- we will be able to fulfill all tasks entrusted 
to us by the party and people by uniting closely, lending each 
other support, fully enhancing collective wisdom and functions, 
being honest in performing official duties, and fulfilling our 
duties and responsibilities." Chairman Abulaiti Abudurexiti 
smiled and was full of confidence. 
  After becoming autonomous regional vice chairman, Abulaiti 
Abudurexiti was put in charge of capital construction in the 
autonomous region. In the past few years he travelled from the 
north to south of Tian Shan to capital construction sites. Upon 
arrival, he would consult with relevant experts and scholars on 
technical questions concerning the construction projects, 
conducted inspections and surveys, and provided guidance at the 
sites. For a few months each year, he was busy rushing about 
among the grass roots. He therefore has a clear understanding 
of the extent of development of various undertakings in the 
autonomous region. He said: "During the transition from an old 
to a new system, a frontier ethnic minority region like ours, 
which has a weak foundation, will face some new conflicts and 
questions and many difficulties in reform, opening up, and 
economic development. Therefore, we should further emancipate 
our minds; take into consideration Xinjiang's realities when 
focusing on the central task of economic construction; fully 
arouse the enthusiasm of all sectors; enhance our natural 
resource assets and geographical superiority; consolidate and 
develop the political situation characterized by stability and 
unity; complete all tasks awaiting this government with one 
heart and one mind; and attain the objective of increasing the 
total annual value of goods and services for the autonomous 
region 5.66 times by 1997, in order to lay the foundation for 
increasing the total annual value eight times by the end of this 
century. 
  In conclusion, Chairman Abulaiti Abudurexiti indicated that 
he will, as always, use his pragmatic workstyle and do all he 
can to justify the great trust placed in him by people of all 
nationalities in the region, and show his gratitude for the 
people's support by producing actual results. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-2010 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "drchi065_t_94019" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-CHI-94-065 </AU>
Daily Report 
<DATE1>  30 Mar 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> Northwest Region </F>
<H3> <TI>   Xinjiang Establishes Telecommunication Network </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Xinjiang Establishes Telecommunication Network </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   OW3003081794 Beijing XINHUA in English 0753 GMT 30 Mar 94 </F>
<F P=103> OW3003081794 </F>
<F P=104>  Beijing XINHUA </F>
<F P=105>  English </F>


<TEXT>
BFN 

  [Text] Urumqi, March 30 (XINHUA) -- A wireless 
telecommunication network for animal husbandry production has 
been set up in northwest China's Xinjiang Uygur Autonomous 
Region. 
  As one of China's five biggest animal husbandry regions, 
Xinjiang has vast grasslands with over 100,000 herders leading 
nomadic lives. 
  As they are scattered over a wide area, it used to be 
difficult to transmit information about snow, drought and insect 
pests to them. In the past local herdsmen usually carried the 
information by horse or on foot and that caused losses to 
animals and property because of the time wasted. 
  In 1985 Xinjiang started construction of an animal husbandry 
telecommunications network. A total of of 260 wireless radio 
stations have been set up, with a total range covering over 
48,000 km. 
  Centered on Urumqi, capital of the region, the four-level 
network covers 51 counties and cities in 12 prefectures and part 
of townships and farms. 
  The network plays an important role in reducing natural 
disasters and the death rate of animals. 
  The network also broadcasts economic information, and 
knowledge of state policies and regulations. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-2011 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "drchi065_t_94020" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-CHI-94-065 </AU>
Daily Report 
<DATE1>  7 Mar 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> Northwest Region </F>
<H3> <TI>   TV Spreads Culture Among Kazak Herders in Xinjiang </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    TV Spreads Culture Among Kazak Herders in Xinjiang </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   OW1103172294 Beijing XINHUA in English 0651 GMT 7 Mar 94 </F>
<F P=103> OW1103172294 </F>
<F P=104>  Beijing XINHUA </F>
<F P=105>  English </F>


<TEXT>
BFN 

  [Text] Urumqi, March 7 (XINHUA) -- China's first cable 
television station in Kazak language was formally opened for 
service Sunday [6 March] in northwest China's Xinjiang Uygur 
Autonomous Region, another step in bringing modern culture to 
one of the world's last nomadic cultures. 
  The station will broadcast colorful locally-made or 
translated Chinese and foreign films, TV plays and other 
artistic programs in the Kazak language to about 500,000 viewers 
all over the Asia-Pacific region who have waved farewell to 
nomadic lives. 
  The 1.1-million Kazak population is mainly scattered in 
Xinjiang and Gansu Province. 
  Traditionally the Kazaks have lived on horseback, spending 
their whole lives moving about seeking pasture and water for 
their herds, totally cut off from basic education and health 
care facilities, not to mention advanced culture. 
  In recent years state and local governments have encouraged 
and helped more and more nomadic Kazaks to settle down and 
engage in the processing of livestock products instead of their 
single traditional pursuit of animal husbandry. 
  Along with efforts to stimulate local economy, governments 
at 
all levels have attached great importance to promoting 
traditional Kazak culture to satisfaction of the Kazak people's 
spiritual needs. 
  Broadcast and television have been cited to perform the 
task, 
having the advantages of being rapid, popular and vivid. 
  In 1989 the first Kazak-language TV news programs were 
beamed 
to the whole autonomous region, enabling Kazaks along both sides 
of the Tianshan Mountains to be well informed and entertain 
through a product of modern civilization for the first time in 
their lives. 
  Moreover, 24-hour Kazak-language TV broadcasting programs 
have been offered since the end of last year by the local 
regional TV station. 
  Traditional Khazak culture, including ancient poems, fairy 
tales, proverbs and mottoes, which used to be transmitted mainly 
by storytellers, has spread even wider among the Kazak people 
thanks to TV and radio broadcasts with distinct local flavors. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-2012 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "drchi065_n_94001" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-CHI-94-065 </AU>
Daily Report 
<DATE1>  4 Apr 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> Economic &amp; Agricultural </F>
<H3> <TI>   Inflation Reaches 39.3 Percent in 35 Largest Cities </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Inflation Reaches 39.3 Percent in 35 Largest Cities </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   HK0404083094 Hong Kong AFP in English 0821 GMT 4 April 94 </F>
<F P=103> HK0404083094 </F>
<F P=104>  Hong Kong AFP </F>
<F P=105>  English </F>


<TEXT>
BFN 

  [Text] Beijing, April 4 (AFP)--The cost of living in 
China's 35 largest cities rose in February from an average of 
25.9 percent the previous month to 39.3 percent, the State 
Bureau of Statistics reported Monday [4 April]. 
  The bureau, quoted by the Economic Daily [JINGJI RIBAO], did 
not specify which city had the highest price increases, but 
named 18 in which inflation registered between 26 percent and 
39.3 percent. 
  All of the 18 cities named were in the eastern half of the 
country, the majority of these in coastal areas with the notable 
exceptions of Xian and Urumqi. Conversely, nearly all the 
cities with inflation rates of less than 20 percent were in the 
interior. 
  Taking January and February together, the rate of inflation 
rose about 20 percent over the same period the previous year, 
and 25 percent year-to-year in the big cities, the report said. 
  Major contributors to February's roaring inflation included 
vegetables, grains, and seafood, which rose in price between 30 
percent and 53 percent. 
  In another report Monday, the China Youth Daily [ZHONGGUO 
QINGNIAN BAO] quoted the bureau as estimating March's urban 
inflation rate at not less than 20 percent. These statistics 
and predictions underline the difficult task facing the 
government, which had promised to keep inflation below 10 
percent for 1994. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-2013 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "drchi065_n_94002" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-CHI-94-065 </AU>
Daily Report 
<DATE1>  3 Apr 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> Economic &amp; Agricultural </F>
<H3> <TI>   Cities Experience Inflation </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Cities Experience Inflation </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   HK0404092694 Hong Kong ZHONGGUO TONGXUN SHE in Chinese 1034 
GMT 3 Apr 94 </F>

<F P=103> HK0404092694 </F>
<F P=104>  Hong Kong ZHONGGUO TONGXUN SHE </F>
<F P=105>  Chinese </F>


<TEXT>
BFN 

  [Text] Beijing 3 Apr (ZHONGGUO TONGXUN SHE)--The most 
recent statistics from the State Statistics Bureau show that in 
February this year, consumer prices increased by nearly 25.9 
percent in 35 large and medium cities across China over the same 
period last year, of which vegetable, grains, aquatic products, 
meat, poultry, and produce prices increased by the widest 
margin, ranging from 30 to 53.5 percent. 
  The statistics show that in February, foodstuffs prices 
soared the highest of rising resident's consumer prices at 31.7 
percent. Next was housing, which rose by 27.8 percent, and 
service charges, which rose by 25.8 percent. 
  The statistics show that consumer price rises varied in the 
35 large and medium cities, of which Haikou, Qingdao, Urumqi, 
Chongqing, Hefei, Nanjing, Ningbo, Tianjin, Dalian, 
Shijiazhuang, Wuhan, Nanchang, Fuzhou, Shenyang, Guangzhou, 
Xiamen, Xian, and Beijing had a price rise margin wider than the 
national average, ranging from 26 to 39.3 percent. Kunming had 
the lowest range of rises, 15.3 percent, and Shenzhen was next 
with a rise of 19 percent. 
  Economists indicated that halting the drastic rise in 
consumer goods prices should arouse the attention of all sides, 
and that it was especially imperative to firmly halt arbitrary 
price rises and rises caused by taking advantage of the 
situation. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-2014 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "drchi065_n_94003" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-CHI-94-065 </AU>
Daily Report 
<DATE1>  3 Apr 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> Economic &amp; Agricultural </F>
<H3> <TI>   Statistics Indicate Sharp Price Rises </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Statistics Indicate Sharp Price Rises </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   OW0404114194 Beijing XINHUA Domestic Service in Chinese 2115 
GMT 3 Apr 94 </F>

<F P=103> OW0404114194 </F>
<F P=104>  Beijing XINHUA Domestic Service </F>
<F P=105>  Chinese </F>


<TEXT>
BFN 

<F P=106> [By reporter Zhang Jinsheng (1728 6930 0524)] </F>
  [Text] Beijing, 3 Apr (XINHUA) -- The latest figures of 
the State Statistics Bureau indicate that the consumer price 
index [CPI] in 35 large and medium-sized cities across the 
country rose 25.9 percent in February over the same period last 
year. Vegetables, grains, aquatic products, meat and poultry, 
and meat and poultry by-products registered the greatest price 
rises, ranging from 30 to 53.5 percent. Economic experts 
pointed out that authorities should take the sharp price rises 
seriously. It is particularly important to firmly put a stop to 
arbitrary and speculative price hikes. 
  The statistics for February indicate that the CPI of 
"edible" 
items rose 31.7 percent in the 35 large and medium-sized cities, 
faster than any other categories. Of the food items, 
vegetables, grain, meat and poultry, and meat and poultry 
by-products saw the sharpest price rises; their prices rose by 
53.5, 39.9, 31.7, and 37 percent, respectively. Next was rents, 
which rose 27.8 percent, followed by services, which rose 25.8 
percent. Among the major categories of consumer goods that 
registered smaller price rises were transportation and 
communications equipment; medical and health care; household 
appliances and daily articles; recreational, educational, and 
cultural products; and clothing. The price rises in all of 
these categories were lower than the CPI average. 
  The statistics also showed the cities with a CPI higher than 
the national average: Haikou, Qingdao, Urumqi, Chongqing, Hefei, 
Nanjing, Ningbo, Tianjin, Dalian, Shijiazhuang, Wuhan, Nanchang, 
Fuzhou, Shenyang, Guangzhou, Xiamen, Xian, and Beijing. The CPI 
of these cities were between 26 to 39.3 percent. The cities 
with a CPI below the national average were: Kunming, Yinchuan, 
Xining, Shenzhen, Zhengzhou, Shanghai, Hohhot, Changchun, 
Harbin, Hangzhou, Changsha, Guiyang, Lanzhou, Chengdu, Taiyuan, 
Jinan, and Nanning. The CPI of Kunming and Shenzhen stood at 
15.3 and 19 percent, the lowest. 
  Experts pointed out that consumer price rises are a normal 
phenomenon since China started implementing the policy of reform 
and opening up. Some of the prices are, however, arbitrary and 
speculative; some units are seeking extraordinary profits by 
unfair means to enrich their small groups, thereby severely 
harming the interests of consumers. We must take resolute steps 
to put a stop to and punish such irregularities. At the same 
time, we should step up administration over prices, and enforce 
relevant state laws and regulations to ensure that consumers' 
interests are not infringed upon. This is the only way to 
ensure the smooth implementation of price reform and other 
reforms. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-2015 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "drchi065_n_94004" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-CHI-94-065 </AU>
Daily Report 
<DATE1>  4 Apr 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> Economic &amp; Agricultural </F>
<H3> <TI>   Commissions Outline Plans To Develop Scientific Sector </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Commissions Outline Plans To Develop Scientific Sector </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   OW0404110194 Beijing XINHUA in English 1041 GMT 4 Apr 94 </F>
<F P=103> OW0404110194 </F>
<F P=104>  Beijing XINHUA </F>
<F P=105>  English </F>


<TEXT>
BFN 

  [Text] Beijing, April 4 (XINHUA) -- China expects to set up 
a framework for a new science and technology system that will 
meet the requirements of a market economy drive at the turn of 
this century. 
  This goal has been set out in a document jointly issued by 
the State Science and Technology Commission and the State 
Commission for Restructuring the Economy. 
  China will first introduce a set of personnel, employment, 
medicare and old-age social security systems in high-tech 
development zones, pioneer cities singled out to experiment with 
new economic and scientific and technological reform measures, 
as well as in regions that have a large number of scientists and 
technicians. 
  A public housing fund for the benefit of young scientists 
and 
technicians will be initiated in scientifically and 
technologically- advanced areas so as to tackle worsening 
housing shortages. 
  According to the document, the central government will 
increase scientific and technological input in central and 
western China in a bid to narrow the widening economic gaps 
between those regions and the coastal areas. 
  China will also reinforce the scientific and technological 
muscle of small and medium-sized enterprises, rural and township 
undertakings and poverty-stricken rural areas, the document 
stressed. 
  It said that the central government is encouraging 
scientific 
research institutions to become technology-intensive modern 
enterprises. Well-positioned high-tech enterprises will be 
allowed to issue and list stocks in and outside the country, 
with shares in the form of technology allowed to account for as 
much as 30 percent of the total registered capital. 
  Meanwhile, foreign trade enterprises and scientific and 
technological bodies will be given the green light to organize 
multi-functional international commercial firms and foreign 
trade enterprise groups, according to the document. 
  It notes that China encourages scientific and technological 
departments to increase overseas capital and set up equity and 
cooperative ventures, scientific and technological businesses, 
as well as development funds for other industries. 
  According to the document, another development priority will 
be given to non-governmental scientific and technological 
undertakings. The government will choose some non-governmental 
high-tech enterprises to raise funds and invest abroad so as to 
help translate them into transnational companies. 
  To promote international cooperation, China will allow 
research institutes, institutions of higher education and 
enterprises with foreign trade rights to invest, run branches 
and engage in other activities abroad, such as research and 
development, production and marketing. 
  They are also allowed to jointly set up research institutes 
and laboratories with foreign partners. 
  At the same time, the document said, China allows and 
encourages overseas enterprises, organizations and individuals 
to set up technology-intensive enterprises and solely or jointly 
run, with their Chinese counterparts, research institutes, labs, 
experimental centres and other development projects. 
  Starting from this year, China will set up a new national 
award for research achievements in the agricultural sector. 
  China will also raise the salary standards for scientists 
and 
technicians to an internationally comparable level by the end of 
this century, without ceiling. 
  To make the bold reform measures a success, China will raise 
the national scientific and technological development and 
research fund to above 1.5 percent of the gross national product 
by the year 2000. 
  Meanwhile, China will promulgate a complete set of laws and 
regulations to guide the country's scientific and technological 
development. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-2016 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "drchi065_n_94005" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-CHI-94-065 </AU>
Daily Report 
<DATE1>  29 Mar 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> Economic &amp; Agricultural </F>
<H3> <TI>   Minister Urges Developing `Pillar Industries' </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Minister Urges Developing `Pillar Industries' </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   HK0404063094 Beijing RENMIN RIBAO in Chinese 29 Mar 94 p 2 </F>
<F P=103> HK0404063094 </F>
<F P=104>  Beijing RENMIN RIBAO </F>
<F P=105>  Chinese </F>


<TEXT>
BFN 

<F P=106> [Article by Chen Jinhua, minister of the State Planning </F>
Commission, from the "Grasp the Opportunity and Revitalize the 
Pillar Industries" column: "Motivate the National Economy To 
Improve Its Quality As a Whole"] 
  [Text] Editor's note: As set forth in the report of the 
14th Party Congress, we must "revitalize the engineering and 
electronics, petrochemical, automobile, and building industries 
to make them become the pillar industries of our national 
economy." This is a major strategic decision. In order to let 
you have a deeper understanding of the meaning of this decision 
as well as the current situation and development prospects of 
our country's pillar industries, probe into issues encountered 
in developing and revitalizing our country's pillar industries, 
and seek solutions, the economic desk of this newspaper and the 
Research Office of the State Planning Commission are jointly 
opening a special discussion column called "Grasp the 
Opportunity and Revitalize the Pillar Industries." We hope you 
all will pay attention to it. [end editor's note] 
  An important change in our country's economic development 
strategy for the 1990's is precisely to transform the extensive 
type of economic growth into an intensive one, to alter the 
current situation of industrial structure with a low level of 
processing, technology, and added value, and to speed up 
industrial modernization. Revitalizing pillar industries 
conforms precisely to this demand. The pillar industries are, 
in general, characterized as being technology-intensive and 
having a high degree of linkage with other industries and a high 
degree of income flexibility. The revitalization of pillar 
industries will definitely bring about the development of a 
number of interrelated industries and will help upgrade the 
overall quality of the national economy. 
  Revitalizing pillar industries is also a historical demand 
in 
line with our country's economic development. The high-speed 
growth of our country's agriculture and consumables industry in 
the 1980's played a vital role in supporting and promoting the 
development of the economy as a whole. In the 1990's, we must 
continue to advance our economic development to a new stage and 
have a new target for economic growth while maintaining the 
steady growth of agricultural production. It is the inevitable 
trend of economic development to select pillar industries as the 
new target for economic growth. Comrade Jiang Zemin once said 
that the electronics industry is the multiplier of the national 
economy. More national income can be created under the 
situation of a nonexistent or limited increase in resources 
investment by utilizing electronics technology to transform 
traditional industries and to develop high-technology products 
that save energy and resources. The electronics, engineering, 
automobile, and petrochemical industries have greater growth 
potential than other industries, and thus play a greater role in 
promoting the national economy. As demonstrated by the 
experience of some rising industrialized countries and regions, 
during the period of accelerating industrial development, only 
when these industries maintain a higher rate of growth can we 
advance the process of industrialization and modernization in 
giant strides. 
  The development of production must be in line with the 
changes in market demand. As far as consumption demand is 
concerned, our people now have adequate food and clothing and 
are moving toward having a relatively comfortable life. City 
and town dwellers' consumption of food, clothing, and durables 
has surpassed the average level of medium-income countries. 
However, our per capita consumption in transportation and 
communications makes us one of most backward countries in this 
area. In the 1990's, with constant economic growth, our 
people's standard of living will advance to another new stage. 
As consumption demand is becoming more and more diversified, 
and the field of consumption is constantly widening, the focus 
of consumption will gradually shift from the several major 
household appliances in the 1980's to a new generation of 
durables, including household communication products, household 
computers, houses, and cars. Due to such changes in consumption 
demand, the industries producing these commodities are being 
urged to speed up their development so that the industrial 
structure can adapt itself to changes in the consumption 
structure. As far as investment needs are concerned, with 
technological progress and the readjustment of the industrial 
structure, the demand for engineering and electronics products 
of high technical standards will maintain a high growth rate. 
In particular, integrated circuits, computers, program- 
controlled telephones, and other investment-type electronics 
products; cars, aircraft, ships, and other means of transport; 
and power-generating equipment, petrochemical facilities, 
ethylene, new building materials, and other industries of raw 
and processed materials have an extremely huge potential market. 
  At present, our country's key productive technology for the 
auto industry still has hardly any competitive power; with the 
huge growth of imports of large electrical engineering equipment 
for domestic use, greater and greater foreign trade deficits in 
electrical engineering products are being incurred; 
petrochemical industrial enterprises lack a large economic scale 
without a strong capability for developing high value-added 
products, such as refined petrochemical products; and buildings 
completed are of low grade and poor benefit. Due to the 
existence of these problems, our economy, after linking up with 
the international economy, will be at a disadvantage in the 
competition. Hence, we must have a sense of urgency and of 
crisis in developing the pillar industries. 
  To develop the pillar industries, we should attach 
importance to the role of industrial policy. The development of 
pillar industries has a number of prominent characteristics; 
that is, it proceeds in a centralized manner and on a large 
economic scale, and we cannot follow the beaten path of starting 
from primitive competition. All localities cannot "rush 
headlong into mass action" and develop these industries at the 
same time. The state must work according to the objective law 
of economic development, give play to the basic role of the 
market in resources distribution, and draw up long- and 
medium-term plans to coordinate the overall arrangements. 
  We must treat the expansion of exports as an important 
strategy for developing the pillar industries. As far as the 
development level of our countries's pillar industries is 
concerned, we still do not have the capability to get into the 
international market. Most of our exports are products of low 
quality and have low added value, which only represent a small 
proportion of international trade. The state must formulate a 
policy to focus on bolstering enterprises which possess key 
products, which are oriented toward the international market, 
which have strong competitive power, and which operate on a 
large scale, The state needs to build up a number of key 
industrial projects, of a high standard and on a large scale, 
for the international market. 
  Realizing an economy of scale in production and encouraging 
competition is an important link in developing the pillar 
industries. The scale of production and operation of our 
country's pillar industries falls short of international 
standards. Overall, the economy of scale has not taken shape. 
For example, international automobile production has reached 
the level of 2 million per year, whereas our country annual 
automobile production amounts to only 250,000. Due to defects 
in the system, enterprises in the realms of the pillar 
industries scatter and are engaged in production on a small 
scale, with a low degree of specialized supply of spare parts 
and a small output of low quality. Moreover, the phenomenon of 
repeated construction and production is quite serious. To 
develop the pillar industries, we must follow the law of large 
scale modernized production and insist on organizing our 
construction in accordance with the demand of economies of scale. 
  To develop the pillar industries, we must also properly 
handle the relationship between the utilization of foreign 
investment and the development of nationality industries. An 
important measure for developing the pillar industries is to 
introduce foreign investment and technology with an emphasis on 
enhancing our capability of self- reliance. After all, the 
markets for automobiles, household appliances, and other 
products in China should be filled with Chinese commodities. We 
should group outstanding talent together and strive to digest, 
assimilate, and innovate the technology that is introduced. We 
must move to the path of independent study and self-development 
as soon as possible on the basis of introducing technology from 
the outside, running joint ventures, and cooperating with 
foreign investors. 
  Making small profits with quick turnover should be an 
important principle of the development of our country's pillar 
industries. The prices of many mechanical and electronics 
products in our country are currently higher than those in the 
international market. It is true that costs are high, but the 
profit rate is also high, and this is one of the reasons behind 
blind and repeated construction. We must form a mechanism 
whereby prices are determined by the market through 
consolidating market competition, draw up a consumption policy 
in line with the new stage of economic development, abolish 
various unreasonable charges, and develop production while 
meeting market needs. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-2017 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "drchi065_n_94006" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-CHI-94-065 </AU>
Daily Report 
<DATE1>  1 Mar 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> Economic &amp; Agricultural </F>
<H3> <TI>   Regulations on Export Commodity Quotas </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Regulations on Export Commodity Quotas </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   HK0404051794 Beijing GUOJI SHANGBAO in Chinese 1 Mar 94 pp 
1-2 </F>

<F P=103> HK0404051794 </F>
<F P=104>  Beijing GUOJI SHANGBAO </F>
<F P=105>  Chinese </F>


<TEXT>
BFN 

<F P=106> [Procedures for inviting bids for export commodity quotas </F>
issued by the Ministry of Foreign Trade and Economic 
Cooperation; place and date not given: "Ministry of Foreign 
Trade and Economic Cooperation Procedures for Inviting Bids for 
Export Commodity Quotas (Trial Implementation)"] 
  [Text] Article 1. To improve and perfect the 
quota allocation system, to establish a mechanism for fair 
competition, to protect the overall interests of the state and 
the legal rights and interests of enterprises engaged in foreign 
trade, and to ensure normal order in the export business, the 
Ministry of Foreign Trade and Economic Cooperation [MOFTEC] has 
formulated these procedures for inviting bids for export 
commodity quotas on the basis of the interim provisions for the 
administration of exported commodities sanctioned by the State 
Council. 
  Article 2. In the work of inviting bids, it is 
necessary to abide by the following principles: "Fair, Open, 
Competitive, and Beneficial." 
  Article 3. These procedures are applicable to all 
export commodities on the quota list of MOFTEC. 
  Article 4. MOFTEC is responsible for the 
supervision and guidance of bidding invitations. MOFTEC 
determines the commodities for which bids are invited and set 
up. A special committee (the bidding committee) has been set up 
to administer bidding invitations for the quota of export 
commodities approved by the Ministry of Foreign Trade. The 
bidding committee is made up of the relevant division under 
MOFTEC and relevant import and export trade associations, which 
are in charge of the actual invitation of bids for commodity 
quotas. The bidding committee sets up various offices (the 
bidding offices) which handle day-to-day work in those trade 
associations. 
  Article 5. The bidding procedures stipulated here 
are bidding with compensation. That is, the enterprise which 
wins the bid gets the quotas, provided it pays accordingly. 
  The specific bidding procedures are determined by the 
bidding 
committee according to the type of commodities open for bidding. 
  Article 6. Bidding scope: Size of quota, price 
of quota. Size of quota refers to the quantity of the export 
commodity on the quota list. Price of quota refers to the 
expense (in renminbi) for each unit the winning bidder has to 
pay. The winning bidder has to pay a fee; i.e., unit price 
multiplied by the quota quantity, to the bidding committee. 
  The fee collected by the bidding committee is used entirely 
for the state's development of exports. 
  Article 7. Quantity for bidding is decided by 
MOFTEC on the basis of the previous year's actual exports of 
quota-administered commodities and the need in the international 
market. The quantity the bidding committee invited for bidding 
must be within the range of the total quantity of commodity 
decided by MOFTEC. 
  Article 8. The number of bidding invitations is 
determined by MOFTEC and the bidding committee according to the 
related situations of different commodities. In principle, each 
commodity is set for bidding twice a year. Each bidding 
invitation gives a three-month notice. 
  Article 9. Bidding invitation notices are to be 
announced by the news media designated by the bidding committee. 
  Article 10. All import and export companies that 
are members of the import and export trade association and are 
sanctioned by MOFTEC to have foreign trade management rights, 
all production enterprises that are sanctioned to have foreign 
trade management rights (restricted to their own products), and 
foreign-invested enterprises (restricted to their own products), 
may submit tenders. 
  Article 11. All enterprises that intend to enter 
a bid must complete an "Application for Entering a Bid," which 
is issued by the bidding office. This application should be 
completed and submitted to the bidding office before a set date. 
An enterprise is allowed to enter only one bid for each 
commodity. 
  Article 12. The "Application for Entering a Bid" 
must be submitted to the bidding office before the deadline 
established by the bidding committee. (It can also be sealed 
and sent by mail or by courier.) The date of receipt of the 
form determines the judgment of validity. 
  Article 13. Based on the valid applications 
submitted by enterprises, the bidding committee assesses the 
quota quantity for the above-said enterprises. 
  Article 14. The basis for assessment: 
  1. Consistent with Article 10 of these procedures. 
  2. The quota price should not be lower than the average 
price of the bidding prices offered by bidders. 
  The average quota price is calculated on the following 
formula: 
  bidders' quota price x bidding quantity 
Average Quota 
  Price = --------------------------------------- 
  total quantity of tender bidding 
  3. A copy of the certificate showing the previous year's 
export earnings related to the commodity concerned. 
  4. The Bidding Office has the right to rule out bidders 
whose offers are far from the normal standard. 
  Article 15. Requirements for winning a bid: The 
list of bidders which are able to meet the requirements in 
Article 14, and the order of the winners are decided by the 
bidding committee according to their price offers for the quota 
of the commodity. 
  Article 16. The bid-winning quantity of the 
winning bidder is calculated on the following formula: 
  Bid-Winning Quantity = 
  bidders' price X bidders' quantity 
  \ total quantity for tender offer X 
  winners' price X winners' quantity 
  If the bid-winning quantity, which is calculated according 
to 
the aforesaid formula, is larger than the actual quantity the 
winning enterprise requires, the bid-winning quantity can be 
lowered to its requirement. 
The bid-winning fee is calculated on the following formula: 
  Bid-winning fee = bidder's quantity X bidder's price 
  Article 17. The bidding committee should finish 
its evaluation of a tender offer before a set date. 
  Article 18. After the announcement of the bid 
winners, the bidding committee should send its certificate to 
the winner before a set date, report the result to MOFTEC, and 
notify the license-issuing authorities. 
  If any malpractice or violations of the stipulations in 
these 
procedures are found and proved, MOFTEC has the right to veto 
the results of the bidding. 
  Article 19. Names of bid winners are announced in 
a unified way by news media designated by the bidding committee. 
  Article 20. Basis for issuing export licenses: 
  1. Names of bid winners (bid winners for major markets are 
listed separately). 
  2. Quantity of bids won. 
  3. Contracted price for the export commodity (not less than 
coordinated price). 
  4. Country or area to which the bid-winning quota is 
applied. 
  Article 21. The bid winner may get the export 
license at the license-issuing authority upon presentation of 
the bid-winning certificate and transaction contract. The 
license-issuing authority must examine the bid-winning 
certificate issued by the bidding committee before issuing the 
export license. The license-issuing authority is not to issue 
export licenses to those who fail to produce bid-winning 
certificates or contracts which are not consistent with the 
certificates; otherwise, the license-issuing authority will be 
held responsible. 
  Article 22. If the bid winner is unable to abide 
by a contract with the foreign enterprise, it should get 
approval from the bidding office before the set date and 
transfer its quota to another enterprise. For this, it has to 
pay a transfer fee. The transfer should be held publicly in a 
place designated by the bidding committee. Priority is given 
according to the order of time and price, which are handled by 
computer. Outside transactions are strictly forbidden. The new 
bidders must be qualified to bid for such commodities, and no 
further transfer is allowed. 
  Article 23. If the bid winner is can neither 
abide by the contract with a foreign enterprise, nor transfer 
its quota to others, it should hand in the quota to the bidding 
office with a written explanation. Once the quota is handed in, 
part of the bidding fee is refunded. The returned quota will be 
added to the total quantity of the next tender offer. 
  Article 24. When the quota of the commodity is 
cleared through Customs, the enterprise concerned should hand in 
the export license of the commodity to the bidding office (one 
duplicate copy is left with the enterprise). The bidding office 
is responsible for checking and filing statistics and reporting 
the execution of the contract to the bidding committee, to 
enable the latter to manage and supervise the export commodities 
subject to bidding. 
  Article 25. If the bid winner fails to use the 
quota, to transfer it to others, or to hand it in to the bidding 
office within the time period before the set date, the bidding 
office, with the approval of the bidding committee, has the 
right to deprive this enterprise of the right to participate in 
the next year's tender bidding for the same commodity or to be a 
receiver of a transfer. 
  Article 26. If a bid winner has transferred its 
quota to others without the approval of the bidding office, it 
will be deprived of its right to participate in the next two 
years' tender bidding for the same commodity, or to be a 
receiver of a transfer. 
  Article 27. If the bid winner sets its export 
price lower than the coordinated price stipulated by the trade 
associations, this enterprise will be deprived of its rights for 
the next three years' tender bidding for the same commodity, or 
to be a receiver of a transfer. 
  Article 28. These procedures shall go into effect 
on 2 February 1994. Rights for explanation remain with MOFTEC. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-2018 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "drchi065_n_94007" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-CHI-94-065 </AU>
Daily Report 
<DATE1>  6 Apr 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> Economic &amp; Agricultural </F>
<H3> <TI>   Official Discusses Ramifications of GATT, MFN </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Official Discusses Ramifications of GATT, MFN </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   HK0404065594 Beijing CHINA DAILY (BUSINESS WEEKLY) in 
English 3-9 Apr 94 p 1 </F>

<F P=103> HK0404065594 </F>
<F P=104>  Beijing CHINA DAILY (BUSINESS WEEKLY) </F>
<F P=105>  English </F>


<TEXT>
BFN 

<F P=106> [By Wang Yong: "Denial By GATT Wouldn't Be Fatal, Moftec </F>
Official Says"] 
  [Text] With or without access to GATT, China will emerge 
as a powerful global competitor, a senior Chinese trade official 
asserts. 
  "Without GATT membership, our open policy and reform would 
continue," said Li Zhongzhou, Deputy Director General for 
International Relations at the Ministry of Foreign Trade and 
Economic Co-operation (Moftec). 
  Li made his remarks last week at an international seminar, 
"China Business Summit," that came about two weeks before China 
was to send a high-level delegation to Morocco to sign the final 
agreements of the Uruguay round of GATT talks. 
  During the 16th session of the GATT Working Party on China 
held in Geneva last month, most member nations showed support 
for China's early re-entry. Among the exceptions was the United 
States. 
  Li admitted that denial of membership in GATT would likely 
have a negative effect on trade expansion and slow down the pace 
of reform in China. 
  "However," he said, "a passive return to import substitution 
(a measure to restrict imports) in parallel with continued 
investment incentives may actually encourage greater foreign 
investment (in China) because local production would then be 
favoured over imports. 
  "The world trade community has a choice between accepting 
China as an equal trading partner by granting it GATT 
membership, or competing for access to the Chinese market on a 
reciprocal basis," he said. 
  The General Agreement on Tariffs and Trade (GATT) prefers 
multilateralism to bilateralism. 
  Li said China has made a high profile effort to regain GATT 
member status, but does not want membership at any cost. 
  "The bottom line is equal treatment," Li said. "China hopes 
to obtain unconditional most-favoured-nation (MFN) treatment 
equivalent to that accorded to all other contracting parties by 
participating in GATT. It is important to point out that this 
is the fundamental international principle applied universally, 
not a privilege as claimed by certain political arguments." 
  The United States has insisted that it will renew MFN for 
China on the condition that the Chinese Government "makes 
progress on human rights" and other issues, an approach that 
China maintains runs counter to the spirit of GATT. 
  "The entry into GATT is a crucial step to integrate the 
Chinese economy with the international community. It injects a 
dynamic factor into the world economic growth. However, this 
purely economic issue has been complicated by non-economic 
factors and the negotiation has been delayed for an unwarranted 
long period," Li said. 
  He added that the market-based pricing system has been in 
place in China, which is one of the fundamental demands of GATT. 
  He noted that certain major trading partners are taking 
advantage of China's negotiations for GATT membership to extract 
unreasonable concessions that are beyond China's ability. 
  For example, some partners demand that China eliminate all 
non- tariff measures while they themselves maintain quantitative 
restrictions on thousands of items such as textiles and 
clothing, agricultural products, consumer goods, steel and 
footwear. 
  In some of these sectors China has comparative advantages. 
  "In the case of increased protection against Chinese 
products," Li asserted, "China will be forced to reduce imports 
in order to balance its foreign trade. 
  This return to import controls, Li said, would be the second 
best choice for China if it is kept out of the world's 
multilateral trading system. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>
